United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:20:25:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is a large manufacturing company located in West Atlanta (Off of Fulton Industrial). Quality products, emphasis on customer service, technological awareness, high productivity and capital investments are the corner stone of the company’s philosophy. TRC Staffing is currently recruiting for several candidates to work in the order puller department. Experience needed: stand up and sit down forklift RF scanner gun order pullingJob duties: follow up with daily schedule on shipping department Pull parts accurately from pick list wrap and weigh load product into assigned company Hours: Monday - Thursday 7am - 5:30pm ***MUST HAVE VALID DIRVER'S LICENSE TO BE CONSIDERED FOR POSITION! INDAOS#TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Order Puller Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30336",,http://jobview.monster.com/order-puller-job-atlanta-ga-us-178595372.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),165b3781e3138a0ae5b23acb24c79f93
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:20:57:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Skilled forklift operators needed for various open positions. Multiple shifts available.Randstad Stockbridge hires and staffs forklift operators for multiple top companies throughout Clayton, South Fulton and Henry county. We are currently seeking experienced clamp, slip, reach and standard forklift operators.Working hours: Multiple Shifts AvailableSkills:Minimum Qualifications:1. Must have a minimum of 2 years forklift experience2. Must have operated a forklift within the last 6 months3. Must provide PROFESSIONAL references who can verify your forklift experience4. Must be able to pass a forklift assessmentPlease apply with your resume.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift Operator Job in Stockbridge,Full Time Employee,"Stockbridge, GA 30281",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-stockbridge-ga-us-178459689.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=4,10.50 - 12.00 $ /hour,,c9de6c836578835809a268809c7c0a21
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:20:58:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Shipping Clerk TRC Staffing is currently seeking Shipping Clerks for our client in Smyrna, GA. This employee will be responsible for orderly and efficiently, pick and ship all products. Duties: Performs shipping of all items according to instructions list FRM-75-20Ensures that current and correct items are shipped according to the orderAssists all Logistics Departments as needed.Requirements: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functionsMust have knowledge of parts and part numbersMust have knowledge of BAANAbility to pay close attention to detailsAbility to effectively organize time and multitask numerous projects at one timeAbility to work independently and as part of a teamEducation/Experience:1-2 years related experience Physical Demands: While performing the responsibilities of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, walk, stoop and bend The employee is required to use fingers and hands to package partsThe employee is regularly required to lift and move boxes with an average weight of 40 lbs. but a maximum weight of 50 lbsPersonal safety protective equipment required #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Packing & Shipping Clerk Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30082",,http://jobview.monster.com/packing-shipping-clerk-job-smyrna-ga-us-178595861.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),96a9ee22a4a034c06143e07dc0bec367
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:13:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Come work for a thriving company! Great opportunity! Must be bi-lingual in German and English.Working hours: 8:30am - 5:30pmSkills:- 2+ Customer Service Experience- MUST be bi-lingual in German and EnglishRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Bilingual Customer Service Job in Tucker,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA 30084",Wholesale Trade/Import-Export,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-customer-service-job-tucker-ga-us-178325408.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,17.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,,c8457e9eaf5f03bd30e7a0d264ae6755
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:13:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is actively looking for a Dialysis RN for a client located in the Decatur, GA area.  This position is full time and permanent! This job will have the following responsibilities:• Enforces all company approved policies and procedures, as well as regulations set forth by state and federal agencies and departments.• Maintains overall shift operation in a safe, efficient, and effective manner.• Act as a resource for other staff members.• Routinely meets with the Clinical Manager to discuss personnel and patient care status, issues, and information.• Collaborate and communicate with physicians and other members of the healthcare team to interpret, adjust, and coordinate care provided to the patient.• Provides assistance as needed to patients regarding prescription refills according to corporate policies.• Ensures all physician orders are transcribed and entered into the Medical Information system in a timely manner.• Oversees all documentation of patient information.• Maintains facility drug list for all required stock medications.• Maintains competency with all emergency operational procedures, and initiates CPR and emergency measures in the event of a cardiac and/or respiratory arrest.• Ensures verification and availability of adequate emergency equipment.• Ensures provision of appropriate vaccinations, immunizations, and annual Tuberculosis (TB) testing.• Administers medications as prescribed or in accordance with approved algorithm(s), and documents appropriate medical justification if indicated. EDUCATION:• Must be a graduate of an accredited School of Nursing.• Current appropriate RN state licensure. EXPERIENCE AND REQUIRED SKILLS:• Minimum of one-year medical-surgical nursing experience preferred.• Hemodialysis experience highly preferred.• ICU experience preferred.• Successfully complete a training course in the theory and practice of hemodialysis.• Successfully complete CPR Certification.• Provide coverage at any or all area facilities as required by management. ALL INTERESTED AND QUALIFIED CANDIADTES PLEASE SEND YOUR MOST UPDATED RESUME TO MIKE STUARD AT MSTUARD@JUDGE.COM OR CONTACT MIKE DIRECTLY AT 484.270.1817.",Dialysis RN Job in Decatur,"Full Time, Employee","Decatur, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/dialysis-rn-job-decatur-ga-us-177766105.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,27e24be5298f16f38bf4fc2713759ad0
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:13:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the Opportunity:TRC Staffing is in URGENT NEED of FORKLIFT OPERATORS to work for a local box plant in the Norcross, GA area. Our client, is one of North America’s leading manufacturers of corrugated and consumer packaging.Job Details:Must be comfortable with overtime (occasional Saturdays and Sundays)Contract to HireCore Responsibilities:• Operating a sit down forklift to move product in plant area (Brand: Hyster) • Moving paper and cardboard, need to have solid forklift skills because sometimes they move the paper without it being palletized• Safety and accuracy are key, speed is important as well • Stacking loads to be shipped out so attention to detail is necessary • Receiving product • Assisting with other general labor tasksRequirements:• Comfortable working in a plant environment • Must have 2 years of forklift experience • Must be 21 years of age• Must be able to pass a Background/Drug Screen/MVR • Ability to work in an un-air conditioned environment, hot environment #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Forklift Operator Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-norcross-ga-us-178595705.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bcd09af390355ec14dd02e5c5eae910b
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:27:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"The tax accountant position is accountable for the collection of tax-related information, reporting to taxation authorities at the federal, state, county, and local levels in a timely manner, and advising management on the tax impact of various corporate strategies.Working hours: 40Skills:At Minimum 3 years of Income Tax ExperienceQuick books Experience (MUST HAVE)Devise tax strategies to defer or eliminate tax paymentsCreate tax data collection systemsComplete required tax reporting in a timely mannerPrepare and update tax provision schedulesUpdate the company sales tax database as tax rates changeCoordinate audits by various taxation authoritiesResearch and correct process errors that caused incorrect tax filingsNegotiate with tax authorities over tax payment issuesResearch the basis for tax positions to be takenAdvise management regarding the tax impact of corporate strategiesAdvise management on the impact of new laws on tax liabilitiesCoordinate outsourced tax preparation workIdentify tax savings in prospective acquisition scenariosRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Tax Season Help Job in Roswell,Part Time Employee,"Roswell, GA 30076",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/tax-season-help-job-roswell-ga-us-178457909.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=2,,,1d8cc2a61cae55460a6b4f890b282e82
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:27:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client in Smyrna seeking qualified candidates for Manufacturing Department. Will be assembling products to prepare for shipping. Other duties assigned: Build subassembly, build the frame, install sights, ensure paperwork is correct from the subassembly to the finished product, report defective parts or questionable conditions to the department supervisor.Working hours: 1st and 2nd shiftsSkills:1-2 years related experience. Must be flexible on shift availability. Please apply with a resume to be considered. Qualified candidates will be contacted for an interview. NO PHONE CALLS PLEASE.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Assembler Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30082",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/assembler-job-smyrna-ga-us-178464697.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=14,10.00 - 10.00 $ /hour,,3c4f79ec3b17790bebb93df05f95bcf1
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:28:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company in Lithonia that specializes in packaged concrete and related products, has an opening for an industrial maintenance mechanic in Lithonia, GA. The ideal candidate will readily comply with all safety procedures and use safe work practices at all times. (lock-out / tag-out, use of PPE, etc.)Working hours: M-TH 3:30p-3am with OT on FridaySkills:Our minimum requirements are: graduation from High School and 2-5 years of verifiable industrial maintenance experience. Proven troubleshooting skills in 3 phase, control wiring, PLC-s, pneumatics, screw/belt conveyors and will be capable of welding & fabrication. This position will require overtime and some weekend work during the peak season.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Industrial Maintenance Mechanic Job in Lithonia,Full Time Employee,"Lithonia, GA 30058",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/industrial-maintenance-mechanic-job-lithonia-ga-us-178684187.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=19,24.00 - 28.00 $ /hour,,542ea92347026e8cbb62d77f8e342857
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:29:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"General Purpose: Ensures proper assembly of components for the finished product.Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Include the following, other duties may be assigned:Making sure parts are assembled accurately and in a timely manner. Point out any errors that may have been missed during manufacturing. Keeping aware of the assigned part they are working with that each piece is consistent. Keeping work station free of clutter and debris. Must be able to maintain pace to achieve designated quota. Communication with team members is essential. Will need to be able to adapt to many different size and shape parts. Keep aware of slight differences in parts that may appear similar to others. Qualifications:To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required.Skills and Abilities:· Must have good written and verbal communications skills· Must be able to work with hands and small parts· Have some computer knowledge· Basic math skills· Attention to details· Working in a fast paced environment· Previous assembly experience requiredPhysical Demands:While performing the responsibilities of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, walk, stoop and bend. The employee is required to use fingers and hands to assemble parts.Will be in a seated position throughout the shift, with the need to lift boxes up to 30 lbs from time to time. #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Assembler Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30082",,http://jobview.monster.com/assembler-job-smyrna-ga-us-178595363.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f9f96836bc01d670b5ad4937cc1fa565
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:31:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Cold Header OperatorOur client, a leading provider of semi-standard and special cold formed parts throughout North America, has an immediate opening for a Cold Header Operator in the Atlanta, GA area. Must have min 5yrs experience setting up and operating multi die headers.Detailed understanding of fastener specifications and the manufacturing process.Must be able to troubleshoot tooling issues.Must be able to work with tool makers and engineers to get parts going.Must be a team player and have a high demand for quality parts.Paid relocation; Benefits and 401K available. If you are interested, please send your confidential resume in Word format to serman@4whitetiger.com Report","Ultimate Placements Job Application for Cold Header Operator | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Stan Erman Phone 877-334-0285 x201,Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/cold-header-operator-job-atlanta-ga-us-175328531.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=19,,,7653dd3e1fae4ac14712df9c0b4c3b3c
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:39:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theLilburn area for same day auto partsdeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Partsfleet II is technology driven to help you bestmanage your business from services provided to reliable invoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Lilburn area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer.  Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Lilburn, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25366 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Lilburn,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theLilburn area for same day auto partsdeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Partsfleet II is technology driven to help you bestmanage your business from services provided to reliable invoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Lilburn area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer.  Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Lilburn, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25366 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-lilburn-ga-us-178644861.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,8d545ef2341f910ffd93e9e8c660243a
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:42:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"10 COURIER / DELIVERY DRIVERS NEEDED! COMPANY: Courier Express DELIVER MORE…MAKE MORE!  Routes currently available in various locations in Georgia. Weekly settlements with an average of $600+ to $900+! Settlements vary based on vehicle size. We are looking for 10 self-motivated individuals to join our team as an Independent Contracted Delivery Driver. Since 1985, Courier Express has been one of the largest courier service companies in the nation! Our success is simple: people and technology.Our Mission is to create transportation solutions, build logistics partnerships, and drive value – one delivery at a time! Advantages of this partnership are:·         Pride in owning your own business – we support your entrepreneurial spirit!·         $100 Million Transportation Company with Fortune 100 Clients!·         Stable book of business·         Large customer base·         Local routes with settlements every Friday! Requirements:·         Previous delivery driver experience is an advantage·         Currently own a vehicle to accommodate route size (i.e. 12-16 ft cube truck, Sprinter, cargo van, mini-van, etc.)·         21+ years old and have a driver’s license with a good driving record (no more than 2 violations in 3 years)·         Drug Screen & Clear Criminal Background Check – last 10 years·         Ability to lift and carry packages of various shapes, sizes, and weight of 50 lbs or more.·         Insurance coverage requirements of 100K/300K/50K·         Time management, sense of urgency….this is a fast-paced environment!·         Customer service focus, willing to go the extra mile with a smile!Customer service is #1  Call 678-626-4179 today and set up a meeting to fill out a pre-app.  Please leave a message if no one answers and we will get back to you.  Change your life and your wallet!  Respond online for more information today! Respond online today.​ Location: Atlanta, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 19294 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV, Cargo Van, Sprinter, 16 ft. Box Truck Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Atlanta,Temporary/Contract/Project,"10 COURIER / DELIVERY DRIVERS NEEDED! COMPANY: Courier Express DELIVER MORE…MAKE MORE!  Routes currently available in various locations in Georgia. Weekly settlements with an average of $600+ to $900+! Settlements vary based on vehicle size. We are looking for 10 self-motivated individuals to join our team as an Independent Contracted Delivery Driver. Since 1985, Courier Express has been one of the largest courier service companies in the nation! Our success is simple: people and technology.Our Mission is to create transportation solutions, build logistics partnerships, and drive value – one delivery at a time! Advantages of this partnership are:·         Pride in owning your own business – we support your entrepreneurial spirit!·         $100 Million Transportation Company with Fortune 100 Clients!·         Stable book of business·         Large customer base·         Local routes with settlements every Friday! Requirements:·         Previous delivery driver experience is an advantage·         Currently own a vehicle to accommodate route size (i.e. 12-16 ft cube truck, Sprinter, cargo van, mini-van, etc.)·         21+ years old and have a driver’s license with a good driving record (no more than 2 violations in 3 years)·         Drug Screen & Clear Criminal Background Check – last 10 years·         Ability to lift and carry packages of various shapes, sizes, and weight of 50 lbs or more.·         Insurance coverage requirements of 100K/300K/50K·         Time management, sense of urgency….this is a fast-paced environment!·         Customer service focus, willing to go the extra mile with a smile!Customer service is #1  Call 678-626-4179 today and set up a meeting to fill out a pre-app.  Please leave a message if no one answers and we will get back to you.  Change your life and your wallet!  Respond online for more information today! Respond online today.​ Location: Atlanta, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 19294 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV, Cargo Van, Sprinter, 16 ft. Box Truck Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-atlanta-ga-us-178644839.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,a023daa6935fd68922e164941a344651
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:46:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the Opportunity:Technology based company located in Norcross is hiring Repair/Update Tech.Ideal candidates will vary from entry level to experienced but will have to be technically savvy. This is a great position for those interested in IT but lacking practical work experience, especially if you are currently enrolled in classes working towards a computer related degree!Job/Position Summary:The Staging Technician is primarily responsible for the programming, loading, labeling, consolidation, and packaging, and quality inspection of new electronic hardwarewhile at the same time ensuring that all customer orders meet the promised Service Level Agreement. This position also records and communicates unique serial andprogramming data to the Project Manager on a regular basis.In addition, the Staging Technician plays a role in the quoting process by performing time trials with new projects.The Staging Technician reports to the Deployment Services Manager.Core Responsibilities:Program, load, inspect and test hardwareVerify accuracy of information during quality inspectionBundling accessoriesTag hardware assetsRecord serial id and other data in an electronic formatKit items for shipmentsCustom-label outer packaging and client-specific informationEnsure production schedule and quality standards are metEscalate all shortages, equipment, procedural and personnel problems to managementRequirements:High school diploma or equivalent, with an electronics or IT coursework from a technical institute preferred or related experience.2 years professional employment working in a repetitive, production environment.2 years of experience troubleshooting Internet connectivity or wireless data devices preferred.2 years of experience conducting quality assurance work in a production or manufacturing environment producing consumer electronic products preferred.Sense of customer urgency.Self-motivated/self-starter with sustainable drive.Highly organized and disciplined, but receptive and adaptable to changing priorities and processes.Advanced problem solving skills in client driven production environment.Passion for electronics and technology.Intermediate MS Office experience.Able to read, interpret and follow technical work instructions.Able to learn new technical information quickly and independently.Ability to work independently with minimal supervision.Extreme attention to detail with the proven ability to execute production work without defects.Able to meet deadlines and to schedule and prioritize time effectively. #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",STAGING TECHNICIAN Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",,http://jobview.monster.com/staging-technician-job-norcross-ga-us-178595614.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),15d1cf990403239462beb8b61fc58f2c
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:49:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Travel Sales Manager COMPANY SUMMARY:Holiday Systems International (HSI) is a technology company, a travel aggregator and a private client service company providing a wide variety of exclusive benefits to a niche market of select international clientele. Founded in 1993, HSI is a fast-paced rapidly growing industry leader. JOB SUMMARY:The Travel Sales Manager provides leadership, coaching and development of the Travel Sales team to ensure the efficient and profitable day to day operation of the department and the achievement of member satisfaction pursuant to company standards. PRINCIPAL RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES:Responsibilities include, but are not limited to the monitoring, mentoring and supporting of staff in all aspects of daily operations. The Travel Sales Manager will be fully focused on ensuring that the department meets or exceeds established revenue and service objectives. Provides leadership and guidance to associates, handles escalated issues and ensures extraordinary member service. The Travel Manager will use sound business judgment to resolve issues, determine the root cause and how to eliminate that issue. The Travel Manager will have in-depth knowledge of how bookings work, typical processes, best practices and strong closing skills.Oversee day to day functions of a call center team.Monitor call center statistics in order to maintain high sales and service levelsEnsure outbound call quotas are met by managing team phone activity andManages tools such as script testing, lead lists and department metrics to improve performance and coach the team.Provides ongoing coaching, training and motivation to team to ensure successReviews and analyzes actions at the end of each day, week, month, quarter and year to increase efficiencyMaintains all goals set for department and does what it takes to meet them each and every day.Identify development areas for each representative and ensure they have a productive personal development plan in placeConduct one-on-one meetings, team meetings and coaching and counseling sessions as neededReview and update productivity tools to monitor real-time and long-term performance, and to identify areas of improvementConduct performance reviews and administer disciplinary warningsCultivate and maintain relationships across multiple job groupsAnalyze, report and improve on performance, growth and salesDevelop policies, procedures and scriptsFollows all company and department policies and procedures.Services and monitors current accounts and recommends new travel vendor business relationships.Resolves problems by clarifying issues; researches and explores answers and alternative solutions; implements solutions; escalates unresolved problems.Accurately completes reports and maintains current files. QUALIFICATIONS/EXPERIENCE:Minimum of 5 years experience managing a department with both in-bound and out-bound sales representatives.Experience with a member based organization preferred.Strong management skills – staff motivation, coaching/training, achieving business objectivesDemonstrated ability to get positive results through influence, leadership, coaching and demonstration.High school diploma required and Bachelor’s degree strongly preferredExcellent communication and interpersonal skillsFlexibility and ability to quickly adapt to changeProven ability to thrive in a critical thinking environmentMultitaskingProject Management experience preferred8 years plus experience as a Travel Agent, specifically leisure Travel.Familiar with ARC reportingExpert knowledge of the Travel Industry and the ability to keep up to date with the cutting edge trends.The ability to identify and solve problems.Strong phone skills, strong computer proficiency, including typing skills and the ability to navigate through computer systems.Effective oral, interpersonal and listening skills. ",Travel Sales Manager Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee","Las Vegas, NV 89129",,http://jobview.monster.com/Travel-Sales-Manager-Job-Las-Vegas-NV-US-167046059.aspx?mescoid=4100678001001&jobPosition=2,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,eef1f5571da20aed53674932c4c29c98
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:53:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsibilities: Develop, implement, and maintain purchasing policies and practices to ensure competitive cost, highest quality, and timely delivery.Understand and articulate business market conditions as well as personal and departmental strategies as related to supplier and commodities.Develop and mentor direct reports in business professionalism, negotiation techniques, cost reduction strategy development and execution, contract development, and efficient project and time management.Develop and foster positive and mutually beneficial business relationships with suppliers.Foster a collaborative environment between purchasing and other departments and divisions to effectively manage and accomplish supply chain objectives.Monitor and report purchasing department performance measures and evaluate vendor performance.Issue and review quotes, contact vendors, and award component bids, as required.Negotiate and buy supplies, materials, equipment, software, and services consistent with cost, quality, and delivery expectations, as required.Work with other departments and divisions to develop and negotiate contractual agreements for all products. Continuously identify, measure, improve, and follow purchasing processes.Other duties as assigned. Qualifications: 2-3 years of progressive Purchasing experience in a leadership roleStrong negotiating skills and demonstrated performanceStrong writing, documentation, presentation, and speaking skillsAbility to learn new skills and assume new responsibilitiesDemonstrated ability to lead, mentor and grow purchasing personnelAbility to work cooperatively in a team environmentSoftware knowledge of RFMS Preferred",Purchasing Supervisor Job in Las Vegas,Full Time,"Las Vegas, NV 89118",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Purchasing-Supervisor-Job-Las-Vegas-NV-US-166568733.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=12,,Entry Level,7bc7b40978c022eeaeedb5320707174b
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:21:54:33,No,jobs.monster.com,Drivers: Need CDL A or B to transfer vehicles from area body plant to various locations throughout U.S.- OTR-No forced dispatch- We specialize in connecting the dots and reducing deadhead. Call Lynn at: 1-931-563-3159. Posting provided by:,Driver Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37922",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Driver-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-166443663.aspx?ch=knxnewssentinel&mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=5,,Student,ed43e3cbb5322c1e0bd7476d6d114f3d
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:22:06:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"TeamSoft is seeking a  Project Manager for the following project based in Madison, WI.This project will focus on building a mobile application to integrate our client more with social media and to provide a better digital experience. Experience with a similar project is preferred. Qualified candidates will have:5+ years of experience as a Project ManagerPMP or CAPM Certification preferredExcellent communication skills, as this position is responsible for all communication related to this project.Great leadership, decision making and teamwork skills.  *A full position description will be provided to qualified candidates.Find out why TeamSoft is the Madison area’s technology leader with over 200 IT consultants. Owned, operated, and managed by IT consultants, TeamSoft is the clear choice for your career. Join the TeamSoft family today!Did you know?TeamSoft offers salaried options for many positions that include 5 weeks PTO and great benefits!TeamSoft has been in business since 1996TeamSoft’s owners are local IT professionals who possess a wealth of experience in application development, business analysis, and project managementTeamSoft’s Recruiters are knowledgeable, friendly, and ready to help you make your next great career moveTeamSoft offers a full benefits suite to all of our W2 consultants, including a 401k plan with a 100% vested 4% dollar for dollar matchOur targeted selection process is designed to get to know your strengths and career interests and provide you with the best chance for success in your new positionOur longest running consultant has been with us for 16 yearsConsultants can participate in our charitable giving committee. To date, TeamSoft’s charitable giving committee has donated over $100,000!TeamSoft is owned by local IT professionals. Our team also has deep experience with IT staffing. Our clients understand this and rely on our expertise. That is why TeamSoft is the Madison Area’s largest privately owned IT consulting firm, with more than 200 current consultants! With over 50 active clients, TeamSoft will give you the greatest exposure to the widest range of IT careers.Our owners possess a combined 60+ years of IT consulting experience. Our recruiting and Account Management staff are very well-versed in our client markets.  We get you. We know you. We know what you do every day.  And we know what you deal with on the job.You take your career seriously and so do we. At TeamSoft you are not just a resume or number. Our goal is to create long-term partnerships with each of our consultants, and according to feedback from many of them, we are very good at this.Click HERE to see what our consultants have to say about working with TeamSoft.TeamSoft – Promote yourself!TeamSoft is an equal employment opportunity employer functioning under an Affirmative Action Plan.",Project Manager Job in Madison,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Madison, WI 53702",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Job-Madison-WI-US-166278810.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Project/Program Management,920632bb5a1b6513e08119d624742d5d
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:22:06:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Well-established firm specializing in large scale Hospitality projects such as casinos, hotels, etc seeking to hire several positions:Managing ArchitectThe successful candidate must be ""hands on"" Architect with Revit experience. This is not a people managing position.....this is a working Architect position. Core / shell experience preferred. Responsible for architectural drawings, etc. Revit Production (2 needed)Must have very strong Revit / BIM skills. Previous hospitality experience strongly preferred.  We have multiple office locations throughout the US. These positions can be based out of Las Vegas, NV or California. Please send resume and salary requirements for immediate confidential consideration. ",Architect / Revit Job in Las Vegas,Full Time,"Las Vegas, NV 89119",Architectural and Design Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Architect-Revit-Job-Las-Vegas-NV-US-167138985.aspx?mescoid=1700157001001&jobPosition=1,"75,000.00 - 150,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),def7be7ca157a90e35afc8cb8c75119e
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:22:15:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description/Purpose Of Position: Responsible for assisting with the implementation of the PI process hospital wide. Job Requirements:Description/Purpose Of Position: Responsible for assisting with the implementation of the PI process hospital wide. Minimum Qualifications: Education: Graduate of an accredited school of Nursing Experience: Three to five years clinical experience. PI or QA experience preferred. Technical Skills: Computer proficiency to include word processing, spreadsheet, and database. License/Certification: Current RN license in the state of Nevada. Other: Must be able to demonstrate the knowledge and skills necessary to provide service appropriate to the age of the patient.Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=185023&site_id=35",Performance Improvement Specialist (FT-varied) Consolidated Job in Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV 89119",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Performance-Improvement-Specialist-FT-varied-Consolidated-Job-LAS-VEGAS-NV-US-166739281.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,df77e4634102644182d532e899a9bf41
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:23:15:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hit a CareerHOME RUNWhat do you bring to the team?Are you resourceful, creative, collaborative, and energetic?If so, get off the bench and join the first string today!Call Center AgentsOur team members are offered a comprehensive benefits package that includes: 401KHealth, Dental & Vision CoverageShort and Long-Term Disability CoveragePaid Time Off (PTO)Wellness ProgramTOBACCO FREE CAMPUS • EEOApply Today!",Call Center Agents Job in Maryville,Full Time Employee,"Maryville, TN 37804",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/Call-Center-Agents-Job-Maryville-TN-US-163846030.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=6,,Customer Support/Client Care,11cfafbf56c1c171eb850afca34ef681
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:23:23:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Call center professionals with exceptional sales and customer service experience have an ideal situation to expand their knowledge of real estate and leasing with American Homes 4 Rent in Las Vegas, NV. Besides adding depth and breadth to your skills, you'll get in on the ground floor of a rapidly growing company that's unique in the industry ~ one of the nation's fastest-growing owners of single-family rental homes. You'll play a key role in customer satisfaction as you assist customers with questions about our properties. In most cases, you are the first person with whom customers will speak, so we will rely on you to build rapport, be polished and professional. Working for a stable organization in a hot industry sector means you will enjoy an environment that fosters career growth, promotions and recognition. You will also receive competitive compensation and benefits package. Your first mission will be coming up to speed on our processes, policies and procedures. Since there is no better way to learn than by doing, you will soon be responding to inbound calls from customers inquiring about our inventory of homes. You will gather information to assess customer needs introduce the benefits to our ""self service"" home viewing... the easiest and most convenient way to rent beautiful single family homes! Top candidates possess a consultative sales approach, a confident and enthusiastic personality and are problem solvers who acquire the knowledge needed to address a client's needs. You must be an excellent self-manager who is energetic, competitive and decisive, with a genuine desire to work effectively with our customers. Your drive to succeed and goal to provide a best-in-class customer experience will make you a perfect fit here. Our atmosphere is fast-paced, friendly, and collaborative. Because of our growth and call volume, you should be able to work flexible hours, including evenings, weekends and holidays; occasional overtime may be required as well. Real estate or leasing experience would be a great asset in this role and allow you to understand and speak credibly about the terms used in the industry. Requirements: High school diploma or GED required; some college preferredAt least 2 years of experience within an inbound call center settingSales experience with a proven track record of successPolished, professional communication style (written & verbal)Strong computer skills and ability to rapidly multi-taskReal Estate or Property Management experience preferredBilingual English/Spanish highly desired American Homes 4 Rent is focused on acquiring, renovating, leasing and operating residential homes. We are a primary leader in the home rental market by aggregating a diversified portfolio of quality properties in our target markets. We are providing high levels of satisfaction to our residents and becoming respected members of our communities.",Inside Sales Consultant - Call Center Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee","Las Vegas, NV 89119",BankingReal Estate/Property ManagementRental Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Inside-Sales-Consultant-Call-Center-Job-Las-Vegas-NV-US-166763969.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,15.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Sales/Retail/Business Development,9da21086502a13bdac2c20b7ae1433a8
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:23:24:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"QTI Consulting, Inc. assists our clients in maximizing their investment in human capital. Our core service areas of Compensation, Surveys and Assessments, and Performance Management & Succession Planning are focused on driving business results through improved performance of our clients' workforce. We have an opportunity available for an HR Consultant to join our Consulting team. As a member of the QTI Consulting team, this individual will assist in providing a variety of consulting services to our clients such as compensation design, total rewards analysis, performance management activities, employee engagement surveys, and human resources effectiveness assessments. Additionally, if a qualified individual brings another HR skill set and expertise, we are interested in incorporating that into the practice.Responsibilities:Advise clients by:maintaining regular contact and establishing personal rapport with current, past and potential clients;identifying, understanding, and responding to client needs;developing total talent management tools such as staff and executive compensation systems, variable pay and sales incentive programs, surveys, and/or performance and talent management systems;and collaborating with the departments and companies of The QTI Group.Manage consulting projects by facilitating client meetings and presentations, responding to client questions, managing workflow, and completing projects within budget and client expectations.Support, maintain and develop client relationship by sourcing new clients; partner with sales and marketing to follow through on leads; develop and present proposals and contracts; educate clients on QTI services, and refer clients to other QTI business units.Design solutions to meet client needs by conducting market analysis, employee interviews, job analysis activities, data analysis; creating job descriptions, salary grades and ranges; administering survey process and logistics.Conduct data analysis using spreadsheet and database applications for compensation market pricing activities,Administer various survey types, including compensation, feedback, satisfaction, engagement, etc. and interpret data/results,Research current human resources activities and stay abreast of trends in the HR marketplace,Partner with others on the team and assist in HR effectiveness assessments, total rewards analysis, design of performance management and succession planning systems, and salary structure designQualifications:We seek candidates with a Bachelor's degree in human resources, industrial relations, market research, statistics, mathematics, accounting, or a related analytical field of study and progressively more responsible, related work experience in consulting or in human resources. Demonstrated quantitative analysis abilities and experience with designing compensation systems, surveys, job description analysis and development and a strong knowledge of human resource compliance is needed. Detailed background in compensation systems including point factor, skill-based, broadbanding, variable pay, executive compensation, non-qualified plans, etc., is preferred. MBA and PHR or CCP certification preferred.Must be able to communicate well with others, both written and verbally; capable of relating to individuals at all job levels; analytical; adaptable, proficient in MS office products; detailed oriented; and must possess excellent decision-making, problem-solving skills and be proficient in MS Office products.The job level and compensation of this position will be based upon the qualifications of the successful candidate. This position can be located throughout the state of Wisconsin. Travel within driving distance is required for most client work.",Compensation Consultant Job in Madison,"Full Time, Employee","Madison, WI",Restaurant/Food ServicesOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Compensation-Consultant-Job-Madison-WI-US-166666433.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=1,,Human Resources,027fd000e08c8e0bee403d971bd84b9c
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:23:25:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Everything begins with solid communications. And in this hyper-networked world, that won't change anytime soon. So set yourself up in a promising civilian career by learning the Information Technology skills you need in the Army National Guard.Computers are essential to every division of the military. In the Army National Guard, you will learn what you need to know to maintain, process, and troubleshoot military computer systems and operations. The skills learned as an Information Technology Specialist can easily be transferred to the civilian workforce. You'll be able to work as a network support technician, data processing technician, or computer programmer in just about any company that uses computers.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for an Information Technology Specialist consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and approximately 15 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT) with classroom instruction.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHelpful attributes include an interest in working with radios, fiber optics, and transmission equipment; an ability to apply electronic principles and concepts; as well as a general understanding of math and physics. You must meet the following requirements to qualify for service:High School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekendPrograms and benefits are subject to change.",Information Technology Specialist Job in Las Vegas  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Las Vegas 89139,,http://jobview.monster.com/Information-Technology-Specialist-Job-LAS-VEGAS-166734238.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=19,,Computer/Network SecurityGeneral/Other: IT/Software Development,3736ad9e106296f781a3e1f5a9ceaf4a
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:23:53:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Role Overview: We are looking for a pragmatic, adaptable and creative HR professional to join our Las Vegas team. Reporting to the CHRO, based in Sydney (HQ), you will work as part of a truly global team with your colleagues based in the US, London and India.   You will work closely with our Centres of Excellence in Remuneration, Talent Acquisition and Organisational Development to drive strategies for 2016. You will partner with executives in the Product & Technology business (Design & Development), which consists of some of the leading tech and creative minds in gaming. You will drive with them a range of activities and programs including: Organisational change management Succession planning Talent retention and acquisition Capability enhancement Incentive scheme design Talent acquisition Leadership coaching and training facilitation Culture and engagement planning EVP creation Other responsibilities: Team management – Las Vegas, Austin, India & Sydney Global business strategy implementation HR project management   Job Requirements:Key Attributes: Ability to build strong relationships and influence leaders Can constructively challenge leadership with an improvement focus Excellent communication skills Highly organised and outcome focused  Experience: 10+ years of experience in Human Resources Experience working in a Centre of Excellence model Relevant tertiary qualification Experience working with technology and/or creative fields   Physical, Mental and Environmental Demands:  Assigned duties are accomplished primarily in an office/production setting. Must be able to maneuver around an office/production setting, work at a desk/work station and respond to written and oral cues.  Must have the manual dexterity to operate a computer and other necessary office/production equipment.  May be required to travel internationally on occasions This position may require registration with the Nevada Gaming Control Board (NGCB) and/or other gaming jurisdictions in which we operate. Click Here To Applyhttps://aristocrat.mua.hrdepartment.com/hr/ats/Posting/view/1231",VP of Human Resources - D&D Job in Las Vegas,Full Time,"Las Vegas, NV 89119","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/VP-of-Human-Resources-D-amp-D-Job-Las-Vegas-NV-US-165681492.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=20,,"Executive (SVP, VP, Department Head, etc)",100a5e6e2afb65ab558b26a7cdb4f40c
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:07:57:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Placement Type: Temp to HirePay: $11.50/hr+ ( To be determined by experience)Position: Warehouse CoordinatorExperience: 8 months of recent experience is required for considerationJob Prerequisites: Employer requires a drug screen and background check.Location: Norcross GA 30071Industry: Medical Supply General Description:Oversee and coordinate the smooth functioning of the warehouse and all freight related activities. Be accountable for the suitable receiving, handling, processing and shipping of the inventory in the warehouse. Assign tasks to and oversee workers in maintaining seamless functions in the warehouse. Responsibilities:- Receive, handle, store, process and ship goods in accordance with established procedures.- Oversee the counting, labeling, and repackaging of goods following approved procedures.- Proactively forecast daily manpower needs based on incoming and outgoing shipment schedules and other warehouse activities.- Keep accurate records of all the stock in the warehouse and conduct periodic inventory counts as determined by management.- Verify the quantity and inspect the condition of the goods in the received shipments and note any discrepancies.- Responsible for informing Purchasing of needed manufacturing aids and maintaining manufacturing aid inventory levels to support warehouse operations.- Must be able to lift 50 pounds.- Complete other assigned tasks as delegated by the supervisorCore Competencies & Skills:- Computer competency, including working knowledge of MS Office applications, with strengths in Outlook and Microsoft Excel. Some familiarization with EPS systems such as NetSuite, JD Edwards, MFGPRO preferred.- Basic understanding of lean manufacturing processes such as Just in Time (JIT), KANBAN or Pull systems.- Ability to work in a non temperature controlled environment.Working hours: 1st shift:Skills:Education, Training and Experience:--High school diploma or GED equivalent.--4 years of experience in warehouse operations (preferably in a regulated industry such as health care, medical devices or pharmaceuticals). --Some experience with pallet jacks or overhead cranes preferred.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse Coordinator - Logistics Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-coordinator-logistics-job-norcross-ga-us-178459569.aspx?mescoid=1100026001001&jobPosition=14,11.50 - 13.00 $ /hour,,db5085b643be8a36068c8a3f2deb69f3
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:07:57:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"TRC Staffing is currently in need of Machine Operators for a manufacturing organization in Smyrna, GA area. Candidates must be able to perform a variety of manual and machine functions related to frame finishing. Essential Functions: include the following. Other duties may be assigned.•Responsible for the daily production of frame finishing following the standard operating procedures to achieve the client's quality and production quotas.•Trims frames with appropriate tools to specifications.•Performs quality inspections making visual checks to assure compliance with engineering specifications; examines frames for surface defects checking for pockets, air holes, layer bonding to assure quality and durability. •Performs quality control using custom measuring equipment.•Immediately reports errors in production and performance to Manufacturing Supervisor.•Operates serial number stamping machine.•Operates CNC milling machines.•Maintains work station by cleaning equipment and work area with appropriate materials.•Assists in box assembly when needed.Qualifications/ Basic Job Requirements: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.•Must have the ability to meet daily production quotas.•Experience with cutting tools.•Ability to pay close attention to details.•Ability to work independently and as part of a team.•Must be able to perform shift work.•Must be able to work rotating shifts.Education and/or Experience: No previous training required. On-the-job training is provided Physical Demands:Work is performed while standing. The employee is required to use fingers and hands to trim the frames using appropriate tools. The employee is regularly required to lift and move boxes with an average weight of 40 lbs. but a maximum weight of 50 lbs. The employee is regularly required to work with or around oils, coolants, and cleaning solutions. Personal safety protective equipment is required. The employee must be able to work rotating shifts. #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Machine Operator Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30080",,http://jobview.monster.com/machine-operator-job-smyrna-ga-us-178595924.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a228a11e9acbda5938be2742792ecea6
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:07:58:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad is seeking a career driven, enthusiastic Recruiter/ Account Manager for our Lithia SpringsOffice. An experienced, successful B2B sales professional with the desire to build business based on hard, rewarding work is needed. As a Randstad Recruiter/ Account Manager, you can stand out based on a passionate work ethic, be part of a driven team environment, and succeed by having the desire to achieve and never give up.Benefits: - Monthly bonus based on team performance.- Medical, dental, and vision plan.- Career growth opportunity.Primary Responsibilities: The primary objective of the Recruiter/Account Manager is to expand relationships with Randstad's preferred clients by filling the maximum number of job orders for the client and gaining access to new departments. - Build, manage, qualify, and maintain a database of clients and prospects - Sell staffing services through effective phone calls and in-person visits - Sell the value of Randstad services to support customers in achieving their business goals - Effectively recruit, interview, retain, coach and develop Talent - Market the Talent's skills to the right companies to ensure the best match - Work with a unit partner to effectively manage the profitability of your business including volume, pricing, and management of days sales outstanding (DSO)Qualifications: - A minimum of three years sourcing and recruiting experience required- A bachelor's degree is strongly preferred - Is team-oriented and has strong interpersonal skills - Is deadline driven and has a sense of urgency - Is extremely organized and able to self-manage - Can take initiative and be proactiveMore information is available at the company's website,www.randstadstaffing.com.Get to know us and find out ""What More Could You Do"" at RandstadEqual Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.",Staffing Consultant Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/staffing-consultant-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178448622.aspx?mescoid=1301121002005&jobPosition=2,,,ded667e4939c16c8aa385b86ec4d3724
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:07:58:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking skilled Material Handlers and Forklift Operators for temp and temp to perm positions with a leading beverage manufacturer in the Atlanta/Hapeville areaJob seekers should:*have ability to work 40-60 hours per week*ability to perform in a physically demanding fast-paced environment*flexibility to perform and train on a variety of task*recent (within the last year) sit down forklift experience Job Duties to include:Responsible for moving product or materials in a production or warehouse environment using powered tools and vehicles. Operate industrial vehicles and equipment. Transport raw materials, full goods and/or finished goods to designated area. Load and unload designated trailers and/or route trucks. Ensure compliance with regulatory and company policies and procedures. Move product and/or materials manually as required.Working hours: All ShiftsSkills:You should submit a resume to be consideredAdditional screening (background and drug) and skill testing will be requiredPosition will pay between $12.40 and $13.00 per hour based on shift and experienceAll shift availableRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift Operator Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30354",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-atlanta-ga-us-178622236.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=7,12.40 - 13.50 $ /hour,,6ddfdd8b60175d1178be6576e2231f7b
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:07:58:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Immediate contract to hire opportunity to join a dynamic, innovative and results driven team!The Senior Quality Assurance Analyst will be responsible for the strategic and tactical execution of formal test plans and test cases for PeopleSoft conversions and upgrades. This will include developing test plans, coordinating resources, developing tests cases, and executing manual testing.Senior Quality Assurance Analyst responsibilities:• Create Test Plans and specific methodology for testing each project/effort with assistance from the Business Analyst and Development teams• Develop and maintain individual test cases for all project requirements• Review progress toward Test Plan regularly with Project Manager and/or appropriate team members (overall Test Coordination)• Maintain comprehensive product regression test suite based on project and operational initiatives• Identify and track bugs to resolution• Execute test cases• Identify and document all software defects• Track quality assurance metrics such as defect count, test results and test status• Lead, coordinate and drive all testing tasks for the defined project• Mentor & Guide QA activities (Senior Analyst)• Recommend and direct improvements to the testing and software development lifecycle (SDLC) process• Provide guidance and subject matter expertise to IT teams on QA methodologies and processesSenior Quality Assurance Analyst qualifications:• Bachelor's Degree in Business or Computer Science, or equivalent experience• 4+ years Quality Assurance experience required• 2+ years experience testing conversion projects• 4+ years working with PeopleSoft• 1+ year experience with PeopleSoft HCMFor immediate consideration apply and contact Jordan at 404-442-0472 or jordan.edwards@randstadusa.com",Senior Quality Analyst Job in Atlanta,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA 30339",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-quality-analyst-job-atlanta-ga-us-178568805.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=9,,,180b2b9aa2133b7b666bf07ff183234f
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:08:02:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionIt takes a team of highly trained professionals on the ground to help the Army National Guard maintain its flight status. If you're looking for a career in the aircraft repair and maintenance field, then join the Army National Guard and watch your future take flight.As an Aircraft Structural Repairer, you will inspect, service, and repair aircraft structural components on Army aircraft to ensure that they remain safe and ready to fly transport, patrol, and flight training missions.Plus, through your training, you will develop the skills and experience to enjoy a civilian career with aircraft manufacturers, commercial airlines, and Government agencies.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to learn. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Soldiers in the Aircraft Structural Repairer specialty consists of 10 weeks of Basic Combat Training, plus 15 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. During this time, you will learn essential Soldiering skills and refine your aircraft repair abilities in the field and the classroom.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",G Aircraft Structural Repairer Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30060",,http://jobview.monster.com/15g-aircraft-structural-repairer-job-marietta-ga-us-178121234.aspx?mescoid=4900865001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,26c402101bfee084c4e39b7a4507b056
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:08:03:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position provides dedicated support of existing customers to ensure customer satisfaction and development of strategic initiatives. This position will drive revenue growth within targeted accounts and will work with the Account Owner to ensure communication and strategy with each customer is consistent throughout the organization. This position is responsible for managing all aspects of the sales delivery cycle and lead generation process, so as to maintain and develop sales of the organization's services to prospects and customersSubject matter expert; specific sales role; project driven; exhibits technical skillsEDUCATION:- High school diploma or equivalent required- Bachelor's degree strongly preferredEXPERIENCE:- 4 years of related experience- Recent staffing sales experienceSKILLS REQUIRED: - Ability to successfully interface with clients (internal and external)- A proven track record of success at the executive and corporation officer level - Strong interpersonal and communication skills- Proven ability to work within a team environment- Ability to make decisions, take direction and execute a plan- Detail orientation with follow-through shown in previous jobs- Able to communicate with and present at the executive level- Ability to handle multiple priorities simultaneously- Ability to qualify and close deals- Sales abilities along with market knowledge and/or product/technical expertiseGet to know us and find out ""What More Could You Do"" at Randstad: https://vimeo.com/user14398035/review/78249279/e899d16cab Equal Opportunity Employer: Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.hours40+contact informationGabriel Berryemail",Account Manager Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30092",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/account-manager-job-norcross-ga-us-178447360.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=6,,,903ac51a7f53c77ea83c1c4ab6a718a7
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:09:13:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Prestigious Medical Company in Atlanta looking for Patient Scheduling Reps Prestige Staffing has been tasked by one of our best clients to find four Patient Scheduling Reps to interview and go to work ASAP! Candidate must be hard working and a self starter. If you want the opportunity to work in a rewarding and dynamic environment, this is your chance. This is a temporary to permanent position and pay is based upon experience. Requirements: At least 2 years in Healthcare Scheduling, Front Office, or Patient Access Must have customer satisfaction focused personality Must have outstanding written and verbal communication skills Healthcare experience would be preferred This is a Monday through Friday position. Only candidates with at least 2 years of experience in a Scheduling or Patient Access or Front/Back Office setting will be considered",Patient Scheduling Rep Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/patient-scheduling-rep-job-atlanta-ga-us-177552457.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=19,13.00+ /hour,Medical/Health,cad3c5b0cf23f8154134979f22e71620
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:09:18:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  718187For more information on this opportunity please contact Apex Systems @248.234.7006 or mbrinkman@apexsystemsinc.com Job Overview:The SQL Server DBA will serve as technical expert responsible for the design, architecture, implementation, administration and optimization of SQL Server database technology. Individuals in this role will research database technology, determine requirements, propose changes, and develop architecture and implementation plans to improve the reliability and performance of the OE Database ApplicationEssential Responsibilities: The GE Power Data Management team is looking for an individual to lead the design, architecture & implementation of existing OE(Operational Excellence) SQL infrastructure and propose improvements. OE is an enterprise application used to monitor the performance of 2000 turbine sites worldwide, it has a number of sub systems that interface with it, such as Optimus Data Viewer, Optimus Alarm Viewer, Proficy Historian. The data is collected from multiple sub system by the M&D application and stored in SQL Server database. This is a highly technical role for a senior DBA with excellent leadership & communication skills.In this role, you will:Monitor, resolve and implement incidents, service requests, changes and problem tickets requested by the applications teams providing hands on DBA supportEnsure that proper root cause analysis in completed on all Database Problem tickets and that solutions are implemented across the enterprise of servers.Constructs database specifications, provides fault isolation and resolution, tunes database applications for optimum performance, and implements disaster recovery and contingency plans as required by the businessResponsible for the control, integrity, and accessibility of the database file structure of one or more databases with multiple concurrent usersResearch database technologies, determine business requirements, propose changes, and develop migration and implementation plans, may execute projects based on these activitiesBasic Qualifications: Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or in “STEM” Majors (Science, Technology, Engineering and Math)Minimum of 7 additional years of experience with SQL Server as a professional DBA in a large business environmentEligibility Requirements: (Country Specific)Legal authorization to work in the U.S. is required.  We will not sponsor individuals for employment visas, now or in the future, for this job.Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a background investigation and drug screenMust be willing to do minimal travelDesired Characteristics:Technical Expertise:Administrative experience with one or more database technologies including Oracle, MSSQL, DB2 or PostgreSQLProvide consulting support to Database application teams, Solutions Architect in complex systems designProvides leadership to identify practical solutions to improve performance and availability for support applications and infrastructureAbility to influence and build consensus with other IT teams and leadership Project Management experience & proven track recordProven analytical and problem resolution skills; Quality and cost drivenProvides leadership to identify practical solutions to improve performance and availability for support applications and infrastructureBusiness Acumen:Understand key cross-functional concepts that impact the organization; is aware of business priorities and organizational dynamics.Provide technology leadership for maintaining and optimizing OE DB environment.  Experience with such as Optimus Data Viewer, Optimus Alarm Viewer, Proficy Historian and its database structure is desiredLeadership:Serve as the DBA project lead for all DBA infrastructure tasks related to PLM program / project Familiar with concepts of costing hardware and software components. Works to assure work is on-time and within budget.Delivers tasks on-time with alignment to architectural goals. Can identify and raise issues, risks and benefits.Participates in change initiatives by implementing new directions and providing appropriate information and feedback.Personal Attributes:Applies values, policies, procedures and precedent to make timely, routine decisions of limited, clear choice.Reacts open-mindedly to new perspectives or ideas. Considers different or unusual solutions.Resolves day-to-day issues related to strategy implementation. Escalates issues that impact the client and/or strategic initiatives.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",SQL DBA Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sql-dba-job-atlanta-ga-us-178685085.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),298bc1d5431358780db5b2a54b124871
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:09:20:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />Description The Transformer Field Technician is responsible for the tear down of transformers and other electrical equipment for the purpose of prepping for proper disposal.  RESPONSIBILITIES:Operates light and heavy equipment including, but not limited to: pumps, vacuum equipment, forklifts, telescopic handlers (lull), man lifts, generators etc.The ability to wear and properly use a variety of personal protective Equipment (PPE). This includes respirators, skin, face, hand and foot protection in a multiple number of combinations.Works in various temperatures indoors and outdoors in all weather conditions: including extreme heat and cold while wearing various levels of personal protective equipment.Works in atmospheres and locations with the potential for exposure to high voltage electrical equipment.Works in potentially elevated noise levels, confined spaces, including lifting in areas of low clearance. Working at elevations including working from ladders and scaffolding.Performs other duties and tasks as assigned from time to time by management and will be required by the needs of the Clean Harbors business. REQUIREMENTS:High School diploma or equivalent requiredExperience operating light to heavy equipment preferredConstruction or mechanical knowledgeAbility to work in all types of weather conditionsAbility to travel overnight 80% to different Southeast statesWHO WE ARE Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market. Headquartered in Norwell, Massachusetts, Clean Harbors has waste disposal facilities and service locations throughout the United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. We offer competitive salaries and progressive benefits including health, dental, life insurance, 401K, generous paid time off, tuition reimbursement and more. We offer a drug free work environment and require a pre-employment drug screen. All Applicants are subject to pre-employment security background checks, and some positions may require pre-employment physical fitness for duty tests.*CH Potential Applicants: We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Transformer Field Technician Job in Tucker,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/transformer-field-technician-job-tucker-ga-us-178374087.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,20066b762830b3256963103af53ff3bf
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:09:35:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"TRC has an immediate need for a Security Analyst in Dunwoody, GA. This Analyst will support the development, education, monitoring, and implementation oversight of enterprise security policies and standards. The Analyst, primary focus is administration of security governance and compliance processes and monitoring and reporting security policy and program compliance.Key Responsibilities•Provides security compliance monitoring and reporting services to the organization in coordination with Business Security Officer’s, security risk, and other security functions•Supports and assists with development, review, update and publication security policies and standards•Monitors policy deployment plan and adoption and compliance•Supports and assists with development, review, update and publication security compliance procedures•Monitors, and reports on security governance and compliance key performance indicators•Prepares and submits mandatory security program compliance reports to management, clients, and regulators•Prepares responses to internal and external inquiries about security program, compliance, and performance•Administers security governance review and approval procedures•Provides security governance oversite for projects•Provides clarification/guidance of policies and standards and their implementation•Assists in the documentation of security controls•Collaborates with other security organization members on cross-business / cross-functional opportunitiesRequirements What we are looking for: •Bachelor’s Degree (or higher) preferred (or equivalent experience) •Minimum of 3 years of relevant work experience •Management and/or advisory consulting background preferred, especially in the software, technology, and/or healthcare industries Strong analytical and problem solving skills •Working knowledge of NIST 800-53, HIPAA, ISO 2700x, and other leading industry security standards and frameworks •Knowledgeable and competent in security concepts, techniques, tools, methods and practices, and the the ability to successfully implement them in both business processes and technology. •Successful track record of working with both business and technical customers both independently and concurrently to achieve business goals and meet requirements •Communicates security concepts, objectives, and requirements in business terms •Articulates the value of security controls in reducing risk •Experience applying leading industry control frameworks •Minimal to no travel •Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Power Point) •Ability to work well independently and in a team environment •Ability to handle multiple tasks, prioritize and meet deadlines •Ability to work within a matrix organization •Excellent written and verbal communication skills •Must have ability to positively handle/manage stress, such as high work volume and frequent change •Must have flexibility and willingness to participate in the work processes of an international organization, including conference calls scheduled to accommodate global time zones. Industry Certifications (Prefer to have one from the following): •Certified in Risk and Information Security Controls (CRISC) •Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP) •Certified in the Governance of Information Technology (CGEIT) •Certified Information Security Manager (CISM) •Certified Information Systems Auditor (CISA) Please submit your resume to Dj.Burel@trcstaffing.com #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Analyst,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30346",,http://jobview.monster.com/analyst-security-compliance-wilton-job-atlanta-ga-us-178595876.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),723e023cc41506b9f76ea76a47b48540
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:09:35:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO) Job Summary: Performs and participates in the day-to-day leadership of department processes and resources to meet organizational objectives. Promotes teamwork to perform daily functions within safety guidelines and established work procedures. Under the direction of a supervisor, lead a group of associates within a department or function to successfully complete assigned duties and tasks. This position would also provide training new associates on department processes. This position is responsible for leading a team of Material Handlers in the day to day operations of a department. The Material Handler Lead will participate and direct a team using a Lean Warehousing. This position is responsible for performing department processes and safely operating equipment to complete duties Essential Functions:· Material handler leads must ensure material handlers in work group are completing task timely and accurately· May provide on-the-job training to new team members· Ensure a safe working environment· Participate in start-up activities with cross functional teams· Applies a range of experience and/or skills to meet established productivity standards· Responsible for immediately reporting to management any damage noticed, including the following: freight, office equipment, forklift equipment, and building amenities· Supports management's decision to install Teamwork and Quality in all areas of the operation· Support management in the Quality Training, development and education of all associates· Assist in the security of the building· Adhere to all Site Work Rules and General Housekeeping guidelines· Must ensure customer's needs are meet (no damage product or pallets loaded on trucks)· Completes moderately complex tasks following well-defined procedures; may involve a variety of work routines· Other duties assigned by management  Scope and Accountability:Completes moderately complex tasks following well-defined procedures; may involve a variety of work routines. Applies a range of experience and/or skills. Selects the appropriate alternatives from a variety of defined options. May provide on-the-job training to new team members. Qualification Requirements:  Knowledge:HS Diploma, or equivalent (preferred).  Skills:· Individual must be able to read and comprehend English to understand work instructions and must have the ability to work well with others with little supervision.· Must have experience in operating material handling equipment and using a RF gun.· Must portray personal accountability and be a positive citizen.· Must have team orientation and portray a commitment to task(s).· Warehouse Knowledge: Material handling equipment and storage medium, Security & Safety· Planning - Strategic and/or Tactical· Quality Management System Knowledge: LEAN warehousing, systems process / orientation· Computer Skills: experience in Microsoft Office - Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Visio, Access, knowledge of ERP systems and experience in computer based WMS technology· Communication· Leadership: personal ownership, accountability and positive corporate citizen.· Decision Making & Problem Solving: able to use systematic approach in decision-making· Team Orientation: commitment to task   Experience:3-5 years in a warehouse environment..  Physical Demands and Work Environment:  Physical Demands:While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands or finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk and hear. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 45 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk and hear. The employee is regularly required to stand or walk for extended periods of time, use hand and fingers to handle or feel tools or equipment. Specific vision abilities required by this job include, close vision, distance vision, depth perception and the ability to adjust focus and see color. Must be capable to understand and follow procedures for loading of trucks. The duties of this job are performed in both an office environment and a warehouse environment, thereby experiencing some minor to moderate level of noise due to office equipment and warehouse equipment. May require extended hours in order to meet customer's needs. Travel may be required to customer locations. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Material Handler Lead Job in Union City,"Full Time, Employee","Union City, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/material-handler-lead-job-union-city-ga-us-178653630.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=8,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e41485ea467a7d9156909bf361818404
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:09:47:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Service TechnicianCompany: Just Better Air Conditioning And Heating LLCLocation: Tempe, AZ 85282Positions: Technician (HVAC/R)Industry: Residential/Light Commercial-------------------Looking to add 2-3 HVAC Service Technicians to our team. Can you diagnose, fix and maintain air conditioning equipment? Do you have a good work ethic and can make it on time to work every day? Are you EPA certified and have a clean driving record? We want to talk to you! Work van is provided.",HVAC Service Technician Job in Tempe  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Tempe 85282,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Service-Technician-Job-Tempe-165278468.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3418ca47c1861315cc175bbf4dd9e316
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:09:47:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:   Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner. Maintains all assigned ancillary areas, department areas, and corridors with the correct preventative maintenance procedures as outlined in department policy as requested. Assists in enhancing productivity and efficient operations of the department. Promotes effective interpersonal and interdisciplinary relationships, maintaining professional conduct at all times. Demonstrates commitment to professional growth and competence by adherence to component and departmental annual training commitments. Inspects and utilizes judgment in determining which cleaning techniques outlined in orientation guidelines to follow. Demonstrated efficient and safe use of housekeeping equipment and solutions as observed by supervisor. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash and bio-hazardous materials. Thoroughly mops and vacuums floors in accordance with established guidelines. Keeps cart properly stocked with equipment and cleaning supplies; ensures all chemicals are properly labeled, and all equipment is in good working condition. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Cleans rooms, hallways, lobbies, lounges, rest rooms, corridors, elevators, stairways, and other areas. Performs all other related duties.   Qualifications Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff. Ability to respond effectively to changing demands. Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-04-29",Custodian Service Worker (FT) - Janelia Farm Research Campus Job in Ashburn,"Full Time, Employee","Ashburn, VA 20147",,http://jobview.monster.com/Custodian-Service-Worker-FT-Janelia-Farm-Research-Campus-Job-Ashburn-VA-US-165717180.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=10,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,783fa6e23a2fa0c857de984936a4103d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:09:47:14,No,jobs.monster.com,".CNC GrindersFreeport,PADirect Hire Adecco direct-hire group, a national leader in permanent placement solutions, has openings for OD/ID, Jig, Thomson and Surface Grinders. Our client is a global leader in CNC manufacturing that designs and manufactures parts for industries including: Aerospace, Automotive, Medical and Oil & Gas. Business is booming and so can your career! Job responsibilities for CNC Grinders include:Set-up and operation of various grinding equipment such as Jig Grinders, OD/ID and Surface grindersSet-up and fixturing of materialsInspecting parts prior to grinding to check for chips and/or cracksVerification that dimensions of the work piece match those of the blueprintsWorking with tolerances of +/- .0005 Successful candidates for the CNC Grinder positions will have the following:Minimum of 2 years experience in a position of similar natureKnowledge of manual and CNC grinding equipmentAbility to work 50 hour work weekHS diploma or GED required 1st and 2nd shifts available with at 20% shift differential for the 2nd shift. Pay is based on experience. Employment package includes Medical, Dental and Vision benefits; 401K w/ match; 2 weeks vacation and quarterly bonuses. To apply for this position, please send a resume to Brett Windham at brett.windham@adeccona.com Applicants may also apply by clicking “Apply Now” or by visiting our website at www.adeccousa.com Question about this position will be answered by calling 724-219-4113. Adecco, Better Work, Better Life!Equal Opportunity Employer: Women/Veterans/Disabled/Minorities Apply Online",OD/ID and Surface Grinder Job in Freeport,Employee,"Freeport, PA 16229",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/OD-ID-Surface-Grinder-Job-Freeport-PA-US-165910512.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6bb77e1061adefef658366262404cc67
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:10:15:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"WOULD YOU LIKE TO WORK FOR THE WINNING TEAM? Adirondack Basement Systems is looking to hire a highly motivated and positive Production Manager for its growing team. The person in this role is responsible for the installation of all the company’s jobs according to quality standards, job specifications, and safety regulations. This person will manage installation crews, fleet maintenance,  inventory, permits, spot check crews at job sites for quality and safety training purposes, and provide hands-on leadership and training to our production employees.The ideal candidate will have: 1) stable and verifiable experience in construction and production management; 2) proficient computer skills: 3) strong verbal and written communication skills; and 4) the proven ability to motivate, guide and direct a team to reach and even exceed business goals. This candidate will also have a bachelor’s or associate’s degree in business and at least two years of experience as a foreman in the construction, renovation, waterproofing, or related field, or an equivalent combination of education and experience to illustrate a proven track record in construction management. Adirondack Basement Systems has been helping homeowners with their basements for 18 years and is the region's largest waterproofing and foundation repair contractor.   We have an A+ rating with the BBB and are recipients of the 2010 and 2013 Torch Award for Marketplace Ethics.  We have a great family environment, and offer solid pay and benefits to our employees. For more information, please visit www.adirondackbasement.com or find us on Facebook. If you are interested, please submit your resume viaemail to resumes@adirondackbasement.com .For an inside look into what it is like to work for our company, pleasecopy and paste the following link bit.ly/fsi-production-manager intoa new browser window!",Production Manager Job in Halfmoon,Full Time,"Halfmoon, NY 12065",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Manager-Job-Halfmoon-NY-US-165423703.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=2,"50,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b9dc711ea2a32bafd1cfaeabb0a7c17b
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:10:16:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Exciting position for the right candidate.  Our company raises the bar on luxury rentals in Westchester and Rockland.  We are the new brand of luxury apartments in New York's northern suburbs, with market-leading design, amenities and services.Summary: Engages in and coordinates the repair, maintenance, and installation of machines, tools, and equipment of the building, by performing the following duties personally or through outside vendors. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned.Schedules and works with property manager to get units ready for occupancy.Reviews work orders to determine priorities and performs the work, as necessary.Manages, inputs, and closes out work order tickets in Yardi and/or Building Link management softwareSchedules repair, maintenance, and installation of machines, tools, and equipment to ensure thesmooth operation of the property. Directs maintenance activities on utility systems to provide continuous supply of heat, steam, electric power, gas, or air required for operations.Develops preventive maintenance program in conjunction with engineering and maintenance needs.Reviews maintenance reports and statistics to plan and modify maintenance activities.Inspects operating equipment for conformance with operational standards.Plans, develops, and implements new methods and procedures designed to improve operations, minimize operating costs, and effect greater utilization of labor and materials.Reviews new equipment needs and modifications with Property Manager.Requisitions tools, equipment, and supplies required for operations.Confers with management, engineering, and quality control personnel to resolve maintenance problems and recommend measures to improve operations and conditions of machines and equipment.Assists in the preparation of department budgets and monitors expenditure of funds in budget. Supervisory Responsibilities: Directly supervises contractors.  Competencies: To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:Technical Skills- Pursues training and development opportunities; Strives to continuously build knowledge and skills.Customer Service- Manages difficult or emotional customer situations; Responds promptly to customer needs; Responds to requests for service and assistance; Meets commitments.Managing People- Provides regular performance feedback; Continually works to improve supervisory skills. Qualifications: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education and/or Experience: Four to ten years related experience and/or training. Language Skills: Ability to read, analyze, and interpret technical procedures, or governmental regulations.  Ability to write reports and business correspondence.  Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public. Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to stand; walk; use hands to handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms; climb or balance; stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl and communicate or hear. The employee must regularly lift and /or move up to 50 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move 100 or more pounds.",Building Maintenance Superintendent- Rockland Job in Rockland,Full Time,"Rockland, NY",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Building-Maintenance-Superintendent-Rockland-Job-Rockland-NY-US-164428955.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=18,,,1be65cad9986564069ef1b7c234bec43
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:11:27:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"MAINTENANCE MECHANIC (MILLWRIGHT) Cement company located in Lyons CO seeks a Journeyman level Maintenance Mechanic to join their mechanical maintenance team. $27.01/Hr. FT w/benefits. Mon-Fri, 7:00 am to 3:30 pm. Some overtime is required. Please send resume to: Cemex, Inc, Fax: 303.823.2199 or email to sally.stine@cemex.com",Maintenance Mechanic Job in Lyons,,"Lyons, CO 80540",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-Lyons-CO-US-165996705.aspx?ch=dailycamera&mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=13,,,a0d04eabce00ae2d4df9e130934fd647
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:11:29:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Electronics Company in Jupiter, Florida (33458) has the following positions available:   * Part-Time and Full-Time Work Available – 25 to 40 hrs per week * $15.00 per hour   Position involves general assembly and soldering of electronics and other related tasks.   Successful applicant must possess a strong work ethic, be well organized and detail oriented.  Quality driven environment. Looking for hard working, energetic, and reliable employee.   * Apply online -- OR -- *  Apply by sending resume to:  kirs88@gmail.com or call 561-839-8127  ",Electronic Equipment Assembler Job in Jupiter,Full Time,"Jupiter, FL 33458","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/Electronic-Equipment-Assembler-Job-Jupiter-FL-166069391.aspx?mescoid=5100913001001&jobPosition=3,$15.00+ /hour,,a7c1ddfaa1f3007ab41571dfd56612f6
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:12:00:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Forms product by operating fabricating equipment.Duties: * Determines sequence of operations by studying blueprints, specifications, and work orders. * Prepares machine for production by positioning and securing dies, stops, guides, and turntables. * Regulates machining by setting and adjusting controls. * Produces parts by locating and marking reference points on workpiece with rule, compass, template, etc.; positioning or aligning workpiece against stops and guides or with die; operating equipment. * Maintains specifications by observing operations; detecting malfunctions; inspecting parts; adjusting controls; replacing dies. * Resolves production problems by altering process to meet specifications; notifying supervisor to obtain additional resources. * Ensures operation of equipment by completing preventive maintenance requirements; following manufacturer's instructions; troubleshooting malfunctions; calling for repairs. * Maintains stock inventory by checking stock to determine amount available; anticipating needed stock; placing and expediting orders for stock; verifying receipt of stock. * Maintains continuity among work teams by documenting and communicating actions, irregularities, and continuing needs. * Documents actions by completing production and quality logs. * Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Manufacturing Quality, Controls and Instrumentation, Equipment Maintenance, Manufacturing Experience, Mechanical Inspection Tools, Decision Making, Tooling, Safety Management, Problem Solving, Judgment, Job Knowledge",Machine Operator Job in North Billerica,Full Time,"North Billerica, MA 01862",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Machine-Operator-Job-North-Billerica-MA-US-165764988.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=11,12.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,,08b9a7da59b15bec404b0d659711c436
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:12:00:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Knoxville State:&nbsp;&nbsp;Tennessee Postal/Zip Code: 37914 &nbsp; Since 1947, Harrison Construction Company, an Oldcastle Materials company, has been the preferred source for ground-level site construction throughout eastern Tennessee and western North Carolina. Committed to quality, service and safety, our integrated products and services enable us to build and manage site development projects from concept through construction.&nbsp; In addition, by being a part of the Oldcastle family, we are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that come together to form Oldcastle.&nbsp; Oldcastle is the number one asphalt producer, the third-largest aggregates producer, and one of the top five ready mixed concrete producers in the United States.&nbsp; Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; &nbsp; BULLDOZER OPERATOR Tired of browsing the classifieds? Job searches unsuccessful? Look no further, HARRISON CONSTRUCTION has the perfect career opportunity waiting for you! Job Description Summary This is a highly skilled position involving the operation of heavy equipment on road, site or highway construction and paving projects. Requirements Must possess a solid understanding of all aspects of the construction industry including preparatory work, grades, drainage, job specifications, oil consistencies, compaction and other details related to grading Properly follow all company policies and OSHA regulations for safe working procedures and environment Attendance required according to company attendance policy to ensure crew is able to operate at normal efficiency level Attitude/cooperation: always maintaining courteous and professional manner with co-workers, customers and public. Physical ability to operate equipment under temperature extremes and for extended hours of time. Normal shift is 8-12 hours May oil, grease, service and make normal operating adjustments to the equipment Ability to operate or initiative to learn to operate other equipment required Ability to be flexible with last minute schedule changes, location changes, time of shift changes. Overtime work required. Out of town/county/or state work may be required Ability to follow instructions and practice safety standards per Company Safety Policy requirements Ability to adhere to PPE (personal protective equipment) policy and maintain individual PPE in a functional condition as supplied by company Requires riding to and from job sites. If operating company vehicle, employee must meet APAC Driver Qualification Standard. The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Following motions may be required: climbing, sitting, stooping, bending, squatting, lifting, stretching, driving, pushing, pulling, vibration, twisting, kneeling, throwing, reaching Vision abilities required include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision and depth perception Must be able to adapt and work in extreme weather temperatures Ability to lift up to 50 lbs for repetitious lifting while using proper lifting techniques. Will be exposed to extremes of heat or cold weather. The statements included in this job description are not intended to be all-inclusive.&nbsp; They represent typical elements and criteria necessary to successfully perform the job.&nbsp; Other duties may be assigned as required.&nbsp; Requirements for this job are subject to modification by the Company and its designees, and reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education/Experience High school degree or equivalent is preferred but not required Must have a minimum of 3 years experience operating heavy road construction equipment Ability to operate dozer to cut grade and work slopes. &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Harrison Construction Company is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer &nbsp; Harrison Construction Company is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",Bulldozer Operator Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Bulldozer-Operator-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-165563375.aspx?mescoid=5301076001001&jobPosition=15,,,a275c5806d59cb28388c4af7f3bfa944
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:12:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title: Service & Repairs ManagerCity: New KensingtonState/Province: Pennsylvania Area of Interest: Manufacturing/OperationsReports to:Vice President of OperationsScheduled Shift:1st ShiftRequisition Number: 10001092  Job Summary: Responsible for managing the day-to-day operation of a “return to depot” repair and service operation.   Directs the factory repair and calibration department, leading aa group of repair technicianswho perform routine evaluation and repair of Bacharach instrumentation returned for warranty and non-warranty maintenance, calibration and repair.Monitors and reports on key performance metrics to meet customer expectations for repair turnaround time, quality repair work and overall customer satisfaction.Principle Responsibilities:  Establishes, manages and maintains efficient workflow processes, work instructions and standard operating policies for all repair and calibration processes. Establishes, manages, promotes and maintains a safety culture for all employees, adhering to all regulatory agency and Bacharach standards.  Works with the customer base, through customer service, to evaluate and present the most cost effective solution relative to repair or replacement of an instrument within or out of warranty. Manages inventory of repair parts for the breadth of product lines serviced, including determination of last buys relative to product end-of-life. Works closely with engineering, marketing, and manufacturing on product related technical issues for new and existing products.   Reviews and makes recommendations for engineering change requests and corrective/preventative actions. Maintains warranty repair record-keeping and escalates trends and quality issues to Quality Manager.  Provides in the field and on-site Train-the Trainer training for the HVAC network of trainers, international distributor technicians and other authorized technicians. Works closely with Quality Assurance and Engineering to record and trend warranty and non-warranty repairs for design improvements.    Works closely with manufacturing relative to cross training of employees and sharing of resources to meet production schedules and work load management within the Repairs & Calibration group. Maintains and keeps accurate records relative to the sales demo pool of instruments. Facilitates product training within the group to insure that there are adequate resources to handle breadth and volume requirements.  Coordinates 3rd Party repairs through a  small group outside repair centers. Supports and adheres to company policies and procedures, attends meeting as needed to support organizational activity, interfaces with customers/vendors as required and performs other miscellaneous duties as assigned.  \\Skills and Requirements:Bachelor’s degree in a technical discipline is highly desirable.   A two year technical degree coupled with significant relevant experience may be considered. Minimum 5 years of experience manufacturing/servicing/repairing instrumentationor electromechanical product. Solid technical knowledge and understanding of test & measurement instrumentation products. Must be able to define problems, collect data, establish facts, draw valid conclusions, and demonstrate the ability to determine critical parameters. Experience working within a union environment is highly desired, but not required. Must have sound written and oral communications skills; must be able to write and understand routine reports, follow oral and written instructions, and speak effectively. Must have a high level of interpersonal skills to handle sensitive and confidential situations and material.   Position requires strong supervisory skills. Problem solving experience with ability to make sound decisions. Ability to prioritize multiple tasks and meet required timelines. Ability to handle demanding workflow in a fast-paced work environment. Team player and problem solving skills a must.     PhysicalRequirements: RThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Works in a manufacturing plant floor environment. Will have regular exposure to the plant floor, external facilities, and office areas. Ability to move throughout the plant and office areas. Alternates between sitting, standing, and moving within the work area. Must be able to manipulate equipment used in performance of tasks. Other demands include but not limited to oral, written, presentation and strong communications skills. Ability to lift 30 pounds. *Bacharach is an equal opportunity employer. Employees of Bacharach are offered a competitive wage, plus eligibility for employee bonuses;  a positive, supportive work environment; an excellent comprehensive benefits plan; opportunity for advancement and growth within the organization; challenges for learning more about the business and how to improve yourself, as well as the company; and to be part of successful and growing business.",Manufacturing Repairs and Service Manager Job in New Kensington,Full Time,"New Kensington, PA 15068","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-Repairs-Service-Manager-Job-New-Kensington-PA-US-165704391.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=16,"60,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),ce2fac42e233d468d8a2d01021ed0925
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:13:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tooling Engineer  – Rapidly Growing Manufacturing Facility Salary $70,000 – $85,000 PLUS Excellent Benefits PackageGenerous Vacation Time & Relocation Assistance A rapidly growing metal stamping, welding and assembly operation in the Southeast has an opening for a Tooling Engineer Manager who has strong tooling experience including construction, cost and design experience.  Will be working in a heavy stamping environment.  Supervising the on-boarding and launching of stamping dies and related manufacturing processes.  This facility has undergone a major expansion and still growing which gives many opportunities to grow.Location: Wonderful Southeastern community – access to the beach, great hunting, lakes, family activities, charming low-cost-of-living. Requirements for this Tooling Manager position:1.      Five plus years tooling engineering experience. Stamping operations.2.      Good oral and written communication skills3.      Ability to draw and read blueprints.  Must have CAD software experience. Apply for Position: Email resume to scott@austinallen.comOR scottATaustinallenDOTcom (please remove the capital letters and replace with proper symbols) in MS Word or PDF. **Resumes sent with a link to an Online resume or a video resume will not be considered.**  All Interview, relocation, & fee expenses paid by companies.  Excellent compensation packages, benefits, perks, and generous relocation packages.                                               Some Facts You Should Know About Austin-Allen Company...*Successfully recruiting professionals since 1973.*One of the most successful firms in the U.S.  We consistently rank in the top percentile of a large national network of Technical Recruiters.*Many of our staff are national award winning consultants with years’ experience and are C.P.C.’s (Certified Personnel Consultants). Areas of Specialization...* Engineering (All Disciplines)           * Six Sigma Black Belts* Manufacturing Management           * Human Resources* Materials / Purchasing                     * Accounting* Quality Engineers & Managers       * Distribution Visit our website at www.austinallen.com ",Tooling Engineer Job in Louisville,Full Time Employee,"Louisville, KY",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Tooling-Engineer-Job-LOUISVILLE-KY-US-165641382.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=9,"70,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Manufacturing/Production/Operations,4419f5740783faf2a4f5e3ea01fc04b9
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:19:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Start your new career with Randstad! If you are looking for work in a face paced environment this is the job for you. Randstad is currently looking for assemblers to work in a distribution center on the Northside of Jacksonville. Job responsibilities will include packing and assembling product while working on a production line. Shift: Monday - Friday 7:00 am - 3:00 pmRequirements:-- Prior distribution/warehouse assembly/packer experience-- Must be able to lift 25 lbs-- Work with a strong attention to detail-- Good communication skills-- Safety first attitude at all times-- Able to adhere to strict quality control standards -- Able to stand up to 8 hours a day--$9.50 per hour--MUST have EXCELLENT attendance -- be on time and at work everydayWorking hours: 7:00am - 3:00pmSkills:Must have 2 verifiable referencesMust be willing to submit to a background screening and drug screeningReliable TransportationPlease upload your resume in a Word document (You may additionally send your resumes via email)Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse Assembler Job in Jacksonville,Part Time,"Jacksonville, FL 32218",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Warehouse-Assembler-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-165022563.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=12,,,afbf60273a80127abbe0642eb52c06e5
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:20:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"This company is a reputable, well-established, and flourishing company that is looking to add a team oriented Production Supervisor to their team. Duties and Responsibilities:- We are looking for a self-motivated, team player with strong leadership, interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills.- This position requires candidates who are enthusiastic about progressing as the company grows.- The candidate must be able to provide direction and guidance to other team members.- Candidate will be expected to perform a variety of complicated tasks relying on experience to accomplish goals.- Candidates must be able to organize employees by communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, and evaluating job results; coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; initiating, coordinating, and enforcing systems, policies, and procedures. - Candidates must complete production plan by scheduling and assigning personnel; revising schedules; resolving problems; report results of the processing by using KPI.- Identify and reward implementation of continuous projects focused around improving safety, quality, delivery, and productivity.- Candidate will be expected to address quality issues while implementing corrective actions to eliminate defects.- Make sure all associates are held accountable to ensure expectations are achieved and sustained.- This company also offers a 401k.Working hours: M-F 3:30PM-12:30PMSalary: $40,000-$50,000 per yearPosition Requirements:--Bachelor Degree is preferred --3-5 years supervisory experience --Prior knowledge of Six Sigma is preferred --Background in Project Management is nice to havePlease contact Kalyn.fritts@randstadusa.com or 423-420-0645 and ask for Kalyn Fritts if you are interested in this position.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",nd Shift Production Supervisor Job in Sweetwater,Full Time,"Sweetwater, TN 37874",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/2nd-Shift-Production-Supervisor-Job-Sweetwater-TN-US-165022452.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=15,,,f1403a822bc235fb9134849a324342b7
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:21:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY: Responsible for the hands-on operation of automated injection/blow molding equipment in a safe and efficient manner to achieve optimal results.DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: -Efficient operation of production equipment to achieve optimal results. -Performs mechanical troubleshooting as needed.-Makes adjustments and repairs on machinery as authorized by Lead Process Technician under site guidelines of centerlining.-Monitors and performs necessary setting adjustments as authorized by Process Leader under site guidelines for centerlining.-Completes preventative maintenance requirements.-Documents all production and scrap issues.-Performs all quality assurance checks in accordance with customer specifications.-Follows all company and local work rules, safety rules and policies, BOS work instructions and SAP standards and activities.-Attends all required training sessions and team meetings.-Other job-related duties as assigned.-Related Associates degree or related experience.-Strong mathematical and analytical skills as demonstrated by pre-hire or pre-promotion screening and testing, transcripts and/or references.-Excellent interpersonal skills as demonstrated in the context of the interview process.-Strong written communication skills as demonstrated by testing, transcripts or other designated methods.https://loopapply.com/apply/62/E5EF62DF2ED1DCF18E2B005056984D64 ""> $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Process Technician Job in Jackson Center,Full Time,"Jackson Center, OH 45334",,http://jobview.monster.com/Process-Technician-Job-Jackson-Center-OH-US-165265781.aspx?mescoid=1700218001001&jobPosition=2,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e39a6dda3bf0fe593a7ded774fcfa695
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:21:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position SummaryTroubleshoot, repair and perform preventative maintenance in a safe and compliant manner on a wide variety of manufacturing equipment and utility systems. Requires strong refrigeration, mechanical, electrical, and machine controls skills. Maintain records and complete paperwork in accordance with all regulatory requirements. Improve equipment/system maintenance; develop predictive and preventative maintenance programs. Determine parts required for repairs and submit requisitions. Primary equipment to be serviced and/or operated includes but is not limited to; freeze dryers, walk-in coolers, walk-in freezers, cooling towers, chillers and vacuum pumps. Prior experience helpful but not required on all equipment.Working hours: 0700 to 1530Skills:Entry and Mid level candidates are encouraged to apply!Trouble shoot and repair equipment as assigned by Maintenance Team Lead in a safe and compliant manner as needed to meet the production schedule while maintaining the established validated state of the equipment and/or systemPerform preventive maintenance (PMs) per schedule and established tasks instructionsIdentify and procure parts to perform repairs with consideration to maintaining the validated state of the equipment or systemDocument repairs and preventive maintenance work in the computer maintenance management system (CMMS) and log books where applicableUnderstand Site SOPs and cGMPs relative to the position and work within compliance of those standardsEducation and ExperienceRequired: High School diploma or GED and Two years' experience in the refrigeration/mechanical fields.Preferred: Associates degree from an accredited technical/trade school in refrigeration/HVAC field with 2 years industrial experience.Technical Skills and CompetenciesHave a working knowledge of and be able to safely and competently operate hand and power toolsStrong communication skills, both oral and written.Demonstrated ability to interact with and positively influence internal and external work groups.Strong organizational skills.Highly motivated with a strong work ethic.Ability to interpret blueprints and schematics.Valid drivers' license may be required.Computer literacy in MS Word, MS Excel, MS Outlook, MS Access and the CMMS.Ability to work flexible hours including work week, weekend, holidays, overtime and ""on-call"" duties.Ability to distinguish colors associated with mechanical and electrical craft work.Physical Position RequirementsOccasionally lifts up to 50 lbs.May be exposed to temperature variations, and may work in noisy and unconditioned areas. Prolonged standing, crouching, sitting, walking and climbing may be part of the candidate's daily routine.Hours: 7am - 3:30pmRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Industrial Refrigeration Maintenance / Commercial HVAC Tech Job in Lincoln,Full Time Employee,"Lincoln, NE 68521",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Refrigeration-Maintenance-Commercial-HVAC-Tech-Job-Lincoln-NE-US-165425820.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=19,24.00 - 29.00 $ /hour,,0b559a739186d9aeb2c740e7c7026cf1
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:26:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Laser Operator 2nd shift Location: Devens, MA Type: Contract To HirePay Rate Max: $17.60 USD Job Description:LASER OPERATOR (2nd Shift)  PR: 17.60 We are seeking a Laser Operator with exceptional work ethics to fill our current 2nd shift opening in our Metal Fabrication Department, 3:45 p.m. - 12:15 a.m., Monday - Friday.   The qualified candidates must be able work from written and verbal instructions under minimal supervision.    The employee will be responsible for loading, operating, and producing metal parts.  The main emphasis for this position is laser operation; however, other duties may include other sheet metal projects and general maintenance of Sealed Air production equipment TPM. Specific Responsibilities Include: • Set-up the laser to cut scheduled work orders.• Load raw materials onto laser and remove parts.• Check raw materials and parts for accuracy using appropriate measuring devices.• Troubleshoot and make adjustments as necessary.• Ensure tasks are executed in the most effective manner in regards to time, cost and function.• Show top notch craftsmanship in all aspects of job and produce high quality parts.• Take direction and learn under Second Shift Supervisor, Fabrication Manager, and Director of Manufacturing.• Strive for ongoing self-improvement through additional training.• 5-S and Lean Projects as assigned.• Calculates and sets controls to regulate machining factors such as speed, feeds, gasses, or enters commands to retrieve, input, or edit computerized machine control media.• Sets up and operates machine on trial run to verify accuracy of machine settings or programmed control data.Verify conformance of finished work piece to specifications.• Keep work space in a neat and organized order.• Maintain safe operations by adhering to safety procedures and regulations.• Other duties as assigned. Skills and Experience • 1 year minimum experience in laser operation.• 2 years of relevant sheet metal fabrication experience.• Experience working with Cold Roll, Aluminum, and Stainless Steel.• Ability to interpret engineering drawings (blueprints) and work orders to develop sheet metal parts from specifications.• Ability to use measuring instruments including, but not limited to, calipers, indicators, and scales.• Ability to operate a forklift.• Must be able to lift up to 50 lbs.• Positive attitude and team player.",Laser Operator Job in Ayer,Full Time,"Ayer, MA",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Laser-Operator-Job-Ayer-MA-US-165182327.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=15,17.60 - 17.60 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),c2aad777cdbf9b17f51b5d43a8b83018
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:29:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"EXPERIENCE CENTER SALES ASSOCIATE We are conducting Open Interviews and we would love to meet you on Wednesday, April 20th from 10:00am – 3:00pmin our showroom located at13500 Bel-Red RoadSuite 1Bellevue, WA 98005 Candidates are interviewed on a first come first serve basis. There is no need to set up an appointment but please bring a copy of your resume and be prepared to discuss this exciting opportunity. Our 12 Experience Centers bring the Miele message and core value of “Forever Better” to life. As our chief brand ambassadors, Experience Center Sales Associates are essential to delivering customer service that offers an exceptional shopping experience and drives sales results. The Miele Experience Center Sales Associate is friendly, full of positive energy, has an entrepreneurial spirit and is driven to provide the highest levels of customer service.   Essential Functions   Sales Generation and Client Management Meeting and greeting all clients as they enter the Miele Experience Center and welcoming them by offering coffee or water. Reception desk duties including answering phones, maintaining visitor logs, data entry, responding to email, and maintaining a professional reception area. Work with walk in clients and by appointment to provide personal service and maintain close relationships with consumer or B2B clientele. Manage existing and future clients/accounts to develop leads, initiate relationships and ensure repeat business and referrals. Responsible for achieving personal sales goals and team goals. Use Customer Relationship Management systems and technology to support the development of a loyal customer base and achieve the highest quality of customer profile capture with every transaction. Enter sales quotes and orders within company computer systems. Proactively develop a high level of product knowledge and expertise on Miele appliances and floorcare by attending training sessions, reading catalogs and manuals, and through self-guided training. Demonstrate enthusiasm for the brand and able to effectively communicate company and product features and benefits to clients. Participate in all areas of the operation of the Experience Center including, processing sales, assisting with stock management and replenishment, conducting physical inventory, maintaining demonstration and live appliances in pristine condition, and maintaining good housekeeping standards throughout the selling areas and demonstration kitchen. Events and Cooking Demonstrations       Must be proficient in demonstrating product features and benefits on both live and demo appliances.       Ability to speak comfortably in front of groups to present trainings and classes.       Participate in all tasks related to event preparation and execution, including, food handling, event set up, cleaning, loading and unloading dishwashers, setting and clearing tables, handling laundry, and acting as serving staff.       Experience Center Sales Associates provide appliance and cooking technique training and education to clients through demonstrations in the Center, at client’s homes, or at dealer locations. Qualifications          Previous sales experience in retail, design, or luxury retail preferred           Strong initiative and ability to work without constant direction           Goal oriented. Ability to stay focused on creating winning results           Strong multi-tasking skills and ability to  work in a fast-paced retail environment           Strong understanding of customer service needs and priorities and willingness to  “go above and beyond” in meeting client expectations.           Friendly, enthusiastic and outgoing manner in interacting with clients and coworkers.           Ability to communicate effectively and clearly with clients and coworkers in person,  via phone and email.           Comfortable working within the demonstration kitchen and being hands-on with food preparation and kitchen duties.           Strong initiative and time management skills.  Ability to work without constant direction.           Ability to prioritize multiple tasks and work in a fast-paced retail environment.           PC proficiency, Outlook, MS Word and Excel and ability to learn new computer applications.           Professional image in personal appearance, manner, and demeanor.           Ability to work non-traditional hours, including days, nights, weekends and holidays.           Flexibility to perform different tasks based on day-to-day business needs.          Able to stand for long periods of time, bend, kneel and use a step stool or ladder to  reach overhead objects.           Able to lift 25 lbs.           A high school diploma is required. Interested candidates that possess dedication, the skills to exceed our customer’s expectations as detailed herein and the drive to join a growing appliance brand are encouraged to apply online at www.mieleusa.com. ABOUT MIELE There are few brands in the world that have sustained their vision, traditions and high-quality standard for more than a century. Fewer still that can claim consistent family ownership and international brand name integrity. And only one that is recognized for creating the world's most innovative appliances.  Founded in Germany in 1899 with a single promise of Immer Besser, a phrase meaning Forever better, Miele has dynamically grown to become the world's largest family-owned and operated appliance company with over 16,600 employees, 12 production facilities, representation in nearly 100 countries and annual turnover of USD$3.62bn (2009/10). As a premium appliance brand represented on all continents, Miele is steadfastly committed to the highest quality, performance and environmental standards. The company's innovative heritage, state-of-the-art design and engineering aesthetic have inspired comparison to other powerhouse German brands synonymous with innovation: Mercedes-Benz and BMW. Miele's range of exceptional consumer appliances included: vacuum cleaners; laundry systems; rotary irons; dishwashers; built-in convection, speed, steam and combi-steam ovens; cooktops; ventilation hoods; refrigeration; wine storage and coffee systems. Additionally, Miele Professional (the commercial product division) offers dishwashers, washing machines, tumble dryers and rotary irons for commercial use as well as washer-disinfectors for medical, dental and laboratory applications. To research further, we invite you to visit mieleusa.com for complete and detailed product information or miele-sustainability.com for our public communication regarding Miele’s commitment to our environment and its employees. Miele is an Equal Opportunity Employer and supports and enforces a drug-free workplace.  EOE/AA:M/F/D/V  ",Showroom Associate - Open Interviews Job in Seattle,Full Time Employee,"Seattle, WA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Showroom-Associate-Open-Interviews-Job-Seattle-WA-US-165706782.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=10,,General/Other: Production/Operations,3cb6e075f388cbb91886aa71bbb41648
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:35:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Judge Group is seeking a Packaging Design Engineer for a Consumer Products  manufacturing company in Massachusetts.  The qualified individual will be responsible development & implementation of packaging designs. This position will have direct responsibility for packaging design, cost analysis, packaging drawing review, and managing project schedules.Must have experience in Packaging design and related software:NX, CAD, AutoCAD, JD EdwardsResponsibilities:•     Ensures all packaging materials are produced in a cost effective manner•     Improves packaging functionality•     Creates and communicates packaging specification with manufacturing team•     Identify and apply cost saving opportunities•     Leads packaging projects for new products•     Works with corporate brands, vendors and food technologists to ensure quality and innovation•     Remains current with packaging technologies and materialsRequirements:•     Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering (Packaging Engineering degreed HIGHLY preferred)•     3 Plus years’ experience in a manufacturing/packaging environment•     Ability to carry out and design experiments with statistical applicability•     Works well independently•      Ability to travel up to 30%Salary: $70,000-$80,000 plus strong bonus and relocation assistance!**QUALIFIED APPLICANTS SHOULD APPLY TO BSD@JUDGE.COM  !**",Packaging Design Engineer Job in Haverhill,"Full Time, Employee","Haverhill, MA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Packaging-Design-Engineer-Job-Haverhill-MA-US-165303334.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=1,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,b1a6a22568f855a12dd9be1c12a84615
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:40:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"  POSITION DESCRIPTION  POSITION: Operations & Maintenance Manager EFFECTIVE DATE:  April 2016                         COMPANY:   Kingsburg, L.P.  PRIMARY PURPOSE: The O&M Manager is responsible for providing leadership along with daily oversight, direction, and guidance to operations and maintenance within the plant. Assist the Plant Manager in ensuring achievement of key operating objectives in the areas of employee safety, employee relations, environmental, profitability, unit availability, efficiency, equipment safety and reliability in full compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, polices, and procedures.  In addition, provide specialized knowledge, skills, and oversight of day-to-day plant functions. The Kingsburg facility is a natural gas-fired combined cycle cogeneration facility located in Kingsburg, CA.    Duties and Responsibilities: Assist Plant Manager in providing oversight of and direction to all mission critical programs andprocesses such as performance management, outage management, project management, asset integrity and financial management. Ensure high plant reliability and overall cost competitiveness, without compromise to employee safety or environmental commitments.Support and emphasize importance of safety and environmental programs and ensure regulatory compliance. Ensure the safety of all employees of the facility through elimination of injuries to employees, contractors and visitors.Interface with regulatory, political, business, civic and public representatives.Ensure the plants are operated and maintained in compliance with all NERC and WECC regional standards including performing self-certifications and audits.Identify all permit requirements and ensure the applicable testing is performed and proper information is provided for renewing the permits as required by jurisdictional regulatory agencies.Assist in the development and administration of the operating budget.Prepare, maintain and provide a variety of reports/documents as required or upon request. Qualify operators as O & M Technician I for the plants and ensure all operators maintain proficiency in safely operating the plants.Fill in as plant operator as needed, including start-up and shutdown. Respond to plant trips and upsets as required.Create and support an organizational culture that encourages and rewards employee involvement, innovative thinking, adaptation to change, responsible risk taking, and continuous improvement.Promote productivity and teamwork with open communication, timely decision making, and use of leadership skills to set high standards of performance, while providing the direction necessary to achieve performance. Establish responsibilities, goals and expectations of assigned employees. Monitor and provide feedback to employees to ensure daily production activities support plant goals. Work under limited to no supervision. Independently prioritizes and executes responsibilities. Provide management direction in the absence of the Plant Manager.   Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: Knowledge of operation and maintenance of gas & steam turbines, electrical generators and heat recovery steam generators.Maintain the highest standards of conduct and integrity in all dealings with or on behalf of SWG at all levels inside and outside the organization. Ability to lead, coach, and guide employees and understand the importance of positive employee relations. Excellent writing and presentation skills, verbal skills that are persuasive, and the ability to promote business initiatives. Ability to plan, organize, schedule, and direct varied programs and tasks involved within the operations and maintenance functions. Must be able to read and understand control logistic diagrams, P&IDs, and other technical material pertinent to power plant operation and maintenance. Ability to obtain and apply knowledge of competitive business practices in daily work activities and decision making. Excellent troubleshooting skills.Ability to anticipate and accept changes in the organization and adapt to meet new requirements.  Excellent organizational skills with attention to detail, accuracy, and timeliness. Ability to demonstrate advanced computer knowledge of Word, Excel, Power Point and various other programs.Ability to follow both verbal and written instructions. Ability to exercise good judgment and make sound decisions.  Education and Experience: Minimum of a Bachelor’s degree in an engineering or related technical discipline.Minimum of 7 years experience in power generation field or exceptional work or military experience in a related technical field may substitute for the degree.Previous second-line supervisory experience (i.e. Assistant Plant Manager, O&M manager, O&M Supervisor) is preferred. Physical Demands: Must be able to accomplish physical requirements with or without reasonable accommodation. Employee will be required to adhere to large amounts of standing, walking, bending, squatting, and lifting. May be required to lift, carry, and move up to 50 lbs. Will use arms and hands to signal, grab, hold, turn, push, and pull: objects, materials, controls and tools. Will occasionally work at heights, climb ladders, stairways, and work off of platforms. Will use vision abilities to focus, see short and long distances, colors, depth perception and peripheral vision. Will be required to wear personal protective equipment (PPE) including but not limited to: hard hat, safety glasses/goggles, ear plugs/muffs, masks/respirators, safety vests, gloves and steel-toe boots. Able to hear (at some dB limit of loss) in order to hear plant alarms, equipment condition, and to receive oral instructions.Able to see to determine plant operating conditions and to avoid safety hazards. Working Environment: Work is generally performed inside the power plant, but may work in all weather conditions ranging from warm/hot - cool/cold. Occasional rain. Noise levels will be moderate to high. Job site will contain light to heavy equipment vehicles, small to large equipment, materials, communication equipment and tools. People standing, walking, sitting, signaling and talking. Bells, whistles and alarms.         AAP/EEO Statement: Southwest Generation does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, genetic information, protected veteran status or any other status protected by law or regulation. We are an Affirmative Action Employer, Veterans, Disabled. It is our intention that all qualified applicants be given equal opportunity and that selection decisions are based on job-related factors.  Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.   ",Operations & Maintenance Manager Job in Kingsburg,Full Time,"Kingsburg, CA",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Operations-Maintenance-Manager-Job-Kingsburg-CA-US-165821593.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=4,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),97de17257ef8ac4c8f2e55de420f5795
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:47:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"·         Arrives at work locations on time, demonstrates a considerate, friendly and constructive attitude towards fellow employees and customers.·         Ensure pre shift toolbox meetings are conducted and documented.·         Responsible for coordinating daily weekend work schedules, notification of management if behind schedule, and participate in counter measure activity to get back on schedule. ·         Ensure all equipment inspection logs are completed properly.·         Ensure all safety observations are completed, thorough, and submitted on time.·         Ensures that all safety practices are being followed and comply with all MPW, TMMK and OSHA standards, LOTO, Confined Space, Fall Protection, etc.·         Train employees on tasks, how to perform, safety procedures, and quality standards.·         Responsible for ensuring the completion and the quality of all tasks performed and to maintain or exceed the quality and safety expectations of the customer. ·         Performs supervision in an efficient and safe manner as directed by Operations/Account Manager. ·         Responsible for reviewing the consistency of disciplinary practices for Team Leaders and Team Members.·         Responsible for reporting to and coordinating with the Operations/Account Manager to maintain inventory needs.·         Check supply inventory weekly and submit material order request to Operations Manager weekly.·         Responsible for working and coordinating with the management in regards to daily activities.·         Responsible for working closely with management in accessing future manpower requirements and work schedules. ·         Responsible for shift communication, leading the discussion of any related topics, safety, operations, and human resources.   ·          Responsible for identifying, analyzing and resolving operational based problems related to productivity, quality, and safety. ·         Responsible for administrative tasks, which include documenting attendance, work completed, work not completed, shift turnover meetings, and reporting to Operations/Account Manager on work status, safety, performance, equipment and issues.  ·         Responsible for reporting and completing all documentation on any and all Incidents, Accidents, and Near misses to Safety/Management immediately.·         Ensure all environmental policies, and waste disposal requirements are followed. ·         Ensure FMDS standards are sustained.  ·         Ensures subordinates keep work area/break areas in the cleanest possible condition.·         Understands and adheres to all information located in the employee handbook.·         Update and maintain any/all visual management boards.",Paint Supervisor Job in Georgetown,Full Time,"Georgetown, KY 40324",MPW Industrial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Paint-Supervisor-Job-Georgetown-KY-US-165778821.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),2910712f6e1039f9dd432bf67efc089d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:54:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; &nbsp; City:&nbsp; AberdeenState:&nbsp; North CarolinaPostal/Zip Code: 28315 &nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden, a division of Oldcastle, is one of the largest manufacturers of bagged and bulk decorative mulch, soil, stone, and limestone products in the nation with over 40 production facilities.&nbsp; We take pride in serving a diverse group of customers including independent garden centers, mass retailers, landscapers, contractors, and homeowners. &nbsp; Job Summary &nbsp; Responsible for assisting designated machine operator or production team in a variety of functions including, but not limited to maintenance, clean up, yard work, warehouse, production, utilities, material handling and other. Manually move freight, stock, or raw materials and finished materials or perform other general labor. Includes all manual laborers not elsewhere classified. &nbsp; Essential Duties and Responsibilities &nbsp; General &nbsp; Handles assignments in a repetitive and/or sequential order for completing tasks assigned Keeps work area clean Uses personal protection equipment at all times and follows all safety regulations Report any unsafe conditions or defective equipment to the supervisor immediately Must attend weekly safety meetings &nbsp; Clean-Up &nbsp; Clean-up to keep of machinery and maintain the surrounding area keeping them free of debris up during down time Cleans machines and conveyors Cleans floors and picks up reusable scrap for salvage Transport trash and debris away from production areas Responsible for keeping pallets neat and orderly &nbsp; Utility / Production &nbsp; Operates machinery or equipment as trained and instructed following safety guidelines at all times Assists lead operator in preparing for shift production Work closely with the lead operator and become knowledgeable of the mechanics and operation machine in which you assist May be required to work with conveyors, ramps, elevators, etc. as assigned May be required to operate equipment such as hoppers, bagging and sealer machines, forklift, palletizers, hydraulic equipment, powered tractors or vehicles, among other.&nbsp; Internal certification/training is required for these tasks Operate a variety of hand tools &nbsp; Yard / Warehouse &nbsp; Assists in the loading/unloading of trucks Assists in completing shipping/receiving documents Packages and labels products properly Handle stockpiles Verify loads leaving the premises Maintain, verify and count product inventory Other duties and responsibilities related to the nature of the job may be assigned on a temporary or permanent basis as needed. &nbsp; Requirements / Education / Experience &nbsp; Previous production experience preferred Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out detailed but uninvolved written or oral instructions Ability to follow company production and safety procedures Ability to read a limited number of two and three syllable words and recognize similarities and differences between words and between series of numbers Able to pass internal certification training Ability to print and speak simple sentences Ability to add and subtract two digit numbers and to multiply and divide 10’s and 100’s Must be able to demonstrate lock out tag out procedures Must keep key lock with self at all times Must attend weekly safety meetings &nbsp; Physical Requirements &nbsp; While performing the duties of this job the employee will be required to frequently stand on their feet for extended periods of time Must have the ability to lift and/or move up to 50 lbs. from ground level &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You &nbsp; Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive benefits&nbsp;programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and advancement &nbsp; About Oldcastle &nbsp; Oldcastle is the leading North American manufacturer of building products. With over 2,000 locations and 30,000 employees, we are a proud reflection of many small to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. We provide a decentralized, entrepreneurial environment, where decisions at all levels drive performance. Each of our businesses works with great autonomy to service their local markets, while leveraging the group’s resources and best practices. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to work and grow! Take charge of your career and leverage the network of resources and growth opportunities. If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today. Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. &nbsp; EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",Production Labor / Bag Line - Aberdeen,Full Time Employee,"Aberdeen, NC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Labor-Bag-Line-Aberdeen-NC-Job-Aberdeen-NC-US-165563535.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=12,,,4904528ee2ba1b8c95b9b9686a581c60
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:13:59:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Knoxville State:&nbsp;&nbsp;Tennessee Postal/Zip Code: 37914 &nbsp; Since 1947, Harrison Construction Company, an Oldcastle Materials company, has been the preferred source for ground-level site construction throughout eastern Tennessee and western North Carolina. Committed to quality, service and safety, our integrated products and services enable us to build and manage site development projects from concept through construction.&nbsp; In addition, by being a part of the Oldcastle family, we are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that come together to form Oldcastle.&nbsp; Oldcastle is the number one asphalt producer, the third-largest aggregates producer, and one of the top five ready mixed concrete producers in the United States.&nbsp; Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; &nbsp; TRACKHOE OPERATOR Tired of browsing the classifieds? Job searches unsuccessful? Look no further, HARRISON CONSTRUCTION&nbsp;has the perfect career opportunity waiting for you! &nbsp; Job Description Summary This is a highly skilled position involving the operation of heavy equipment on road, site or highway construction and paving projects. Requirements Must possess a solid understanding of all aspects of the construction industry including preparatory work, grades, drainage, job specifications, oil consistencies, compaction and other details related to grading Properly follow all company policies and OSHA regulations for safe working procedures and environment Attendance required according to company attendance policy to ensure crew is able to operate at normal efficiency level Attitude/cooperation: always maintaining courteous and professional manner with co-workers, customers and public. Physical ability to operate equipment under temperature extremes and for extended hours of time. Normal shift is 8-12 hours May oil, grease, service and make normal operating adjustments to the equipment Ability to operate or initiative to learn to operate other equipment required Ideal candidate will have the ability to run other equipment like dump truck, loaders and other various equipment. Ability to be flexible with last minute schedule changes, location changes, time of shift changes. Overtime work required. Out of town/county/or state work may be required Ability to follow instructions and practice safety standards per Company Safety Policy requirements Ability to adhere to PPE (personal protective equipment) policy and maintain individual PPE in a functional condition as supplied by company Requires riding to and from job sites. If operating company vehicle, employee must meet APAC Driver Qualification Standard. The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Following motions may be required: climbing, sitting, stooping, bending, squatting, lifting, stretching, driving, pushing, pulling, vibration, twisting, kneeling, throwing, reaching Vision abilities required include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision and depth perception Must be able to adapt and work in extreme weather temperatures Ability to lift up to 50 lbs for repetitious lifting while using proper lifting techniques. Will be exposed to extremes of heat or cold weather. The statements included in this job description are not intended to be all-inclusive.&nbsp; They represent typical elements and criteria necessary to successfully perform the job.&nbsp; Other duties may be assigned as required.&nbsp; Requirements for this job are subject to modification by the Company and its designees, and reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education/Experience High school degree or equivalent is preferred but not required Must have a minimum of 3 years experience operating heavy road construction equipment Experience in laying stone drainage and cutting grade. &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Harrison Construction Company is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer &nbsp; Harrison Construction Company is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",Trackhoe Operator Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Trackhoe-Operator-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-165563385.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,,3025da22000c5eb4577ad02dc74ec88d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:14:07:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Manufacturing Maintenance MechanicLocation: Ayer, MAPosition: 2nd & 3rd Shifts AvailablePay Rate: $25-$30.00/HourResponsible for the installation, set-up, maintenance, and repair of all equipment in the facility.Must be proficient in electrical troubleshooting and control to correctly resolve issues both mechanical and electricalMust be able to design and fabricate temp/perm parts for systemsExperience with PM programs and major repairsWill have the knowledge and ability to follow and work from blueprints, sketches, verbal instructions and/or written work orders with minimal supervision.Will have the ability and working maintenance knowledge of machine repair, welding, machine shop equipment, electrical, hydraulic, pneumatic and pumps.Will understand, sign and conform to written power lockout/tagout procedures.Will perform basic mathematical functions.Will keep legible and accurate maintenance records.Will read and follow verbal and written instructions and company-posted work and safety policies, procedures and programs.Will work in all areas of the facility, both inside and outside, and on all floors in the facility",Manufacturing Maintenance Mechanic Job in Acton,,"Acton, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-Acton-MA-US-165561208.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=11,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e597e1dae49a59f3f5d3dd24d044c16b
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:22:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES: Read and interpret job information on order to determine bindery operation and specification to be performed. Sets up and operates most entry level bindery equipment including but not limited to: drill punch, folder, collators, off-line numbering machines, paper cutter, padding press and poly wrapper as required. Makes a continuous quality check throughout operations .Insert completed quality check throughout operation. Insert completed product into boxes. May use various methods and equipment for counting, spooning, padding, etc. Performs kitting or fulfillment functions that involve assembling different materials into open item as per customer specifications. Checks over quality checklist from previous departments to ensure consistent and accurate information before running order. Performs basic shipping and receiving duties.ADDITIONAL RESPONSIBILITIES: Ensure that all operations are carried out at the minimum cost consistent with quality standards. Maintains a high degree of employee motivation and morale, departmental and interdepartmental cooperation. Maintains and complies with policies, procedures and practices relating to operations of the plant. Must be able to work out side normal working hours to accommodate production needs when required. Keeps current with rapidly changing technology associated with our requirements. Ensures that all related equipment is in proper operating condition. Assists others as production needs require. QUALIFICATIONS: Previous printing, bindery, production, or shipping experience preferred. Requires basic math and reading ability and manual dexterity. High School Education/G.E.D. required.We work with equipment that requires, folding, score, stapling, cutting & other things.Shift1st Shift - Standard HoursShift Hours7am-3pm.Interested candidates should apply with a copy of their resumes.",Bindery Operator Job in Grove City,Full Time,"Grove City, OH 43123",,http://jobview.monster.com/Bindery-Operator-Job-Grove-City-OH-US-165287402.aspx?mescoid=5100959001001&jobPosition=19,10.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,,cc810cb990e64a7f5a192c804bba5a42
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:22:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Read productionschedule, work order, or shipping order to determine items to be moved,gathered, or distributed and provide materials to work stations to supportcontinuous production.  Verify andload/unload materials to or from pallets, trays, racks, and shelves to conveymaterials from storage or work areas to designated fabrication or storageareas.Load materialsinto vehicles and secure all items to prevent shifting or damage during transitto destination.Assemble customerorders from stock and place orders on pallets or shelves, or convey orders toshipping department to expedite the movement of product to meet customerrequirements and specifications.Record amounts ofmaterials received or distributed into the production system to assist inmaintaining accurate inventory records.Safely operateand maintain industrial lift truck to assist in loading or moving materials andproducts to and from production areas to assist in maintaining adequatesupplies for fabrication.Accuratelymeasure parts to ensure proper dimension and form. Check setup and in processmeasurementInitiate andcomplete necessary paperwork such as a daily production report, scrap andreject report, sheet requirements, and part program data sheet to comply withinventory and schedule requirementsProficientlymaintain, setup, and operate multiple machines in production and maintain anacceptable production and scrap rate on all machines.Act as anin-process inspector and effectively program and evaluate first-run partsquality during setup.Comply with allsafety rules and policies and maintain safe, clean work environment.Other duties asassigned.Qualifications:Toperform this job satisfactorily, an individual must be able to perform eachessential duty satisfactorily.  Reasonable accommodations may be made toenable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Highschool or equivalent and a minimum one year related experience in a productionor warehousing environment.  Must possessor be able to qualify for Industrial Lift Truck Operators License.",Warehouse Associate Job in Fort Wayne,Full Time,"Fort Wayne, IN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Warehouse-Associate-Job-Fort-Wayne-IN-US-165638625.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=15,,,707a3d815e053f9e709fa64b61333499
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:22:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"4-DAY WORK WEEKLift up to 50 lbsAssist in other departments cross training30% Forklift Material HandlingBuilding CratesShipping and Receiving DutiesWorking hours: 6:30am-5pmSkills:Sit-Down Forklift RequiredUse / Knowledge of Hand ToolsPositive AttitudeWilling to Cross Train in Other DepartmentsRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift Driver / Shipping & Receiving - FRIDAYS OFF Job in Cedarburg,Part Time,"Cedarburg, WI 53012",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Forklift-Driver-Shipping-Receiving-FRIDAYS-OFF-Job-Cedarburg-WI-US-165023128.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=9,,,56c45691145a29ec5fb5d18b07d04eb6
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:23:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Digital Marketing Coordinator Job Label:Digital-Marketing If you’re a looking for the best way to use your experience in digital marketing, the Digital Marketing Coordinator role at Manufacturing Technology, Inc. (MTI) could be the perfect match for you!Your ability to coordinate social media, blog posts, and online content to communicate with our customers will help us spread the word about our custom solutions onto the world stage. If you are excited to take the next step in your career in digital marketing, join us today! As our Digital Marketing Coordinator, you will be responsible for supporting our social channels, email and DRIP campaigns, search engine optimization and content campaigns. You'll work within a collaborative team and become an integral part of meeting our overall company goals. The successful candidate will have knowledge of online marketing trends and feel comfortable multitasking as well as open to learning new web practices. Take this opportunity to play a critical role in influencing the growth of our company while enhancing your career at an industry leader!Essential Functions and Responsibilities: Develop and manage MTI’s digital communications calendar, including the scheduling of social media posts, email campaigns, web updates, and blog posts Manage email campaigns via HubSpot and integrated with company CRM Create and monitor paid ad campaigns for Google AdWords and other appropriate online channels Copy write and publish content for various digital assets including emails, website, and social media channels Write and edit blog content Coordinate MTI’s social media efforts including developing and collecting content from all events, as well as posting, replying to and monitoring conversation Contribute to the growth of MTI’s social media followers and engagement Track campaign results and response rates Update web site content via CMSMarketing Core Competencies: Creativity and Innovation Teamwork Results FocusedRequired Skills: Broad familiarity with social media platforms A keen interest in the latest developments, trends, and best practices for B2B digital marketing Experience with Google AdWords and Google Analytics Good working knowledge of MS Office products: Word, Excel, PowerPoint Basic knowledge of WordPress or similar CMS preferred Previous experience using email platforms preferred Excellent communications skills Creative problem solving skills Team oriented and self-motivated Project Management skills and attention to detail High level of initiative and follow-through Bachelor’s degree in Marketing/Business, or a liberal arts degree and 1-2 years’ experience in marketingFunctional Competencies: Project Planning Effective Listening Content DevelopmentExperience and Education:  Minimum of a Bachelor's degree in business, marketing, economics or related field is preferred Ideal candidate would have 1-2 years of marketing experience with proven experience in marketing, digital marketing, and promotional activities MTI is a privately held company headquartered in South Bend, Indiana, specializing in transformational, custom-engineered joining solutions for manufacturing processes. Our leading-edge expertise is available worldwide. An ISO 9001 and AS 9100 registered company, we also provide contract manufacturing services at our 127,000 SF facility in South Bend, as well as at MTI Welding Technologies, Ltd. in Kingswinford, England.MTI is an Equal Opportunity Employer To apply for this position or refer someone you know, please use our online interview system managed by Accolo. Apply for this job Once you have completed the online interview, your information will be forwarded to the hiring authority for decisions on next steps. Related Keywords: digital marketing coordinator, digital marketing, social media, media content, social media marketing, multi channel marketing, multi-channel, social channel, market segment, marketing, analysis, product management, product marketing, market development, marketing communications, marcom, technology, B2B, marketing strategy, messaging, marketing coordinator, segment, segmentation, global, international, ROI, KPI, competitive analysis, capital equipment, large equipment, milling, welding",Digital Marketing Coordinator Job in South Bend,Full Time,"South Bend, IN 46628",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Digital-Marketing-Coordinator-Job-South-Bend-IN-US-166013359.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=6,,Entry Level,4a3b7bbe0d2280b05a9e0ba0f0039b58
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:25:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"A company in the Green Bay area is looking for an experienced TIG welder that would be available for 1st shift.Position: Direct HireShifts: 1st Pay: based upon experienceBenefits: We offer a comprehensive benefit package consisting of health, life, dental, vision, health savings account, short term disability, vacation, paid holidays, and 401(k).Job Responsibilities / Experience:- Preferred to have experience in an ASME pressure vessel manufacturing environment- 5 - 10 years of experience welding TIG (class 1 and 2), Flux Core, and gas metal arc- Experience with stainless steel, carbon steel, aluminum, exotic metals- Fabrication of large vessels start to finish- Able to work with a team and have a positive attitude- Complete necessary paperwork on each job and followup with lead- Ability to read blue prints including metrics & weld symbols- Would be able to complete a 6G TIG Test / GTAW TestWorking hours: 1stSkills:*** All candidates must submit to criminal background check and also drug test.Please EMAIL your resume to Kira at kira.bronowski@randstadusa.com or fax 920.469.6628Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",TIG Welder Job in Green Bay,Full Time,"Green Bay, WI 54304",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/TIG-Welder-Job-Green-Bay-WI-US-165022591.aspx?mescoid=5100949001001&jobPosition=11,,,67c47a60fc25aeae0021f19d462253e3
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:25:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"1ST, 2ND, and WKD shifts available. General warehouse positions. TEMP TO HIRE. Please apply at www.penmac.com then call our office 864-576-7590Pay will be discussed in interview.Job Purpose:Completes shipments by processing and loading orders.Duties:* Prepares orders by processing requests and supply orders; pulling materials; packing boxes; placing orders in delivery area.* Completes deliveries by driving truck or van to and from vendors.* Maintains truck or van by completing preventive maintenance requirements; arranging for repairs.* Maintains inventory controls by collecting stock location orders and printing requests.* Maintains quality service by following organization standards.* Maintains safe and clean work environment by keeping shelves, pallet area, and workstations neat; maintaining clean shipping supply area; complying with procedures, rules, and regulations.* Completes reports by entering required information.* Maintains technical knowledge by attending educational workshops; reviewing publications.* Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Teamwork, Coordination, Organization, Planning, Time Management, Reporting Skills, Inventory Control, Documentation Skills, Equipment Maintenance, Data Entry Skills, Dependability",Warehouse Worker Job in Jonesville,Full Time,"Jonesville, SC 29353",,http://jobview.monster.com/Warehouse-Worker-Job-Jonesville-SC-US-165369529.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=16,10.50 - 13.50 $ /year,,c6832edabd49b43c9ef6d4fc06be5640
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:26:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Burlington State:&nbsp;&nbsp;North Carolina Postal/Zip Code: 27216 &nbsp; Based in Greensboro, North Carolina, Thompson-Arthur Paving and Construction, an Oldcastle Materials Company, is a leading provider of high-quality asphalt paving services. In addition to paving services, we provide stone base construction, bridge construction, curb and gutter construction, site utilities, complete site development and sand products. We have been proudly serving the Triad area for over half a century. By being a part of the Oldcastle family, we are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that come together to form Oldcastle.&nbsp; Oldcastle is the number one asphalt producer, the third-largest aggregates producer, and one of the top 5 ready mixed concrete producers in the United States.&nbsp; Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; &nbsp; Plant and Loader Operator Tired of browsing the classifieds? Job searches unsuccessful? Look no further, Thompson-Arthur Paving &amp; Construction. has the perfect career opportunity waiting for you! &nbsp; Job Description Summary Crew member essential to operations at various locations by utilizing loader to maintain production levels. &nbsp; Requirements Physical ability to operate loader on rough terrain and provide assistance to crewl under extreme temperatures and for extended hours of time. Normal shift is 8-12 hours. May be required to use power and/or hand tools needed to complete jobs within specifications. May oil, grease, service and make normal operating adjustments to equipment. May perform other related duties such as backfilling trenches/excavations. Attendance required according to company attendance policy to ensure crew is able to operate at normal efficiency level. Attitude/Cooperation: Must always maintain a courteous and professional manner with co-workers, customers, public. Ability to be flexible with last minute schedule changes, location changes, time of shift changes. Overtime work required. Out of town/county/state work may be required. Ability to adhere to personal protective equipment (PPE) policy and maintain individual PPE in a functional condition. Initiative to perform/assist with other positions for job completion. Must pass drug test and criminal background check. Education/Experience High school diploma or equivalent preferred, but not required.&nbsp; &nbsp; &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; Thompson-Arthur Paving is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; Thompson-Arthur Paving&nbsp;is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",Grading Loader Operator Job in Burlington,Full Time Employee,"Burlington, NC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Grading-Loader-Operator-Job-Burlington-NC-US-165782253.aspx?mescoid=5301089001001&jobPosition=11,,,d7468f0b65dca0852ea8644f9fcd83ed
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:26:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary RETAIL SUPERVISOR FULL TIME   Our retail team needs a sales supervisor with a knowledge of sales and merchandising with the ability to motivate their associates. This full time Retail Supervisor is responsible for achieving and maintaining all Client and Customer standards by overseeing and directing activities of Retail Sales Representatives and Merchandisers within an assigned territory. This person works closely with Business Development Managers, Clients, Store Managers, and various retail personnel to ensure retail business objectives are met. Come join the team at Advantage Solutions and earn competitive pay rates at the largest sales and marketing agency in North America.    RESPONSIBILITIES: Business Development: Building goodwill with the trade and Clients, timely new item retail placement, and ensure completion of all retail projects. Managing and directing retail personnel, conducting store audits, and executing all retail projects.  Will increase brand representation and effectiveness through establishing and maintaining trade and Client relationships and by conducting Client work with appointments. Sales and Merchandising: will maintain Client objectives by ensuring product(s) are fully stocked, correctly signed, properly faced, and set to schematics. New Items: will work on the achievement of business objectives through placement of new items in all authorized stores. Shelf Standards and Conditions: will authorize items to meet Client shelf schematic standards. Call Coverage; oversee call coverage through scheduling merchandisers and reviewing reports. Budget and Expense Control: Budgeting and expense control with the goal of coming in under budget and having excellent control of expenses. Administration/Reporting: will complete accurate and timely paperwork and reports, recaps, itineraries, timesheets, expense reports, etc. Qualifications:  Education Level: (Required):Associate's Degree or equivalent experience. 4 years of applicable experience. 2+ years supervisory experience. Excellent written communication and verbal communication skills. Strong prioritization skills. Skill in supervising to include delegating responsibility, training and evaluating performance. Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment. Ability to work independently and prioritize duties with minimal supervision, in order to meet deadlines. Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting from one to another with frequent interruptions and competing deadlines. Basic computer skills including familiarity with Word, Excel, and Internet usage.  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today. Position Summary   The Retail Supervisor (RS) is responsible for achieving and maintaining all Client and Customer standards by overseeing and directing activities of Retail Sales Representatives and Merchandisers within an assigned territory. This person works closely with Business Development Managers, Clients, Store Managers, and various retail personnel to ensure retail business objectives are met.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Business Development: will work on the achievement of in-store retail excellence goals by building goodwill with the trade and Clients, timely new item retail placement, and ensure completion of all retail projects. Client Audits: will work on the achievement of Client goals and objectives by effectively managing and directing retail personnel, conducting store audits, and executing all retail projects.  Will increase brand representation and effectiveness through establishing and maintaining trade and Client relationships and by conducting Client work with appointments. Sales and Merchandising: will maintain Client objectives by ensuring product(s) are fully stocked, correctly signed, properly faced, and set to schematics. New Items: will work on the achievement of business objectives throughplacement of new items in all authorized stores. Shelf Standards and Conditions: will authorize items to meet Client shelfschematic standards. Call Coverage; oversee call coverage through scheduling merchandisers andreviewing reports. Budget and Expense Control: Budgeting and expense control with the goal ofcoming in under budget and having excellent control of expenses. Administration/Reporting: will complete accurate and timely paperwork andreports, recaps, itineraries, timesheets, expense reports, etc. Supervisory Responsibilities   Direct Reports Hires, retains, trains, coaches, guides, directs, and develops direct reports using company-wide processes, tools and resources   Indirect Reports May delegate work of others and provide guidance, direction and mentoring to indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving is an essential duty and function of this job  Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required): Associate's Degree or equivalent work experience                                           (Preferred):Bachelor's Degree                                  2-4 years of supervisory experience Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Good written communication and verbal communication skills Well-organized, detail-oriented, and able to handle a fast-paced work environment Work independently Basic computer skills including familiarity with Word, Excel, and Internet usage Ability to gather data, to compile information, and prepare reports Environmental & Physical Requirements   Field / Administrative Requirements Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work may be performed in an office, field, retail store, or warehouse environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 50 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). Also required to travel and drive.  The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.      Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions:   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.",Retail Supervisor Full Time Job in Jacksonville,Full Time Employee,"Jacksonville, FL",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Retail-Supervisor-Full-Time-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-165069671.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=6,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,926df71da8a6155f010e1a3e6e894a6c
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:27:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:Talent Acquistion SpecialistJob DescriptionThe Sr Recruiter ensures that staffing requirements are met to identify, attract and onboard top talent to efficiently and effectively meet dynamic business needs. This position is responsible assisting with development of recruiting strategy and working with various clients to assess hiring needs and interview candidates for positions.Essential Functions/Core Responsibilities• Responsible for development, implementation and administration of recruitment programs  • Assist with development of innovative, creative, and proactive recruitment strategies to meet the business needs of each client, internal department, and appropriate stakeholders  • Conduct initial screening interviews, telephone interviews, and/or face-to-face interviews with prospective applicants  • Work with hiring manager(s) and appropriate statekholders to determine final decisions on candidate hiring; make recommendations on appropriate hire(s) based on need and candidate interaction  • Partner with HR and Compensation to offer competitive compensation packages and facilitate negotiation with candidates  • Leverage various resources - internet, community organizations, print media, formal/informal networks, colleges, trade associations - to directly and indirectly source qualified candidates  • Surfaces candidates and develops networks of people and processes to support a strong pipeline of qualified candidates  • Ensures the maintenance of accurate and concise records and reports concerning all phases of the recruitment process, working within the Applicant Tracking System (ATS) and HRIS tools  • Maintain consistent standards for all applicants and ensures compliance with all local rules and regulations related to hiring and recruiting  • Promote the Company image to candidates and external service providers  Candidate Profile• Bachelor's Degree in related field and 2-4 years relevant experience preferred • Strong communication skills, both written and verbal  • Demonstrated ability to multi-task, prioritize, and meet timelines on deliverables  • Proficient in Microsoft Office  • Self-starter, sense of urgency, works well under pressure, ability to work in high-velocity environment  • Awareness of recruiting metrics and trends: retention, quality of hire, net throughput, etc.  • Sense of professionalism and ability to develop relationships  • Strong attention to detail  • Ability to handle and maintain confidential information  Careel Level DescriptionRequires knowledge and experience in own discipline; still acquiring higher level knowledge and skills.  Analyzes possible solutions using standard procedures and principles.  Builds knowledge of the organization, processes and customers.  Solves a range of straightforward problems.  Receives a moderate level of guidance and direction.  Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel working within this job title. Location:USA, Salt Lake City, UTLanguage Requirements:Education:Work Experience:Time Type:Full time Additional Information:",Talent Acquistion Specialist Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time Employee,"Job Title:Talent Acquistion SpecialistJob DescriptionThe Sr Recruiter ensures that staffing requirements are met to identify, attract and onboard top talent to efficiently and effectively meet dynamic business needs. This position is responsible assisting with development of recruiting strategy and working with various clients to assess hiring needs and interview candidates for positions.Essential Functions/Core Responsibilities• Responsible for development, implementation and administration of recruitment programs  • Assist with development of innovative, creative, and proactive recruitment strategies to meet the business needs of each client, internal department, and appropriate stakeholders  • Conduct initial screening interviews, telephone interviews, and/or face-to-face interviews with prospective applicants  • Work with hiring manager(s) and appropriate statekholders to determine final decisions on candidate hiring; make recommendations on appropriate hire(s) based on need and candidate interaction  • Partner with HR and Compensation to offer competitive compensation packages and facilitate negotiation with candidates  • Leverage various resources - internet, community organizations, print media, formal/informal networks, colleges, trade associations - to directly and indirectly source qualified candidates  • Surfaces candidates and develops networks of people and processes to support a strong pipeline of qualified candidates  • Ensures the maintenance of accurate and concise records and reports concerning all phases of the recruitment process, working within the Applicant Tracking System (ATS) and HRIS tools  • Maintain consistent standards for all applicants and ensures compliance with all local rules and regulations related to hiring and recruiting  • Promote the Company image to candidates and external service providers  Candidate Profile• Bachelor's Degree in related field and 2-4 years relevant experience preferred • Strong communication skills, both written and verbal  • Demonstrated ability to multi-task, prioritize, and meet timelines on deliverables  • Proficient in Microsoft Office  • Self-starter, sense of urgency, works well under pressure, ability to work in high-velocity environment  • Awareness of recruiting metrics and trends: retention, quality of hire, net throughput, etc.  • Sense of professionalism and ability to develop relationships  • Strong attention to detail  • Ability to handle and maintain confidential information  Careel Level DescriptionRequires knowledge and experience in own discipline; still acquiring higher level knowledge and skills.  Analyzes possible solutions using standard procedures and principles.  Builds knowledge of the organization, processes and customers.  Solves a range of straightforward problems.  Receives a moderate level of guidance and direction.  Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel working within this job title. Location:USA, Salt Lake City, UTLanguage Requirements:Education:Work Experience:Time Type:Full time Additional Information:",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Talent-Acquistion-Specialist-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-166078990.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=3,,Marketing/Product,0d46d5572bbcf1fd60f18530c9c47886
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:53:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have two full-time positions as supervisors for Applied Thin-Film Products, a mid-sized thin-film circuit manufacturing firm located in Fremont.  Company is profitable, over 20 years in the same location, and has about 125 employees.  One opening is for day shift, which is 5am to 1:30pm, the other is for swing shift, which is 1:30pm to 10pm.Production Supervisor—Supervise eight to ten direct employees with some indirect employees in other areas.   Leadership, providing direction, decision-making, coaching, scheduling and problem-solving abilities required.                                                                                                             Duties:  Monitor employees, prioritize work, create and follow through on daily schedules, achieve quality and quantity daily.  Follow up on daily problems encountered, work closely with engineering for problem-solving and yield improvement, handle NCRs, address problems and issues with employees.Confirm safety procedures are followed, maintain charts that show skill levels, complete annual focal reviews, and facilitate cross training.Make sure each area is covered by monitoring scheduled and unscheduled PTO.Attend daily production meeting and provide department schedule.  Periodically hold problem-solving meetings.Keep management informed of problems or issues, primarily via daily meetings with peers and in MRB meetings.Coach and teach employees so they perform well. (MBWA - management by walking around.)Other duties and projects as assigned. Requirements:  Bachelors degree in business, industrial engineering or chemical engineering or equivalent experience.  At least five years experience in manufacturing environment, preferably with semiconductor experience.  At least five years experience in a supervisory role.  Hands-on technical experience in a manufacturing environment.  Proficient in Word and Excel and generating reports off of computer systems.  Knowledge of Total Quality Management and exposure to ISO a plus.",Production Supervisor Job in Fremont,Full Time,"Fremont, CA 94538",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-Job-Fremont-CA-US-163855861.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=3,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),6fb23e5313229f8a5de50873d1084726
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:15:54:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Function:Reporting to the Quality Inspection Supervisor. Will use predetermined methods, operations, setups, and prescribed specifications to perform in-process and complete inspections of products such as machined parts and mechanical assemblies.  Requirements:Must have a strong math backgroundDemonstrated ability to effectively perform assigned tasks and interpret results of inspectionsKnowledge of precision measuring equipment (micrometers, dial calipers, etc...)Accurate and competent use of all inspection equipment related to inspectionAbility to meet critical deadlines and work in fast paced environmentFamiliar with MS Office software (Word, Excel, Power Point, etc.).Participate in cross-training efforts interacting with other departments to acquire additional skills and knowledgeMust be able to follow verbal and written instructionsMust be able to write and document information clearly20/25 vision (natural or corrected) required  Must be able to work independently with minimal supervisionMust be able to perform overtime when necessary, including weekends when requiredPerform miscellaneous duties and projects as assigned and required Qualifications:High school diploma or GED from an accredited institutionMust have the ability to read, write, speak and understand the English languageAll applicants must be U.S. persons within the meaning of ITAR. Preferable Experience1-3 years of previous manufacturing experienceAbility to read and interpret blueprints and various technical dataAbility to interpret geometric dimensions and tolerances            Prior experience with visual, airflow, and dimensional inspections of aerospace / gas turbine components a plus.Experience working in a Quality System certified to ISO9001, AS9100, or Nadcap a plus Physical Demands/Work Environment:While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, use hands, reach with hands, and arms, and communicate.  The employee must frequently lift/or move up to 50 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.  The noise level in the work environment may be loud.  Must be able to use required PPE. Must be able to work in a supportive team environment that is fast paced with a strong commitment to accountability",Quality Inspector - nd Shift Job in Batesville,Full Time,"Batesville, SC 29607",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Inspector-2nd-Shift-Job-Batesville-SC-US-165667207.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=6,12.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),898316e1aa148644ddbfe174ae4cf4e4
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:08:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking to fill numerous loader/unloader positions in the Vacaville and Fairfield area. This position would be in a warehouse environment and could have you start as early as today!Job duties:Standing long periods of timeUnloading and loading product from palette to floorFollow proceduresWorking hours: Flexible schedule necessarySkills:Qualifications:Good hand/eye coordinationAbility to lift 50 poundsMust clear background and drug screenReliable, dependable, productive and team playerIf you are interested, please email your resume to: Rachelle - rachelle.obiacoro@randstadusa.com Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Loader/Unloader Job in Vacaville,Part Time,"Vacaville, CA 95688",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Loader-Unloader-Job-Vacaville-CA-US-165022731.aspx?mescoid=5301089001001&jobPosition=4,,,d5a225fec372f2e54e12d3cad559adf8
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:08:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Omaha State:&nbsp;&nbsp;Nebraska Postal/Zip Code: 68138 &nbsp; OMNI Engineering, an Oldcastle Materials Company, started its business in 1985 in Omaha, Nebraska.&nbsp; OMNI is involved in heavy highway construction as well as private and commercial site construction.&nbsp; Its primary business involves the manufacture and placement of asphalt for roads, city streets and parking lots.&nbsp; Currently, OMNI Engineering employs around 200 employees and remains a competitive force in the Omaha market. &nbsp;&nbsp; &nbsp; &nbsp; &nbsp; Position Description &nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp;&nbsp; Position Title: Asphalt Loader Operator / Plant Laborer Pipeline Level: Self Reports To: Supervisor FLSA Status: Non-Exempt Direct Reports: N/A Department/Division: Oldcastle Materials Group/GP Division &nbsp; &nbsp; &nbsp; &nbsp; &nbsp; Position Overview The Asphalt Loader Operator / Plant Laborer is responsible for operating a variety of equipment primarily at a Hot Mix Plant and will also perform various duties on the construction and/or Asphalt plant. &nbsp;The employee will be involved/responsible for the daily operations at the plant and maintenance of the plant equipment. Scheduling all inbound materials and communicating with the production foreperson, Quality Control, and Plant Manager as required.&nbsp; &nbsp; Key Responsibilities (Essential Duties and Functions) Operate heavy equipment of various sizes and weights safely and efficiently. Follow all company policies and OSHA/MSHA regulations for safe working procedures and environment. Report any problems to the Foreperson, Superintendent, Safety Manager, or Human Resources Manager. Follow direction of Foreperson as to daily tasks and expectations for each specific project or jobsite. Perform minor servicing and maintenance of equipment; refer major problems to the supervisor. Perform daily pre-and-post inspections with appropriate documentation in compliance with company policies. Perform daily maintenance and greasing of the plant. Perform routine and daily housekeeping duties. Assist in training less-experienced employees on the proper operations, servicing, and repair of equipment to further their abilities. Ensure a safe work environment in compliance with all safety policies and procedures using the appropriate tools and equipment for the task. May be called upon to run small power tools such as jack hammer. Lifts, carries and holds material, tools and supplies. Perform general laboring duties when necessary. Regular and predictable attendance at assigned times is required. Other duties as assigned. Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Education/Experience High School diploma or general education degree (GED) preferred. 1-3 years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. &nbsp; Work Requirements Ability to operate equipment safely and efficiently under a variety of working conditions. Ability to perform strenuous work in varying weather conditions. Ability to read, write and do basic mathematical calculations in order to keep time and material records, and read blueprints or other project documents. Ability to understand and follow verbal and written instructions. Ability to effectively communicate verbally and in writing. Ability to work independently and complete daily activities according to work schedule. Ability to operate heavy and complex equipment requiring skill and the exercise of independent judgment. Must be 18 years in age or older. Must pass pre-employment physical, drug screen and criminal background check. Must have the ability to work without close supervision. Strict adherence to safety requirements and procedures as outlined in the Employee Handbook. Willingness to work in a team environment and assist co-workers or supervisors with other duties as required. Must be willing to travel and work away from home when required. Must be willing to work nights and weekends when necessary. Individuals are required to wear personal protective equipment (PPE) in designated operations and production areas as stated by OSHA and/or MSHA. Protective equipment that may be required, but not limited to, for this position is: Face Shield, Safety (hard toe) Shoes, and Coveralls. Compliance with all OSHA and/or MSHA regulations. &nbsp; Knowledge/Skill Requirements Knowledge in operating heavy equipment. Basic Knowledge of mechanics. Knowledge of materials, methods, and tools involved in construction and paving. Knowledge of hazards and safety precautions common to heavy equipment operations and construction sites. Knowledge of trenching and shoring standards. &nbsp; Physical Requirements The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Able to stand, walk, use hands and fingers to manipulate objects or controls, climb or balance, stoop, kneel, crouch, crawl, talk and hear. May require sitting for extended periods of time. Vision abilities (with correction) include close, distance, peripheral, depth, and the ability to adjust focus. Able to climb ladders and to work at heights. Able to move/carry objects up to 50 – 100 lbs. Able to work in all weather conditions. &nbsp;Work Environment While performing the duties of the job, the employee may be occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. The employee is occasionally exposed to moving mechanical parts; high, precarious places; outside weather conditions; and risk of electrical shock or burn. The noise level in some areas of the work environment may be loud, but is typically moderate. &nbsp; The statements included in this job description are not intended to be all-inclusive.&nbsp; They represent typical elements and criteria necessary to successfully perform the job.&nbsp; Other duties may be assigned as required.&nbsp; Requirements for this job are subject to modification by the Company and its designees, and reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. &nbsp; &nbsp; &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; OMNI Engineering is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. &nbsp; EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; OMNI Engineering is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",Asphalt Loader Operator / Plant Laborer Job in Omaha,Full Time Employee,"Omaha, NE",,http://jobview.monster.com/Asphalt-Loader-Operator-Plant-Laborer-Job-Omaha-NE-US-165562643.aspx?mescoid=5100990001001&jobPosition=4,,,67150f4477d0b7c7da3eed719b110570
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:18:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"SCHÖTTLI, a Husky Company is a globally acting injection mold manufacturer focused on medical applications. Our manufacturing plants are based in Europe (Diessenhofen/CH) and North America (San Dimas, California). Together with our Service Center in China (Suzhou) this allows us to bring together our global capabilities which enables us to provide excellent and strategic customer support. http://www.schoettli.com/en / Hard mill/ Electrode Machine Operator Job Details: Set-up and operate CNC milling/ Hard milling machinesThe ability to hold close tolerance ±.0002The ability to set-up multiple machines with robotsThe ability to inspect of parts to maintain ±.0002 toleranceMin. 5 years’ experience in High speed millingMin. 5 years’ experience in Electrode manufacturingFanuc controls a plus Must be able to commute to office is San Dimas CA *Please email resumes to valerie.acuna@schoettli.comor fax to 909-592-6609  Husky Injection Molding Systems offers a competitive compensation and benefits package and excellent opportunities for growth and advancement. We are committed to equal employment opportunity and respect, value and welcome diversity in our workplace. Husky also values being a great place to work and strives to maintain a safe workplace. Accordingly, Husky conditions all offers of employment on satisfactory completion of background checks. No agency or telephone inquiries please.",CNC Hard milling/ Electrode operator Job in San Dimas,Full Time,"San Dimas, CA 91773",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Hard-milling-Electrode-operator-Job-San-Dimas-CA-US-165179665.aspx?mescoid=5100938001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d9d14ba52de78d34b8bdc39ba68d8981
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:18:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"FORKLIFT OPERATOR (Oxford, MA)Now Hiring in the Oxford Area!! Forklift Operator with General Labor responsibilities. Please see job description below and apply online at www.remedyma.com if interested.Position: Forklift OperatorPay Rate: $11.00/HourShift: Days, 7:00 AM - 3:00 PMBenefits: Upon hire, employees will be eligible for: Health Insurance, Dental Insurance, Vision Insurance, Long Term Disability, Short Term Disability, Paid Sick Time, Life and AD&D InsuranceJob Description: Keeps production supplied by operating a forklift to retrieve materials and supplies.Job Duties May Include: Planning supply and material requirements by studying production schedule; scheduling deliveries to production area. Retrieving supplies and materials by studying specifications; locating and verifying supplies and materials; secures pallet on truck; moves pallet to production location. Maintaining inventory in production area by anticipating and tracking usage. Monitoring inventory by reporting discrepancies. Clearing production area by securing and moving finished pallets; moving empty pallets. Documenting actions by logging movement of supplies, materials, and finished goods. Maintaining safe work environment by watching out for foot traffic; following standards and procedures; complying with legal regulations. Keeping forklift operating by following operating instructions; troubleshooting breakdowns; maintaining supplies; performing preventive maintenance; calling for repairs. Updating job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities. Accomplishing warehousing and organization mission by completing related results as needed",Forklift Operator Job in Millbury,,"Millbury, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Forklift-Operator-Job-Millbury-MA-US-165561209.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=12,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,c690db6dd8d0bf79505f4796ed742218
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:34:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you a skilled Metal Shop Laser Programmer looking for your next career opportunity?   Do you see yourself somewhere you can continue to learn, and grow in your career, while getting to be creative in your skill?  Are you looking for a great atmosphere, great opportunities, and a great staff to help you along the way?  Then look no further, Diversified Sourcing Solutions has the opportunity you need!We are currently seeking Laser Programmers for a great position in their metal shop with one of our top clients in the Richmond area.  This is for a Monday to Friday position, with some Saturdays.  You will be working with a team in the metal shop helping to create displays and fixtures that will require intricate attention to detail. Experience Needed:2-3 years of Laser Programming in a metal shop/decorative welding environmentPrevious Mig or Tig welding experience a plusPrevious experience with grinders, calipers, reading prints, etc.Previous experience working in a metal fabrication shopKnowledge of welding machines, and the safety that must be incorporatedRequirements:High School diploma or GEDWelding certification is a plus!Ability to pass pre-employment screening, including Drug Test and Background CheckWilling to submit to on-site testing interviewDrivers LicenseTransportationAbility to work M-Saturday, 6am-6pm",Metal Shop Laser Programmer Job in Richmond,Full Time,"Richmond, VA 23231",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Metal-Shop-Laser-Programmer-Job-Richmond-VA-US-165816630.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,16.00 - 18.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),c54837b8788ff1137ccd63854198ac52
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:34:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR - Off ShiftThis Steel Fabrication plant seeks an experienced hands on Production Supervisor for the 2nd Shift.Roll forming experience a plus   DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:       (*)   Directs a union work force of up to 20 employees        (*)   Works with the materials department to make sure orders are run timely       (*)   Coordinates with the shipping supervisor for the daily schedules       (*)   Handles 1st step grievances       (*)   Ensures company safety rules are being followed       (*)   Fills in for other supervisors as required       (*)   Communicates with Sales team when applicable       (*)   Enters production and union employee attendance into computer systems       (*)   Quality control responsibilities       (*)   Helps directs maintenance employees   QUALIFICATIONS:       (*)   Previous manufacturing supervisory experience, preferred in a union facility       (*)   General computer skills       (*)   Possess good communication/motivation skills       (*)   Able to work flexible schedules when required       (*)   Demonstrates good safety practices       (*)   High school education       (*)   Previous Roll form experience a big plus       (*)   Past experience in steel fabrication a plus       (*)   Good mechanical aptitude       (*)   Strong knowledge of fractions and precise measurements",Production Supervisor - Off shift roles Job in East Chicago,Full Time,"East Chicago, IN 46312",Ware Industries,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-Off-shift-roles-Job-East-Chicago-IN-US-147221433.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=15,,,e91a96cbfc20872a8fb4a94c815acbc1
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:35:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"MACHINE OPERATORS Brunk LLC is hiring MACHINE OPERATORS for our Goshen, IN facility. We have immediate full and part time openings.Qualified candidates must possess a high level of mechanical aptitude. Looking for individuals with a winning attitude, strong problem solving skills and full understanding of a customer service based industry. Duties include: operate pulverizing machines, weigh, fill, pack and store boxes of material and forklift operations. On the job training provided We offer a competitive starting wage with increases available based upon performance. 401k retirement program, company subsidized health, dental, vision insurance plan, company paid life/disability insurance & paid vacations/ holidays for full time employees. Visit us at www.brunk-ajp.com If you want to learn in a unique environment with job advancement, please apply in person:BRUNK LLC - GOSHEN, IN803 Logan StreetGoshen, IN 46528574-533-1109This job listing brought to you by The Goshen News",Machine Operators Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,46528,Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Machine-Operators-Job-US-165317099.aspx?ch=newsgosh&mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b6637bae439dd5e13a2618e06f209140
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:35:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"PeopleShare is looking for TOP TALENT with a great company only 10 miles away from Greensburg, PA! Shift: Monday - Friday, 9:30am - 6:30pm Pay Rate: $10/hour Job Description: Responsible for picking and packaging orders based on customers needsResponsible for using an RF scanner to locate items in the warehousePicking and packing both small and large parts Job Requirements: Must have GREAT attention to detailHigh school diploma or equivalent Must be able to walk and stand for long periods of timePlease submit your resume to apply!",General Laborer Needed for a Great Company! Job in Mount Pleasant,Full Time Employee,"Mount Pleasant, PA 15666",,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Laborer-Needed-for-a-Great-Company!-Job-Mount-Pleasant-PA-US-165532917.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=15,10.00 - 10.00 $ /hour,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,3a5d694d5947951e3ecc1ba4919a80c1
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:37:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Newell Rubbermaid is a global marketer of consumer and commercial products that touch the lives of people where they live, learn and work.  We are committed to building brands that matter in the lives of the users of our products.  We are also committed to making sharper portfolio choices and investing in new marketing and innovation to accelerate performance.  Our global sales are approximately $6 billion and we have a strong portfolio of leading brands including Sharpie®, Paper Mate®, Elmer’s®, Rubbermaid Commercial Products®, Irwin®, Lenox®, Parker®, Waterman®, Contigo®, Rubbermaid®, Calphalon®, Goody®, Graco®, Aprica®, Baby Jogger® and Dymo®.  We are headquartered in Atlanta, Georgia.  Newell Rubbermaid and its subsidiaries are Equal Opportunity Employers and comply with applicable employment laws. EOE/M/F/Vet/Disabled are encouraged to apply.DescriptionTitle: Setting Machine OperatorLocation: Dept. 551 HACKSPAND/Raw-SASHours: Mon-Fri 5p-5aGeneral Responsibilities:Perform various duties to setup and operate a number of machines to set teeth on a variety of bi-metal material to required specifications.Duties: Use micrometer, dial indicator, microscope, to insure overall set, balance and conformance to ISO specifications. Use wrenches, metal cutters, pliers, miscellaneous hand tools, overhead electric hoist. Use size block to confirm micrometer accuracy. Use various electric, hydraulic or hand trucks to transport materials to and from production area. Use hydraulic hand truck to lift material to machine table height. . Observe operation conducting frequent checks to assure, amount of set, pitch or other factors, make necessary adjustments to maintain quality. Perform TPM maintenance of equipment as required. Detect and report defective equipment or material as well. Observe and obey all safety rules, regulations and practices and employ all safety equipment and devices. Perform other similar or related duties as assigned or directed.Climate:Demanding, fast-paced position resulting from deadline pressures, simultaneous competing demands and changing priorities.Requirements: Knowledge of charts, specifications, and micrometers 1-2 years experience preferred Use of numbers including decimals Light physical effort required, equivalent to lifting, pushing, pulling 5 to 25 pounds High School Diploma or GED Equivalent",Setting Operator Job in East Longmeadow,Full Time,"East Longmeadow, MA 01028",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Setting-Operator-Job-East-Longmeadow-MA-US-165233881.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,,ac1fce9277d11165e2bbba1d646eeb69
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:39:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"PUBLIC RELATIONS - Sports Minded Entertainment Marketing We are looking for individuals that have experience in customer service, sales, hospitality, retail or leadership.  We are a aggressive marketing and advertising firm looking for outgoing individuals to fill entry level sales & marketing positions. We Train! No Experience Necessary!  Our company strives to create unlimited opportunities for individuals to achieve their personal and professional goals. We do this by encouraging competition, making it easy for individuals to share effective techniques and communicate ideas openly and by recognizing accomplishments both large and small. QUALIFICATIONS: Outstanding communication skills both verbal & written.Able to prioritize and work independentlyAble to work effectively in a team environmentDetail-oriented and the ability to follow up on tasks.Work effectively under pressure and maintain a positive attitudeCapable of multitasking, prioritizing, and managing time efficiently For Immediate Consideration apply onlineRequirementsLeadership qualities & experiencesExcellent motivation skillsStrong communication and presentation skillsAbove average people skillsBe goal oriented & lead teams in fast-paced, challenging environment. The candidates we are seeking must have a great work ethic, good communication skills, a positive attitude, and an ability to work in a fast pace environment.   ""The area's Leader in Marketing &  Advertising""      Related Keywords: marketing, advertising, sales, event marketing, entry level, entry level management, entry level sales, entry level marketing, public relations, customer service, retail, restaurant, hospitality, sports, entertainment, events, campaigns, promotions, event planning, promotional sales",CAREER - Sports Minded Entertainment Marketing Job in Miami,Full Time,"Miami, FL 33186",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/CAREER-Sports-Minded-Entertainment-Marketing-Job-Miami-FL-US-166013085.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=8,,,f0fd1477ed48706071684bb914da8c2b
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:40:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"FORTUNE 100 FOOD MFG COMPANY IS SEEKING A TOP QUALITY MANAGER FOR ONE OF THEIR FLAGSHIP PLANTS LOCATED IN THE MIDWEST SALARY: $$$90-110K PLUS BONUS AND FULL RELOCATION /HOUSE BUYOUT Position Summary: Manages Quality Assurance programs in establishing, implementing and monitoring company, plant and regulatory programs involving product quality, food safety and overall sanitation of facility.  Ensures food safety and quality of all products produced. Responsible for ensuring specifications are defined and communicated, formalizing process capability, institutionalizing process control and predictive quality process. Performs inspections of processes, employee training, compliance with applicable food laws and regulations and verifies plant HACCP plans. Defines best lab practices and provides guidance and adherence to quality policies. Actively participates in resolving customer complaints. Integral part of plant leadership team. Provides support to Sales, R&D and Operations on customer issues, questions and concerns. Essential Job Functions:•Oversee, implement and maintain quality programs, vendor certification, raw materials, recall, hold and release and pest control•Oversee, research and develop work on cost effectiveness and overall improvements, implementing line extensions/product changes and plant test requests•Manage raw materials and communications to suppliers in relation to compliance•Manage plant laboratory to include analysis and interpretation of microbiological results from equipment and environmental swabs•Implement lean techniques to eliminate/reduce operating costs, cycle times, and non-value added activities•Interpret, analyze and communicate quality issues, both internal and external (customer complaints) and initiate applicable corrective measures•Proved Corporate with quality assurance assistance involving vendor issues, both improvements and corrective measures•Development and maintenance of all food safety regulatory programs to meet FSIS/USDA requirements•Serve as liaison with local, area and Federal USDA and FDA personnel•Implement, maintain and oversee comprehensive sanitation program for cleaning of entire plant (daily and periodic cleaning requirements/procedures) ensuring compliance with Company, State and Federal regulations•Oversee product quality with regards to specification development, defects, complaints and new accounts•Oversee employee training for hourly and supervisory levels, in manufacturing processes and GMP’s.•Ensure allergens are being managed appropriately•Summarize technical data monthly to identify defect trends and corrective actions•Conducts GMP and sanitation audits of operations and warehouse areas•Responsible for disposition of all held product with input from the Plant Manager as needed•Acts as liaison for all technical and QC issues between operations and sales departments•Maintain and support (i.e. SPC, Key Concepts of Quality, SQF, 6 Sigma, etc.) to measure and control quality systems and processes for improvement•Work closely with RQI on product developments and quality issues. Requirements:•BS Degree in Biology, Microbiology, Chemistry or Food Science required.  •5+ years quality management experience required in food mfg - plant level position •Experience working with USDA/FDA required.•Experience required within a SQF/HACCP certified food manufacturing environment•Lean Manufacturing/TPM experience highly preferred.",PLANT QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER Job in Council Bluffs,"Full Time, Employee","Council Bluffs, IA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/PLANT-QUALITY-ASSURANCE-MANAGER-Job-Council-Bluffs-IA-US-165027442.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=20,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,4ea927a47f32665672e81d7212c7d5ce
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:48:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Xtra Mile Marketing Solutions has immediate positions available for Sales, Marketing & PR Associates to join our growing team. We offer a competitive compensation package, excellent benefits and room for advancement! We are a rapidly-growing promotional marketing company, applying a customer-friendly, direct, results-driven approach to our marketing research and sales. Because of our proven success and expertise, we continue to obtain new clientele as we dramatically increase our clients' product exposure, sales and brand recognition. Representatives should be comfortable with face to face sales with customers.Availability includes:- Advertising & Brand Exposure- Marketing & Account Satisfaction- Public Relations Associates- Assistant ManagementWhat Xtra Mile has for you:- Rapid growth and advancement- Competitive compensation- Sales and marketing experience- Energetic and goal oriented team environment- Travel ExperienceAt a base level, Xtra Mile trains entry level team members to act as liaisons between clients and prospective customers in the  Centerville, OH business market. On a management level, Xtra Mile acts as an advisory agent to marketing firms within the organization as well as prepares recently-promoted Managing Partners to oversee new markets and campaigns.  Our plan is to double in size throughout 2016. We need goal oriented team members who have the entrepreneurial mind set to contribute to our growth.RequirementsRequirementsResponsibilities in this program include:- Sales/Marketing- Team Leadership- Sales Training- Human Resources- Marketing Strategies and Sales Techniques- Oversee Campaign Development- Manage Customer Service, Administration, and Sales PeopleWe provide full training for the right candidates. This position is paid on a combination of base, commission, and bonuses. No door to door sales or telemarketing are involved.",College Grads! Entry Level Sales and Marketing Job in Centerville,Full Time Employee,"Centerville, OH 45458",RetailBusiness Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/College-Grads!-Entry-Level-Sales-Marketing-Job-Centerville-OH-US-165432807.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=14,,Marketing/Product,ae858568001c07de837b7b82034515ca
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:16:50:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Maintain and repair progressive dies. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following, other duties may be assigned * Draw, forming, blanking, piercing, parting, extruding type progressive die operations. * Able to work to print and verbal instructions on building gages and fixtures. Attendance/Punctuality Is consistently at work and on time; Ensures work responsibilities are covered when absent; Arrives at meetings and appointments on time. Competencies To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies: Qualifications to perform this job successfully an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions: Journey man tool and die makers only. Proficient in all tool room machine tools. Wire EDM experience a plus. Education and/or Experience * TMA, trade school certified or have a department of labor journeyman card. * 5 years experience minimum.Language Skills Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence. Ability to speak effectively before groups of customers or employees of organization. Mathematical Skills Ability to work with mathematical concepts such as probability and statistical inference, and fundamentals of plane and solid geometry and trigonometry. Ability to apply concepts such as fractions, percentages, ratios, and proportions to practical situations. Reasoning Ability Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. Ability to interpret an extensive variety of technical instructions in mathematical or diagram form and deal with several abstract and concrete variables. Certificates, Licenses, Registrations Must be card carrying or TMA certified. Other Skills and AbilitiesOther Qualifications Physical Demands The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions: While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, walk and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to sit; reach with hands and arms; stoop, kneel, crouch down. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Work Environment The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions: While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly exposed to moving mechanical parts. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. PPE is required in this and many other areas this individual will work.",Tool and Die Maker Job in Palatine,Full Time,"Palatine, IL 60038",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Tool-Die-Maker-Job-Palatine-IL-US-165019696.aspx?mescoid=5100947001001&jobPosition=12,,,3228725e699509fee915176a1a2352e3
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:17:09:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Level Five Careers has been retained to recruit a new Plant Operations Manager for a growing Tier One manufacturer of automotive components in the Augusta, Georgia area.The employer is the $300 Million US division of a global automotive supplier, with several additional locations in the US and Mexico.This position bears primary responsibility for the profitable operation of a $60 Million operation producing components for some of the highest quality automobile brands, including Mercedes, BMW and Volkswagen. The facility currently operates 24 x 5 and has a staff of about 260 personnel.Direct reports include managers in Engineering, Quality, Maintenance, HR.The ideal candidate will possess several years of experience in the management of a Tier One, TS16949 automotive facility, with a documented record of successful turn-around of manufacturing operations. Experience with injection molding operations is particularly important. Substantial experience in Lean Manufacturing and a commitment to continued support and implementation of Lean is also required. Experience with the high-end automotive customers mentioned above is highly desired. The company has a very strong record of promotion of successful managers to positions of increasing authority.The employer offers a very substantial salary and bonus package, along with great benefits and relocation.For immediate consideration, please forward your resume to Don Gaze, President of Level Five Careers Inc. via the Monster portal.",Plant Operations Manager - Automotive Job in Chattanooga,Full Time,"Chattanooga, TN",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Plant-Operations-Manager-Automotive-Job-Chattanooga-TN-US-165388590.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=10,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),a96afcb9d5129b7ab886ac9750e99a27
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:17:11:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary CLUB SUPERVISOR FULL TIME   Do you have the ability to manage a team and lead by example? Then our full time Club Supervisor job is definitely the right fit for you. Our Brand Ambassadors and Event Specialists need an individual who can train, motivate, and supervise their efforts to boost sales at our client’s retail locations. The ideal candidate will be adept at client relations, able to build strong relationships with store managers and stimulate sales growth. As the Club Supervisor, you will be expected to organize events, schedule staff, and develop solutions to improve in-store events. Advantage Solutions is the largest sales and marketing agency in North America. Join our team of over 38,000 associates and receive top-tier training and competitive pay rates.                                                                                                                     RESPONSIBILITIES: Supervise team members. Plan, schedule and direct their work. Monitor and coach performance; train associates. Prepare and deliver performance appraisals. Make discipline and termination recommendations. Handle associate complaints and grievances. Forecast staffing needs for Event Specialists and Lead Event Specialists. Independently recruit, interview, and hire ES and LES. Identify and recommend candidates for promotion. Build relationships with store managers and customers. Analyze and report daily event execution. Develop and recommend opportunities for event improvement. Manage inventory and equipment for events. Supervise and assist with event preparation and break down. Conduct events in the event of a staffing emergency.  Qualifications:                                                                                                                                         High School Diploma or GED. At least one year of experience managing employees preferred. Strong coaching and performance management skills. Problem solving and conflict resolution skills. Detail-oriented and capable of managing projects with excellent follow through and accuracy.  Strong customer service skills. Ability to communicate professionally with associates, club management, and customers. Strong proficiency in Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook). Ability to access internet and use spreadsheets for analysis and reporting. Must complete Food Safety course, pass Food Safety Certification exam, and any additional requirements which may include online or in-person training. Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.    Position Summary                                                     The Club Supervisor is the highest-level Advantage Solutions manager at each Club location.  They primarily are responsible for managing numerous team members and achieving exceptional program execution.  They are expected to make frequent independent decisions of importance regarding associate and operations management at their assigned locations.  They must be astute decision makers, effective communicators, detail-oriented, organized, and efficient.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities   Associate Management Supervise team members Plan, schedule and direct their work Monitor and coach performance; train associates Prepare and deliver performance appraisals Make discipline and termination recommendations Handle associate complaints and grievances Oversee and enforce compliance with Advantage Solutions policies and procedures Forecast headcount needs for Event Specialists and Lead Event Specialists Independently recruit, interview, and hire ES and LES Identify and recommend candidates for promotion Event Management Build relationships with store managers and customers Appropriately schedule and staff events Analyze and report daily event execution Develop and recommend opportunities for event improvement Manage inventory and equipment for events Manage safety and security of associates and property Supervise and assist with event preparation and break down Conduct events in the event of a staffing emergency Additional Expectations Executes verbal and written business communications in a manner that effectively achieves business objectives, reflects the Company’s commitment to integrity, and advances Company policies (including Code of Business Conduct and Ethics). Delivers work that meets or exceeds management expectations as to quality, quantity, timeliness and attendance. Adheres to Company Policies & Procedures including but not limited to associate policies found on the Company’s intranet site and the Company’s Code of Business Conduct and Ethics Satisfies job-related safety expectations Additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department Travel and/or Driving Requirements   Travel on an as needed basis is an essential duty and function of this job. Driving is not an essential duty or function of this job.    Schedule Requirements Regular schedule for this position:  Thursday through Monday Must be willing to work outside of the regular schedule for this position Minimum Qualifications   Education Level: (Required)    High School Diploma or GED or equivalent experience                                     At least 1 year of experience in managing employees preferred   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong coaching and performance management skills Problem solving and conflict resolution skills Excellent organization, time management Strong written and oral communication skills Detail-oriented and capable of managing projects with excellent follow through and accuracy  Strong interpersonal and customer service skills Ability to communicate professionally with associates, club management, and customers Strong proficiency in Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook) Ability to access internet and use spreadsheets for analysis and reporting Must complete Food Safety course, pass Food Safety Certification exam, and any additional requirements in accordance with local regulations which may include online or in-person training Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Environmental & Physical Requirements   Field / Reps Requirements Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). Also required to travel and drive.  The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law. ",Club Supervisor Full Time Job in Papillion,Full Time Employee,"Papillion, NE",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Club-Supervisor-Full-Time-Job-Papillion-NE-US-165360681.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=16,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,5164bcdc4203be111a8064c7d2370fbe
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:17:24:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"High Reach Forklift Operator $15.00/hour. Must have 6 mos high reach forklift exp in fast paced, non-temperature controlled warehouse environment. Must be able to read packing slips & bills of lading in English & be familiar with common shipping/ receiving warehouse procedures. Must have valid driver's license & reliable transportation. Must be able to work well with co-workers. Benefits include medical/dental/401K/life insurance/ Paid holidays & vacation after 1yr. Call 215-945-1943",High Reach Forklift Operator Job in Levittown,Full Time,"Levittown, PA 19054",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/High-Reach-Forklift-Operator-Job-Levittown-PA-US-165792985.aspx?ch=phillyburbs&mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=8,15.00 - 17.50 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),90adc0b045e9e8a20f5a8a810ef71d00
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:17:32:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Senior Specialist Talent Acquisition   Job Description The Sr Specialist Talent Acquisition ensures that staffing requirements are met to identify, attract and onboard top talent to efficiently and effectively meet dynamic business needs. This position is responsible assisting with development of recruiting strategy and working with various clients to assess hiring needs and interview candidates for positions. Specializes in technical, sales, management, and/or highly specialized searches. Essential Functions/Core Responsibilities • Responsible for development, implementation and administration of recruitment programs for highly specialized positions or candidate profiles   • Liaise with hiring managers to help develop and implement innovative, creative, and proactive recruitment strategies that are appropriate for their business needs and consistent with the organization's overall HR strategy   • Evaluate external market trends and internal employee turnover on specialized and difficult-to-fill positions to recommend changes and improvements to leadership on recruitment strategies   • Conduct telephone interviews and/or face-to-face interviews with prospective applicants   • Work with hiring manager(s) and appropriate statekholders to determine final decisions on candidate hiring; make recommendations on appropriate hire(s) based on need and candidate interaction   • Partner with HR and Compensation to offer competitive compensation packages and facilitate negotiation with candidates   • Leverage various resources - internet, community organizations, print media, formal/informal networks, colleges, trade associations - to directly and indirectly source qualified candidates   • Surfaces candidates and develops networks of people and processes to support a strong pipeline of qualified candidates   • Ensures the maintenance of accurate and concise records and reports concerning all phases of the recruitment process, working within the Applicant Tracking System (ATS) and HRIS tools   • Maintain consistent standards for all applicants and ensures compliance with all local rules and regulations related to hiring and recruiting   • Promote the Company image to candidates and external service providers     Candidate Profile • Bachelor's Degree in related field and 4-6 years relevant experience preferred   • Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.  Ability to effectively present information to internal and external associates.   • Demonstrated ability to organize and prioritize projects in a fast-paced and deadline-oriented business environment   • Advanced Microsoft Office skills   • Demonstrated ability to take initiative and ownership with focus on continuous improvement   • Ability to interpret and analyze recruiting metrics and trends: retention, quality of hire, net throughput, etc.   • Solid understanding of the organization's business operations and industry.  Demonstrated business acumen   • Demonstrated ability to comprehend, analyze, and interpret   • Excellent attention to detail   • Ability to handle and maintain confidential information   Careel Level Description Requires in-depth knowledge and experience.  Broad application of principles, theories and concepts in applicable discipline.  Solves complex problems; takes a new perspective using existing solutions.  Works independently; receives minimal guidance.  Acts as a resource for colleagues with less experience.  Represents the level at which career may stabilize for many years or even until retirement.   Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel working within this job title.    Location: USA, Salt Lake City, UT   Language Requirements:   Education:   Work Experience:   Time Type: Full time Additional Information:",Senior Specialist Talent Acquisition Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time Employee,"Job Title: Senior Specialist Talent Acquisition   Job Description The Sr Specialist Talent Acquisition ensures that staffing requirements are met to identify, attract and onboard top talent to efficiently and effectively meet dynamic business needs. This position is responsible assisting with development of recruiting strategy and working with various clients to assess hiring needs and interview candidates for positions. Specializes in technical, sales, management, and/or highly specialized searches. Essential Functions/Core Responsibilities • Responsible for development, implementation and administration of recruitment programs for highly specialized positions or candidate profiles   • Liaise with hiring managers to help develop and implement innovative, creative, and proactive recruitment strategies that are appropriate for their business needs and consistent with the organization's overall HR strategy   • Evaluate external market trends and internal employee turnover on specialized and difficult-to-fill positions to recommend changes and improvements to leadership on recruitment strategies   • Conduct telephone interviews and/or face-to-face interviews with prospective applicants   • Work with hiring manager(s) and appropriate statekholders to determine final decisions on candidate hiring; make recommendations on appropriate hire(s) based on need and candidate interaction   • Partner with HR and Compensation to offer competitive compensation packages and facilitate negotiation with candidates   • Leverage various resources - internet, community organizations, print media, formal/informal networks, colleges, trade associations - to directly and indirectly source qualified candidates   • Surfaces candidates and develops networks of people and processes to support a strong pipeline of qualified candidates   • Ensures the maintenance of accurate and concise records and reports concerning all phases of the recruitment process, working within the Applicant Tracking System (ATS) and HRIS tools   • Maintain consistent standards for all applicants and ensures compliance with all local rules and regulations related to hiring and recruiting   • Promote the Company image to candidates and external service providers     Candidate Profile • Bachelor's Degree in related field and 4-6 years relevant experience preferred   • Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.  Ability to effectively present information to internal and external associates.   • Demonstrated ability to organize and prioritize projects in a fast-paced and deadline-oriented business environment   • Advanced Microsoft Office skills   • Demonstrated ability to take initiative and ownership with focus on continuous improvement   • Ability to interpret and analyze recruiting metrics and trends: retention, quality of hire, net throughput, etc.   • Solid understanding of the organization's business operations and industry.  Demonstrated business acumen   • Demonstrated ability to comprehend, analyze, and interpret   • Excellent attention to detail   • Ability to handle and maintain confidential information   Careel Level Description Requires in-depth knowledge and experience.  Broad application of principles, theories and concepts in applicable discipline.  Solves complex problems; takes a new perspective using existing solutions.  Works independently; receives minimal guidance.  Acts as a resource for colleagues with less experience.  Represents the level at which career may stabilize for many years or even until retirement.   Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel working within this job title.    Location: USA, Salt Lake City, UT   Language Requirements:   Education:   Work Experience:   Time Type: Full time Additional Information:",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Specialist-Talent-Acquisition-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-164901038.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=2,,Marketing/Product,40f5fa2cb3503da3dfa30f4474e44f80
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:17:53:32,No,jobs.monster.com,".TAD PGS, INC. is currently seeking a Mechanical Engineer for one of our clients in Cherry Hill, NJ.Job Description:We are looking for a talented engineer with the ability to develop mechanical drawings and specificationsThe successful candidate must have design knowledge of engineering and construction of HVAC, boilers, chillers, plumbing, fire protection, electrical systems, BIM, renewable energy and energy conservationMust have previous experience with engineering investigations/assessments of facilities, designing of building mechanical systems, economic analysis of alternate HVAC systems, specifications, codes, project and construction cost estimates, scheduling, manpower requirements, and budget controlsQualifications:Bachelor Degree (BS) in Mechanical EngineeringPE License with a minimum of 5 - 10 years’ experienceExperience with HVAC systems, plumbing and fire protectionRequired knowledge of AutoCAD and preferably REVIT softwareLEED Certification or Certified Energy Auditor/Manager a plusCommissioning and verification experience a plusMust be willing to travel from time-to-time (no longer than one week)TAD PGS, INC. specializes in delivering secure, reliable and rapidly implemented workforce solutions to the U.S. Federal marketplace, including U.S. Government agencies and their prime contractors. With more than 50 years of experience, TAD PGS, INC. has earned a reputation for accountability, a value that government agencies and prime contractors both demand and deserve.TAD PGS, INC. sources professionals for the full spectrum of federal positions, from administrative to management, and those contracts requiring extremely niche-oriented technical skills and the highest levels of security clearance. Apply Online",Mechanical Engineer Job in Cherry Hill,,"Cherry Hill, NJ 08002",,http://jobview.monster.com/Mechanical-Engineer-Job-Cherry-Hill-NJ-US-165637668.aspx?mescoid=1700184001001&jobPosition=4,,,4548826c2805105d24282b838462fbff
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:17:53:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"ARE YOU READY TO START YOUR CAREER?   Aspire Beyond is continuing to expand and currently looking for new applicants to add to our Customer Service and Junior Marketing department. We are looking for experienced customer service or retail representatives that we can additionally train and mold to our clients needs. Aspire Beyond is looking for motivated individuals who have a competitive edge and are willing to learn. EXPERIENCE IS NOT MANDATORY BUT IS A HUGE PLUS! FULL PAID ONE ON ONE TRAINING WILL BE PROVIDED.Aspire Beyond specializes in promotional campaigns while continually providing the top notch customer service experience that we have become known for in the Simi Valley Area. Due to rapid expansion, we are  looking to fill 5-6 positions for our newly opened locations. We are looking for immediate hires and have already started the interview process!RequirementsTHE PROPER CANDIDATE WOULD HAVE: - Excellent verbal & written communication skills and the willingness to learn - Must be a team player and work well with others - Great customer service skills - Effective listening skills - Enthusiastic personality! EXPERIENCE IN THE FOLLOWING IS A PLUS BUT NOT REQUIRED:- Customer Service- Work in the restaurant industry- Retail/Sales- Marketing/Advertising- Promotions- Management/Leadership Skills  WHAT ASPIRE BEYOND OFFERS:-Competitive Hourly Pay Starting At $10-$15 (Negotiable)-Fully Paid One-On-One Training Program-Management and Growth Opportunities-Bonuses and Incentives-Full Time and Part Time Positions-Fun, Team Work Environment   IF YOU ARE READY TO JUMP START YOUR CAREER- APPLY TODAY!",Marketing Associate- Paid Training Job in Simi Valley,Full Time Employee,"Simi Valley, CA 93065",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Marketing-Associate-Paid-Training-Job-Simi-Valley-CA-US-165415617.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=4,,Marketing/Product,69006c4f133d84ec160ec7c207e2626a
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:18:06:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Capstone Management, Inc. is a team of dynamic sales and marketing professionals who leverage interactive outreach and empower brands to succeed in the modern marketplace. We specialize in developing long-term relationships with consumers through ultra-targeted campaigns.We are seeking to hire on several ENTRY LEVEL individuals to our expanding office that are dedicated, charismatic, and enjoy working in a team oriented environment to develop exposure for our clients and their services.RequirementsThe right candidate would have the following:- Wants to grown from within; self motivated individuals who have an entrepreneurial mindset do best in our company.-Team-oriented; We work in teams every day!- Goal-oriented; we do not micromanage our employees because we believe that those who excel do not need a push from anyone but themselves!- Punctual- Ability to Multitask; managerial skills that allow you to prioritize and delegate.- Student Mentality; we put our representatives through thorough training to give industry insight. Willingness to learn and be critiqued is key!Check us out at www.CapstonePhilly.com We are also on Facebook, Pinterest, Tumblr, and Twitter!You may apply here or directly on our website!We look forward to hearing form you!Full time applicants only!No Skype interview!Must be fluent in English and be available immediately.RelatedKeywords: marketing, advertising, sales, event marketing, entry level,entry level management, entry level sales, entry level marketing, publicrelations, customer service, retail, restaurant, hospitality, sports,entertainment, events, campaigns, promotions, event planning, promotionalsales, South Philly, Center City, Rittenhouse, Rittenhouse Square, FitlerSquare, Gayborhood, Italian Market, Bella Vista, Old City, Queen Village,University City, King ofPrussia, Manayunk, Conshohocken, Roxborough, MountAiry, Bala Cynwyd, Narberth, Ardmore, Wynnewood, Haverford, Bryn Mawr,Paoli, Art Museum, Franklintown, Fairmount,Chinatown, Northern Liberties, Fishtown, Spring Garden, CherryHill, Haddonfield, Collingswood",Entry Level Event Marketing & Sales Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19123",Advertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Entry-Level-Event-Marketing-Sales-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165481336.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=18,,Marketing/Product,5caa56e314747b095d942a508a74c15a
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:18:13:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Emco Wheaton Retail Corp., a manufacturer of environmental service station products, located in Wilson, NC is seeking a General Machinist.Candidate must be experienced in operating manual milling machines, lathes and drill presses. Individual must be a self-starter capable of working with general instruction and minimal supervision.  Position will include light fabrication, making jigs, fixtures, and special lots of production components.  Formal machinist training preferred. Emco offers excellent benefits and competitive wages.  Qualified candidates may appear in person to request an application, or may send in a resume via mail, email or fax. Emco Wheaton Retail Corp., 2300 Industrial Park Drive, Wilson, NC 27893, 252-243-0418 (fax).   No phone calls please.  EOE",Machinist Job in Wilson,Full Time,"Wilson, NC 27893",,http://jobview.monster.com/Machinist-Job-Wilson-NC-US-165643725.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=2,Commensurate with experience,Experienced (Non-Manager),9635b825ad8a4076332705402e4c3b8d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:18:14:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"As one of the world’s leading analytical instrumentation companies, Bruker covers a broad spectrum of advanced solutions in all fields of research and development. All our systems and instruments are designed to improve safety of products, accelerate time-to-market and support industries in successfully enhancing quality of life. We’ve been driving innovation in analytical instrumentation for 50 years now. Today, worldwide more than 6,000 employees are working on this permanent challenge, at over 70 locations on all continents.SUMMARY OF RESPONSIBILITIES: Must be able to read and understand assembly drawings and engineering drawings required to perform the build of complex electro-mechanical assemblies. Use of assembly hand tools is required to include crimp tools, arbor presses, torque wrenches, and other hand tools as required. Must be able to tin wires, solder wires onto contact points and effectively use heat shrink and heat guns. Must be able to build finished assemblies within defined time standards and with a high level of quality. Must be able to determine methods and procedures to accomplish the assigned tasks utilizing the drawings and tooling provided for the required assembly. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: Must be able to understand detailed assembly drawings, drawing parts lists, required hardware and drawing assembly notes. Must be able to build complex electro-mechanical assemblies using crimp tools, hex drivers, torques wrenches, soldering irons and all other hand tools as required. Must build the assembly with a quality requirement of >95% defect free. Must disposition defective parts via the NCMR process. Must take responsibility of the assemblies being built to include identifying parts that do not align correctly, cosmetic defects, identifying drawing errors, identifying tooling that is damaged or does not work correctly and completing required tracking cards/sheets in accordance with approved methods. ADDITIONAL RESPONSIBILITIES: Must be able to communicate effectively and provide limited guidance and instruction to other non-exempt personnel within the department that are performing similar duties. Must be able to both control and account for inventory that has been issued to the required assembly to include point of use inventory on the production floor. Must be able to complete all other duties as assigned that are within the job responsibility. PHYSICAL/ENVIRONMENTAL REQUIREMENTS: Must possess visual acuity necessary to read very detailed drawings and work with very small mechanical parts. Must be able to lift 25 lbs. individually and lift 50 lbs. in a two person lift.KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES: Must possess a working knowledge of computers and computer programs necessary to perform bench verification of proper assembly techniques. This includes using computer based fixtures and bench set ups required to verify proper assembly operation. Must possess a working knowledge of how to navigate in Windows XP and Windows 7. EDUCATIONAL/EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: A minimum of a high school diploma and 4 - 6 years of related electro-mechanical assembly experience are required. Bruker Corporation offers a comprehensive and competitive benefits package including medical, dental, 401(k), paid vacation, holidays, and tuition assistance (as applicable). Bruker is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. Certain positions at Bruker require compliance with export control laws and as a result, all interviewed candidates for all positions will be screened pre-interview to determine their eligibility in light of export control restrictions. ",Assembler Job in Tucson,"Full Time, Employee",Job Details,,http://jobview.monster.com/Assembler-Job-Tucson-AZ-US-165276935.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=9,,,f701b48f5a0415542e9bf22be2083520
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:18:16:15,No,jobs.monster.com,MACHINISTChardon area company has an immediate opening for a Wire EDM Operator & Manual Machinist. Please send resume to hr@chardontool.com Click to apply by EMAIL,Machinist Job in Chardon,Full Time,"Chardon, OH 44024",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Machinist-Job-Chardon-OH-US-165660861.aspx?ch=newsherald&mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=12,,,f9b3467f9646c304cc57d6d4df01e0da
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:18:49:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pentair Overview Pentair is an S&P 500 diversified industrial company with $7 billion in revenue and 30,000 employees worldwide. A global leader, Pentair provides solutions to help its customers manage water use, deliver safe and sustainable energy, meet the world's increasing demand for food, and support, maintain and protect critical processes. Organized as four global businesses which include Valves & Controls, Flow & Filtration Solutions, Water Quality Systems and Technical Solutions, the company operates as One Pentair, driven by purpose, led by vision, guided by process, and united by its Win Right Values. Business Unit Overview Flow and Filtration Solutions serves all five of Pentair’s verticals, providing integrated solutions for the transfer, flow, filtration, separation and treatment of clean water, wastewater and other fluids. We innovate and deliver industry-leading products ranging from light duty diaphragm pumps to high-flow turbine pumps and solid handling pumps designed for water, wastewater and variety of industrial and residential applications, as well as ultrafiltration membranes, pressure vessels, quality control equipment, hygienic valves & pumps, and complete process systems. Job Summary Primary Function:  To set up and operate a group of metal cutting machines to perform a variety of machining operations on component pump parts.Tools and Equipment:  Keyseaters, shapers, radial, multiple or single spindle drill, engine, turret lathes, handscrew, milling, tapping, straightening honing, reaming, bore-matic, threading machines, and accessories.  Jib hoist & pendent controlled overhead crane.  Measuring instruments such as micrometers, Vernier calipers, indicators, surface gauges, combination sq., scales, etc. furnished by employee.  Dial bore, thread, plug, taper gauges, etc.  Miscellaneous facing, turning, boring tools, mill cutters, drills, taps, reamers, etc. and appropriate hand tools.Materials: Ferrous and non-ferrous material in form of castings or bar-stock Working Procedure:Receives work assignments, verbal and/or written instructions from supervision.Receives parts or material to be machined and obtain necessary tools and gauges, as required.Works from process documents, blueprints and/or written or verbal instructions.Checks equipment for proper operation.Sets up and operates machines using tools and equipment needed, selects proper speeds and feeds.Positions part in machine, secure and align using hoist or crane as required.Performs a variety of machining operations such as face, bore, turn, ream, thread, drill, tap, keyway, mill, saw, grind, chamfer, spotface, assemble, etc. on component pump parts.Checks part with measuring instruments as required.Performs necessary material handling throughout sequence of operations and grinds own high speed, steel tool bits.File burrs and stamp identification on parts as delivered.Prepares production card and turns into supervision.Lubricates machine as required, wipes and keeps machines, tools and work place clean and remove chips from machines.Reports defective material and equipment to supervisor.Maintains good housekeeping by keeping tools, material and equipment in proper place.Observes all safety rules and watches for safety of others. Additional Information Pentair offers outstanding benefits including medical and dental coverage,  matching 401k, stock purchase plan, tuition assistance, plus many more. EEO Statement Pentair is an Equal Opportunity Employer. ",Machine Operator / Machinist Job in Kansas City,Full Time Employee,"Kansas City, KS 66106",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Machine-Operator-Machinist-Job-Kansas-City-KS-US-165637935.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=19,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,76934cad6a5bea2f955fc1a2e61f1496
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:18:58:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Perform various functions throughout the various facilities and off-site warehouse location including receiving, delivering materials to/from production areas, shipping, scrap material moves, and misc. supply moves, using different types of forklifts and attachments, in a safe and efficient manner.   We are looking for Material Handlers who are reliable, punctual and safety-minded, with a strong work ethic. You must also work well as part of a team and be willing to work long hours when necessary. It is also important that you display a positive, helpful demeanor and a commitment to providing the best in customer service.Perform various functions throughout the various facilities and off-site warehouse location including receiving, delivering materials to/from production areas, shipping, scrap material moves, and misc. supply moves, using different types of forklifts and attachments, in a safe and efficient manner. Specific qualifications for the role include:****MUST BE ABLE TO WORK A 12 HOUR ROTATING SHIFT*****•Forklift experience•Superior attention to detail•Ability to lift 75-100 pounds or more•Comfortable working at various heights, including three story homes•Ability to pass a background check and drug screen•Employee must be able to work rotating 12 hour shifts•High School Diploma or equivalent required•At least 2 years manufacturing experience*Must have or be willing to obtain CRC CertificationPlease send resume for consideration.",Material Handler Job in Statesville,Full Time,"Statesville, NC 28625",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Material-Handler-Job-Statesville-NC-US-165867773.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=12,11.00 - 13.50 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),56b387441ccb7ce201085c2edf237596
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:09:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hertz Local Edition is seeking professionals to drive our vehicles to various locations while providing our best in class customer service.  As a Transporter you will pick up and drop off customers and deliver vehicles from the Hertz Local addition office to various locations.The general responsibilities will include but are not limited to;Transports vehicles from Hertz Local Edition offices to various locations.Will pick-up and drop-off customers as required.Must interface with vendors such as body shops, dealerships, and insurance agents.Maintain courteous and professional behavior & appearance.Follow all company safety policies and procedures and protect company assets.Ability to work with minimal supervision while maintaining high energy.Educational Background:High School Diploma, GED or Equivalent Experience.Skills:Valid driver's licenseMust be at least 20 years of ageFlexibility in scheduling which may include night's weekends and holidaysProfessional Experience:Previous experience in a related field.Previous customer service experience.Satisfactory driving record.Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Transporter Job in Montgomery,Full Time / Employee,"Montgomery, AL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Transporter-Job-Montgomery-AL-US-165672659.aspx?mescoid=5301072001001&jobPosition=18,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,03d1c2761aee9b693a640286a1fa824c
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:09:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Eastern Metal Recycling (EMR) is seeking a Scale Operator for our Bristol, PA location. EMR is an ever-expanding global recycling organization, spreading 10 countries and 18 states. As a Scale Operator, you will have the opportunity to learn the various facets of our business to help build a foundation for a career at Eastern Metal Recycling (EMR). In this role, you will be learning all aspects of scale operations and quality assurance, as well as interacting with the general public. We are seeking highly motivated candidates who want to work in a fast-paced growing environment and learn about the scrap metal industry.Position Description:Responsible for the documentation of quantity, quality, and type of ferrous and non-ferrous metalsMaintaining that all purchasing and sales tickets are in orderCommunicate with customers and vendors to ensure proper information regarding metals/materialsAbility to instruct trucks and workers (union/non union) to weigh, move and examine metals/materialsResponsible for operating the scale and ensuring accuracy of all weighingEnter all customer information, metal/material in the ERP system (propietary software)Constant communication with Yard SupervisorOther duties as assigned by managementMaintain accurate daily records of scale operationsManage the Scale payables and ticketsIdeal Candidate will Possess:Knowledge of ferrous and non-ferrous metals (preferred)Basic Computer SkillsDetail-oriented and ability to prioritizeExcellent verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work in a fast-paced, growing environmentEMR/USA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. ALL employees must successfully pass drug screen and background check.",Scale Operator Job in Tullytown,Full Time,"Tullytown, PA 19007",Metals and Minerals,http://jobview.monster.com/Scale-Operator-Job-Tullytown-PA-US-165867376.aspx?mescoid=4300745001001&jobPosition=17,12.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,,2f507abd20537510eea782b33e672d79
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:10:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Plant Manager, Albany, NY About the Job Plant Manager Shelter Enterprises Inc. a recognized innovator in the manufacturing of building products for over 40 years, is looking for an experienced and outgoing Plant Manager for our expanded polystyrene manufacturing plant in Cohoes, NY. The ideal professional candidate will possess related job experience, demonstrated ability to supervise, and a willingness to learn new things. Please let us know how your unique skillset can be an asset to our company. Your contact information and salary requirements should go to HR@shelter-ent.comJOB DESCRIPTION SUMMARY: The Plant Manager is responsible for all manufacturing, purchasing of materials, plant personnel, and distribution operations. The Plant Manager will track and improve all company goals and metrics and foster a well-trained, efficient, and motivated staff. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Plan, organize, and direct the manufacturing operations to attain the most effective return on assets. Initiate plans and processes which minimize manufacturing costs through effective utilization of manpower, equipment, facilities, materials, and capital.Couple the attainment of business objectives and production schedules while insuring product standards that will exceed our customers’ expectations. Implement manufacturing strategies and action plans to ensure that the facility sets the standard in excellence for service and quality. Establish team and individual accountabilities throughout assigned departments for problem solving and cost reduction, both on a permanent and ad-hoc basis, depending on need. Encourage use of new techniques and focus on fact based problem solving. Work to establish management practices throughout assigned areas that include all employees’ involvement with opportunity for constructive input and action. Continually improve safety record by addressing both physical safety issues and employee safety attitudes Maintain and improve housekeeping in all areas. Foster a continual learning environment whereby employees maintain essential skills and are challenged to learn the latest in techniques and processes QUALIFICATIONS:The continued growth of our business requires: A dedicated and proven leader able to work closely with and develop all functional business units in the organization. Ability to work with Excel spreadsheets with ease 5 plus years of experience in operations/logistics in a direct and/or support role 5 plus years of supervisor experience Demonstrated ability to work with little supervision Established track record of improvement Strong leadership skills, independent thinking, strong organizational and planning abilities and excellent analytical and problem solving skills are essential along with a high energy level To be flexible and motivated to take up challenges, showing strong initiative Salary, Benefits, 401k Plan available",Plant Manager Job in Cohoes,Full Time,"Cohoes, NY",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Plant-Manager-Job-Cohoes-NY-US-165866362.aspx?mescoid=1100015001001&jobPosition=19,,,768c4e029d97f84a9d389e93b26c25d4
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:10:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Excellent Company with great culture has a new opening for a Quality Manager. The position was created because of an internal promotion. The Quality Manager will be responsible for managing and facilitating the development, training, implementation, internal audit, and continuous improvement of quality systems. Here are some other responsibilities, but not limited to. Interact with customers to resolve quality issues. Track and chart customer visits using QOS measurables. Problem resolution at the plant level. Monitor supplier systems to gage quality performance. Support AQP activities with suppliers. Establish with purchasing, the supplier qualification and monitoring system. Assist with improving plant standardized quality systems. Assist with the internal quality system. Complete special projects in the areas of quality system improvement and corrective action. Plastics Injection Molding.Job Requirements:Four year degree in engineering or industrial management or equivalent combination of education and experience Minimum three to five years in a manufacturing environment. Thorough knowledge of manufacturing operations Knowledge of MS Office computer software Customer and supplier written and verbal interaction. Systematic problem solving skills. Experience in conducting or preparing for QS/ISO quality system audits. ISO 16949 a strong plus",Quality Manager Job in Greenville,Full Time,"Greenville, SC 29601",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Manager-Job-Greenville-SC-US-165421794.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=5,,,aa16c2574e998aec07c88f45174330cd
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:10:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"General Responsibilities:The Project Manager RAC Planning will report into the Senior Director Operations Analysis while supporting the RAC Planning group and is responsible for successful delivery of all assigned RAC Planning projects. The key responsibilities and accountabilities for the incumbent are to:Follow the established PMO framework and methodologies for managing projects.Manage all aspects of global project and program management including planning, design, engineering, procurement, resource planning, cost, scheduling and implementation activities, across multiple areas and multiple project teams.Facilitate and coordinate the various tasks for successfully analysing, designing, developing, testing and implementing the project on time and within the defined project budget.Establish a detailed project charter for project, ensuring that all involved project team members understand and agree what the project’s definition is before the project begins.Define, monitor and manage project schedules and responsibilities.Identify all contributing parties and their respective tasks.Determine task relationships and realistic completion dates.Create and manage a detailed project work plan for each project. Manage project portfolios including prioritizing projects, allocating resources and reporting progress to goals.Effectively communicate the project status to all team members.Establish and enact escalation procedures for questionable project milestones.Track the project milestones outlined in standard development and implementation methodologies.Ensure requirements for approvals, controls and documentation is satisfied.Obtain detailed knowledge of the project, identify problem areas before they impact the project and coordinate corrective actions.Ensure compliance with policies and standards.*LI-MM1Mandatory Requirements:Professional Experience:- Previous project management experience, preferably within Hertz.- Experience working in cross functional teamsKnowledge:- Knowledge of Hertz systems, data sources and organizational responsibilities- Knowledge of project management tools and processesSkills:- Ability to influence others without formal authority- Project management- Change management- Business case management- Requirements management- Planning and control- Time management- Organization skills- Presentation skills- Excellent written skills- Excellent MS Excel skills (tested)Competencies:- Ability to work comfortably across functional and geographical boundaries- Matrix management capability- Contingency planner- Execution and discipline- Business Acumen, commercial awareness- Ability to coach and provide feedback to team members- Edge – courage to make tough yes/no decisions- Excellent team builder. Ability to identify and overcome obstacles that inhibit team effectiveness- Leadership- Teamwork- Continuous improvement- Communication- Energy- Ability to energize othersPreferred Requirements :Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Project Manager RAC Planning Job in Estero,Full Time / Employee,"Estero, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-RAC-Planning-Job-Estero-FL-US-164979672.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,138e0ec3a154c53310916d59cebb1e55
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:12:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently looking to fill multiple customer service and sales positions in our Salem and Albany locations. The right person will love the thrill of a challenge, the excitement of working in a team, and the drive of tackling leadership responsibilities. Our company handles all face to face client interaction with new and existing customers. This position is full time and the pay is DOE hourly and commission. Competitiveness, hardworking, motivated, and customer sales skills would be the ideal characteristics of an employee who could excel in customer service. D.M. Management Group Promotes 100% from within! We do not outsource for any of our leaderhip roles. Job Summary:The successful candidate will be an integral part of our client's customer service and sales organization. They will assist the Market Manager in developing and executing a successful public relations strategy and will receive FULL TRAINING in sales and business development designed to gear them up for management roles.  What You’ll Learn:How our dynamic team creates business solutions unmatched by competitorsHow Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service fits into the big picture of what drives every great companyMarketing yourself to others inside and outside of your professional lifeHow fun at work actually create progressive more successful company cultureDeveloping & Managing a relationship with a growing client Benefits:Fast track career growthStrong team environmentTeam building work environmentPersonal and professional coaching by the industry’s finestLeadership developmentRequirements Qualities Our Team Members Exemplify: WORK WELL UNDER PRESSURE - Our clients are household names and expect our teams to deliver their best work and adhere to strict deadlines. Nevertheless, our team remains calm, cool, collected and is confident in our ability to deliver results. LEARN FROM MISTAKES - Everyone makes them. Our management encourages an environment where we examine data carefully, adapt accordingly and modify our training and overall game plan. We do not get discouraged but seek the right questions and answers. DEMAND PRECISION - We do not leave anything to chance. Through the use of proper tools, diverse training, and innovative solutions, we are able to meet our clients growing business needs. We are not afraid to take chances, but we take all available measure to reduce risk. SETTING GOALS - We consistently evaluate our team members performance and assess current and future capabilities in order to develop our teams maximum potential through training and mentorship. Our management is also not afraid to look for their own areas of improvement as well. We are seeking motivated individuals to help us grow our Customer Service & Sales Team. Because we are Entry Level, you do not need a background in sales. But, you DO need to have the above characteristics to be successful at our firm. Apply Online or Visit Us Online: http://www.developmentalitymanagement.com",NOW HIRING! Customer Service and Sales Representatives Job in Tualatin,Full Time Employee,"Tualatin, OR 97062",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/NOW-HIRING!-Customer-Service-Sales-Representatives-Job-Tualatin-OR-US-165997319.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=12,,Marketing/Product,af7a2da5607df4b207cf72b71045a595
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:14:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Promotions Assistant: Marketing. Advertising. Public Relations.Now hiring for a Promotions Assistant to help with our communications and sales promotions for our Telecommunication and Technology Clientele!Bivion International is looking for an Promotions Assistant to join our Marketing, Advertising and Public Relations team.  Through working closely with our Marketing Coordinators, this position will assist in increasing the availability and awareness of our clients’ products through pre-planned local campaigns and initiatives.  Our company is very customer-focused, and our goal for every marketing campaign is to create an engaging, positive, memorable experience surrounding the brand.  The primary responsibility of the Promotions Assistant is to facilitate the brand experience through professional interactions with preferred customers. Now what's different about this position?!?The Promotions Assistant will learn every facet of our campaigns from the ground up.  After a completion of training and demonstrated ability to take a leadership role in our marketing & public relations, this position will be considered for growth opportunities within SIX MONTHS !  We have 2 NEW OFFICES opening in the Southeast and we are actively recruiting the best and brightest talent NOW! RequirementsCore Responsibilities of the Promotions Assistant:Serve as the voice and face of the brand through promotional marketing and advertising campaignsFollowing training in each brand and product line, be able to effectively answer any questions or inquiries from consumersProvide demonstrations, samples and promotional materials to interested customersAssist customers in filling out order or registration forms at the promotionHave a full understanding of pricing and  be able to provide approximate quotes for product packagesKeep detailed records of consumer demand traffic, common questions, and complications for review to continuously improve customer service as a wholeAdditional Duties Based on Interest and Ability:Assisting in the daily growth and development of our companyAssisting with efforts of new business acquisition Customer retention and acquisition for a telecommunications clientOverseeing a team Expertly managing the needs of external customers Developing strong leadership and interpersonal skillsSales and Promotional ServiceWorking on a tablet dailyDemographic Research for residential areas  Qualifications:Excellent customer service skills; experience in direct customer service and sales is a plusStrong organizational skills and time management skillsAbility to work independently as well as within the teamAbility to represent a professional, positive, and enthusiastic demeanor to customers and fellow team membersMust be able to work designated schedule and be flexible for promotions in the evenings and on weekendsAbility to work well under pressure in a fast-paced, high-volume environmentWe train our team to learn a variety of skills from sales and human resources to management and mentorship. We are looking for candidates that may be new to the workforce or who have work experience, but are willing to start from the bottom up in order to learn the complexities and opportunities within a new industry.  ",Promotions Assistant: Marketing. Advertising. Public Relations. Job in West Palm Beach,Full Time Employee,"West Palm Beach, FL 33406",Advertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Promotions-Assistant-Marketing-Advertising-Public-Relations-Job-West-Palm-Beach-FL-US-165861966.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=11,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,5538a41d345f1f6c9963488bd6abb963
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:16:01,No,jobs.monster.com,".The Superior Group has a need for a Manufacturing Engineer/CNC Programmer for an exciting opportunity in Utica, NY! General Job Description: Company Products are Turbine engine air foils/blades-Aerospace Application To support all projects undertaken by the Engineering team in an NC Programming capacityThe candidate must have extensive Programming experience using Siemens Unigraphics NXThis individual must be a motivated, self starter, someone who can learn on the fly and take ownership and accountability. 50% of position is shop floor troubleshooting and process work. 50% is desk computer work. Key Responsibilities/Areas of Accountability: Tasks related to NC Programming Possess the ability to effectively create NC programs for various Milling Machine tools using Siemens Unigraphics NX or MasterCam.Perform Machine Setups and Trials for Development Projects. Note this is product development-Operators will assist in set-ups.Create Process Sheets that clearly define Process ProceduresTo provide support to machine operatorsTo identify improvement opportunities in NC programmingPossess ability to effectively understand and/or modify created macro programs Tasks related to Manufacturing Engineering Analyze and document current manufacturing methodsTo clearly understand the manufacturing processes used for all company productsPresent solutions/recommendations to business units for capitol equipment purchasesInvestigate current and developing technologies for improvements in future company manufacturing methodsSupport capitol equipment purchasesSupport Machine Installations and AcceptancesSupport projects in regards to improving manufacturing capabilitiesCommunicate with suppliers/vendors in a professional manner that helps achieve company needsDevelop presentations and/or documentation to allow for clear understanding of projects to company colleagues Core Competencies: IntegrityInitiative/MotivationTeamworkTroubleshooting/problem solvingTime ManagementAttention to DetailDecision-Making/Judgment Required Skills / Qualifications: 2 year degree in engineering, IT, IS or systems programming5 years of CNC programming experience3 years CNC machine Setup and Operation experiencePreferred Skills / Qualifications:4 year degree in engineering, IT, IS, systems programming, preferred.3 years of CNC programming in aerospace manufacturingSiemens Unigraphics NX or Mastercam experienceFamiliar with machining aerospace alloys, titanium, Inconel, and steel Experience working in the aerospace industry and/or knowledge of Aerospace specifications are a plusUnigraphics Design and/or Multi Axis CNC Programming experience is a plusGood knowledge of cutting tool geometry and the ability to calculate speeds and feeds based on materialGood working knowledge of machine controls as related to programmingUnderstand drafting standards and thoroughly understand geometric dimensioning and tolerancingAbility to organize a sequence of tasks on a project to meet commitment datesEffective user of Microsoft Office Suite productsMust have shop floor experience and intimate knowledge of milling machine capability and functionality Go Beyond. www.superiorjobs.com EEO Employer - Minorities / Females / Disabled / Veterans / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity.",Manufacturing Engineer/CNC Programmer Job in Utica,Employee,"Utica, NY 13501",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-Engineer-CNC-Programmer-Job-Utica-NY-US-165181219.aspx?mescoid=1700194001001&jobPosition=17,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e33de0248d6f1a9e8777d6d59fa9f4ce
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:16:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Evans Hotels seeks a qualified Laundry Manager to oversee our Belmont Laundry facility. Belmont Laundry is located on Pacific Highway in San Diego. The Laundry is a large facility that employs approximately 35 employees and has a variety of industrial-sized machines that wash, dry, and press all of the linen, including sheets, towels, tablecloths and napkins for all of our San Diego resorts. The linen is transported to and from the hotels daily by our own laundry drivers. Although the laundry is physically located away from the hotels, the team there plays an integral role in creating a positive experience for our guests. The Laundry Manager is responsible for total administration of Belmont Laundry, by managing the staff, monitoring the equipment and ensuring the highest standards of linen cleanliness. The Laundry Manager is aware of safety, payroll, state, federal, and laundry rules, regulations and procedures. Is well versed is CAL-OSHA regulations and procedures. Manages laundry staff in the processing of linen, including sheets, towels, robes, tablecloths, napkins and variety of employee uniforms. Effectively manages the production of the laundry plant to meet the linen needs of the various departments of the hotels, processing approximately 300,000 pounds of linen each month.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following. Other duties may be assigned.1. Manages flow of work through sorting, washing, and ironing departments, taking into consideration amount of clothes to be laundered and capacity of equipment.2. Oversees the maintenance of laundry equipment and ensures that all components are functioning properly. 3. Directs the activities of the maintenance team. Sets-up maintenance charts to verify preventative maintenance is being done. 4. Ensures the safety and security of the personnel.5. Prepares and analyzes reports on labor cost and production operations to determine whether operating cost standards are being met.6. Ensures that labor costs are in line with budgets.7. Responsible for purchasing items needed in the laundry, such as soap, starch, soap and equipment parts.8. Receives and assigns special requests for projects and special assignments from other departments. 9. Conducts monthly department meetings and sets goals for the department.10. Ensures that cleaning processes meet the quality standards of cleanness for Evans Hotels. Due to the sophistication of the equipment, the laundry must be cleaned on a daily basis. This includes vacuuming the machines, ledges and overhead beams. Ensures that lint traps are cleaned twice per day. The floor must be cleaned on a daily basis using the floor-polishing machine.11. Interviews, hires, and trains employees. 12. Counsels, develops and conducts employee performance evaluations.13. Completes weekly schedules according with occupancy demands. 14. Motivates and disciplines personnel as needed. 15. Anticipates employee needs. 16. Is aware of and implements programs to maintain safety, payroll, state, federal, and hotel rules, regulations and procedures. 17. Schedules two safety tailgates per week.18. Ensures that laundry vehicles are properly controlled, maintained, and all designated drivers placed on DMV pull program. 19. Documents linen inventory received and delivered each day to produce production reports for the Accounting Department.20. Protects Company assets. 21. Physical demands include being able to lift up to 100 pounds or maneuver 400 pounds in a cart without injury. Must be able to regularly push, pull, lift and bend constantly. 22. Work shifts will be 20% sitting and 80% standing/walking on a daily basis. Must be able to work long hours productively, between 8 - 10 hours a day, work weekends and holidays as needed. 23. Must have a valid California driver's license. 24. Experienced in chemicals, equipment usage, labor and supply controls. 25. Operates a variety of commercial laundry equipment, including Ellis Tunnel System; high speed folding system; various other smaller front loading commercial washers and a car lift. 26. Performs all laundry helper, driver, and attendant duties when needed. 27. Tests strength of bleach and water hardness.28. Performs other administrative and supervisory duties to ensure efficient and profitable operation. MACHINES AND TOOLS USED1. 10 key calculator2. Telephone3. Washing 4. Ellis Tunnel & System5. Commercial Dryers6. Sheet folders7. Ironers and pressers8. Laundry carts9. Towel folders10. Vacuum cleaners11. Vehicle12. Car lift 13. Lint Traps14. Steam Ironer for UniformsCandidate Requirements:•Five years previous experience as Laundry Manager in a commercial laundry required•Bilingual English/Spanish, preferred.Service professionals with a friendly, enthusiastic, can-do attitude is what we are looking for! Candidates must be able to maintain a friendly, positive attitude and a professional demeanor at all times. They must be dedicated to providing a memorable experience to each of our guests. They must be committed to the pursuit of excellence in service, a consistent product of high quality and value, and an entrepreneurial, sales-focused culture. Company ProfileEvans Hotels is the premier provider of resort accommodations in one of San Diego's most beautiful and scenic locations, Mission Bay Park. Since 1953, it has been our mission to match the superior natural beauty of this landscape with a superior level of service, in addition to well thought out amenities complemented by stylish interior environments. Our properties include The Lodge at Torrey Pines in La Jolla and the Bahia and Catamaran Resort Hotels on Mission Bay.To apply online : https://recruiting.adp.com/srccar/public/RTI.home?d=ExternalBAHCareerSite&c=1093641To apply in person and complete an online application: Monday - Friday from 10:00 AM - 4:00 PM at the Bahia Human Resources Office located at 998 West Mission Bay Dr. San Diego, CA, 92109. Se habla EspañolA partial list of our benefits includes: Medical coverage (after 30 days of employment, for full-time employees); 401(k) Plan (after the completion of 1,000 hours of service in the first 12 months of employment or in any subsequent calendar year); Section 125 Reimbursement Plan; discounted banking services; discounted health club membership; employee hotel discounts through the Resort Hotel Association Employee Rate Lodging Program; free employee parking and free employee shift meals. --------------------------------------------------------------------------------We Are An Equal Opportunity EmployerEvans Hotels provides equal employment opportunities to all qualified persons. The Company prohibits unlawful discrimination on the basis of a person's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, pregnancy, marital status, national origin, citizenship, military and veteran status, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, genetic characteristics or medical condition, or any other legally-protected category. Reasonable accommodations are available upon request for qualified individuals with disabilities.",Laundry Manager Job in San Diego,Full Time,"San Diego, CA 92109",,http://jobview.monster.com/Laundry-Manager-Job-San-Diego-CA-US-165707544.aspx?mescoid=3700620001001&jobPosition=8,"$78,000.00+ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),43ac2b847096028704b029a0a76753ba
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:16:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Start your career HERE! The Product Marketing Specialist will be motivated to make an impact and have a start-up mentality within an established International organization. Ideal candidates will desire career longevity, possess passion for the products and ability to lead promotional activities.Amazing opportunity for an individual interested in developing a promising Marketing Career in the Health Industry. Exceptional candidates will have Marketing Strategy and Product or Program Management experience. Sales Strategy, Excellent Interpersonal Communications & Public Relations are also crucial skills to generate demand and capture market share. Bachelor?s degree required, Business Administration or Management preferred, with concentrations in Marketing, Public Relations or Communications. Must have a minimum of one year of related experience and specific product or program management. Company is located in thriving life sciences industry area of Carlsbad. Candidates will have the opportunity to travel across the US and potentially internationally as well. This job is ideal for someone that has high energy, ability to think as an entrepreneur and would appreciate to have dynamic work load. If you are ready to be treated like family, operating on a global scale, this is the place for you! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1027971 Job Experience:,",Product Marketing Specialist - up to $K Job in Carlsbad,Full Time,"Carlsbad, CA 92010",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Product-Marketing-Specialist-up-to-38K-Job-Carlsbad-CA-US-165999276.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=9,Up to $38000.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),f763a71bf980d2522762f40656a01666
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:17:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Machine Operators Riverdale Mills CorporationFull timeRotating 12 hour shift 7am-7pm or 7pm to 7 amQuality, EfficiencyMultiple openingsAn established Wire Mesh Company in the manufacturing industry is looking for the services of Machine Operators to work with their close knit team in Northbridge.The Machine Operators will perform a variety of standard operations to operate a computer controlled welding machine to produce welded wire mesh to meet production schedule requirements, meet all quality specifications, perform set-ups, changeovers and assist with routine maintenance. The Welding Machine Operator does not physically perform the welding, the machine does. The operator’s responsibilities and requirements are listed below.Welding Machine Operators will: Work from specification sheets, job orders and verbal instructions.Ensure that all wires are properly positioned for feeding into the welder.Maintain continual visual inspection of product and process for proper positioning, welding. Cutting.Clean and maintain welding electrodes on a regular basis and make minor adjustments to machine as neededPerform and record prescribed quality checks.Inform supervisor of any processing or operating problems.Remove welded rolls of mesh from rollers.Palletize finished rolls.Monitor wire field.Perform general preventative maintenance task.Help other machine operators as needed. Requirements for Welding Machine Operators: High School Diploma required or its equivalent with 2-5 years of experience as a machine operator or in a related area.Must be able to work independently.Must be detail oriented and organized.Maintain a clean work area.Lifting requirements up to approximately 50 lbs.Maintain high levels of efficiency and quality.Good mechanical aptitude. If you are a proactive person who takes pride and ownership in your contribution, have excellent attention to detail and want to be part of a growing organization this could be your next long term role.",Machine Operators Job in Northbridge,Full Time,"Northbridge, MA 01534",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Machine-Operators-Job-Northbridge-MA-US-165253628.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3a825dba0e24bd69630d90058ee55a43
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:21:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production Manager/Supervisor Regional Healthcare Laundry is looking for enthusiastic, energetic, and professional candidate looking for long term career with growth and stability. Skills:·         Leadership Experience minimum 2 years or other work related experience·         Proficient in productivity and performance evaluation·         Needs to be a self-starter and energetic·         Knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel and Outlook·         Bilingual is preferred but not necessary·         Flexible- Must be able to work extended hours according to production schedule and other shifts if need it Job Description:·         Full Time Position·         Lead, train and supervise the Production staff, including production supervisors·         Oversee all new hires training, consistently conduct regular and ongoing training in all departments·         Consult with engineers to ensure the optimal operation of the plant·         Communicate with transportation on any transportation related issues ·         Responsible for adherence to, implementing and execution of company production policies, procedure and standards·         Responsible for ensuring that industry standards for production, quality and housekeeping and safety are met·         Responsible for departments budgets, discipline and employee relations·         Follow written and verbal instructions, attend meetings, create reports and perform other tasks as directed by supervision Benefits:Competitive PayQuarterly Bonuses401 (k) Retirement PlanMedical, Dental, &  Life insuranceVacation and Holiday Pay",Production Manager-Supervisor Job in Joliet,Full Time,"Joliet, IL 60433",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Manager-Supervisor-Job-Joliet-IL-US-165083156.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=20,Competitive Pay,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),3ea7558839fc61c8a6f0dab7a3d0a1b4
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:21:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Memphis State:&nbsp;&nbsp;Tennessee Postal/Zip Code: 38113 &nbsp; APAC Mississippi, Inc, an Oldcastle company is a great place to work!&nbsp; We have great employees that have been with us many years – and hope that that track record of longevity shows the pride we take in being one of the best places to work in Mississippi!&nbsp; Come join our team – where you will receive vacation, retirement and many other great benefits! &nbsp; &nbsp; Roller Operator- Rubber Tire Do you want to work for a company that values your skills? Do you want to work for a company that values safety above all else? Are you looking for opportunities and benefits of a large corporation with a small company feel? Then Oldcastle Materials is the company for you! Apply for the Equipment Operator today and jump start your career with the Oldcastle Materials family. &nbsp; Job Description Summary Minimum of 2 years prior experience operating a PT125R or similiar roller&nbsp;is required. The selected candidate will be required to work in a team environment with other co-workers and managers. Safely and efficiently operate heavy equipment of various sizes and weights used in road, site or highway construction and paving. Report any problems to your manager. Operator will be responsible for a safe work environment for themselves and co-workers. When working with co-workers, constant eye contact will be maintained when backing, communicating using hand signals or other movements. Properly follow all company policies and OSHA / MSHA regulations for safe working procedures and environment. Follow directions of Foreman as to daily tasks and expectations for each specific project or job site. Perform minor servicing and maintenance of equipment; refer major problems to the Foreman. Perform daily pre–and–post inspections with appropriate documentation in compliance with company policies. Assist in training less–experienced employees on the proper operations, servicing and repair of equipment to further their abilities. Perform general labor duties when necessary. Perform other duties as assigned. Work Requirements The ideal candidate will: Pass pre-employment drug screen and criminal background check. Pass a pre-employment “Fit for Work” physical. Be able to provide valid documentation for the I-9 Immigration document. Display a professional and courteous attitude to co-workers, supervisors and the general public at all times. Willing to travel and work away from home when required. Be willing to work nights and weekends when necessary. Report to work at the designated start time. Be able to work overtime when required. Be willing to work outdoors in extreme temperatures, both hot and cold. Strictly adhere to safety requirements and procedures as outlined in the Employee Handbook. Have the willingness to work in a team environment and assist co–workers or supervisors with other duties as required. Wear personal protective equipment (PPE) in designated operations and production areas as stated by OSHA and / or MSHA. Be at least age 18 years of age due to nature of working environment. Education/Experience Minimum high school diploma or general education degree (GED) required. Previous related experience in the construction field and/or training. &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; APAC Mississippi s an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer &nbsp; APAC Mississippi is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",Roller Operator - Memphis TN Job in Memphis,Full Time Employee,"Memphis, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Roller-Operator-Memphis-TN-Job-Memphis-TN-US-165563954.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=9,,,1a40ac18e026d290d76652a6f1cf2fce
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:23:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; &nbsp; City:&nbsp; LouisburgState:&nbsp; North CarolinaPostal/Zip Code: 27549 &nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden, a division of Oldcastle, is one of the largest manufacturers of bagged and bulk decorative mulch, soil, stone, and limestone products in the nation with over 40 production facilities.&nbsp; We take pride in serving a diverse group of customers including independent garden centers, mass retailers, landscapers, contractors, and homeowners. &nbsp; Job Summary &nbsp; This position requires operating a forklift in a rugged 50+ acre outdoor, paved and unpaved environment.&nbsp; The successful candidate must be able to work in a fast-paced, covered and uncovered manufacturing facility. &nbsp; &nbsp; Job Duties &nbsp; Operate stretch wrap machines, film roll up-enders, and extended boom arm forklift equipment Organize product on the yard according to inventory procedures Safely load product onto and unload product from flat beds and box trailers Validate packing slips, ship tickets, and other delivery documentation by auditing, recording and interpreting shipping documentation, weights &amp; measures, labels and production schedules &nbsp; Requirements &nbsp; 2 years’ experience operating 5,000 lb forklift in an outdoor yard environment High school diploma or GED, or equivalent combination of education, training and experience Ability to perform routine inspection, fueling &amp; preventive maintenance duties (lubrication, cleaning, battery change) Ability to read and write in English Math, communication, and comprehension skills to interface with transportation, dispatch, &amp; direct trailer hitch operations Ability to successfully pass internal Forklift Certification Training and demonstrate safety procedures.&nbsp; Able to perform job tasks in sometimes dusty, hot and/or cold working conditions &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You &nbsp; Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive benefits&nbsp;programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and advancement &nbsp; About Oldcastle &nbsp; Oldcastle is the leading North American manufacturer of building products. With over 2,000 locations and 30,000 employees, we are a proud reflection of many small to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. We provide a decentralized, entrepreneurial environment, where decisions at all levels drive performance. Each of our businesses works with great autonomy to service their local markets, while leveraging the group’s resources and best practices. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to work and grow! Take charge of your career and leverage the network of resources and growth opportunities. If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today. Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. &nbsp; EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. #30 &nbsp;",Forklift Operator - Louisburg,Full Time Employee,"Louisburg, NC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Forklift-Operator-Louisburg-NC-Job-Louisburg-NC-US-165564012.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=6,,,252869ef099f18d575ea6238d4a37e6f
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:25:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Operate EDM Wire machines to produce parts, all of which must meet the dimensional specifications of the mechanical engineered drawing.ISO-13485 certified, medical device manufacturer. Responsibilities: ·         Learn how to setup tools, Load/unload parts from machine.  Measure and inspect.  Learn to make dimensional adjustments (offsets).  Resolve and communicate problems/issues to attention of the Supervisor ·         Accurately complete all quality control documentation and inspection sheets·         Follows verbal and/or written instructions such as blueprints, traveler, work instruction, process specifications, sketches, and direction from supervisor in completing a variety of machining and inspection tasks   Requirements: ·         Must have a high school diploma (or equivalent)·         Ability to read part drawings ·         Clean, organized, and multi-task capable·         Team player, open to new ideas and team work, self-motivated individual, willingness to continually strive to increase personal knowledge and value·         Above average manual dexterity and mechanical aptitude·         Intermediate Math skills in geometric and trigonometric formulas a plus·         Visual inspection with the use of a microscope on small parts with attention to detail·         Flexible, reliable, self-starting team player with ability to work with little or no supervision ·         Good communication skills·         Willing to grow with our companyCompetitive wages and great benefits!EOE M/F/D/V Branch Medical Group is an equal opportunity employer",CNC Machinist EDM Wire Operator/Trainee nd Shift Job in Norristown,Full Time,"Norristown, PA 19403",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Machinist-EDM-Wire-Operator-Trainee-2nd-Shift-Job-Norristown-PA-US-135247745.aspx?mescoid=5100929001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ff4cb66879930a416759f6e5c6a2f95f
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:25:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is a Leading Global Consumer Healthcare Company that is seeking a Supply Chain PlannerClient DetailsOur client is a Leading Global Consumer Healthcare CompanyDescriptionThe Supply Chain Planner will be responsible for supply planning activities for a category of products to optimize inventory, meet customer service expectations and support the S&OP process. The Supply Chain Planner will develop supply plans to satisfy customer service objectives, while minimizing inventory costs for all products within the assigned category. Day to day responsibilities include the following:Act as single point of contact for the Supply Planning Manager and other key stakeholders for resolution of supply issues and implementation of relevant actions from regional supplier relationship management and S&OP meeting.Create Supply Plans for Finished Goods to meet the short, medium and long term goalsContribute to the development of proposals together with the Supply Planning Manager, Site Teams, External Supply Teams, Procurement, and Other Regional Hubs on how to best flex supply chain cost to changing volume requirementsReport key supply planning KPIsExecute Regional Capacity Planning process to ensure issues are clearly escalated for resolution at the monthly SRM/S&OPOptimize daily, weekly, monthly supply planning processes and co-ordination activities between Site Scheduling and Supply PlanningSplit plan production generated by local and central Distribution Requirements Planning (DRP) in weekly buckets (5 - 13 weeks) jointly with site schedulers and communicate gross production plan to sitesGenerate a manual supply plan for SKU's not in central DRPWork closely with Demand Forecasters to understand the forecasted requirements and manage supply to achieve and maintain high levels of customer service whilst meeting inventory targets.Manage seasonal planning and campaigning with the factories and marketLiaise with Commercial, CS&L and Site Logistics Departments to adjust delivery dates to customer when requiredOptimize stock holding levels within the total supply chain through a detailed understanding of the key planning parameters and end to end processManage stock levels for NPD and re-launches/discontinuationsProfileBachelor's degree2-5 years of related supply chain planning experience within a Fast Moving Consumer Goods or similar industryKnowledge and experience within highly complex and regulated supply chains, manufacturing sites and processStrong analytic and problem solving skillsExcellent communication and interpersonal skills with the ability to manage key stakeholders as well as drive continuous improvementKnowledge and experience with SAP preferredJob Offer$70,000 - 85,000Performance bonusHealthcare benefits3 weeks vacation401Ketc.",Supply Chain Planner Job in Warren,"Full Time , Employee","Warren, NJ",,http://jobview.monster.com/Supply-Chain-Planner-Job-Warren-NJ-US-165291775.aspx?mescoid=1300084001001&jobPosition=18,"70,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",,76288422c832b4f9301f5390f0276e22
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:39:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance Analyst-15904DescriptionCushman & Wakefield is a global leader in commercial real estate services, helping clients transform the way people work, shop, and live. The firm’s 43,000 employees in more than 60 countries provide deep local and global insights that create significant value for occupiers and investors around the world. Cushman & Wakefield is among the largest commercial real estate services firms with revenues of $5 billion across core services of agency leasing, asset services, capital markets, facility services (branded C&W Services), global occupier services, investment management (branded DTZ Investors), project & development services, tenant representation and valuation & advisory. To learn more, visithttp://www.cushmanwakefield.com/or follow@CushWakeon Twitter.JOB SUMMARY:Collect and research data and establish a record of maintenance and repairs on facility assets and equipment. Review data to insure compliance and develop countermeasures for improvement.Evaluate whether PM frequency is correct, should something be changed from a passive inspection to a pro-active replacement PMESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS & RESPONSIBILITIES:Must have working knowledge of the following: Industrial applications / machinery, Microsoft Office Suite applications and Maximo.Responsible for administration of Site Maximo for the C & W Services Facility groupMust keep equipment records currentMust be able to review data and develop reports for the Department ManagersMust have planning knowledge and be able to write job plans for the Facility equipmentJob plans need to be written in a manner that clearly instructs employees on LOTO, safety, inspection requirements, or repair requirements emphasizing pro-active PM work.Responsible for planning and scheduling TQS (""Total Quality Savings"") meetings.Encourages and coordinates employee’s ideas for improvement and track the cost reduction of that improvement during that calendar year.Responsible for reviewing current year goals and developing goals for the next yearDevelop LOTO procedures and establish Safety files for attachment to MAXIMO job plansKeeping all documentation and develop monthly reports such asKPI type documentationDevelop job tasks and procedures, establishing manpower and equipment requirements, assist in specifying and ordering materials, developing schedules and charts, attending planning and scheduling meetings with assigned departmental personnel, other work as defined by immediate supervisorParticipates in PEO (""Plant Emergency Operations"") requirements. Required to be part of the emergency response team.These responses include spills, traffic control if there is a medical emergency, plant emergencies, etc.NON ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS & RESPONSIBILITIES:Generate, distribute, and schedule PM audits on a monthly basisMember of Safety committee and Quality committeeAccurate and timely administrative duties to include, but not limited to, time accounting and work order completion.Must maintain positive customer and employee relations.REQUIREMENTS (Knowledge, Skills, Abilities, and Education and/or Experience):High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence.Ability to speak effectively before groups of customers and employees of organization.A valid driver’s license is required to obtain a Customer Mobile Equipment LicenseAble to operate a fork-liftAble to operate man-liftsWORKING CONDITIONS and/or PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:Physical Demands:The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is frequently required to sit and climb or balance. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl; talk or hear and taste or smell. The employee must regularly lift and /or move up to 10 pounds, frequently lift and/or move up to 25 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision and depth perception.Work Environment:The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly exposed to outside weather conditions. The employee is frequently exposed to wet and/or humid conditions and moving mechanical parts. The employee is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles; extreme cold; extreme heat; risk of electrical shock and vibration. The noise level in the work environment is usually loud.MON16#cwsQualificationsRequirementsTO BE INSERTED BY JOB CREATORWe are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.Job:Facility Management SolutionsPrimary Location:United States-North Carolina-WhitakersOrganization:OperationsSchedule:Full-timeJob Posting:Dec 28, 2015, 3:03:22 PMRecruiter:Jim Thompson",Maintenance Analyst Job in Whitakers,Full Time Employee,"Maintenance Analyst-15904DescriptionCushman & Wakefield is a global leader in commercial real estate services, helping clients transform the way people work, shop, and live. The firm’s 43,000 employees in more than 60 countries provide deep local and global insights that create significant value for occupiers and investors around the world. Cushman & Wakefield is among the largest commercial real estate services firms with revenues of $5 billion across core services of agency leasing, asset services, capital markets, facility services (branded C&W Services), global occupier services, investment management (branded DTZ Investors), project & development services, tenant representation and valuation & advisory. To learn more, visithttp://www.cushmanwakefield.com/or follow@CushWakeon Twitter.JOB SUMMARY:Collect and research data and establish a record of maintenance and repairs on facility assets and equipment. Review data to insure compliance and develop countermeasures for improvement.Evaluate whether PM frequency is correct, should something be changed from a passive inspection to a pro-active replacement PMESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS & RESPONSIBILITIES:Must have working knowledge of the following: Industrial applications / machinery, Microsoft Office Suite applications and Maximo.Responsible for administration of Site Maximo for the C & W Services Facility groupMust keep equipment records currentMust be able to review data and develop reports for the Department ManagersMust have planning knowledge and be able to write job plans for the Facility equipmentJob plans need to be written in a manner that clearly instructs employees on LOTO, safety, inspection requirements, or repair requirements emphasizing pro-active PM work.Responsible for planning and scheduling TQS (""Total Quality Savings"") meetings.Encourages and coordinates employee’s ideas for improvement and track the cost reduction of that improvement during that calendar year.Responsible for reviewing current year goals and developing goals for the next yearDevelop LOTO procedures and establish Safety files for attachment to MAXIMO job plansKeeping all documentation and develop monthly reports such asKPI type documentationDevelop job tasks and procedures, establishing manpower and equipment requirements, assist in specifying and ordering materials, developing schedules and charts, attending planning and scheduling meetings with assigned departmental personnel, other work as defined by immediate supervisorParticipates in PEO (""Plant Emergency Operations"") requirements. Required to be part of the emergency response team.These responses include spills, traffic control if there is a medical emergency, plant emergencies, etc.NON ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS & RESPONSIBILITIES:Generate, distribute, and schedule PM audits on a monthly basisMember of Safety committee and Quality committeeAccurate and timely administrative duties to include, but not limited to, time accounting and work order completion.Must maintain positive customer and employee relations.REQUIREMENTS (Knowledge, Skills, Abilities, and Education and/or Experience):High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence.Ability to speak effectively before groups of customers and employees of organization.A valid driver’s license is required to obtain a Customer Mobile Equipment LicenseAble to operate a fork-liftAble to operate man-liftsWORKING CONDITIONS and/or PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:Physical Demands:The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is frequently required to sit and climb or balance. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl; talk or hear and taste or smell. The employee must regularly lift and /or move up to 10 pounds, frequently lift and/or move up to 25 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision and depth perception.Work Environment:The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly exposed to outside weather conditions. The employee is frequently exposed to wet and/or humid conditions and moving mechanical parts. The employee is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles; extreme cold; extreme heat; risk of electrical shock and vibration. The noise level in the work environment is usually loud.MON16#cwsQualificationsRequirementsTO BE INSERTED BY JOB CREATORWe are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.Job:Facility Management SolutionsPrimary Location:United States-North Carolina-WhitakersOrganization:OperationsSchedule:Full-timeJob Posting:Dec 28, 2015, 3:03:22 PMRecruiter:Jim Thompson",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Analyst-Job-Whitakers-NC-US-165826090.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,575e1c3b3b2bc63133c642843cd4f46a
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:41:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"             General Warehouse Support              Job Summary: The General Warehouse Support position is responsible for order picking and packing, will call order picking and packing, staging of both ship out and will call orders, processing cable cuts, lagging reels, palletizing reels, boxing cable cuts, forklift, and shipping/receiving. Essential Job Functions: Responsible for assuring that the Warehouse is cleaned on a daily basisMaintain, sort, and organize merchandise so that it can be easily located in proper bin locationsResponsible for picking all orders that come in on a daily basis for Talley, Inc. customersAssure that product that is being picked for customer orders is 100% accurateResponsible for packing all orders that come in on a daily basis for Talley Inc customersAssure that product that is being packed for customer orders is 100% accurate and protectedResponsible for picking, packing, and loading/checking out of customer will call ordersProcess cable cuts, lagging/boxing of reels/coils, and palletizing reels per customer requirementsShipping and receivingAdditional job duties and responsibilities can be added at any time Knowledge, Skill and Experience Required: 1.                  The General Warehouse Support must be able to operate a standard forklift2.                  The General Warehouse Support must be able to lift up to 50lbs.3.                  The General Warehouse Support must be able to stand for long periods of time and be able to bend and reach overhead4.                  The General Warehouse Support must be able to work under deadline pressure as organization skills are the key to finding and providing merchandise quickly and accurately for customer orders.5.                  Experience using a  hand held scanner6.                  Minimum Education (or substitute experience) required: High School Diploma or equivalent.7.                  Minimum Experience required: 1 year warehouse experience.8.                  Ability to read and write in English.  Basic math skills.  9.                  Customer Service skills a plus",General Warehouse Support Job in Aurora,"Full Time, Employee","Aurora, CO 80011",,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Warehouse-Support-Job-Aurora-CO-US-165425067.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=20,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,20adbb9a39b16b14d704a90020270d68
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:41:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; &nbsp; City:&nbsp; WalterboroState:&nbsp; South CarolinaPostal/Zip Code: 29488 &nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden, a division of Oldcastle, is one of the largest manufacturers of bagged and bulk decorative mulch, soil, stone, and limestone products in the nation with over 40 production facilities.&nbsp; We take pride in serving a diverse group of customers including independent garden centers, mass retailers, landscapers, contractors, and homeowners. &nbsp; Summary &nbsp; This position will operate various heavy equipment, such as front-end loaders, knuckle booms, bulldozers, wheel loaders, and all-terrain forklifts, in a rugged 50+ acre outdoor, paved and unpaved environment.&nbsp; Operators will use this heavy equipment to move bulk material throughout a manufacturing facility, while adhering to safety policies and procedures. &nbsp; Essential Duties and Responsibilities &nbsp; Observe equipment operation to detect machine malfunction. Read job specifications to determine operator adjustments and material requirements. Perform routine maintenance to include lubricating, fueling and cleaning. Inspect and complete equipment report daily. Able to move levers, shift gears, depress pedals and maneuver steering wheel to operator equipment Ability to think independently while successfully functioning in a team environment, with a proven track record of contributing toward team goals &nbsp; Requirements &nbsp; 2 years’ experience using heavy equipment/front end loader Must be able to work safely in a busy mulch yard, judging distances and operating equipment with precision High school diploma or GED, or equivalent combination of education, training and experience Able to read and write in English as well as record and understand numerical values Able to sit for extended periods, climb up &amp; down from cab heights, work affectively in extreme outdoor climate(s) - cold, heat, rain, fog &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You &nbsp; Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive benefits&nbsp;programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and advancement &nbsp; About Oldcastle &nbsp; Oldcastle is the leading North American manufacturer of building products. With over 2,000 locations and 30,000 employees, we are a proud reflection of many small to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. We provide a decentralized, entrepreneurial environment, where decisions at all levels drive performance. Each of our businesses works with great autonomy to service their local markets, while leveraging the group’s resources and best practices. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to work and grow! Take charge of your career and leverage the network of resources and growth opportunities. If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today. Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. &nbsp; EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. #30 &nbsp;",Equipment Operator - Walterboro,Full Time Employee,"Walterboro, SC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Equipment-Operator-Walterboro-SC-Job-Walterboro-SC-US-165761533.aspx?mescoid=4700802001001&jobPosition=16,,,37fd75882fb44bc895ade37ce6375d28
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:41:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Warehouse Coordinator - Location: Jacksonville, FLPOSITION SUMMARY Responsible for ensuring that all warehouse functions are completed accurately and on time.   Keeps records on incoming and outgoing shipments and prepares items for shipment.  Responsible for filling customer orders and delivering them to the delivery platform in a manner that meets Company standards for safety, security, and productivity.  Responsible for the completeness and correctness of all orders filled.   Checks outbound shipments for accuracy and readiness for customer delivery.",Warehouse Coordinator Job in Jacksonville,,"Jacksonville, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Warehouse-Coordinator-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-165709019.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=4,,,be009a3185f07f27e47dac2a3d699e1d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:46:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Press Operators Location: Chicago, ILWith Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment.Manufacturing Positions AvailableJob Responsibilities:Responsible for a production machine, able to understand the process and paperwork and able to keep up with high speed environment. Machines vary from: Automatic Presses, Manual Presses, Seamers, body makers, and Palletizers.Full Time & Part TimeAll Shifts Associate Requirements:HS Diploma or GED 1 yr. Manufacturing Experience. Must have Previous Machine Operator ExperienceAble to Lift 60 poundsBackground CheckDrug TestStand for Shift DurationMust be at least 18 years oldAssociate Benefits:Weekly paychecksDirect Deposit or Cash Card pay optionsMedical / Dental InsuranceHourly Work Location BWAY Corp./Chicago-7015 3200 S. Kilbourn Ave. Chicago, IL 60623 FOLLOW US ON FACEBOOK SEARCH: STAFF MANAGEMENT / SMX & TWITTER: #SMXJOBSNOW EOE",Press Operators Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Press-Operators-Job-Chicago-IL-US-165775395.aspx?mescoid=5100934001001&jobPosition=17,,Entry Level,1c74ee38cd30e434f03146bcf1a4192b
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:48:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Septic Service Technician Clay's Septic Service Looking for full time permanent employee to pump out septic tanks.  CDL preferred but will train the right person  Pre-employment drug test and physical required  Good driving record  Able to lift 75 lbs.  Good customer service skills required  Monday - Friday with occasional weekend call Resumes with 2 work and 2 personal references required, e-mail claysseptic@yahoo.com or mail P.O. Box 632 Tomah, WI 54660.",Septic Service Technician Job in Tomah,Full Time,"Tomah, WI 54660",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Septic-Service-Technician-Job-Tomah-WI-US-165326550.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=7,,,912e8b5a493e4dc8ed6abe2c73f09582
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:50:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manages Production, Maintenance, Engineering, EHS, Geology, and acts as the senior executive for a site with several functions reporting to functional heads in a matrix organization.  Duties and Responsbilities:Provides leadership and vision to the production, maintenance, engineering, EHS, and geology department managers ensuring safe, compliant, and cost effective operations.Uses resources and assets to meet the market demand and enable the site to support new product introductions. Seek technological advances to increase reliability and improve the unit cost position. Direct the site geology department and contract mining operations to ensure continuity of clay supply. Develop capital project plans and oversee project execution. Coordinate with departments based on-site reporting to off-site functional heads such as production planning, finance, customer service, warehouse and logistics, laboratory services, G&A, and HR. Foster a spirit of cooperation amongst all BYK employees on site and serve as the senior executive authority in case of a dispute as the person responsible for employee welfare on site. Ensures compliance with all company policies and procedures, regulations and corporate guidelines on business ethics. Manage the talent pool under your direct control and make organization structure adjustments as necessary to optimize the operation. Develops department budgets and operates within budgets. Ensure the site is trained to respond to emergencies using the Incident Command system. Conduct annual performance reviews and ensure discipline is fairly administered to all employees. Ensure root cause investigations are performed as needed, corrective actions are performed, and drive a culture of continuous improvement.  Required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:Strong interpersonal skills – positive attitude, stress tolerant, able to inspire others.Knowledge of chemical manufacturing operations with a heavy emphasis on mechanical equipment. Knowledge of workplace safety and environmental regulations as applied to a chemical production facility, as well as the incident command system. Knowledge of factory costing models, budgets, and cost control. Experience with capital project costing and project execution. Strong verbal and written communication skills with the ability to interact effectively with individuals at all levels in the organization.  Qualifications:BS/BA Degree in Chemical or Mechanical Engineering 15 years of experience in manufacturing operations preferably in a chemical plant Competent on standard computer programs such as MicroSoft Office, SAP experience desirable",Site Manager Job in Gonzales,Full Time,"Gonzales, TX 78629",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Site-Manager-Job-Gonzales-TX-US-165078463.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),fac08b80552dedf5c3f22f56a2c6dab2
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:52:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"JENSEN PACKINGAccepting Applications for Packers/Graders/Palletizers/Box Makers/Forklift DriversMust Apply in Person on March 29th & 30th, 9am-12pm, March 31st & April 1st, 12pm-3pm, 13138 S. Bethel Avenue, Kingsburg",All Positions Job in Kingsburg,Full Time,"Kingsburg, CA 93631",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/All-Positions-Job-Kingsburg-CA-US-165032576.aspx?ch=hanford&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=16,,,92a2b03e58e4ec59a0fb044a20650624
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:53:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assurance Resource Manager San Jose, CA DESCRIPTION:As part of the Assurance Finance organization, this team consists of Resource Managers, Resource Senior Associates and Resource Coordinators. Broadly, across all the staff who comprise the team, their roles focus on analyzing and managing the optimal mix and use of skills, resources and budgets to deploy resources to best achieve the business goals of the Assurance client service leaders and engagement teams. The Resource Manager is responsible for senior manager and manager deployment and provides oversight to senior and associate deployment.KNOWLEDGE PREFERRED:- Demonstrated understanding of the business strategies and business priorities and ability to drive the effective allocation of resources in a manner that promotes individual development while meeting client needs and business objectives.- Extensive knowledge of HR, Finance, and deployment processes including knowledge of business drivers and financial implications of demand, capacity, utilization, and forecasting.- Detailed knowledge of utilizing resource allocation methods to achieve specified resource goals.- Experience providing guidance, coaching, supervision and formal feedback to team members.DEMONSTRATED ABILITY TO:- Partner with the business leaders to strategically align talent with clients.- Apply project management skills.- Support the practice leaders by providing deployment and operational metrics.- Collaborate with Human Resources on: contribution awards, performance feedback, strategic opportunities for managers/seniors, balance needs of engagement with developmental needs of staff.- Obtain input from Human Resources regarding headcount and confirm that related issues are communicated to Market Leader; work to implement headcount plan.Responsible for Sr. Manager and Manager deployment, provide oversight to senior and associate strategic deployment",Assurance Resource Manager Job in San Jose,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Jose, CA 95110",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Assurance-Resource-Manager-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-165766265.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=8,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,72bc36e062d37d1c0401955027701943
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:54:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"General Responsibilities:Hertz is currently looking for highly motivated adept professionals who want a Career. As an Airport Location Manager, you will have an opportunity to learn our most successful side of the business “hands-on”. This attained knowledge will enable you to rise through the ranks of management and continually become challenged by higher level roles and responsibilities. If you are searching for new challenges and rewards, Hertz offers exciting career opportunities to get you to the next level and beyond.Responsibilities:As a Hertz Airport Location Manager, you have full responsibility for one or more distinct areas of operation. You will be exposed to the entire operation to gain a well-rounded understanding of what makes a successful car rental company. A Location Manager oversees all of the personnel and operational functions of an airport location. You are responsible for managing a unionized and/or non-unionized workforce, delivering quality customer service, increasing sales and revenue, scheduling adequate staff coverage, handling customer issues and requests, and training new personnel. You will be empowered to make quick decisions independently to make the operation as successful as you know it can be.In addition, you are responsible for the rental fleet at your location and the staff that maintains it. You need to be aware of daily and hourly reservation and return counts, vehicle make and model availability, preventive maintenance schedules, etc.In your position as a Location Manager, you will move between these key areas of responsibility, learning the functions of each and in that way gain a working, on-site knowledge of the business that can help you progress into higher management ranks.Hertz strives to be the #1 car rental company in customer satisfaction and retention; we need you to help us achieve our goal!The compensation package includes a competitive base salary plus generous quarterly and annual bonus potential.  In addition to the compensation package, you will receive a fleet vehicle with all expenses paid. Some of the benefits employees are eligible for include:MedicalDentalVisionLife InsuranceDependent Life InsuranceVacationsHolidaySick DaysIncome Savings PlanU.S. Savings BondEmployee DiscountsTuition ReimbursementEmployee Stock Purchase Plan*Eligibility varies, depending on your employment statusMandatory Requirements:Mandatory Requirements:Associates Degree requiredProfessionally direct employees including: training, setting expectations, follow up and corrective actionExcellent communications skills with the ability to engage in verbal interactions with customersStrong sales skillsStrong problem-solving and decision making skillsAbility to project professional appearanceMust have basic computer skills and knowledge of Microsoft Office programsProficiency in EnglishMust have a valid driver's licensePreferred Requirements:Bachelor's degree preferred1+ years of Management experience preferredCustomer Service, Management, and Sales experience preferredA background managing a unionized workforce is helpfulExperience in car rental, hospitality, or tourism a plusFamiliarity with Lean/Six Sigma/Toyota Management techniques is an advantageApplicant must posses all auditory, speaking and communicating capabilities necessary to complete the responsibilities detailed above.  The essential functions of this position include, but are not limited to, the following: sitting, standing, walking, bending and twisting, climbing, driving, pushing and pulling, speaking, hearing, writing, lifting, typing, filing, seeing, reading and the ability to use a computer, telephone, calculator, copy machine and fax machine.Position Specs:40+ hour work weekSchedule flexibility within a 24 hour 365 day a year operation is required including Saturday/Sunday and Holiday availability.Base salary is $____ per hour plus quarterly bonuses.Commissions are paid quarterly and based on your location’s performance on a number of metrics.What We Need:Determined business professionals who are ready to take advantage of a managerial careerPolished/professional appearanceDriven and motivated personally and operationallyIndividuals looking for career growthIndividuals who thrive in challenging and competitive business environmentsWhat We Offer:Full benefits after probationary period (Medical, Dental, Vision, Vacation, 401K)The use of a Hertz car as your own personal vehicle, including coverage of gas and insuranceWork life balanceRoom to grow within multi branded corporation-Hertz, Dollar/Thrifty, Firefly Car RentalProfessional and Publicly respected environmentGreat reliable products to our guests!Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Location Manager (San Antonio) Job in San Antonio,Full Time / Employee,Location Manager (San Antonio),,http://jobview.monster.com/Location-Manager-San-Antonio-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-165053945.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=13,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e1ee8fc9d5294ed196c2f8142978e9fb
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:20:59:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manufacturing WE RE BUILDING A HEALTHIER WORLD JOIN US. Merck is a global health care leader with a diversi ed portfolio of prescription medicines, vaccines and consumer health products, as well as animal health products. Today, we are building a new kind of healthcare company - one that is ready to help create a healthier future for all of us. LIVE INTERVIEW DAY FOR: Engineering Specialists: Provide day-to-day equipment and facility engineering support for assigned areas including vaccine bulk manufacturing, and/or associated facility/utilities mechanical support. Manufacturing Operations Managers: Manage the direct processing of materials and supervise the associated hourly workforce within the integrated process team. If you have 2 + years of Supervisory work experience in a manufacturing environment, please come to discuss continuing your professional career with a leader in the pharmaceutical industry on: Friday,April 8 From 2:00PM to 4:00PM Normandy Farm Hotel & Conference Center 1401 Morris Rd Blue Bell, PA Interviews will be held in the Buchanan Room. For more information, please visit: www.merck.com/careers Merck is an equal opportunity employer, M/F/D/V - proudly embracing diversity in all of its manifestations. Copyright 2014 Merck Sharp & Dohme Corp., a subsidiary of Merck & Co., Inc. All rights reserved. CORP-1064987-0012 12/14",Manufacturing/Engineering Job in Ambler,Full Time,"Ambler, PA 19002",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Manufacturing-Engineering-Job-Ambler-PA-US-165797028.aspx?ch=phillyburbs&mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,add1828b9e707e52f839778d35a5b988
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:21:00:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Amatrol is a producer of skill-based, integrated technical learning systems. Our comprehensive training solutions include interactive multimedia as well as print-based student learning materials, teacher's guides, industrial quality hands-on training equipment, and instructor training. We are currently looking for Assembly Technicians who will complete or modify electronic and mechanical assembly of components, sub-assemblies and finished products.  Incumbents must also be able to identify and solve problems related to broken and defective electronic components, products and equipment.  This position is regular, fulltime (day shift) with attractive benefit package. Wage range is $11.00 to $14.00 per hour depending on experience and qualifications.Essential functions include the following:–        Assemble AC & DC, analog and digital components and finished goods to product specifications.–        Complete or modify electronic and mechanical assembly of components, sub-assemblies and finished goods.–        Assemble, solder, wire and repair electronic components, sub-assemblies and finished goods.–        Wire components, sub-assemblies and finished goods–        Ensure that circuit and component performance conforms to specifications.–        Document and maintain manufacturing procedures for electronic devices.–        Diagnose and troubleshoot defects and errors in electronic circuitry and components.–        Identify and solve problems related to broken and defective electronic and mechanical components, products and equipment.–        Calibrate, test and maintain production and test-associated equipment where applicable and designated.  Requirements–        Associate Degree in Electronics or equivalent experience–        Highly Preferred—Certification as an Electronics Technician with advanced electronics knowledge–        Knowledge and competency in fundamental electronics knowledge–        Ability to read blueprints and other product specification documents in English.–        Ability to solve problems–        Good interpersonal skills with ability to communicate and interface positively with other team members and departments.–        This position requires an organized individual who is self-motivated and can work independently. Past applicants may reapply.  Please contact Human Resources if you need any accommodations during the job application process due to a disability.  Amatrol, Inc. is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer.",Assembly Technician - Electronic (AT-E) Job in Jeffersonville,Full Time,"Jeffersonville, IN 47130","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/Assembly-Technician-Electronic-AT-E-Job-Jeffersonville-IN-US-145802041.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,d3488ccf267b5b97f62a77e6148d4624
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:21:03:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client in Cleveland is seeking a PRODUCTION SET-UP OPERATOR.  This is a 2nd Shift opportunity - a shift premium does apply.Responsibilities:Prepare, set up and operate all aspects of assigned machines at an appropriate pace according to engineering standards.Observe operation of machines and verify conformance of parts to specifications using visual inspection and proper measuring instruments.Properly track and record production and quality data through manual recording or computer data entry.Requirements:High School diploma or GED required.Previous manufacturing experience preferred.",Production Set-Up Operator Job in Cleveland,Full Time,"Cleveland, OH 44101",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Set-Up-Operator-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-159752216.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,10.00 - 10.00 $ /hourSecond Shift Shift Premium,Entry Level,8ce96badc559f8bc0f18a3602bb84955
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:21:07:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Linde is currently seeking a Sr. Regional Instrumentation & Control Technician to join the team in the LaPorte, Indiana area. Other locations within the region that may be considered include Lima, Ohio; Delta, Ohio; Hartford, Illinois; Muscatine, Iowa; Beloit, Wisconsin and Crawfordsville/Indianapolis, Indiana. Regional travel of 50-75% is required in this position. JOB RESPONSIBILITIES• Establish a culture of safety in working with regional staff and contractors in the execution of all aspects of the role requirements• Understand and follow company safe work policies and practices including Lone Worker requirements, hot work permit, lock out tag out, energy isolation, EMOC and SHEQ requirements• Promote a safe work environment by reporting safety incidents, near misses, unsafe conditions, environmental concerns and process problems to management immediately• Perform safety induction for contractors as required and monitor compliance• Ensure safety compliance for Regional instrumentation and controls staff• Execute and support Maintenance and Reliability initiatives and assignments in the Region• Ensure correct and comprehensive preventive maintenance job plan coverage for Regional plants in EAM system• Assign and/or execute instrumentation and controls maintenance• Ensure proper use of the system including comprehensive recording of data and close out of system work-orders• Assist in improving plant work instructions and/or job plans• Maintain and document calibration of Regional metrological equipment• Follow all Linde Quality Control procedures to ensure that the product delivered to Linde's customers meets all contractual, industry, and FDA requirements as applicable • Install, modify, or replace instrumentation and control systems in regional plants including local initiatives up to and including major maintenance (turnaround) activities • Ensure correct and optimal job scoping and risk analysis• Oversee the procurement and staging of necessary services and materials• Coordinate related EMOC and necessary permitting and approvals with plant and regional staff• Install and/or supervise the installation using regional staff and/or contractors• Commission work and installations including the production necessary records and as-built drawings• Effectively identify issues and troubleshoot and repair plant instrumentation and control systems• Routinely monitor the performance of regional assets to identify deficiencies• Maintain regular dialogue with the Remote Operations Center and Central Lead Instrumentation Engineer• Maintain regular communication with Area Managers and instrumentation/control staff• Review trends and corrective maintenance work-orders for Regional plants in the EAM system• Diagnose, communicate, and execute corrections and/or provide sufficient direction to plant staff to resolve issues • Identify and lead and/or support instrumentation and control initiatives in the Region• Understand the condition of regional assets from an instrumentation and controls perspective• Instrumentation and controls obsolescence• Identify degradation and reliability risks• Procure regional and central spares based on condition and identified risks• Input requirements into the yearly budget process• Input to national initiatives and lead the execution of regional components• Input scope to commercial evaluations such as plant re-lifes, upgrades, relocations, and roll out of new technologies • Under the direction of central Lead Instrumentation Engineer, execute defined regional scopes• Transfer or accept instrumentation and controls best practice. Replicate whenever possible• Assist Shutdowns, Start-ups, Derime and production slate changes for plant(s) in Region• Support sites outside of the home Region as required• Accept On call duty and overtime as required• Responsible for identifying, training and developing instrumentation technicians in the Region• Participate in the recruitment and performance management process for regional instrumentation staff• Support new or less experienced entry instrumentation technicians through training, coaching and mentoring• Assist in developing and administering instrumentation technician training regimen with Lead Instrumentation Engineer to roll out to regional instrumentation technicians• Stay current on latest methods, tools and techniques regarding instrumentation and controls technologies• Assign work that stretches and develops instrumentation technicians based on job requirements and identified development needs• 50 - 75% travelBASIC QUALIFICATIONS• Associate's Degree ​- Instrumentation / Industrial Controls• Minimum 15 years' experience in an operations environment having specific instrumentation & controls expertise with rotating equipment (pumps, turbines, and compressors), HV/MV electrical distribution, refrigeration systems, steam systems, heat exchangers, and adsorption systems/dryers.• Associate Degree or certificate in instrumentation, industrial control/automation or equivalent experiencePREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS• Excellent oral and written communication skills• Valid driver's license with good record• Computer literate; experienced to use commercial support programs such as TiSoft, Wonderware, WinCC, Simatic Manager, and Step 7 to troubleshoot primarily Siemens controls systems (545, PCS7, and S7)• 15 years experience to interpret engineering drawings including P&IDs, PFDs, electrical drawings and Single line diagrams• Able to lift loads up to 50 lbs, climb stairs, work at heights up to 200ft, physically distinguish colors and can work alone. Can safely operate all tools and equipment necessary to perform assigned work• Familiar with applicable chemical industry hazards, codes and standards • Comprehensive knowledge of and experienced to install, calibrate and troubleshoot: 4-20 mA transmitter and electro-pneumatic control loops. Pneumatic control systems consisting of I/Ps, solenoid valves, quick exhausts, actuators, regulators and proportional/integral controllers both stand alone and cascaded• Siemens plc systems (typ). Rosemont systems, Bently machinery vibration monitoring systems (typ)• Perform and document process and product analyzers calibration checks. Calibrate custody meters and manage documentation• In-depth knowledge of predictive and preventative maintenance techniques including the use of computerized maintenance management systems to manage these processesLinde offers excellent salaries, world-class benefits, and unparalleled opportunities for development - all to create an invigorating and satisfying environment. Join a World Leading Team Today!For IMMEDIATE consideration, APPLY NOW!",Sr. Regional Instrumentation & Controls Technician Job in La Porte,Full Time,"La Porte, IN 46352",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Regional-Instrumentation-Controls-Technician-Job-La-Porte-IN-US-165300525.aspx?mescoid=4900882001001&jobPosition=5,,,837437d6eaa833984b3f1073cd6192b6
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:21:18:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"CNC Programmer – Immediate temp to hire position – City of Monrovia, CA Essential Functions:Utilize Mastercam software to develop, edit, revise, and review drawings to create the CNC (CAM) programs for the manufacturing equipment to reflect customer specifications. Convert, program, and implement post-process steps for CNC machining equipment using provided CAD models and drawings. Write and optimize CNC programs to create complex parts on 3-5 axis milling machining centers and 2 axis lathes with live tooling. Analyze drawings, sketches, and design data of part to determine dimension and configuration of cuts, selection of cutting tools, and machine speeds and feed rates. Determine reference points and direction of machine cutting paths. Computes angular and linear dimensions, radii, and curvatures, and outlines sequence of operations required to machine part. Revise program to eliminate instruction errors or omissions. Observes operation of machine to evaluate programmed instructions when needed. Create set-up sheets and tool/cutter lists to guide correct set-up and operation of machines. Verify availability of special tools and/or cutters with Tool Crib department. Communicate regularly with production employees performing job set-ups in order to optimize programs to improve set-ups, run-time, and efficiency. Coordinate work with other departments such as Quality Assurance, Purchasing, Production Control, etc. to ensure a smooth and timely flow of quality products though the shop. Perform other duties as assigned. Skills, Knowledge, and Experience:Associate's (AA) degree  or equivalent from two-year college or technical school; or five plus years related experience and/or training  programming in CNC systems using CAD/CAM software such as Surfcam; or equivalent combination of education and experience is required. Previous experience working in a manufacturing environment is a plus. Experience programming with Mastercam strongly desired. Experience with G CodeDemonstrated proficiency with CAD (solid modeling) software such as SolidWorks is required. Familiarity with various types of machines including: Okuma, Haas, and Seiki. Proficient with MS Office (Outlook, Word, Excel) and Internet. Able to read and understand blueprints and technical documents. Strong shop math skills including the ability to perform measurement conversion and the understanding of Geometric Tolerancing. A genuine belief in continuous improvement and a disciplined process. Organization and time-management skills. Self-starter with the ability to multi-task and prioritize daily work assignments. Excellent verbal and written communication skills. Knowledge of computer systems/software such as Job Boss or DocuWare is a plus.    ",CNC Programmer Job in Monrovia,Full Time,"Monrovia, CA 91016",,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Programmer-Job-Monrovia-CA-US-165385167.aspx?mescoid=5100930001001&jobPosition=16,22.00 - 27.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),8cef3a5315f78d339f3d2245a92af7ae
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:21:35:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"  MaintenanceElectricalTechnician The Maintenance Electrical Technician provides maintenance troubleshooting and fabrication expertise to the facility in the areas of electrical and mechanical machine problems, improvements, and safety. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following; other duties may be assigned: Provide labor and expertise for daily maintenance and improvement projectsHands-on project involvement including fabrication, assembly and installation of apparatus and machineryUnderstand the functionality of the equipment within the facility to assess production needs and troubleshoot various problemsProvide training for operators, and other maintenance personnel in the areas of machine operation, troubleshooting and safetyThrough close involvement with the daily activities of the shift production personnel, be aware of repetitive problems, and generate proposed resolutions for those issuesUnderstand and assist implementation of administrative systems within the Engineering / Maintenance DepartmentMaintain the organization of machine manuals, drawings and printsGenerate documentation for assigned projects including drawings, schematics, and layouts     Requirements: Electrical Technicians:Possess a thorough understanding of electrical theory and the National Electric CodeAbility to install and troubleshoot control circuits and communication systemsA thorough knowledge of process control / instrumentation, and A.C. / D.C. motor control architecture A working knowledge of PLC based systems and AC / DC drives systems. (Rockwell PLC software, Allen & Bradley and Parker/SSD drives preferred)Ability to read and understand electrical test and recording equipmentAbility to read and understand various electrical, mechanical and fluid schematics and blueprintsProficient with hand and power tools (each technician must provide his/her own hand tools in sufficient quantity and quality to perform the job.)Ability to use basic machine shop equipment Mechanical Technicians:Possess a thorough knowledge of mechanical power transmission equipmentAbility to use all machine shop equipment to fabricate and machine parts and materials Capable of welding with at least with one of the three common methods of welding (mig, tig or stick)Ability to read and understand various mechanical, pneumatic and hydraulic schematicsKnowledge of common accepted practices in machine shops such as tolerances, fits and hardnessProficient with hand and power tools (each technician must provide his/her own hand tools in sufficient quantity and quality to perform the job.)Possess a basic understanding of metallurgy, and various material types and specifications Pay Rate: 24.85-29.81/ DOE Hours: 24/7, 12/hrs., 3-2-2 Hiring starts TODAY– apply now! Earn extra cash - refer a qualified and reliable friend to us! Email Resume to: auburnjobs@cpsrecruiter.com CPS Recruitment's office hours Monday – Friday 8:00 am-5:00 pm Phone: 315-883-5506 CPS Recruitment is an EOE",Maintenance Electrical Technician Job in Brockport,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Brockport, NY 14420",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Electrical-Technician-Job-Brockport-NY-US-164208642.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=14,24.85 - 29.81 $ /hour,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,52018de644e1adb3b0708a98227cf52b
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:21:53:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Candler State:&nbsp;&nbsp;North Carolina Postal/Zip Code: 28715 &nbsp; Since 1947, Harrison Construction Company, an Oldcastle Materials company, has been the preferred source for ground-level site construction throughout eastern Tennessee and western North Carolina. Committed to quality, service and safety, our integrated products and services enable us to build and manage site development projects from concept through construction.&nbsp; In addition, by being a part of the Oldcastle family, we are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that come together to form Oldcastle.&nbsp; Oldcastle is the number one asphalt producer, the third-largest aggregates producer, and one of the top five ready mixed concrete producers in the United States.&nbsp; Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; &nbsp; ASPHALT SCREED OPERATOR Tired of browsing the classifieds? Job searches unsuccessful? Look no further, HARRISON CONSTRUCTION&nbsp;has the perfect career opportunity waiting for you! &nbsp; Job Description Summary Crew member essential to application of asphalt on highways/private roadways/parking lots/driveways operating screed controls. Requirements Operator on the asphalt paver making normal adjustments for obtaining proper depth, grade and finished cross section of asphalt material via screed extensions Must partner with other crewmembers to apply asphalt per plan specifications and perform tasks of other positions as instructed by crew foreman to insure daily schedules/estimates are met Properly follow all Company policies and procedures for safe working procedures and environment.&nbsp; Report any problems to the Foreman, Superintendent, Safety Manager, or Human Resources Manager Attendance required according to Company Attendance Policy to ensure crew is able to operate at normal efficiency level Attitude/cooperation: always maintaining courteous and professional manner with co-workers, customers and public. Must be flexible with last minute schedule changes, location changes, time of shift changes.&nbsp; Overtime work required. Out of town/county/or state work may be required Ability to follow Traffic Control instructions and practice safety standards per Company Safety Policy requirements Must adhere to PPE (personal protective equipment) policy and maintain individual PPE in a functional condition as supplied by company May perform other related duties such as adding or removing screed extensions Initiative to perform/assist with other positions for job completion May be required to use power and/or hand tools needed to complete jobs within specifications Physical ability to operate equipment under temperature extremes and for extended hours of time. Normal shift is 8-12 hours Requires riding to and from job sites. If operating company vehicle, employee must meet Driver Qualification Standard. The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Ability to withstand physical demands associated with heavy highway construction Must be able to adapt and work in extreme weather temperatures May be required to use the following tools: brooms, pick, mattock, axe, brush hook, hammer, saw, pneumatic hammer/drill, tamps(both manual and power driven), sample saw, concrete saw, sledge hammer, as well as, other tools needed to complete jobs within specifications The following motions will be required: stretching, bending, lifting, pushing, pulling, twisting, throwing, walking, standing, reaching and squatting&nbsp; - these will occupy most of work day May require lifting from 25-100 lbs. Will be exposed to extremes of heat or cold weather. The statements included in this job description are not intended to be all-inclusive.&nbsp; They represent typical elements and criteria necessary to successfully perform the job.&nbsp; Other duties may be assigned as required.&nbsp; Requirements for this job are subject to modification by the Company and its designees, and reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education/Experience Ability to operate screed with attention to detail and emphasis on craftmanship/rideability Ability to operate Moba and Topcon electronic controls, a plus. High school education or GED preferred but not required. &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Harrison Construction Company is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer &nbsp; Harrison Construction Company is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",Asphalt Screed Operator NC Job in Candler,Full Time Employee,"Candler, NC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Asphalt-Screed-Operator-NC-Job-Candler-NC-US-165562626.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,,aa3a4188ba0aad169555c02f93765fec
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:21:54:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Amatrol is a producer of skill-based, integrated technical learning systems. Our comprehensive training solutions include interactive multimedia as well as print-based student learning materials, teacher's guides, industrial quality hands-on training equipment, and instructor training. We are currently looking for Assembly Technicians who will complete or modify mechanical (hydraulic and pneumatic) assembly of components, sub-assemblies and finished products.  Incumbents must also be able to identify and solve problems related to broken and defective components, products and equipment.  This position is regular, fulltime (day shift) with attractive benefit package. Wage range is $11.00 to $14.00 depending on experience and qualifications. Essential functions include the following:–        Assemble components and finished goods to product specifications.–        Complete or modify mechanical, hydraulic and pneumatic assembly of components, sub-assemblies and finished goods.–        Soldering copper tubing–        Assemble some electrical elements of components, sub-assemblies and finished goods.–        Assemble mechanical components, sub-assemblies and finished goods–        Ensure component performance conform to specifications.–        Document and maintain manufacturing procedures for specified devices.–        Diagnose and troubleshoot defects and errors in hydraulic and pneumatic components.–        Identify and solve problems related to broken and defective hydraulic, pneumatic and mechanical components, products and equipment–        Calibrate, test and maintain production and test-associated equipment where applicable and designated. Amatrol, Inc. is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. Requirements–        High School Diploma or equivalent–        High level of mechanical aptitude–        Preferred—2-year Assembly experience–        Highly Preferred—experience with soldering copper tubing–        Knowledge and competency in fundamental mechanical assembly–        Ability to read blueprints and other product specification documents in English.–        Ability to solve problems–        Good interpersonal skills with ability to communicate and interface positively with other team members and departments.–        This position requires an organized individual who is self-motivated and can work independently.. Past applicants may reapply.  Please contact Human Resources if you need any accommodations during the job application process due to a disability. ",Assembly Technician - Mechanical (AT-M) Job in Jeffersonville,Full Time,"Jeffersonville, IN 47130","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/Assembly-Technician-Mechanical-AT-M-Job-Jeffersonville-IN-US-145802363.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=6,,Entry Level,2f3b29a43c0874871913c6abd7e8b4dd
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:22:19:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description   Northrop Grumman Information Systems is seeking Counter Threat Finance (CTF) Intelligence Analyst Subject Matter Experts (SME) to assist our customer with support to Department of Defense (DoD) CTF, Office of the Deputy Assistant Secretary of Defense for Counter Narcotics and Global Threats (DASD CN&GT), and/or the interagency partners; Department of Justice, the Drug Enforcement Administration, and Departments of State and the Treasury in support of the implementation of counter-network threat finance action plans. Program support for military, law enforcement, and other mission and Interagency partners involved in countering the worldwide illicit networks of narcotics traffickers and associated financial networks – CTF SME Analysts specializing in counter-narcotics, counterterrorism, criminal/investigative, and financial information. Candidates should have a background in All-Source Intelligence, Financial and/or Criminal Analysis, Special Operations and be able to meet requirements for Courier Card and Special Program Access.   This position will be performed out of the Washington DC and/or Chantilly, VA location.   Qualifications   Basic Qualifications: 14 Years with Bachelors in Science; 12 Years with Masters; 9 Years with PhD. Must be a US Citizen with the ability to obtain TS/SCI Clearance (Active TS/SCI highly desirable). Must have deep knowledge of CTF and its respective communities. Experience with analyzing intelligence data and writing high-quality analytical reports, information papers, and briefings for senior-level government officials. Knowledge of the US intelligence community and DoD. Must have an understanding and familiarity with customer databases and classified data repositories. Must possess strong interpersonal skills and motivation to work in a dynamic team environment. Must have strong oral and written communication skills with a demonstrated ability to; research, analyze, prioritize effectively, problem-solve, and synthesize large amounts of data and information Must have the ability work several tasks concurrently with minimal supervision. The following are preferred:Knowledge of all-source intelligence areas such as: HUMINT, SIGINT, and/or Special Operations considered an asset. Experience with the DEA, Department of Treasury or like agency. Experience with Drug Enforcement Administration, Department of Treasury, US Special Operations Command, US Central Command, and other federal law enforcement and Intelligence agencies. Northrop Grumman Corporation is a leading global security company providing innovative systems, products, and solutions in unmanned systems, cybersecurity, C4ISR, and logistics and modernization to government and commercial customers worldwide. Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action-Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",CTF SME Strategy Development / Intelligence Analyst  Job in Washington,Full Time Employee,"Washington, DC",,http://jobview.monster.com/CTF-SME-Strategy-Development-Intelligence-Analyst-5-Job-Washington-DC-US-164994769.aspx?mescoid=3300585001001&jobPosition=10,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,d32e14270df59b799cc45f349aa734dd
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:22:20:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Warehouse LaborerBeacon Roofing Supply, Inc. is one of the largest distributors of residential and non-residential roofing and complementary building products in North America. Beacon currently has 360 locations in 45 US states and 6 Canadian provinces and more than 4,000 employees. We are known throughout the building supply industry for having quality people, quality service and quality building products.Beacon Roofing Supply is publicly traded on the NASDAQ stock market under the symbol BECN. In June of 2006, Beacon Roofing Supply was named to the NASDAQ Global Select Market.We are currently seeking a Warehouse Laborer in our Miami, FL branch to receive, store, and distribute material, equipment, and products within warehouse and branch by performing the following duties.The Responsibilities Include:Provide quality service to customers using clear communication skills.Be knowledgeable regarding all Company products and services.Count, verify and manually unload incoming orders and shipments.Utilize a forklift for moving inventoryVerify and manually load orders on outgoing trucks.Verify and manually load outgoing orders onto customer vehicles.General yard and office maintenance to include cleaning and painting.Maintain neatness and cleanliness of warehouse.Maintain inventory in appropriate/designated storage areas in warehouse.Perform other duties as assigned by management.Job RequirementsMust have some experience with warehouse, forklift, or other machineryPrefer high school graduate or GEDAbility to lift up to 100 pounds.Operation of forklift.Team player with good customer service skills.Ability to read, speak and write the English language.Must have reliable transportation to work each day.Must be able to physically and safely deliver products on roof. Beacon Roofing Supply is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/Vwww.beaconroofingsupply.com",Warehouse Worker Job in Miami,Full Time,"Miami, FL 33142",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Warehouse-Worker-Job-Miami-FL-US-165533447.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=13,,Entry Level,5d315ff7f369b3934e27d688f891f0d0
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:22:25:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Marketing Assistant  We are looking for individuals that have experience in customer service, sales, hospitality, retail or leadership. We are a aggressive marketing and advertising firm looking for outgoing individuals to fill entry level sales & marketing positions. We Train! No Experience Necessary! Our Firm strives to create unlimited opportunities for individuals to achieve their personal and professional goals. We do this by encouraging competition, making it easy for individuals to share effective techniques and communicate ideas openly and by recognizing accomplishments both large and small.QUALIFICATIONS:Outstanding communication skills both verbal & written.Able to prioritize and work independentlyAble to work effectively in a team environmentDetail-oriented and the ability to follow up on tasks.Work effectively under pressure and maintain a positive attitudeCapable of multitasking, prioritizing, and managing time efficientlyFor Immediate Consideration apply online  www.alliancemktgroup.comJOB REQUIREMENTSLeadership qualities & experiencesExcellent motivation skillsStrong communication and presentation skillsAbove average people skillsBe goal oriented & lead teams in fast-paced, challenging environment.The candidates we are seeking must have a great work ethic, good communication skills, a positive attitude, and an ability to work in a fast pace environment.  ""The Area's Leader in Marketing &  Advertising""related keywords:  sales, marketing, customer service, advertising, public relations, general business, business development, management opportunity, sales and marketing, entry level, retail, restaurant, hospitality, sports, entertainment, business.",Marketing Assistant Job in San Diego,Full Time,"San Diego, CA",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Marketing-Assistant-Job-San-Diego-CA-US-154384566.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=9,"W-2, Weekly Paycheck, Great Compensation Package and Incentives",Entry Level,8d8e266ba07408bc209b74de978d60f4
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:22:41:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: Vi-Jon is one of the nation’s oldest brand and private label Health and Beauty Care companies, serving retailers in all 50 states and Canada. For over 105 years, the Vi-Jon name has come to represent some of the highest standards in the manufacturing of quality products in the Health and Beauty Care industry. The Vi-Jon corporate headquarters are in St. Louis, Missouri, and we operate manufacturing and distribution centers in Missouri and Tennessee 24 hours a day.  Vi-Jon is a company of tradition and commitment to our associates and our customers, and our company culture reflects that. By joining Vi-Jon, you will become part of a team-oriented and entrepreneurial culture that allows associates to grow both personally and professionally. We recognize that a company is not a building, production line, equipment or products, but people. Our company is not made up of just people, but individuals who together make up a team – the Vi-Jon team. Current Opportunity: We currently have an opening for a 2nd, 3rd shifts working out of Mt. Juliet , Tennessee location.Responsible for load, unload trucks; move rows of components from racks on floor to storage; operate pallet wrappers and other powered equipment; use computer to key various transactions; read dispatches; light cleaning of assigned areas, Selecting, stacking, storing, loading, unloading and moving goods in production, warehouse, manufacturing or other areas of company; responsible for safe and efficient operation of all equipment used in handling components, raw and finished goods; this includes, but is not limited to forklifts, pallets, stock pickers, sweepers or scrubbers, wrappers, palletizers or any other powered equipment in the movement of raw materials, components, or finished goods; enter data if required, count, sort, segregate, and otherwise keep track of materials in their respective work area. Meet or exceed the required minimum performance standards as set forth by each department.  ·        Must have basic computer skills.·         Previous Material Handling or Warehouse experience preferred.·        Must be forklift certified within the first 30 days of accepting positions. ·         Must have good and reading comprehension skills.·         Perform all duties and assigned tasks in accordance with applicable SOP, GMP, D.O.T. and safety requirements. ·         Ability to work closely with co - workers and interact with other departments while meeting established performance standards. Education: Must possess the skills and abilities normally through the completion of high school or equivalent. Vi-Jon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, marital or veteran status, or any other legally protected status. We are committed to recruiting and retaining the best talent in the health and beauty care industry. To learn more about Vi-Jon, please visit our website at www.vijon.com. To apply for this position please send resume to mhysong@vijon.com ",Material Handling Specialist Job in Mount Juliet,Full Time,"Mount Juliet, TN 37122",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Material-Handling-Specialist-Job-Mount-Juliet-TN-US-165778319.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=5,12.50 - 13.50 $ /hour,Student (High School),9cc42e18df19f9ff9828646ac32a7b6e
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:22:42:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Sanitation Technician is responsible for the sanitation and overall cleanliness of the equipment and facilities of Carlton Farms, with special attention being paid to regulations regarding sanitation of the processing areas.Job Duties:Must be detail oriented, able to work independently and self-motivated.Break down equipment and directly handle and dispose of inedible products.Maintain housekeeping of facilities and break rooms.Use hot water and chemicals to clean and sanitize.Wash pens that live animals are held in.Work with others in a team environment.Learn and follow regulations set by the USDA.Clean and sanitize slaughter and processing facilities.Must be able to push and or pull 50-100 lbs.Able to work in extreme cold and hot environments.Swing shift, 4:00pm to 12:30am, Mon - Fri, with occasional overtime & weekend projects.Long periods of walking/standingHeavy lifting (capable of at least 50-100lbs)",Sanitation Technician/ Swing Shift Job in Carlton,Full Time,"Carlton, OR 97111",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Sanitation-Technician-Swing-Shift-Job-Carlton-OR-US-164421418.aspx?mescoid=5101019001001&jobPosition=11,$13.00+ /hour,Entry Level,a4590a4c03c14a97d59d4e2eb6c388dc
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:22:43:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad in partnership with John Deere is looking for Assembly Line WorkersIf you hold an interest in working in the field of production assembly, there is a wonderful opportunity available to you at the reputable manufacturing facility, John Deere. This position offers you highly competitive wages-- employees are guaranteed $10/hour but employees average anywhere from $12-$12.50 an hour as a result of weekly production bonuses! As an assembler your main function will be the assembly of L100 Riding lawn equipment in a team environment. Other job functions will include assistance with inventory records, the maintenance of both equipment and facilities, the operation of material handling equipment, and the performance of routine quality checks. If you believe you would be a good fit for this position, please take a moment to review the list of preferences below.Job Requirements and Preferences are as follows:- We are looking for candidates that possess the ability to work in a fast-paced work environment.- A minimum of 6 months manufacturing experience is required.- The ability to work well with a team is strongly valued. - Safety is a top priority in this environment (any experience working in a ""safety-first"" environment is a plus). - Candidates with military experience are strongly encouraged to apply.Working hours: various shiftsSkills:Additionally, because this position is in a manufacturing facility, there are a few special considerations that we follow for our client. Everyone that we present for this role needs to be able to pass a background check and a drug screen.We truly hope that this is the opportunity you have been searching for, and that you will get the process started by applying with us today! Our team will be in touch within the next 3-5 business days. Randstad thanks you for your interest, and we look forward to working with you!Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Assembly positions Job in Greeneville,Part Time,"Greeneville, TN 37743",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Assembly-positions-Job-Greeneville-TN-US-165023000.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=16,,,5e91fc00f2ca57bc440ff6ea31c70e80
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:22:43:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"IF YOU ARE INTERESTED IN APPLYING, PLEASE E-MAIL A MS WORD VERSION OF YOUR RESUME TO:  grhoda@HIREcruiting.com  and subject Lean Manufacturing Supervisor.  This is a 2nd shift opportunity.The primary responsibility of this position is to supervise, facilitate, coach, assist and manage the deployment of direct and indirect production employees, materials, machines and supplies in manufacturing. Position Criteria: • Actively drive, implement, maintain and participate in client's Lean initiatives • Drives the company’s vision and mission by reinforcing ethics, values and quality policies throughout their area of responsibility • Participates in the planning process, achieves operational excellence by leveraging the available tools, ensuring the team has the appropriate training to achieve desired goals and assessing the achievement of those goals • Leads, measures and monitors continuous improvement programs through • Complies with all national and local safety and environmental standards, guidelines and policies by driving workforce initiatives such as our environmental, health & safety system as well as acting as a steward for our Zero Incident Safety Culture • Actively participates in setting, communicating and achieving Plant goals and objectives •Develops and maintains performance metrics as required to monitor results and uses as a tool to identify and initiate process improvements within their work area • Coordinates and leverages resources with other managers, such as maintenance, materials, scheduling, logistics and engineering, to resolve manufacturing problems and/or improve processes • Partners with HR in the selection, promotion, counseling and termination of employees using clients guidelines and policies • Demonstrates an appreciation for similarities and individual differences by promoting a culture of inclusion that leverages the full potential of all employees • Promotes employee development and potential through effective performance management and coaching (e.g. job skills and career development) • Takes ownership of employee training and development by ensuring that appropriate and required training is completed for direct reports • Promotes personal accountability by identifying goals, setting expectations and providing on-going feedback on associate performance with formal evaluation provided regularly • Acts as an employee advocate in appropriate situations by raising and addressing employee issues with management • Fairly and consistently applies policies and practices to all employees • Applies appropriate processes and problem solving tools to drive continuous quality improvement and ensure alignment/compliance with industry standards • Constructively interacts with internal customers • Promotes a quality culture by demonstrating customer focus. Regularly communicates customer feedback to employees in order to facilitate collaborative problem solving KEYWORDS: Lean, Six Sigma, Green belt, Black belt, production, supervisor, Kaizen, Kanban Requirements·         Bachelor’s degree·         Experience with continuous (one piece) flow manufacturing, labor paced production, standard work, and pull systems highly desirable·         Proven team building and change management skills required·         Bi-lingual (English/Spanish) a plus but not required·         Demonstrates integrity, flexibility, sound judgment, respect for people, and good critical thinking skills",Production Supervisor Job in Grifton,Full Time,"Grifton, NC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-Job-Grifton-NC-US-163986906.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=5,"50,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /yearCompetitive Bonus / Benefits / Relocation",Experienced (Non-Manager),0afdbaac59216741e41b6bdcbd7c406b
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:23:00:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"McNichols Company is North America's leading supplier and fabricator of metal, expanded, wire mesh, architectural metals and a variety of gratings products. Founded in 1952 by the late Robert L. McNichols, the company was established on his Christian values, high ethical standards and strong commitment to customer satisfaction. With metals service centers strategically placed from coast-to-coast, McNichols has a dedicated staff and communication network in place that can supply worldwide service. We have an exciting opportunity for an articulate, creative and enthusiastic team player to join our team as an Assistant Operations Manager. This position will assist the Operations Manager or District Operations Manager with planning, directing and coordinating the operations of a metal service center within the McNichols operations organization. The Assistant Operations Manager is responsible for ensuring and improving the performance, productivity, efficiency, safety and profitability of branch and organizational operations through the provision of effective methods and strategies. Job Title: Assistant Operations Manager Reports to: Operations Manager or District Operations Manager depending on size of location. Classification: Exempt Key Responsibilities: Coordination and Supervision - Coordinate, manage and monitor the performance of Operations Service Specialist and Team LeadersInventory integrity and accuracy. Plan effective strategies to improve cycle count performance, stock check accuracy, and the reduction of inventory adjustments.Monitor adherence to company rules, regulations and procedures.Fabrication - Coordinate and monitor the work of associates who are providing value added fabrication to customer orders.Monitor quality metrics performance and implement improvements. Ensure quality of products. Manage maintenance of equipment and machinery. Provide technical support where necessary.Communication - Monitor, manage and improve the efficiency of support services such as IS, Employee Services, Accounting and Supply Services. Facilitate coordination and communication between support functions.Provide excellent Customer service to both internal and external customers.Strategic Input - Liaison with Operations Managers, District Operations Managers and Senior Leadership. Assist in the development of strategic plans for operational activity. Implement and manage operational plansVendor/Supplier Management - Manage and sustain excellent communication and viable relationships with McNichols vendors and suppliers.Distribution: Work closely with 3rd party logistics and local carriers to provide on time delivery of McNichols product, as well as Inter-branch truck loads. Qualifications/ Ideal candidate profile: Industry relevant fabrication experience (welding, sawing and shearing)Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written.Ability to prioritize, organize and multi task.Previous management experience with a proven record of Influencing, leading, delegation, conflict management and decision making.High levels of professionalism with strong attention to detail.Strong negotiating skills.Proficient in Microsoft office with the ability to type 35 WPM.Experience with Oracle/ JD Edwards Enterprise One software would be an advantage but not essential.High school diploma required with 7 years warehouse and metal fabrication experience.Strong critical thinking and problem solving skills.Working knowledge of shop math and design drawings - experience with all types of toolsBlueprint reading ability (a plus!)Knowledge and experience in organizational effectiveness and operations managementKnowledge of business and management principles and practicesKnowledge of financial and accounting principles and practicesKnowledge of human resource principles and practicesKnowledge of project management principles and practicesStrong team player and the ability to work under pressure.Lean Six Sigma Certification or the willingness to attain certification.Experience in dealing with ISO 9001:2008 The candidate will be a self-motivated team player with a determined and mature approach. McNichols offers an extensive benefits package",Assistant Warehouse Manager Job in Cleveland,"Full Time, Employee","Cleveland, OH",Metals and MineralsManufacturing - OtherArchitectural and Design Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Warehouse-Manager-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-165866201.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=1,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,44f542839ebd07571b296dffdd527372
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:23:01:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"CNC Operator Job Purpose:Produces machined parts by, setting up, and operating a computer numerical control (CNC) machine; maintaining quality and safety standards; keeping records; maintaining equipment and supplies.Involved with implementations programs to minimize production change over’s and machine down time.Position Description: Read and interpret travelers and visual instructions for machine operations.  Make checks, adjust tools and program parameters to maintain proper dimensions, Obtain first, middle and last piece inspection, log data into inspection book.Operate designated machines and ability to multi-tasking as instructed, CNC Mills, flex arm Drill press, etc.Able to use basic measuring instruments such as calipers, micrometers, height gage, etc.Maintain proper coolant and lubricant levels.Break down set ups and clean-up work area as directed.Report equipment malfunctions, material discrepancies, and unusual conditions to supervisor.  Maintain safe and clean work area. Promote team concept and help train new employees. Adhere to all safety procedures. . Perform any other related duties as directed",CNC OPERATOR Job in Troy,Full Time,"Troy, OH 45373",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-OPERATOR-Job-Troy-OH-US-165552251.aspx?mescoid=5100929001001&jobPosition=9,12.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,f4ce378e395d830f6e098cc1541e15f6
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:23:26:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Industry leading distribution center seeking individuals needed for shipping outbound trailers of perishable commodities. Key responsibilities are as follows:Ensure timely shipment of correct quantities while adhering to specific operational procedures.Follow-up and attention to detail.Effective communication with all subordinates, peers, and upper management.Ensure safety and general housekeeping rules are maintained at all times. This is a job for someone who can multi-task. Individuals must have warehouse experience or education in the field of management/operations/logistics. Salary commensurate with experience. We offer an attractive benefits package.Send resume along with salary considerations EEO Employer",Shipping Manager Job in Plant City,Employee,"Plant City, FL 33563",,http://jobview.monster.com/Shipping-Manager-Job-Plant-City-FL-US-165415877.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=10,,,ee5616bca35912a5481809c813da6484
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:23:29:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad is seeking candidates for our clients in New Castle, Delaware. JOB SUMMARY:-$10 per hour-Sorting/inspecting pallets for quality-Manual/physical labor required-Repetitively lifting pallets from chest height to floor-Available Shift: Monday-Friday 8 am to 4:30 pmKEY RESPONSIBILITIES:-Candidates will be required to repetitively lift 50 lbs -Receiving, loading/unloading, material handling, and forklift experience is strongly preferred-Candidates are required to be flexible to work overtime as neededWorking hours: 8 AM to 4:30 PMSkills:QUALIFICATIONS:-All candidates must submit to a Drug testIf you are interested in being considered for these openings, please apply to this posting with an updated resume.-Please note that applications submitted without a resume will be removed from consideration.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse Sorters Needed! Job in Newark,Part Time,"Newark, DE 19702",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Warehouse-Sorters-Needed!-Job-Newark-DE-US-165023089.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=11,,,90224bfd468e29da81e0785b819fd11d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:23:31:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Receive and store manufacturing materials by checking stock to determine inventory levels; anticipating future materials needed; placing and expediting orders for materials; verifying receipt/delivery of materials. Maintain and organize warehouse equipment and supplies. Maintain a safe work environment for warehouse employees by establishing, following, and enforcing safety standards and procedures. Light maintenance on shop equipment Skills/Qualifications:Ability to Prioritize TasksAttention to Detail/Organization Safety Management and Maintenance Maintain/Manage Warehouse Equipment (automation, forklifts, etc.)Product Quality Control  Production Planning & SchedulingMaintenance Skills: plumbing, electrical and other building and equipment maintenance needs. Duties: General maintenance, orderliness, and cleanliness in a warehouse environment to ensure equipment and facility are in good working condition. Verify warehouse inventory by entering and adding supplies received to current inventory levels.Purchase parts and materials by investigating potential suppliers; researching parts, equipment, and material availability; preparing and submitting purchase requisitions.Supervises a safe and clean work environment by ensuring compliance with OSHA safety regulations.Achieves warehouse operations operational objectives by contributing warehouse operations information and recommendations to strategic plans and reviews; preparing and completing action plans; implementing production, productivity, quality, and customer-service standards; resolving problems; completing audits; identifying trends.Accomplishes warehouse operations and organization mission by completing related results as needed.Develops warehouse design by planning layout, product flow, and product handling systems; evaluating and recommending new equipment.",WarehouseOperations/Maintenance Manager Job in Wake Forest,Full Time,"Wake Forest, NC 27587",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/WarehouseOperations-Maintenance-Manager-Job-wake-Forest-NC-US-165868169.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=10,"40,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /yearplus bonuses",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),5ce05db4513f7cd2890a6b29288d6e27
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:04:12:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description:The Maintenance Technician is responsible for maintaining, servicing, and troubleshooting equipment and site property; making adjustments and/or mechanical/electrical repairs to the machines and equipment in a safe, efficient manner. Responsibilities: Maintain and service machinery at the site. General maintenance duties to maintain the site. Follows all safety requirements, policies, and reports unsafe conditions to a leader; and takes immediate action to correct issue when possible. Functions effectively within a team environment. Attends all team meetings as required. Performs all required quality checks and assures all production conforms to specification. Follows all company policies and work rules including but not limited to 6S, GMP, and BOS quality system. Responsible for maintaining ISO standards. Use the preventative maintenance program. Troubleshoot electric, pneumatics, mechanical and hydraulics. All work performed must be entered into PICS; and all Parts used must be checked out using PICS. Be able to identify parts in all machines. Perform light fabrication. Monitor reliabilities and scrap on related production equipment. All other duties as assigned.Qualifications: Must be team oriented. Self-Motivation and flexibility of job assignments. Blend of technical, interpersonal skills, and continuous learning through training. Strong mechanical/electrical aptitude and experience. 2-year degree or prior work experience. Basic computer skills. https://loopapply.com/apply/62/E6D2A27922F8F8F1B41B005056984D64 ""> $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Maintenance Technician Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30336",,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-technician-job-atlanta-ga-us-178649126.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=3,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f88eaacb875ecdf275d7e4ce8d19bd38
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:04:14:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the Opportunity:A major healthcare provider located in Atlanta, is currently looking to hire friendly, experienced, and eager Floor Care TechniciansCore Responsibilities:• Waxing and buffing floors• Clean building floors by sweeping, mopping, scrubbing, or vacuuming them.• Gather and empty trash.• Service, clean, and supply restrooms.• Clean and polish furniture and fixtures.• Clean windows, glass partitions, and mirrors, using soapy water or other cleaners, sponges, and squeegees.• Dust furniture, walls, machines, and equipment.• Steam-clean or shampoo carpets.• Greet patients, visitors, and customers in a kind and professional mannerRequirements: 2+ years of cleaning/janitorial experience 2+ years of customer service experience Strong record of attendance and punctuality in previous positions Must be able to pass background check and drug screen#TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Floor Care Technician Job in Atl,Full Time Employee,"Atl, GA 30329",,http://jobview.monster.com/floor-care-technician-job-atl-ga-us-178595423.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b8f3e9e2704fdb7a985e22d3efcd7ae3
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:04:22:25,No,jobs.monster.com," Job ID:  100996 Oldcastle Architectural Products (APG) is North America’s leading manufacturer and supplier of concrete masonry, dry mix, and hardscape products. Additional strong national positions are also found in packaged lawn and garden products. The business produces and markets brands you know such as Belgard® hardscapes and Sakrete® cement mixes. With over $2B in sales, APG operates across 33 states and 6 Canadian provinces through a network of over 165 operating locations and more than 5,000 employees. Position Summary Oldcastle Architectural is seeking a talented IT Support Manager who will be responsible for the overall strategic design, implementation and operation of its highly regarded service desk. The role will focus on the achievement of high customer satisfaction and efficient operation relative to industry benchmarks for service desk support professionals and services.  This key position will manage the delivery of customer service to 5000+ internal customers across the US and Canada.  Our service center team consists of highly skilled systems engineers focused on fast resolution of the majority of cases without require escalation to other teams. As the IT Support Manager, you will develop, promote and maintain a high quality, professional, service-oriented group that will build and maintain lasting relationships with business leaders and IT customers. As a senior member of the IT leadership team, you will work closely with your peers to ensure the highest levels of support for new technology initiatives, identify education needed to reduce recurring issues, and work to find additional value for our organization.  Develop and leverage metrics to measure customer satisfaction and convey customer feedback to leadership teams and other key stakeholders. Roles & Responsibilities Build, motivate, and lead a team of IT Support professionals to support company technology, including all desktops, laptops, mobile devices, associated peripheral devices, and software.Work with the IT leadership team to define goals and objectives, and to ensure that standard operational procedures are established to meet those goals.Directs recruitment, training and development of Service Desk engineers. Oversees personnel activities of team including hiring, development, and training.Leads technical projects and technology implementations to advance business initiativesEnsures that performance metrics, leading and lagging indicators, are an integral part of the management of the support team.Ensures that continuous improvement plan is properly aligned with SLAs.Implement ITIL and/or industry best practices/​concepts to ensure world-class operations.Collaborate and build long-lasting symbiotic relationships with business and IT leaders to enhance support levels and drive and internal customers to the Support Team.Manage procurement and fulfillment of technology to meet stakeholder’s needsManage vendor relationships for key support team focused technology providersAct as the primary communication conduit between IT and our customersOther duties as assigned Requirements Minimum Requirements Bachelor’s degree in Information Systems or related field or equivalent education and experience. Requires a minimum of 3 years in customer support environment with 5 years in technical support management. 3 additional years would be accepted in lieu of bachelor’s degree5+ years endpoint, network, and server administration and support experienceExperience in planning, developing, implementing or managing a customer service center.Knowledge of IT support best practices, frameworks, and measuresExperience in planning, developing and implementing new programs, products, technologies, or services.Proven history of developing and maintaining long-term relationships within organizations.Proven ability to manage both people and processes to meet company objectives.Ability to motivate and drive a team and process.Excellent verbal and written communication skills – along with public speaking skillsProject management skills; ability to manage large-scale, multi-faceted projects.Conflict management skillsExtremely high level of drive and ownership Preferred Qualifications 3+ years direct supervisory experienceDeep understanding of Windows clients, Windows servers, and Citrix network equipmentExperience with ZenDesk or similar issue management solutionUnderstanding of primary business functions (Finance, Operations, Transportation, Sales, Customer Service, etc)Experience in a manufacturing environmentERP support experience What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development, and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Oldcastle Architectural is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle Architectural is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.#CAN ",IT Support Manager - Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-support-manager-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-178688385.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=9,,,2294be4d325fd43902a13c9bfb855304
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:05:10:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Bakersfield, CA is Currently looking for an experienced Travel Registered NurseMother-Baby/ Post Partum RN to fill 13-week contract opening with a hospital located in the Atlanta, GA area.  Interested candidates must have 2 recent years of  Mother-Baby experience and hold a current RN license..- Salary: Get customized pay package w/ your recruiter.- Specialty: Mother-Baby / Couplet Care / Post Partum RN- Facility: Hospital-Location: Atlanta, GA- Quantity of positions: 5- Target Start Date: ASAP- Assignment Length: 13-week assignment- Shift: Day and Night (12 Hours) What Care Team Solutions can do for you:Travel assignments in all 50 states.Top level, competitive pay w/ travel reimbursements/Per Diem.Healthcare & dental insurance.401(K) savings program.Certification and License reimbursement.Sign-on & completion bonuses.Referral bonuses for fellow nurses! $$$Loyalty Program for returning nurses.Responsibilities of the Registered Nurse - Mother-Baby /  Post PartumInstruct and counsel new mothers on baby care issues like breastfeeding and bathing..Assist and support mothers in coping up with post-partum depression.Execute mother baby nursing functions in the care of new mothers and their newborns.Administer medications and intravenous fluids to mothers.Adhere to and comply with all nurse practicing laws and regulations.Requirements of the Registered Nurse - Mother-Baby / Post PartumRegistered Nurse with current license to practice in the applicable state.2 years of experience working as a Registered Nurse2 years of Mother-Baby / Couplet Care / Post PartumBLS and NRP is required Report","Care Team Solutions LLC Job Application for Registered Nurse (RN)- Mother Baby | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Bakersfield, CA is Currently looking for an experienced Travel Registered NurseMother-Baby/ Post Partum RN to fill 13-week contract opening with a hospital located in the Atlanta, GA area.  Interested candidates must have 2 recent years of  Mother-Baby experience and hold a current RN license..- Salary: Get customized pay package w/ your recruiter.- Specialty: Mother-Baby / Couplet Care / Post Partum RN- Facility: Hospital-Location: Atlanta, GA- Quantity of positions: 5- Target Start Date: ASAP- Assignment Length: 13-week assignment- Shift: Day and Night (12 Hours) What Care Team Solutions can do for you:Travel assignments in all 50 states.Top level, competitive pay w/ travel reimbursements/Per Diem.Healthcare & dental insurance.401(K) savings program.Certification and License reimbursement.Sign-on & completion bonuses.Referral bonuses for fellow nurses! $$$Loyalty Program for returning nurses.Responsibilities of the Registered Nurse - Mother-Baby /  Post PartumInstruct and counsel new mothers on baby care issues like breastfeeding and bathing..Assist and support mothers in coping up with post-partum depression.Execute mother baby nursing functions in the care of new mothers and their newborns.Administer medications and intravenous fluids to mothers.Adhere to and comply with all nurse practicing laws and regulations.Requirements of the Registered Nurse - Mother-Baby / Post PartumRegistered Nurse with current license to practice in the applicable state.2 years of experience working as a Registered Nurse2 years of Mother-Baby / Couplet Care / Post PartumBLS and NRP is required",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-mother-baby-job-atlanta-ga-us-178637316.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=9,,,7731b6cd96e76787868ffc56fa9500d3
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:05:23:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theMarietta area for same day autoparts deliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with20+ years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimizationbusiness. Partsfleet II is technology drivento help you best manage your business from services provided to reliableinvoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Marietta area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer. Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Marietta, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25365 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Marietta,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theMarietta area for same day autoparts deliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with20+ years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimizationbusiness. Partsfleet II is technology drivento help you best manage your business from services provided to reliableinvoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Marietta area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer. Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Marietta, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25365 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-marietta-ga-us-178644859.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,f4e9d0b090df7e09742f157b2f025f07
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:05:23:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Reports to: Shipping ManagerPosition Summary: The Shipping/Receiving team member will perform all tasks relating to shipping/receiving operations and complete shipping transactions accurately and in a timely manner to maximize customer service, effectiveness, and efficiency. Duties can include: assembling, addressing, stamping, shipping and receiving merchandise, loading, unloading, unpacking, verifying, recording incoming/outgoing merchandise, and arranging for the transportation of merchandise. Responsibilities: The responsibilities of the Shipping and Receiving team member will consist of but are not limited to the following:Prepares outbound shipments by assembling, protecting, labeling and determining best method of shipment Scan and assemble orders for shipment and complete packing slips, bills of ladings (BOL’s), and shipping/driver logs; unload/load merchandise Enter data into a Warehouse Management System (WMS) and other computer programsSort outbound cartons, maintain shipping lanes and process outbound cartons using small parcel shippingReceive and stage shipments in designated locationsVerify and keep records on incoming and outgoing shipments against shipping documents for accuracyReview all documentation to insure accuracy of each shipmentEnsure timely completion and shipment of product from outside vendorsFile and maintain accurate shipping/receiving records, documents, and informationInspect and ensure quality control measures on inbound and outbound goodsEnsure accuracy and count of products selectedReport damages and discrepanciesRecord and report any damaged products/merchandise to the designated supervisorMaintain a safe work environment and report all maintenance or safety issues requiring corrective actionMaintain a clean and safe work environment Requirements:High School Diploma or Equivalent requiredPrior experience in warehouse/distribution, especially with shipping and receiving operational functionsExperience with TWW and 3rd party shipping methodologies (federal express, UPS, freight scheduling and shipping, etc.) is a plusBasic computer skills is requiredForklift Experience is a plusPrior experience in the use of warehouse technology equipment and tools (radio-frequency scanners) to perform daily functions is requiredMust have excellent attention to detail and apply problem-solving skills to identify and resolve discrepancies with a high sense of urgency to meet deadlinesAbility to multi-task and process orders in a timely mannerMust be customer service oriented, good communication and people skills, and maintain a positive, professional relationship with all personnel at all timesMust have commitment to quality and customer serviceGood math and counting skillsStrong organizational, multi-tasking, prioritize, and follow-through skills requiredAbility to work in a fast paced, team environment with others and work independently with good work ethics Ability to meet productivity standards and complete work in a timely manner; strives to increase productivity in a fast-paced and changing work environmentHighly motivated and high initiative in providing proactive efforts in seeking solutions to problems and willingness to take on new tasks, challenges, and opportunitiesThe ability to learn new skills, follow directions, and take on additional job responsibilities as neededGood attendance/punctuality record; consistently at work and on time Self-motivated with the desire to excel in performance and knowledge Dependable team player willing to do what it takes to get the job done and flexible in scheduling is required based on business needs (i.e.; increased hours, weekends, holidays and volume of work, staffing shortages, etc.)Ability to work in a warehouse environment setting with physical demands that include continuous standing, walking, sitting, use of hands and fingers, grasping, reaching, climbing or balancing, stooping, bending, kneeling, squatting, stretching, crouching, crawling, pulling, pushing, working and reaching overhead, using ladders or lifts, and frequently lifting and/or moving up to 50 pounds or moreAbility to use handling equipment and machinery including sorter systems, conveyors, radio-frequency (RF) scanners, metal hooks, plastic bags, plastic packaging, cardboard boxes, tape dispensers, and other materials necessary to the production and packaging of our merchandiseApply On-Line at: www.tailoredbrands.com   Click  “Join Our Team"" Link (located at the bottom of the page) Choose  “Transportation and Shipping/Receiving"" Position Category:  “Non-Management"" Choose Position:    “Shipping and Receiving Staff” Choose Location    Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xmenswearx/cjt1/photo4.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xmenswearx/cjt1/photo5.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xmenswearx/cjt1/photo6.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xmenswearx/cjt1/Tailored-Brands-bottom.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xmenswearx/cjt1/photo3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Tailored Brands Job Application for Shipping and Receiving Staff | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Reports to: Shipping ManagerPosition Summary: The Shipping/Receiving team member will perform all tasks relating to shipping/receiving operations and complete shipping transactions accurately and in a timely manner to maximize customer service, effectiveness, and efficiency. Duties can include: assembling, addressing, stamping, shipping and receiving merchandise, loading, unloading, unpacking, verifying, recording incoming/outgoing merchandise, and arranging for the transportation of merchandise. Responsibilities: The responsibilities of the Shipping and Receiving team member will consist of but are not limited to the following:Prepares outbound shipments by assembling, protecting, labeling and determining best method of shipment Scan and assemble orders for shipment and complete packing slips, bills of ladings (BOL’s), and shipping/driver logs; unload/load merchandise Enter data into a Warehouse Management System (WMS) and other computer programsSort outbound cartons, maintain shipping lanes and process outbound cartons using small parcel shippingReceive and stage shipments in designated locationsVerify and keep records on incoming and outgoing shipments against shipping documents for accuracyReview all documentation to insure accuracy of each shipmentEnsure timely completion and shipment of product from outside vendorsFile and maintain accurate shipping/receiving records, documents, and informationInspect and ensure quality control measures on inbound and outbound goodsEnsure accuracy and count of products selectedReport damages and discrepanciesRecord and report any damaged products/merchandise to the designated supervisorMaintain a safe work environment and report all maintenance or safety issues requiring corrective actionMaintain a clean and safe work environment Requirements:High School Diploma or Equivalent requiredPrior experience in warehouse/distribution, especially with shipping and receiving operational functionsExperience with TWW and 3rd party shipping methodologies (federal express, UPS, freight scheduling and shipping, etc.) is a plusBasic computer skills is requiredForklift Experience is a plusPrior experience in the use of warehouse technology equipment and tools (radio-frequency scanners) to perform daily functions is requiredMust have excellent attention to detail and apply problem-solving skills to identify and resolve discrepancies with a high sense of urgency to meet deadlinesAbility to multi-task and process orders in a timely mannerMust be customer service oriented, good communication and people skills, and maintain a positive, professional relationship with all personnel at all timesMust have commitment to quality and customer serviceGood math and counting skillsStrong organizational, multi-tasking, prioritize, and follow-through skills requiredAbility to work in a fast paced, team environment with others and work independently with good work ethics Ability to meet productivity standards and complete work in a timely manner; strives to increase productivity in a fast-paced and changing work environmentHighly motivated and high initiative in providing proactive efforts in seeking solutions to problems and willingness to take on new tasks, challenges, and opportunitiesThe ability to learn new skills, follow directions, and take on additional job responsibilities as neededGood attendance/punctuality record; consistently at work and on time Self-motivated with the desire to excel in performance and knowledge Dependable team player willing to do what it takes to get the job done and flexible in scheduling is required based on business needs (i.e.; increased hours, weekends, holidays and volume of work, staffing shortages, etc.)Ability to work in a warehouse environment setting with physical demands that include continuous standing, walking, sitting, use of hands and fingers, grasping, reaching, climbing or balancing, stooping, bending, kneeling, squatting, stretching, crouching, crawling, pulling, pushing, working and reaching overhead, using ladders or lifts, and frequently lifting and/or moving up to 50 pounds or moreAbility to use handling equipment and machinery including sorter systems, conveyors, radio-frequency (RF) scanners, metal hooks, plastic bags, plastic packaging, cardboard boxes, tape dispensers, and other materials necessary to the production and packaging of our merchandiseApply On-Line at: www.tailoredbrands.com   Click  “Join Our Team"" Link (located at the bottom of the page) Choose  “Transportation and Shipping/Receiving"" Position Category:  “Non-Management"" Choose Position:    “Shipping and Receiving Staff” Choose Location   ",,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-receiving-staff-job-rockbridge-ga-us-177699255.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=17,,,92d2c1e2b5e70c1ecf9584696f8cf179
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:05:26:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Include the following, other duties may be assigned:Order pulling for accessories, apparel and promo items to be shipped in a timely manner. Packing orders in the best efficient way for FED EX shipping or mail shipping. Receiving including making sure to properly check piece count on packing slips as needed. Shipping from FED EX station, interacts with FED EX shipping manager and in interaction with BAAN as needed. Making sure the warehouse is kept in a clean and safe manner. Making sure that received items are put up correctly in the assigned lots and recorded onto the receiving sheet as needed. Making sure that all locations in the warehouse are properly named and numbered. Takes precaution to protect warehouse content against loss. Ensures that all problems are properly reported to Production Manager. Making sure that all power equipment in the warehouse is turned off at the end of the day. Keeping warehouse free of clutter and debris. Keeping track of boxes, tape, wrapping material to ensure warehouse is properly supplied. Qualifications:To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required.Skills and Abilities:· Must have good written and verbal communications skills· Must be able to work with BAAN shipping· Have some computer knowledge· Attention to details· Working in a fast paced environmentPhysical Demands:While performing the responsibilities of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, walk, stoop and bend. The employee is required to use fingers and hands to package parts. #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Warehouse Associate Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30080",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-job-smyrna-ga-us-178595527.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f2461c308f57d3bdeadfc250691d5cdd
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:05:26:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Want to finally earn what you’re worth? We have a job opportunity for the independent-minded professional. Liberty National makes a difference by helping protect people financially. We also believe in giving back to the communities around us. Our people make us a great company, and we’re always looking for community-focused individuals to join our team.We are currently interviewing entry level and senior level applicants or applicants with business-to business sales experience who want to help people, gain experience and earn the money they deserve. This is a Sales Representative position working one-on-one with families in the community. There is flexibility and room for advancement.5 Reasons To Choose A Job With Liberty NationalYou will be supporting the needs of people in the community and making an impact.You get hands-on training while you manage relationships with existing and new customers.The compensation is very competitive.You can benefit from performance awards, incentives and advancement opportunities.You only need a high school diploma or equivalent, be independent-minded and a good communicator.Liberty National Life Insurance Company has been helping working-class people fulfill their benefit needs since 1900. That's over 100 years of making a difference in lives of people across the United States. See what's going on at Liberty National Life Insurance Company right now. We work hard and play hard.Get to know the people who make our organization successful by visiting us at https://agent-jobs.lnlcareers.com . Take our people's word for it, not just ours. Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-new-1.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-new-2.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-new-3.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Liberty National Insurance Company Job Application for Sales Rep Job Available Now - Local Office | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Phone 1-800-405-6514,All,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-job-available-now-local-office-job-atlanta-ga-us-178282166.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=5,,,d03486dfb5e2028288cda649cc8ad702
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:05:28:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />Description Our Environmental Field Laborers (Environmental Technicians CBPP) are responsible for the performance of tasks associated with hazardous waste clean-up, site-remediation, equipment decontamination and handling of hazardous materials.Why work for Clean Harbors?Health and Safety is our #1 priority and we live it 3-6-5! We offer all eligible employees a comprehensive benefits package including:Competitive Competency Based Pay ProgramsOpportunities for growth, development and internal promotionComprehensive Health, Dental and Life Insurance401K, tuition reimbursement, and generous paid time offCompany paid certifications, licenses and training. What does it take to work for Clean Harbors?High School Diploma or equivalency6 months construction or general labor experienceWillingness to obtain OSHA (40 hour) CertificationClean Motor Vehicle Record and Valid Driver’s LicenseSafety oriented mindset with the determination to follow all procedures and policiesAbility to travel and work on an on-call basisAbility and willingness to work in a physically intensive roleTo learn more about opportunities with Clean Harbors visit us at www.cleanharbors.com/careersTo Apply to this position directly click on the following link: Environmental Field Laborer Job ID 45114   We would like to thank all those interested in joining the Clean Harbors team; however only those who complete the online application and meet the minimum job qualifications will be considered for this role.   We are an equal opportunity employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.   Clean Harbors is a Military & Veteran friendly company.  *SK*CH Potential Applicants: We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Environmental Field Laborer - Morrow,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/environmental-field-laborer-morrow-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-177656742.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=8,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,41632c80c7a8e9fb9ba0bae5985dec91
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:05:31:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job Area: Information Security ConsultingTitle: Senior Consultant (Intermediate-level)Experience: 4-8 yrs in Information securityLocation: United StatesTravel: 50%-75% (mostly in region)Type: Full-timeCompensation: Depending on experience, 401(k), Health insuranceSecurity Clearance: Not RequiredJob Description:AT&T Security Solutions is a division of AT&T (a Fortune Global Top 10 company).  AT&T is looking for an information security practitioner with technical experience for the position of a Senior Consultant located in the US to be a part of a dynamic team of experienced security professionals with varied experiences.  Candidate must be skilled in Secure Infrastructure Services such as secure network architecture design, implementation, device configuration review, and secure architecture reviews.  AT&T Security Consulting clients range from some of the largest companies in the world to small businesses requiring security consulting expertise.Job Duties:Key functions of this role will be to work on network security and architecture trusted advisor engagements for our customers involving segmentation and optimization, DDoS mitigation, firewall migration/optimization, detailed assessment and next-generation design recommendations.  Manual and automated configuration analysis for security weaknesses in firewalls, routers, switches, servers (Windows, Unix/Linux), IDS/IDP, Databases, and other platforms as well as VoIP infrastructures will also be required.  Successful candidates will have demonstrated experience in network security consulting and will have an understanding of network level risk assessments with the ability to write objective, detailed reports explaining security issues.  A background in Network Architecture and Engineering is required. Technical knowledge and experience with configuration review tools such as Nessus, Nipper, AlgoSec Firewall Analyzer, Tufin SecureTrack or NetBrain as well as Unix/Linux scripting (php, perl, shell, etc.) will be given preference.Requirements:Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related fields, Masters Degree preferredA minimum of four years of Information Security  consulting with mid to advanced level infrastructure security design experience requiredVery good understanding of security operations & management in a large customer environmentKnowledge of Virtualization and Cloud securityWorking Knowledge of SDN, IAM, NAC and DLPKnowledge of Linux, UNIX, Windows (including Active Directory) and other operating systemsKnowledge of popular databases such as MSSQL, Oracle, and MySQLAbility to write customized scripts using at least two of bash, Perl, PHP, Python preferredMust possess strong network device implementation/integration and troubleshooting skills Must be able to demonstrate in-depth expertise with multiple network device and firewall platforms, including at least 3 of the following:Palo AltoFortinetCisco ASA (w/FirePower)Cisco IOS and NX-OS routers/switchesCheck PointJuniper NetscreenJuniper SRXMust be a flexible team player, hard-working, and possess excellent communication and customer-facing skillsMust be self-directed, able to manage solo projects or participate as part of a larger teamStrong report writing skills and ability to explain complex security issues to customers in a formal presentation format requiredMust be able to interact confidently with all levels of technical and management client teamsOne Security certification such as CISSP, CISA, CISM, PCI QSA, CEH, SANS GSEC, etc., is required and willingness to pursue further certification preferred.Ability to travel 50%-75%, mostly within region, must possess drivers’ licenseTechnical SkillsStrong technical problem / resolution skills requiredKnowledge and experience with technical network and host-based security required.Knowledge and experience with technical virtual networking (VMware NSX, SDN), and cloud security preferredMid to advanced level infrastructure or security design capabilities for environments that include 10 to 20 security devices, processes or applications. Mid to advanced level knowledge of one or more of the following preferred: SOC OperationsSecurity event monitoringNetwork segmentation designrouting/switching, including BGP, OSPF,v2/3 RIPv2 & EIGRPAdditional RequirementsKnowledge and experience with risk and compliance assessmentsSCADA / Control systems network experience a plusVoIP Infrastructure knowledge a plusBi-lingual candidates a plus Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xattcorpwrapx/cjt/c1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xattcorpwrapx/cjt/c2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xattcorpwrapx/cjt/c3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","AT&T Job Application for Consultant Professional Services  ATC - Secure Infrastructure Services | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Job Area: Information Security ConsultingTitle: Senior Consultant (Intermediate-level)Experience: 4-8 yrs in Information securityLocation: United StatesTravel: 50%-75% (mostly in region)Type: Full-timeCompensation: Depending on experience, 401(k), Health insuranceSecurity Clearance: Not RequiredJob Description:AT&T Security Solutions is a division of AT&T (a Fortune Global Top 10 company).  AT&T is looking for an information security practitioner with technical experience for the position of a Senior Consultant located in the US to be a part of a dynamic team of experienced security professionals with varied experiences.  Candidate must be skilled in Secure Infrastructure Services such as secure network architecture design, implementation, device configuration review, and secure architecture reviews.  AT&T Security Consulting clients range from some of the largest companies in the world to small businesses requiring security consulting expertise.Job Duties:Key functions of this role will be to work on network security and architecture trusted advisor engagements for our customers involving segmentation and optimization, DDoS mitigation, firewall migration/optimization, detailed assessment and next-generation design recommendations.  Manual and automated configuration analysis for security weaknesses in firewalls, routers, switches, servers (Windows, Unix/Linux), IDS/IDP, Databases, and other platforms as well as VoIP infrastructures will also be required.  Successful candidates will have demonstrated experience in network security consulting and will have an understanding of network level risk assessments with the ability to write objective, detailed reports explaining security issues.  A background in Network Architecture and Engineering is required. Technical knowledge and experience with configuration review tools such as Nessus, Nipper, AlgoSec Firewall Analyzer, Tufin SecureTrack or NetBrain as well as Unix/Linux scripting (php, perl, shell, etc.) will be given preference.Requirements:Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related fields, Masters Degree preferredA minimum of four years of Information Security  consulting with mid to advanced level infrastructure security design experience requiredVery good understanding of security operations & management in a large customer environmentKnowledge of Virtualization and Cloud securityWorking Knowledge of SDN, IAM, NAC and DLPKnowledge of Linux, UNIX, Windows (including Active Directory) and other operating systemsKnowledge of popular databases such as MSSQL, Oracle, and MySQLAbility to write customized scripts using at least two of bash, Perl, PHP, Python preferredMust possess strong network device implementation/integration and troubleshooting skills Must be able to demonstrate in-depth expertise with multiple network device and firewall platforms, including at least 3 of the following:Palo AltoFortinetCisco ASA (w/FirePower)Cisco IOS and NX-OS routers/switchesCheck PointJuniper NetscreenJuniper SRXMust be a flexible team player, hard-working, and possess excellent communication and customer-facing skillsMust be self-directed, able to manage solo projects or participate as part of a larger teamStrong report writing skills and ability to explain complex security issues to customers in a formal presentation format requiredMust be able to interact confidently with all levels of technical and management client teamsOne Security certification such as CISSP, CISA, CISM, PCI QSA, CEH, SANS GSEC, etc., is required and willingness to pursue further certification preferred.Ability to travel 50%-75%, mostly within region, must possess drivers’ licenseTechnical SkillsStrong technical problem / resolution skills requiredKnowledge and experience with technical network and host-based security required.Knowledge and experience with technical virtual networking (VMware NSX, SDN), and cloud security preferredMid to advanced level infrastructure or security design capabilities for environments that include 10 to 20 security devices, processes or applications. Mid to advanced level knowledge of one or more of the following preferred: SOC OperationsSecurity event monitoringNetwork segmentation designrouting/switching, including BGP, OSPF,v2/3 RIPv2 & EIGRPAdditional RequirementsKnowledge and experience with risk and compliance assessmentsSCADA / Control systems network experience a plusVoIP Infrastructure knowledge a plusBi-lingual candidates a plus",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/consultant-professional-services-3-atc-secure-infrastructure-services-job-atlanta-ga-us-176961467.aspx?mescoid=4100688001001&jobPosition=17,,,836249f8ddfcd252beb5ec83c72becda
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:06:18:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Licensed Practical NurseJob SummaryWe are looking for driven and experienced Licensed Practical Nurse to provide personal care and related services to our healthcare residents.  QualificationsHigh school diploma or GEDCurrent Licensed Practical Nurse in the State of GAGood standing with the Georgia Board of NursingCurrent CPR certification Excellent technical assessment, documentation skills and leadership skills Work ScheduleFull Time:  2:45 p.m. - 11:15 p.m., Monday through Friday with rotating weekendBenefits:Lenbrook offers a competitive salary and benefits which includes:For Full Time status:MedicalDentalVisionDisabilityLife InsuranceFlexible Spending AccountHealth Savings Account401(k) with employer matchEmployee Assistance ProgramPaid Time OffTo complete your application, please visit our website at www.lenbrook-atlanta.org/careers.  Select Job Listings. EOE and drug-free workplace Report","Lenbrook Job Application for Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name www.lenbrook-atlanta.org,All,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-practical-nurse-lpn-job-atlanta-ga-us-178678989.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=17,,,17657efd8a706396767766661a120f13
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:06:22:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Growing System Integrator has an Immediate - DIRECT HIRE - opening for for a Controls Engineer out of their Atlanta, Ga Location. Our Client specializes in automation and motion controls, predominantly for Automotive MFG. Responsibilities for the Controls EngineerReview projects including quotes, job specifications and resolve any quote to job specifications differences.Review specifications, standard practices, internal hardwired and logic standards, general specifications and scope of work.Design requirements may include establishing non-standard designs, generating system map layout, BOM's and design packages, sequence of operations, reviewing cycle time studies and dimension switch layouts, design logic, enter logic, and the design of Smart displays.Assisting with installation, debugging, Launch and Standby, As-Builts, commissioning etc... Requirements for the Controls EngineerAS, BSEE, BSEET, or technical degree2-5+ years experience with controls systems and PLC programming.System Design using AutoCAD and setting up BOM's etc..Experience with Allen-Bradley products (ex. RSLogix 5, 500, 5000; RSView Studio, RS Networx for DeviceNet, ControlNet, EtherNet IP, PanelBuilder PDS 1400e, 32)Proven trouble shooting and de-bugging skills are necessaryConveyor/manufacturing experience or controls engineer with fiberglass experience<Benefits for the Controls EngineerThis is a Direct Hire opening and Company sponsored benefits, 401k, paid time off / holiday pay, life insurance will be provided.This Job is located in Atlanta, GA -> United States",Controls Engineer - PLC programming/Allen Bradley/AutoCAD Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30377",,http://jobview.monster.com/controls-engineer-plc-programming-allen-bradley-autocad-job-atlanta-ga-us-178557031.aspx?mescoid=1700195001001&jobPosition=1,"60,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",,4209db639fc847641b2f83bec5b9d45c
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:06:24:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO)1. Summary of FunctionsWith minimal supervision, demonstrate the ability to interpret and solve practical problems and issues using a variety of instructions or guides furnished in written, oral, or diagram form. 2. Essential FunctionsTakes direction from SupervisorPossesses functional knowledge of warehouse functionsReading of customer orders, manifest, work orders, shipping orders, or requisitions to determine items to be moved, gathered, or distributed and/or shipped.Moves materials and items from receiving or storage areas to shipping or to other designated areasReplenishes stock, sorting and placing materials or items on racks, shelves, or in bins according to predetermined sequence such as size, type, style, color, or product code and knowledge of what can be reclaimedRecords amounts of materials or items received or distributed via appropriate computer programAssist in counting of physical inventoryWeighs and counts items for distribution within plant to ensure conformance to company standardsPossesses intermediate computer literacy skillsActively participates in department/shift/team meetingsParticipation with safety or quality suggestions; maintain proper housekeeping and safety standards i.e.: proper use of personal protective equipment; proper use of safety devices, such as lock-out, as requiredSafe operation of all machinery, tools and equipmentPossesses attention to detailParticipates in special projects and provide reports to management on findings, as assignedParticipates in inventory, preparation and countingFollows company policies and procedures, enforce safety regulations, and assure proper procedures are followed by all co-workers; maintain a neat, clean and organized appearance and work area per company policy Other duties may be assigned that pertain to the classificationDemonstrates job duties and knowledge for the job classification 3. Quality RequirementsDemonstrates an understanding of XPO Logistics – Supply Chain (XPO)  quality policyAdheres to the XPO 7S program and maintains a clean environment at all timesMaintains a safe work environment by adhering to and enforcing safe work practices and following safety practicesDemonstrates a positive attitude and teamwork in meeting goals and objectivesDemonstrates commitment to process excellence by ensuring proper, efficient and accurate use of the processCommunicates well with leadership, team members and other departments 4. Physical RequirementsMay also include frequent bending, stooping, squatting, pushing and pulling of parts and part containers can also be expected.Ability to lift 10 to 40 pounds, and up to 50 pounds on an frequent basisSpecific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, read small print, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, ability to adjust focus, and ability to distinguish primary colorsAbility to sit or stand for long period of timeEffectively performs the position through effective communication and exchange of information with all parties that you may come into to contact with while performing the essential functions of the position 5. Education and/or Experience RequirementsHigh school diploma or general education degree (GED) and 3 to 6 months related experience and/or trainingDemonstrated ability to comprehend simple instructions, communicate orally or in written form effectively with co-workers, departments, preferably customers and vendors as wellAbility to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals; ability to interpret graphsAbility to apply common sense understanding to carry out instruction furnished in written, oral, or diagram form; ability to deal with problems involving several concrete variables in standardized situationsComputer literate, skills (start computer, log in, use browser, fill in forms, logout, and shutdown computer safely)ability to use Microsoft Office and XPO Logistics systems; executes as a process expert within the specific department  We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Material Handler Job in Ellenwood,"Full Time, Employee","Ellenwood, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/material-handler-job-ellenwood-ga-us-178652099.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=6,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,8804384f5cb5e8691a9cc20fa77b2073
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:07:01:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Environmental Services Technician Responsibilities:Clean building floors by sweeping, mopping, scrubbing, or vacuuming them. Gather and empty trash. Service, clean, and supply restrooms. Clean and polish furniture and fixtures. Clean windows, glass partitions, and mirrors, using soapy water or other cleaners, sponges, and squeegees. Dust furniture, walls, machines, and equipment. Steam-clean or shampoo carpets. Greet patients, visitors, and customers in a kind and professional manner Qualifications:2+ years of cleaning/janitorial experience 2+ years of customer service experience Strong record of attendance and punctuality in previous positions Must be able to pass background check. drug screen and nicotine testing #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",nd Shift Environmental Services Tech Job in Atl,Full Time Employee,"Atl, GA 30342",,http://jobview.monster.com/2nd-shift-environmental-services-tech-job-atl-ga-us-178596298.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ba85d10b40107e4b1578b1d82c671c68
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:07:02:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Conversation English in China.$22,000 to $32,000 per year-free housing includedQualified or Certified Teachers can earn $30,000 to $54,000 per year (especially AP/AL Experienced)Experienced School Administrators from $75,000 and up (Master’s degree required w/license Preferred) Start date: Immediate-March (Also hiring for next fall start date in September)20-40 hours per week. (Depending on position)Single apartment or larger provided (Families also welcome)Utilities Included in many casesMedical Insurance provided.Vacation 2 weeks plus national holidays or,Universities and K-!2 offer winter and summer breaks similar as the U.S.Airfare reimbursement  Contract completion bonus at some school up to one month’s salaryGovernment medical coverageReduced school tuition for those with childrenLocation: Shanghai, Shenzhen (next to Hong Kong), Beijing and many other cities Requirements:Bachelors degree or higher.Recent Graduates WelcomeNo experience required.Clean criminal background check.12 or 6 month contract commitment.TEFL, TESOL or CELTA holders eligible for an increased SalaryGovernment licensed teachers eligible for increased payMust be native speaker with passport from USA, Canada, UK, Australia Ireland or New Zealand Well established education corporation with schools across China teaching all subjects including Math, Science, Social Studies, History, Economics and business English, Arts, PE etc.. college level, and K-12.  China’s cost of living is very inexpensive. Imagine working in someplace new for the same or nearly the same salary at a fraction of the cost of living with no house or rental payment needed. A typical teacher working in China can save up to 70% of their monthly income.TO APPLY: send a copy of your resume, profile picture, any certifications or license, a copy of your passport (you may cover sensitive information or we can collect once you're set for an interview) along with a copy of your highest degree to apply@wvcjobs.com and you may register at https://www.workingvacationsinchina.com / (Not all positions are posted on the site so please contact us)If you have any questions please contact us via Skype at grif1021 as we're always available to answer your questions or call +1 727 498 0114 anytime in the mornings or evenings US time Report","Working Vacations in China Co Ltd Job Application for English and Subject Teachers-Any City in China | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Conversation English in China.$22,000 to $32,000 per year-free housing includedQualified or Certified Teachers can earn $30,000 to $54,000 per year (especially AP/AL Experienced)Experienced School Administrators from $75,000 and up (Master’s degree required w/license Preferred) Start date: Immediate-March (Also hiring for next fall start date in September)20-40 hours per week. (Depending on position)Single apartment or larger provided (Families also welcome)Utilities Included in many casesMedical Insurance provided.Vacation 2 weeks plus national holidays or,Universities and K-!2 offer winter and summer breaks similar as the U.S.Airfare reimbursement  Contract completion bonus at some school up to one month’s salaryGovernment medical coverageReduced school tuition for those with childrenLocation: Shanghai, Shenzhen (next to Hong Kong), Beijing and many other cities Requirements:Bachelors degree or higher.Recent Graduates WelcomeNo experience required.Clean criminal background check.12 or 6 month contract commitment.TEFL, TESOL or CELTA holders eligible for an increased SalaryGovernment licensed teachers eligible for increased payMust be native speaker with passport from USA, Canada, UK, Australia Ireland or New Zealand Well established education corporation with schools across China teaching all subjects including Math, Science, Social Studies, History, Economics and business English, Arts, PE etc.. college level, and K-12.  China’s cost of living is very inexpensive. Imagine working in someplace new for the same or nearly the same salary at a fraction of the cost of living with no house or rental payment needed. A typical teacher working in China can save up to 70% of their monthly income.TO APPLY: send a copy of your resume, profile picture, any certifications or license, a copy of your passport (you may cover sensitive information or we can collect once you're set for an interview) along with a copy of your highest degree to apply@wvcjobs.com and you may register at https://www.workingvacationsinchina.com / (Not all positions are posted on the site so please contact us)If you have any questions please contact us via Skype at grif1021 as we're always available to answer your questions or call +1 727 498 0114 anytime in the mornings or evenings US time",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/english-subject-teachers-any-city-in-china-job-atlanta-ga-us-177884869.aspx?mescoid=2500365001001&jobPosition=19,,,a198c32d23d5d86ce6737b0ab2a881d1
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:14:32:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Desktop Support Job #:  656559Job DescriptionOur ITS Help and Service Desk consultants provide excellent customer service and first-level technical support to our San Francisco Faculty and Staff. We provide support and assistance through our call center, e-mail system, and Service Desk.Job Duties•  Politely respond to the customer's problem and convey a resolution either by resolving it at first contact or escalating it to the next level of support•  Continuous Help and Service Desk training that will help you grow and preserve your knowledge of Help and Service Desk procedures and ITS products and services•  Make sure all problems are resolved via phone, e-mail, and Service Desk•  Maintain Help and Service Desk technical documentationRequired Qualifications•  High school graduate•  1-2 years Help Desk or Desktop Support or Service Desk Experience•  Must be authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis for any employer.•  Extremely Great Energy and Desire to Learn•  Experience troubleshooting Windows, Macintosh, or Unix environmentsPreferred Qualifications•  Very strong interpersonal and communications skills•  Genentech experience or trained•  Experience working in a customer service environment•  Experience in a healthcare or Audited environment.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Desktop Support Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/desktop-support-job-san-francisco-ca-us-169021792.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b054a45ae5f6395f3461020942e5d26b
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:14:32:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"PL/SQL Developer   Cognizant Technology Solutions (CTSH) is looking for a PL/SQL Developer Specialist. The individual should have extensive experience in PL/SQL Developer     Job Summary –   ·         Over 5 years+  of Oracle PL/SQL and SQL Development experience ·         Outstanding written and verbal communication skills ·         Strong Interpersonal Skills     Job Responsibilities –   ·         Good exposure to Performance Tuning ·         Understanding of Data Modeling concepts ·         Unix Scripting ·         Oracle Business Intelligence Tools (Nice to have) ·         Reporting Tools (Crystal Reports, Oracle Reports, Discoverer and APEX – Nice to have)   Minimum Qualifications –   ·         Bachelor’s Degree ·         Hands on experience on PL/SQL Development     A Snapshot about Us:   Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 75 development and delivery centers worldwide and approximately 187,400 employees as of June 30, 2014, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on Twitter: Cognizant.     Cognizant is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V. Cognizant is committed to ensuring that all current and prospective associates are afforded equal opportunities and treatment and a work environment free of harassment.   Technical Skills SNo Primary Skill Proficiency Level * Rqrd./Dsrd. 1 Ab Initio Conduct>It NA Required 2 Ab Initio BRE NA Required 3 Ab Initio Administration NA Required 4 Ab Initio ACE NA Required 5 AAS NA Required   * Proficiency Legends Proficiency Level Generic Reference PL1 The associate has basic awareness and comprehension of the skill and is in the process of acquiring this skill through various channels. PL2 The associate possesses working knowledge of the skill, and can actively and independently apply this skill in engagements and projects. PL3 The associate has comprehensive, in-depth and specialized knowledge of the skill. She / he has extensively demonstrated successful application of the skill in engagements or projects. PL4 The associate can function as a subject matter expert for this skill. The associate is capable of analyzing, evaluating and synthesizing solutions using the skill.   About Cognizant Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centers worldwide and approximately 233,000 employees as of March 31, 2016, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on Twitter: USJobsCognizant.",Sr. Oracle Developer Job in Birmingham,Full Time Employee,"Birmingham, AL 35202",All,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-oracle-developer-job-birmingham-al-us-168910774.aspx?mescoid=1500142001001&jobPosition=7,,IT/Software Development,d6e64d50e33280801a29aed354823593
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:14:27:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Responsible for on-site installing, maintaining, documenting and repairing various multi-vendor network and voice devices working under the direction of a remote network management center. Tasks include hardware device replacement, patch cable installation, documentation updates, software installation, 3rd Party vendor coordination and basic equipment configuration. Ensures customer satisfaction by advising on-site customer personnel and remote management center on any issues which may impact product performance. Takes responsibility for potential or desired follow-up services, on-going communication and/ or problem escalation. Required Skills:·         A+ IT Technician·         Cisco Networking Products·         Cisco Router Support",Customer Engineer Job in North Chicago,Full Time Employee,"North Chicago, IL 60064",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-engineer-job-north-chicago-il-us-166589383.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,1a077f013e31a919474577bc92c6b169
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:14:27:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cognizant Digital Engagement Practice (DEP) DEP Practice provide consulting and systems integration services in the areas of Portals, Content Management, Collaboration, Social Media and Enterprise Search. It holds partnership with the market leading products in each of the areas and offers customer’s services to consult, implement and maintain product based solutions. Key technology sub-practices include SharePoint, PCC (Portal Content & Collaboration), and ECM (Enterprise Content Management). The group is around 3000 associates worldwide and is one of the fastest growing businesses within Cognizant. Focus areas are in Digital platforms market expansion where we leverage Internet and Intranet Platform Products and Services portfolio in the digital platforms landscape. Also a market leader in the areas of Commerce and WCM, domain specific Web Portals and Cloud and Mobile Web, Social, Mobility, Core SP Business Applications, Migrations and upgrades   Job Title: AEM (CQ) Developer / Architect  Mandatory Skills: Strong knowledge and experience on Adobe Experience Manager Proven experience with rolling out templates, micro sites, tagging and campaigns on AEM Experience architecting and providing hands on technical leadership for development of AEM based Enterprise Content Management platforms. Proven experience to deliver enterprise initiatives working with cross functional teams Strong sense of ownership and accountability with a commitment to delivering quality outcomes that balance technical and business goals. Experience migrating from on premise setup to cloud-based AEM implementation Experience managing a team of AEM lead developers and developers Experience coordinating with onsite and offshore teams  Preferred Skills: Excellent verbal and written communication skills. Comfortable interacting regularly with both technical subject matter experts as well as business owners of all organizational levels.   Technical Skills SNo Primary Skill Proficiency Level * Rqrd./Dsrd. 1 Spring MVC NA Required 2 REST Web Services NA Required 3 Core Java NA Required 4 Struts NA Required 5 Java Server Pages NA Required   * Proficiency Legends Proficiency Level Generic Reference PL1 The associate has basic awareness and comprehension of the skill and is in the process of acquiring this skill through various channels. PL2 The associate possesses working knowledge of the skill, and can actively and independently apply this skill in engagements and projects. PL3 The associate has comprehensive, in-depth and specialized knowledge of the skill. She / he has extensively demonstrated successful application of the skill in engagements or projects. PL4 The associate can function as a subject matter expert for this skill. The associate is capable of analyzing, evaluating and synthesizing solutions using the skill.   About Cognizant Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centers worldwide and approximately 233,000 employees as of March 31, 2016, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on Twitter: USJobsCognizant.",AEM (CQ) Developer / Architect Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/aem-cq-developer-architect-job-dallas-tx-us-168997423.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=9,,IT/Software Development,068b99eb4898f0ccf50b14d3d422251c
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:12:04:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Quality Assurance Tester II Job #:  657863Apex Systems, #2 in IT Staffing, is helping a large partner client in Fort Wayne, IN bring on some great talent for a contract. This can be some great experience and something to diversify your experience!Quality Assurance/Testing Analyst Job Specification Qualifications:Quality Assurance/Testing Analyst with a minimum of 4-6 years’ experience based on strong analytical, communication written/verbal and technical skills.  A team player with great communication skills and understands critical path activities and deadlines. The ideal candidate would have ability to interact with the business partners and technology project team members during all phases of the project life cycle. Responsibilities:The Quality Assurance/Testing Analyst will responsible for collaborating with project team members throughout the project life cycle to analyze and prepare the testing deliverables. Specifically, those deliverables include the Test Plan/Strategies, test cases/scripts, and participating in the execution phase. The role will execute test activities through the SDLC and the skills to write Test Cases/scripts based on Business Requirements, Test Plan/ Strategy, Design Specifications and implementation strategies.  Execute against the test cases/scripts during testing phases/events and document test results including defects. The Testing Analyst will report to the project manager. This role may help with supporting management reporting to senior management.  Position Details:Analyze the project deliverables including Business Requirements, Design Specifications, and Implementation Strategies for testing requirements.Write and document Test Plan, Test Cases/Scripts for review with project team membersWork closely with User Acceptance Test Coordinator, Business Managers and other testing personnel to ensure timely delivery of the tested product.Execute test and regression testing protocols and defect tracking and analysis based on the test scriptsMaintain complete record of testing transactions including pass/fail indicators, final results and evidence of testing.Track and report test results to Testing Coordinator for integrated reporting to leadership teamMaintain and protect the confidentiality of all company and client information.Comply with all applicable federal, state, and local safety and health regulations that would apply to this job. Technical Skills: Strong Microsoft Office skills including Excel, Word, and Power Point and Quality Center testing tool is desirable.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Quality Assurance Tester II Job in Fort Wayne,Full Time Employee,"Fort Wayne, IN",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-tester-ii-job-fort-wayne-in-us-169030323.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d84638033528ab3dba961e9ad23c484c
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:12:03:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More IT Risk Consultant Job #:  665471Our great Fortune 500 client in Downtown Milwaukee has an immediate opening for IT Risk Consultant. If you are interested please apply with resume to aboettcher@apexsystemsinc.com .Responsible for designing and evaluating the processes and controls, accountable for consulting and advising on large, complex and ambiguous efforts on the appropriate information protection controls. Responsible for approving deviations to the policies and standards and providing subject matter expertise for the information risk program1. Conduct risk assessments on large, complex and ambiguous efforts to identify, rank, prioritize and report security and information protection risks associated with processes and technology.2. Partner with individuals throughout the organization (horizontally and veritically) to develop corrective action plans with mutually agreeable milestones to effectively mitigate identified risks.3. Develop security specifications and requirements for information system and processes to ensure compliance with applicable industry standards, laws and regulations.4. Evaluate information system architecture, network and processes to ensure controls effectively mitigate information risks and meet security baselines.5. Provide security and information protection control options that are holistic, strategic, and visionary to ensure proper implementation and sustainability for the organization.• Strong ability to maintain and strengthen relationships; ability to effectively influence and negotiate with internal and external partners• Demonstrates excellent written and verbal skills.• Knowledge of information risk management, security controls, and process design with proven ability to balance desired security with the needs of the businessResponsible for designing and evaluating the processes and controls, accountable for consulting and advising on large, complex and ambiguous efforts on the appropriate information protection controls. Responsible for approving deviations to the policies and standards and providing subject matter expertise for the information risk programCISSP, CIPT, CEH or other security certification is desirable.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",IT Risk Consultant Job in Milwaukee,Full Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/it-risk-consultant-job-milwaukee-wi-us-169030384.aspx?mescoid=1500136001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),62e2025b76b337d296cc32bbd1142a02
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:12:00:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More IT - Technology Support Analyst Job #:  665185Help Desk Analyst6 month contract-to-hirePlymouth, MNPrimary Responsibilities:- Answer and resolve inbound technical calls at a large corporate help desk, efficiently and professionally, in a high volume call center environment that operates 24x7x365.- Proficiently manage the resolution of inbound technical calls; balancing the need for customer service and issue resolution with the constraints of a call handle time goal.-Effectively translate complex, technical concepts into easy to understand language to assist non-technically oriented customers.- Demonstrate a highly developed sense of integrity and commitment to customer satisfaction.- Diagnose hardware, software, printing, and network connectivity issues including LAN, WAN, and VPN access in a Windows XP and Windows 7 environment, offering a variety of level 1 to 1.5 solutions over the phone. Using remote control tools to assist customers when needed.- Troubleshoot corporate applications with the use of a Knowledge Base and assign issues to the appropriate support group as needed. In addition, providing feedback on technical documentation for publication in Knowledge Base.- Accurately, quickly, and typing efficiently record all interactions with customers in an incident management tracking tool.- Anticipates customer needs and proactively identifies solutions.-Meet or exceed statistical metrics regarding; ticket and call quality, first call resolution, schedule adherence, and call handle time.- Adhere to policies and procedures regarding the safeguarding of protected information, such as personal health information (PHI/PII) and access to corporate systems.- Escalate high priority, high impact issues to the internal support teams.- Adhere to a strongly regimented schedule (start/end times, lunches, breaks, off phone time, etc.).- Work in a low-wall cubicle environment with moderate noise levels.Qualifications- Bachelor's degree preferred, but HS Diploma/GED and 2 years of experience accepted- 1 year of experience in a call center environment where success was gauged by balancing call handle time and first call resolution- 1 years’ of experience in technical support (preferably in a helpdesk) with experience with resetting passwords and verifying permissions- Experience using an incident or call tracking system- Willingness to work a schedule described above.Assets- Experience working in environment where success was gauged by balancing call handle time and first call resolution or other specific metrics- Experience assisting customers through alternate intake channels (phone and nonverbal channels like: live chat, email, social media and web form submissions)- Typing speed of 50 WPM a plus- Experience working with a knowledge base or knowledge tool- Experience using and supporting IP phone systems- Experience troubleshooting remote access tools (VPN) and general connectivity (LAN/WAN) issues by phone- Experience with supporting Microsoft Office Suite (including Outlook) and handheld devices- Experience with supporting MAC hard and software- Experience in a large corporate environment- Exposure to or knowledge of ITIL practices If you are interested please send your resume to bkelsey@apexsystemsinc.com and we will setup an initial phone interview. Thank you! EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",IT - Technology Support Analyst Job in Plymouth,Full Time Employee,"Plymouth, MN",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/it-technology-support-analyst-job-plymouth-mn-us-169030387.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7b08090501739d716d6bd66394ef0b5e
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:11:30:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Software Systems Engineer / Cloud Architect/Automation – CONTRACT – Dallas, TX-Proficiency with programming languages such as Java and Python. -Ability to debug compilation issues with builds. And get code pushed out to servers. -Participating in Scrum team activities, like stand-ups, sprint planning and sprint reviews. -Strong foot hold on platform archtiecture like OpenStack, Cloud Foundry and AWS and experience with Big Data strategies like MongoDB, LogStash, Elastic Search or Hadoop -Advanced level Custom-scripting build and deployment processes using Bash, Ruby, Python, Perl and other scripting languages. Follow us on our BLOG to see more jobs like this: http://tampa.vereduscorp.com / Why Veredus?Candidates work with a professional Recruiter whose average experience is eight years in the industry. That means they have intimate knowledge of the Information Technology industry and market trends - who is in demand now and who will be next. Your Veredus Recruiter will lead you through a thorough screening process in order to understand your skills, experience, needs, and desires. They also counsel their candidates in resume writing, interviewing, and career planning so when there’s a position you really want, you’re fully prepared to get it. . Additionally, if the position is a consulting opportunity Veredus provides full benefits starting Day 1, and at virtually no cost to you. • Medical • Dental • Vision • 401K • Life Insurance ($20,000 benefit)• ATOP - Accrued Time Off Program• Consultant Lunches and Outings • Consultant Web-Site• Name Plates• Care packages/Survival packs• Dedicated Consulting Services RepresentativeVeredus has been recognized as one of the “Best Staffing Firms to Work For” by Staffing Industry Analysts the last 3 years in a row. Nervous about an upcoming interview? Want to be as prepared as possible?Click on the link below and you will have access to the Veredus Interview Prep Video - culled from hundreds of years of collective experience in preparing candidates for that all important job interview: http://vereduscorp.com/career-center / Veredus Corporation is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer M/F/D/V.Drug testing may be required; please contact Recruiter for more information.",Software Systems Engineer Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/software-systems-engineer-job-dallas-tx-us-168963827.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=10,100.00 - 120.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,302fa0038e04a0c6bf75d3b8f4919c36
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:11:28:42,No,jobs.monster.com,".custom-description p{margin-bottom: 15px !important;font-size:14px !important;line-height: 18px !important;}.custom-description ul{margin:10px 0px !important;font-size:14px !important;line-height: 18px !important; }Position Purpose The Project Management Analyst position has responsibility to manage the operational and administrative aspects of ongoing project tasks. The successful candidate will work with the Program Management team in the development and sustainment of the project management methods, systems, tools and techniques in order to ensure continuous improvement of the department capabilities. Position Responsibilities/Duties/Functions/Tasks Demonstrates basic understanding of project management PMBOK methodology and software development lifecycle (SDLC)Develops project plans, budgets and other key deliverables for project managersProactively identify project risks and opportunities for improving processesCommunicates and publish plansCommunicates any schedule conflicts, resource and time constraints to the project managerAdvise the program/project manager of any trends, deviations and exceptions and make recommendations as to options availableMaintain information on multiple programs/projects (primarily) concerning risks, issues, plans, actuals, costs and quality outcomesAnalyze and provide complex data to produce reports on programs/projects for monthly reporting cycles and dashboard reportsPosition QualificationsDemonstrates basic understanding of project management PMBOK methodology and software development lifecycle (SDLC)Exceptional customer relationship building skillsExcellent written and oral communication skillsStrong analytical capabilities for advanced problem-solvingDemonstrable leadership skillsHighly organized and strong ability to multi-taskAbility to display good judgmentMust be able to meet deadlines and keep track of assignmentsAbility to work cross-functionally in a fast-paced environmentAbility to follow through on tasks until completedAbility to develop trusted relationships and find creative solutionsDemonstrated experience with providing documentationHigh degree of flexibilityStrong MS Excel skillsProficient PC Skills; including working knowledge of Microsoft Office ProductsBachelor’s degree preferred1 to 2 years of profession experience Physical Demands and Work EnvironmentPosition requires working at a desk at the corporate office for periods of time up to eight hoursEmployee AcknowledgementThis is not necessarily an exhaustive list of responsibilities, skills, duties, requirements, efforts or working conditions.  While this list is intended to be an accurate reflection of the current job, Liberty Tax Service reserves the right to revise the functions and duties of the job or to require that additional or different tasks be performed when circumstances change (i.e. emergencies, changes in personnel, work load, or technological developments). Liberty Tax Service is an equal opportunity employer.",Project Management Analyst Job in Virginia Beach,Full Time / Employee,"Virginia Beach, VA 23454",All,http://jobview.monster.com/project-management-analyst-job-virginia-beach-va-us-168923815.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,2785171b32256e8c6efc925470594c90
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:11:28:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client has an opening for a Director Application Development who has specific experience working with Real Time & Provider Portal Application. Lead a technical team to manage the development and enhancements of Real Time and Provider Portal applications. Lead the implementation of large ($2-3 million) initiatives in the eBusiness area. Drive technology innovation to achieve competitive differentiation in the market. Work directly with business to manage expectation and to deliver the results. Lead the technical implementation of strategic initiatives. Interface with various department in the organization including Application and Data Architecture teams and provide technical leadership to development teams. Function as a solution architect to effectively interface with leadership team in both IS and Business organizations. Use creative problem solving skills to remove barriers and effective communication skills to keep all parties informed regarding status of projects. Become SME in Medicaid and Medicare Provider Portal and customer facing software applications and interactions.Responsibilities:The Director of Real Time and Provider Portal Applications is to manage the development and enhancements of Real Time and Provider Portal applications.Lead a team of 15 professionals in developing/enhancing Real Time and Provider Portal applications.Lead Real Time Provider Portal Production Support and Operational Procedure team to ensure production excellence through metrics.Provide leadership and direction to team members around compliance with IS processes for application development and Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC).Lead, evaluate and provide technical, architectural and career guidance to direct reports and other members.Lead the design and implementation of real time architecture solution for Real Time Provider Portal and cross-platform solution.Work collaboratively with architecture team to ensure that the proposed solution is aligned with enterprise architecture direction.Develop in agile development methodology including user stories, continuous integration and test driven development.Lead, evaluate and provide technical and architectural guidance to team members.Requirements:Bachelor's Degree or equivalent experience.Three to five years of experience managing customer facing web solutions, clinical or healthcare applications.Five to ten years of experience with business requirements gathering, IT resource management, change management at cross-functional organization, enterprise IT; and people management.Project management skills.Knowledge of healthcare clinical applications.Other Skills: Experience with Portal technology, .Net, web pages and web forms, HTML, Adobe, AJAX, and knowledge of SOA and web services; experience in Agile Scrum; .Net experience and ready to develop code; Healthcare background a plus.We are an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.",Director of App Development (HEI Portals) Job in Philadelphia,Full Time Employee,"Philadelphia, PA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-app-development-hei-portals-job-philadelphia-pa-us-169020859.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,0a782d1945abcbe5cf24c89b6559ac6e
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:11:05:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"QA Engineer - Automation, C#, Agile Job in Pittsburgh 15222, Pennsylvania US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders QA Engineer Apply Pittsburgh, PA Full-Time $65,000 - $100,000 Job Details QA EngineerLocation: Pittsburgh, PASalary: Up to $100kJob Summary: Ensure the system meets the agreed upon requirements of the end-users and to produce a high-quality, fully-functional and user-friendly applications. Our QA Engineers produce, review, execute test cases, prepare documentation, record defects, retest fixes and prepare quality applications for release to our customers. Perform the total scope of engineering responsibilities including participation in the software and documentation design process using an Agile development lifecycle model.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Extremely competitive pay- Stable industry- Mid- Sized company- Not too big not too small- Work Life Balance- We understand that you have a life outside of workWhat You Will Be Doing- Develop test cases according to the specifications for all testing phases and conduct reviews.- Execute test cases and record results.- Verify software and applications are coded according to the specifications for basic product assignments.- Tests software, system integration, installation procedures, documentation and other product components and review technical documentation, help files and other product materials.- Test to ensure that software and documentation follow the design and style guidelines.- Suggest process improvements to ensure efficient and effective testing operations.- Participate in the product feature and requirements process for more complex product testing assignments.- Reviews QA estimates for project plan- Works with Development, Product Management and other QA Engineers to design and build automated test scripts for validating product software.What You Need for this Position- BS/BA in computer information technology, computer science, management systems or related discipline or equivalent combination of education and experience- 3 or more years of QA Engineer experience. - Automation /performance tools and script development experience. Pluses- Experience in a healthcare field - Experience working within a C#/.NET Environment- Agile ExperienceSo, if you are a QA Engineer with relevant experience, please apply today! Or simply send your resume to: Lauren@Cybercoders.com Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Lauren Formby is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: LF2-1290874 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Lauren.Formby@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: LF2-1290874 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Lauren Formby | Recruiting Manager | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",QA Engineer - Automation,,"QA Engineer - Automation, C#, Agile Job in Pittsburgh 15222, Pennsylvania US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders QA Engineer Apply Pittsburgh, PA Full-Time $65,000 - $100,000 Job Details QA EngineerLocation: Pittsburgh, PASalary: Up to $100kJob Summary: Ensure the system meets the agreed upon requirements of the end-users and to produce a high-quality, fully-functional and user-friendly applications. Our QA Engineers produce, review, execute test cases, prepare documentation, record defects, retest fixes and prepare quality applications for release to our customers. Perform the total scope of engineering responsibilities including participation in the software and documentation design process using an Agile development lifecycle model.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Extremely competitive pay- Stable industry- Mid- Sized company- Not too big not too small- Work Life Balance- We understand that you have a life outside of workWhat You Will Be Doing- Develop test cases according to the specifications for all testing phases and conduct reviews.- Execute test cases and record results.- Verify software and applications are coded according to the specifications for basic product assignments.- Tests software, system integration, installation procedures, documentation and other product components and review technical documentation, help files and other product materials.- Test to ensure that software and documentation follow the design and style guidelines.- Suggest process improvements to ensure efficient and effective testing operations.- Participate in the product feature and requirements process for more complex product testing assignments.- Reviews QA estimates for project plan- Works with Development, Product Management and other QA Engineers to design and build automated test scripts for validating product software.What You Need for this Position- BS/BA in computer information technology, computer science, management systems or related discipline or equivalent combination of education and experience- 3 or more years of QA Engineer experience. - Automation /performance tools and script development experience. Pluses- Experience in a healthcare field - Experience working within a C#/.NET Environment- Agile ExperienceSo, if you are a QA Engineer with relevant experience, please apply today! Or simply send your resume to: Lauren@Cybercoders.com Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Lauren Formby is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: LF2-1290874 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Lauren.Formby@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: LF2-1290874 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Lauren Formby | Recruiting Manager | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-engineer-automation-c-agile-job-pittsburgh-pa-us-168993983.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=3,,,6c86dc373c9497a089934f25da67b5c2
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:10:17:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.CenturyLink is the third largest telecommunications company in the United States and is recognized as a leader in the network services market by technology industry analyst firms. The company is a global leader in cloud infrastructure and hosted IT solutions for enterprise customers. CenturyLink provides data, voice and managed services in local, national and select international markets through its high-quality advanced fiber-optic network and multiple data centers for businesses and consumers. CenturyLink is an S&P 500 company and is included among the Fortune 500 list of America’s largest corporations. HR Reporting Analyst plays a critical role in the success of the HR Analytics and Reporting organization.  The analyst is responsible for producing reports often complex in nature while maintaining working relationships with internal customers and HR leaders.  The successful reporting analyst uses his/her in-depth knowledge of the data to provide high quality reports that help drive the accuracy and success of projects companywide. Job Responsibilities:Collaborates with internal customers and analytics leaders to gather requirements and produce medium to complex human resources reports using SAP, HANA, MS Access and other database technologiesResponsible for developing and producing key reports on a routine schedule in addition to creating and producing various adhoc report requests on a daily basisLeads efforts to identify improvement opportunities in current reporting practices and proposes changes to team and reporting managerAble to work in a team environment with minimal supervision.Must be able to maintain confidentiality and adhere to CenturyLink HR data privacy and security standardsWorks well under pressure, often times with short deadlines Minimum Qualifications:  Bachelor's Degree in Business, Information Technology, Mathematics or a related field with 5 years of business experience working with reporting, data warehousing, analytics, or business intelligence OR Master's Degree with 2-3 years of relevant experience.Strong organization skills, attention to detail and follow throughExceptional communication skills with ability to influence effectivelyStrong experience and skill with complex Microsoft Excel and Microsoft Access utilizationExperience in process automationKnowledge of SQL and relational database conceptsKnowledge of SAP Business Objects Web Intelligence ToolsCustomer service orientedExtremely detail-oriented with a proven track record for producing accurate, high quality workAbility to adapt to a fluid, unstructured environment and ability to produce results with little supervision #LI-POST1Requisition #: 61810EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, ""protected statuses""). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",SR HRIS ANALYST Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-hris-analyst-job-monroe-la-us-168950976.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=18,,,9790cd6fd9cfae8dc15b7d32887a06df
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:10:15:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Associate Cyber Security Analyst Job #:  670069Position Title Cyber Security Operations AnalystLocation Fairfax, VAClearnce Required Ability to obtain and hold a DOD Secret ClearanceOverviewThe selected candidate will be a part of the Defensive Cyber Operation team to support, maintain, and monitor Assured Compliance Assessment Solution (ACAS) systems infrastructure for the Army National Guard (ARNG). As part of the team, the administrator will be responsible to maintain, create, and execute a variety of security and compliance related activities.ResponsibilitiesResponsibilities Responsible for the application support of the ARNG ACAS infrastructure including Security Centers and the Nessus User InterfaceResponsible for all engineering activities for identifying, querying, creating scan groups for the Enterprise GuardNet client environmentSchedule and manage all system software update and maintenance activitiesMaintain plug-ins and configuration to the current Army standardCreate and maintain system documentation, standard operating procedures, and diagramsDiagnose and resolve configuration and troubleshooting issues within a multi-tenant infrastructureUse the GuardNet change management processInvestigate any reported false-positives to the appropriate DoD Service DeskCreate and update weekly and monthly network/tenant vulnerability reportsRequired Skills/Experience Prior experience with ACAS or NESSUS vulnerability scannersOutstanding customer service skillsBroad understanding of system software, patching, IAVM, and system vulnerability managementExperience with Red Hat Linux OS in a VM environmentExcellent written, verbal, and presentation communication skillsStrong analytical and problem resolution skills, organizational skills, and ability to analyze technical problemsAbility to work independently as well as collaboratively with network administratorsSystem troubleshooting skillsCompTIA Security (required to start)ITIL v3 Foundation (required within 45 days of start)Certified Ethical Hacker (CEH) certificationAbility to obtain a DoD Secret clearanceQualificationsExperience with DISA STIGs, IAVMBachelor’s Degree in a technical field2 years related job experience        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Associate Cyber Security Analyst Job in Fairfax,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Associate Cyber Security Analyst Job #:  670069Position Title Cyber Security Operations AnalystLocation Fairfax, VAClearnce Required Ability to obtain and hold a DOD Secret ClearanceOverviewThe selected candidate will be a part of the Defensive Cyber Operation team to support, maintain, and monitor Assured Compliance Assessment Solution (ACAS) systems infrastructure for the Army National Guard (ARNG). As part of the team, the administrator will be responsible to maintain, create, and execute a variety of security and compliance related activities.ResponsibilitiesResponsibilities Responsible for the application support of the ARNG ACAS infrastructure including Security Centers and the Nessus User InterfaceResponsible for all engineering activities for identifying, querying, creating scan groups for the Enterprise GuardNet client environmentSchedule and manage all system software update and maintenance activitiesMaintain plug-ins and configuration to the current Army standardCreate and maintain system documentation, standard operating procedures, and diagramsDiagnose and resolve configuration and troubleshooting issues within a multi-tenant infrastructureUse the GuardNet change management processInvestigate any reported false-positives to the appropriate DoD Service DeskCreate and update weekly and monthly network/tenant vulnerability reportsRequired Skills/Experience Prior experience with ACAS or NESSUS vulnerability scannersOutstanding customer service skillsBroad understanding of system software, patching, IAVM, and system vulnerability managementExperience with Red Hat Linux OS in a VM environmentExcellent written, verbal, and presentation communication skillsStrong analytical and problem resolution skills, organizational skills, and ability to analyze technical problemsAbility to work independently as well as collaboratively with network administratorsSystem troubleshooting skillsCompTIA Security (required to start)ITIL v3 Foundation (required within 45 days of start)Certified Ethical Hacker (CEH) certificationAbility to obtain a DoD Secret clearanceQualificationsExperience with DISA STIGs, IAVMBachelor’s Degree in a technical field2 years related job experience        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-cyber-security-analyst-job-fairfax-va-us-169021955.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),97c55e15fe3e5dfcaae416ea5fdb755f
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:10:14:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hi,Established in 1998, eTouch Systems is a technology services company that specializes in Digital Web Engineering. We deliver technology services and accelerate growth for Global 1000 companies by solving complex business challenges with breakthrough technical innovations. We partner with leading global hi-tech enterprises to service their business and technology needs. currently working with our direct clients including VMware, Intuit, Cisco, Yahoo, Sony, Google, PG&E &Kaiser amongst others enabling the success of their Software as well as IT infrastructure development initiatives through the quality of our consultants. Role: Technical PMLocation: Mountain View, CA.Duration: 12+ Months Job Function:•             Own & manage projects, working closely with deeply technical hardware and software engineers and management.•             Track milestones and detailed deliverables for the many moving parts that need to come together•             Work with department directors to manage resource planning and project scheduling.•             Manage communication of progress/status within the core team and external to the team. Escalate issues as necessary.•             Manage dependencies, remove roadblocks and keep processes running smoothly.•             Lead/contribute to infrastructure, process and methodology improvements. Subject areas worked: HW/SW and/or Mobile Products. Graphics experience is a plusAccomplishments: Track record of shipping hardware and/or software on timeSkills: MSProject, MS Visio, MS Office Suite, Jira, Confluence, Python, Source Code Control System, PLM and excellent verbal and written communication skills Please feel free to send your questions on my way at gnagaraju@etouch.net/ 510 585 1527 ©, if you would like to learn more of this need. Thank you. Best regards,Raju | eTouch Systems | Desk phone: +1.510.795.4800 X 159 Cell phone: +1.510.585.1527| Email: gnagaraju@etouch.net | Fax: +1.510.795.4803 |URL: www.etouch.net Linked In:  http://www.linkedin.com/in/graju/ Custom Development Solutions| Integration & Support Services| Professional Services6627 Dumbarton Circle | Fremont, CA 94555 ",Monster,,"Hi,Established in 1998, eTouch Systems is a technology services company that specializes in Digital Web Engineering. We deliver technology services and accelerate growth for Global 1000 companies by solving complex business challenges with breakthrough technical innovations. We partner with leading global hi-tech enterprises to service their business and technology needs. currently working with our direct clients including VMware, Intuit, Cisco, Yahoo, Sony, Google, PG&E &Kaiser amongst others enabling the success of their Software as well as IT infrastructure development initiatives through the quality of our consultants. Role: Technical PMLocation: Mountain View, CA.Duration: 12+ Months Job Function:•             Own & manage projects, working closely with deeply technical hardware and software engineers and management.•             Track milestones and detailed deliverables for the many moving parts that need to come together•             Work with department directors to manage resource planning and project scheduling.•             Manage communication of progress/status within the core team and external to the team. Escalate issues as necessary.•             Manage dependencies, remove roadblocks and keep processes running smoothly.•             Lead/contribute to infrastructure, process and methodology improvements. Subject areas worked: HW/SW and/or Mobile Products. Graphics experience is a plusAccomplishments: Track record of shipping hardware and/or software on timeSkills: MSProject, MS Visio, MS Office Suite, Jira, Confluence, Python, Source Code Control System, PLM and excellent verbal and written communication skills Please feel free to send your questions on my way at gnagaraju@etouch.net/ 510 585 1527 ©, if you would like to learn more of this need. Thank you. Best regards,Raju | eTouch Systems | Desk phone: +1.510.795.4800 X 159 Cell phone: +1.510.585.1527| Email: gnagaraju@etouch.net | Fax: +1.510.795.4803 |URL: www.etouch.net Linked In:  http://www.linkedin.com/in/graju/ Custom Development Solutions| Integration & Support Services| Professional Services6627 Dumbarton Circle | Fremont, CA 94555 ",,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-project-manager-job-mountain-view-ca-us-168929576.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=17,,,2c7f15bb8c4849c7879d244ef468126f
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:10:00:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a J2EE Developer . Lafayette, LA based Onshore IT Services Delivery team is looking for skilled J2EE Developers to support our client. Job Requirements: 5 years of J2EE experience  • Excellent Communication Skills • Strong technical experience with J2EE, Spring Batch, RESTful Webservices, Apache Camel, Cucumber is must • Database experience with Oracle 12, SQL Server • Experience with modern software engineering practices (Continuous Integration, Specification by Example, Behavior / Test Driven Development – BDD, TDD) and the respective tools is must • Experience on working with Informatica is an added advantage • Experience w/ Agile Methodologies • Experience in creating the design documents – High Level & Low Level Design Documents • Healthcare knowledge is an added advantage • Must be willing to work diligently to meet project deadlines • Demonstrate strong desire to develop new technical and professional skills on a continual basis Technology Stack: J2EE, Spring Batch, RESTful Webservices, Apache Camel, Cucumber, Informatica Power Centre 9.1, Oracle PL/SQL, SQL, PL/SQL Cartridge, Interface design and implementation, UNIX / Linux shell scripting Databases: Oracle 12, SQL Server Tool Stack: Maven, GIT/SVN, Jenkins, Udeploy, Eclipse based IDE with Plugins, Rally, Jmeter, CA-APM, VisualVM, MQJavaRoundTrip Skills: •Communication (Oral/Written) •Java Enterprise Editions JEE •SQL •Unix",JEE Developer Job in Lafayette,"Full Time, Employee","Lafayette, LA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/j2ee-developer-job-lafayette-la-us-169020556.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=13,,IT/Software Development,cb6f03cb7b9a41673159e1aacc53500e
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:09:20:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an IT Project Manager - A/V Audio Visual in Miami, FL. Summary: This company is an enterprise organization in Miami, FL that is expanding their project management team and needs top level project managers to continue their strong growth. This is a great opportunity to join a well-established and growing IT department. They are seeking candidates who have a strong background in A/V that have recently begun working a project manager. This position will support the company nationwide and could possibly involve a bit of travel.REQUIREMENTS: Four years or more of experience in managing complex projects involving infrastructure, A/V Strong experience in data projects, and infrastructure projects",IT Project Manager - A/V Audio Visual Job in Miami,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Miami, FL 33172",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-project-manager-a-v-audio-visual-job-miami-fl-us-168959220.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b1a8343c0112f7a7501104faae1258ca
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:09:18:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Sys Admin: AD Focus Job #:  665407Our Client is looking for an Active Directly System Administrator! POSITION SUMMARY:The System Administrator is responsible for installing, configuring, and maintaining physical/virtual Microsoft based servers in support of business processing requirements.  Installs, upgrades, and patches operating systems and complex software packages.    Schedules installations and upgrades in accordance with established IT policies and procedures.  Conducts routine software audits of Microsoft based servers to ensure compliance with established standards, policies, and configuration guidelines.  Must be a self-starter; capable of working independently, under limited direction, and in a team environment. PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:The successful candidate must be able to do the following:Administer and configure Microsoft’s Active Directory Services at an enterprise level.Administer and configure Microsoft’s DNS services at an enterprise level.Administer and configure Microsoft’s Group Policy at an enterprise level.Create, execute and report on testing and implementation plans.Create, execute and maintain Standard Operating Procedures for Enterprise ServicesExcellent communication skillsCapable of resolving complex issuesStrong troubleshoot and debugging skillsCapable of multi-taskingMust be a self-starter; capable of working independently, under limited direction, and in team environments REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS:5 years as a Systems Administrator (Microsoft).Experience maintaining Microsoft’s Active Directory/DNS/Group Policy services at an enterprise levelExperience maintaining Microsoft Windows Server 2008 R2 and Windows Server 2012R2 platformsLevel II DoD 8570 certification: Comptia Security CEMicrosoft Certification in either Microsoft Windows 2008 or 2012 server technologies PREFFERED QUALIFICATIONS:ITIL v3 Foundation Certification If interested, please reach out to Taylor Volk at tvolk@apexsystemsinc.com or by phone at (919) 836-1234.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Sys Admin: AD Focus Job in Fort Bragg,Full Time Employee,"Fort Bragg, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sys-admin-ad-focus-job-fort-bragg-nc-us-169030418.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1672833ee1b6ef723c254db1a0270807
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:09:18:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Candidate Profile:The Senior HRIS Analyst will report to the Director of HRIS and will function as a SuccessFactors BizX & SAP-HR Systems Analyst. He/she will be responsible for ensuring proper design, configuration, and documentation of system change requests and processes. Key Responsibilities Include:Participate in the regular review and prioritization of HR systems configuration projectsParticipate in SAP-HR and SuccessFactors implementation projects by providing support to requirement gathering and documentation, business process mapping and redesign, data conversions, system configurations, testing, deployment, cutover coordination, training and system post go live stabilizationParticipate in SAP-HR and SuccessFactors system updates including functional enhancement reviews and testingUnder the direction of Project Manager/HRIS Manager, partner with other team members to manage the delivery of small HR systems projects including configuration changes and functionality deployment (including configuration, testing, documentation, peer review, sign off, training, change management etc.)Participate in system testing; responsibilities include test scripts development and execution, testing resources coordination and test completion metrics compilationProvide training to end users during project rollout as neededCoordinate with business owners and other HRIS team members to develop future state HR Systems Road MapDocument internal processes and audit procedures to ensure data integrity of systemsDevelop and maintain system and program administration documentation; update documentation on a frequent basisIdentify opportunities for improving the effectiveness of processes, systems, and reportsConduct troubleshooting analysis; Document system errors and issues clearly/with screenshots; escalates for review & ticket creationEscalate process change requests, system enhancements or any other major resource requests to HRIS management team for approval / prioritization Qualifications:Degree in economics, statistics, human resources, finance, information technology or related field or equivalent experienceAt least 5+ years of applicable HCM or HR application experienceSystem administration experience of SAP-HR or SuccessFactors systems strongly preferredWorking knowledge of HR systems and processesAdvanced experience with Microsoft Access, PowerPoint and ExcelStrong database management skills including the ability to merge, clean and analyze large amounts of dataEffective written and verbal communication skills, including the ability to explain data and findings to a non-technical audienceAbility to multitask and manage competing prioritiesDemonstrated strong attention to detail, problem-solving, critical thinking and analytical skillsAbility to work independently as well as collaborating with team members from various business owners   #LI-POST1Alternate Location: Monroe, LA (Louisiana)Requisition #: 4007 Company StatementCenturyLink is an industry-leading provider of communications, high speed Internet and entertainment services from coast to coast.  Our combination of business and residential service solutions – including home and wireless voice solutions and digital television – provide innovative solutions to our customers.  CenturyLink is proud to be a participant in the U.S. General Services Administration Networx program, the largest communications services contract in the world.  CenturyLink offers you the opportunity to develop and cultivate your career as we lead the communications industry into the future.Disclaimer:The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Senior HRIS Analyst Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-hris-analyst-job-monroe-la-us-168951292.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=3,,,7a2a08c16b6fd3849fc759fd619f5e20
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:09:18:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Systems Administrator needed for a contract opportunity with Yoh's client located in Herlong, CA. Possession of a Secret Security Clearance or ability to obtain one is required as a condition for employment. The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess: - 2-4 years IT experience - COMPTIA SEC + CE certification - MSCA Windows Server 2012 - High school Diploma or General Equivalency Diploma (GED) What You'll Be Doing: - Provide technical knowledge, expertise and resources to sustain applications and systems or executive/enterprise software products hosted within the job network. - Serve as an Information Technology (IT) Specialist (CUSTSPT/SYSADMIN) responsible for the mission and function of the organization, which is to provide state-of-the-art technology that incorporate software and hardware and software solutions - Perform highly technical computer system Tier I and Tier II administration level customer support tasks where state-of-the-art technology is rapidly changing. - Utilize skills in Windows server 2012, VMWare, Microsoft SCCM server and other applications to provide network mission functionality for the job - Ensure systems comply with current security Technical Implementation Guides (STIGs), Information Assurance vulnerability Alerts (IAVAs) are patched and software is kept up to date - Perform computer system administration/customer support tasks to include troubleshooting, installation and management of all IT systems and software. - Work with various manufacturers' software to include all versions of Microsoft Office - Manage systems resources including performance, capacity, availability, serviceability, and recoverability What You Need to Bring to the Table: - Active Secret Security Clearance or ability to obtain - SEC + CE certification - MSCA Windows Server 2012 What's In It For You? We welcome you to be a part of the largest and legendary global staffing companies to meet your career aspirations. Yoh's network of client companies has been employing professionals like you for over 65 years in the U.S., UK and Canada. Join Yoh's extensive talent community that will provide you with access to Yoh's vast network of opportunities and gain access to this exclusive opportunity available to you. If the most advanced technology to do your job is what you seek, this is the place to be. With the most progressive cultural of growth opportunities, this will be the company that leads you aspire - Medical, Dental & Vision Benefits - 401K Retirement Saving Plan - Life & Disability Insurance - Direct Deposit & weekly epayroll - Employee Discount Program's - Referral Bonus Program's Get Hired, Apply Now! Recruiter: Todd Weber Phone Number: 314.341-0730 Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: GOV MONJOB J2WYOHFED Ref: 1074351 Branch: IT & Telecom Nearest Major Market: Northern California Job Segment: System Administrator, Telecom, Telecommunications, Medical, Security Clearance, Technology, Healthcare, Government #TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Systems Administrator Job Job in Portola,Full Time Employee,"Portola, CA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/systems-administrator-job-job-portola-ca-us-168982862.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,1d344307dae6a7fdd6103c7a6921c51f
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:07:59:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Marketing Analyst Job #:  669232Site: North Plaza - Northbrook - ILThe Digital Analyst works with a dedicated account base of tier 1 agents providing personalized strategy and support using a variety of digital disciplines. In this role you will work with local agents to help building their digital and social media presence. The ideal candidate have a broad digital marketing background vs. being highly specialized in one technique. Experience working directly with SMBs and knowledge of local search strategies is a huge plus. Candidates must be able to build and maintain relationships with a variety of stakeholders.Description:* Leverage your experience in digital marketing to perform 1:1 consultations with local agents on a wide range of digital marketing programs including, paid search, organic search, social media strategy, web content strategy, online review acquisition, display advertising and analytics reporting.* Perform a digital health audit for each of your agents and make personalized recommendations based on the agents bandwidth, interest, market competition and overall need. You must be able to communicate digital marketing strategy and benefits to an audience largely unfamiliar with digital* Work closely with your agent base to uncover local content opportunities. Translate those opportunities into recommendations for developing digital content for web and social. This includes the review / approve of content for accuracy, basic spelling & grammar and adherence to predefined guidelines* Train agents on the use, features and best practices of our digital tools and top online platforms (Hearsay Social, Yelp, Facebook, etc.)* Evaluate digital performance reports and consult with your agents to understand the numbers and make recommendations for improvements based on data* Develop best practice training material and documentation to help train the Jr. Staff* Research and suggest additional digital opportunities that should be consideredRequirements:* 3-5 Years digital marketing experience* Hands on experience with social media strategy, web content development, review acquisition strategy, SEO / SEM and web analytics tools.* Experience performing digital marketing assessments and the ability to translate your findings into a workable strategy* Experience of directly working with SMBs to support them in digital marketing* Experience pulling, interpreting and presenting web analytics data* Ability to work 1:1 with a large client base and offer personalized service* Experience using a CRM system (Salesforce.com, MS Dynamics, Sugar CRM, etc.)* Strong written and verbal communication skills         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Marketing Analyst Job in Northbrook,Full Time Employee,"Northbrook, IL",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-analyst-job-northbrook-il-us-168932662.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a593b9a913e1cf744725f29c85c3060e
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:07:58:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Developer - Python/Django, JS/HTML - $160K DOE Job in San Francisco 94102, California US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Senior Developer Apply San Francisco, CA Full-Time $130,000 - $160,000 Job Details Come and work for the healthcare industry's version of Facebook for healthcare! We're located in beautiful San Francisco, CA, and we're building a free and easy way for patients to keep track of doctor visits, medical bills, personal medical information, insurance, immunizations and pharmacy medications. We're empowering consumers to become their own health advocates - join us and make a difference!What You Will Be DoingYou’ll be responsible for taking ownership over products, building great code, and proactively ensuring the quality and performance of our platform. As you scope and build new features, you’ll leverage appropriate APIs, tools, and frameworks. You’ll be making informed decisions about what existing resources to integrate into our platform vs. which to develop in-house.What You Need for this PositionAt least 3 years of experience in Python and knowledge of:- Django, Flask, or a similar python web application framework- JavaScript, HTML, and LESS/SASS- PostgreSQL and/or MySQL- REST APIs (building and consuming) Nice to Have:- Experience building scalable and performant services- A track record of completing interesting projects- Proven proficiency in building and running tests to ensure high-quality code- Ability to communicate effectively across both technical and non-technical teams- Experience building HIPAA compliant software and in the healthcare industryWhat's In It for YouLocation: San Francisco, CA (onsite)Job Type: Full-time, perm onlySalary: $130-$160K, depending on experiencePLUS:Flexible work hours, full medical and dental coverage, retirement plans, paid vacation and time off and more!So, if you are a Senior Developer with Full-Stack experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Christina David is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: CD1-1296350 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Christina.David@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: CD1-1296350 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Christina David | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",Senior Developer,,"Senior Developer - Python/Django, JS/HTML - $160K DOE Job in San Francisco 94102, California US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Senior Developer Apply San Francisco, CA Full-Time $130,000 - $160,000 Job Details Come and work for the healthcare industry's version of Facebook for healthcare! We're located in beautiful San Francisco, CA, and we're building a free and easy way for patients to keep track of doctor visits, medical bills, personal medical information, insurance, immunizations and pharmacy medications. We're empowering consumers to become their own health advocates - join us and make a difference!What You Will Be DoingYou’ll be responsible for taking ownership over products, building great code, and proactively ensuring the quality and performance of our platform. As you scope and build new features, you’ll leverage appropriate APIs, tools, and frameworks. You’ll be making informed decisions about what existing resources to integrate into our platform vs. which to develop in-house.What You Need for this PositionAt least 3 years of experience in Python and knowledge of:- Django, Flask, or a similar python web application framework- JavaScript, HTML, and LESS/SASS- PostgreSQL and/or MySQL- REST APIs (building and consuming) Nice to Have:- Experience building scalable and performant services- A track record of completing interesting projects- Proven proficiency in building and running tests to ensure high-quality code- Ability to communicate effectively across both technical and non-technical teams- Experience building HIPAA compliant software and in the healthcare industryWhat's In It for YouLocation: San Francisco, CA (onsite)Job Type: Full-time, perm onlySalary: $130-$160K, depending on experiencePLUS:Flexible work hours, full medical and dental coverage, retirement plans, paid vacation and time off and more!So, if you are a Senior Developer with Full-Stack experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Christina David is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: CD1-1296350 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Christina.David@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: CD1-1296350 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Christina David | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-developer-python-django-js-html-160k-doe-job-san-francisco-ca-us-168977028.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=14,,,aec504cae7ecd5401912d7da529c1d49
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:07:19:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"IT Sr. Engineer (RPG) Job Summary: The Sr. Engineer applies the theories and principles of information and computing to the design, development, testing and deployment of new and improved technology solutions. Partnering with architects on technology standards and roadmaps, and with business analysts on the business needs, the Sr. Engineer guides effective solution delivery with a focus on designs and verification, overseeing technology contributions from internal and external resources. Job Responsibilites: Partner with business and/or business analysts to analyze and understand the organizations information technology needs.Design, develop, test and deploy technology solutions to satisfy identified needs.Partner with business analysts and architects to evaluate trade-offs between in-house, vended and cloud-based solutions.Ensure solutions are aligned with the technology roadmap and standards (technology, security, quality).Create process flowcharts, diagrams, technical workflows and other related design documentation.Create the actual technical solution, for example programming, configuration, data delivery, hardware deployment, etc.Verify that the solution (in-house, vended, service-based) satisfies both the functional and non-functional requirements, accomplished through planning and executing tests, and through reviewing delivery lifecycle documents.The role may specialize by function (e.g., design, test, etc.), or by technology solution (infrastructure, integration, data, application, etc.).This particular position has the following specialized responsibilities: o Extensive coding experience with RPG and building applications in a legacy environment o Strong understanding in the areas of application programming (RPG III, RPG IV), database (DB2 & SQL) and system design (iSeries & Network) o Review, analyze, and modify iSeries applications o Apply knowledge and best practices to support users in our AS400 systems o Facilitate and complete testing activities o RPG programing abilities o Data analysis and query development o Data architecture and modelingQualifications/Education/Experience/Skills:BS in Computer Science or related field, or equivalent experience7+ years IT experience, with mastery in the following domains: o Development on the iSeries/AS400 platform o Experience using RPG III, RPG IV, CL, CLLE, SQL, DDSo Experience with sub-filesPreference for breadth of IT domains, technologies and rolesDemonstrated experience with modeling and design visualization toolsAbility to document and effectively communicate complex technical subject matterExperience designing, integrating, and managing complex technical solutionsLeadership, negotiation and consensus-building skills with business and technical groupsExcellent verbal and written communication skillsHigh sense of urgency and flexibility in a fast-paced environmentStrong project management and organization skillsThe person in this role can sit in either Savannah, GA or Omaha, NE.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",RPG Programmer Job in Savannah,Full Time Employee,RPG Programmer,"Savannah, GA",http://jobview.monster.com/rpg-programmer-job-savannah-ga-us-168969078.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,c303b692da0342f44bf91e88e733d766
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:07:10:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Software Architect - Relocation to St. Louis provided! Job in Kansas City 64101, Missouri US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Software Architect Apply Kansas City, MO Full-Time $90,000 - $130,000 Job Details If you are a .NET Software Architect with experience, please read on!Title: Software ArchitectSalary Range: $90K - $130KLocation: Relocation to St. Louis provided!We are a top tier consulting firm with a 30 year proven track record of success and over 1,000 employees in 7 cities nationwide. You will be developing solutions for unpredictable and varied problems for multiple clients across different industries. We want you to be well-rounded in a broad range of languages with the ability to adapt to new clients and learn as you go.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Work with a variety of clients on a wide range of projects- Zero to extreme minimal turnover - our consultants stick around for the long haul- Interesting/challenging workWhat You Will Be Doing- Design software solutions to meet client’s various business and technical needs- Manage a team of developers and analysts throughout the entire project lifecycle- Analyze application specifications and technology approach to ensure business requirements are met and are scalable for future product releases- Investigate future oriented products and take ownership of driving resolution and making proposals that may include reusable components- Work with Business Analysts and Management to recommend future application solutions- Produce conceptual design documents and detailed specifications for large-scale and complex projects to reinforce our technical product and architectural standards- Collaborate with Business Analyst team members to diagnose and resolve complex defects identified throughout testing phasesWhat You Need for this PositionCollege experience and knowledge of:- .NET- VB.NET or C#- WCF- WinForms- Oracle, DB2, or SQL Server- RUP- Agile- NHibernate or Entity- Spring.NET or StructureMap- SharePoint- JavaScript- Ajax- CVS- Ant or MavenNice to haves:- SilverlightWhat's In It for You- Relocation to Saint Louis, MO- Extremely comprehensive benefits package- Competitive salary commensurate of experienceSo, if you are a .NET Software Architect with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Emma Goulden is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: EG1-1296251 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Emma.Goulden@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: EG1-1296251 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Emma Goulden | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",Software Architect,,"Software Architect - Relocation to St. Louis provided! Job in Kansas City 64101, Missouri US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Software Architect Apply Kansas City, MO Full-Time $90,000 - $130,000 Job Details If you are a .NET Software Architect with experience, please read on!Title: Software ArchitectSalary Range: $90K - $130KLocation: Relocation to St. Louis provided!We are a top tier consulting firm with a 30 year proven track record of success and over 1,000 employees in 7 cities nationwide. You will be developing solutions for unpredictable and varied problems for multiple clients across different industries. We want you to be well-rounded in a broad range of languages with the ability to adapt to new clients and learn as you go.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Work with a variety of clients on a wide range of projects- Zero to extreme minimal turnover - our consultants stick around for the long haul- Interesting/challenging workWhat You Will Be Doing- Design software solutions to meet client’s various business and technical needs- Manage a team of developers and analysts throughout the entire project lifecycle- Analyze application specifications and technology approach to ensure business requirements are met and are scalable for future product releases- Investigate future oriented products and take ownership of driving resolution and making proposals that may include reusable components- Work with Business Analysts and Management to recommend future application solutions- Produce conceptual design documents and detailed specifications for large-scale and complex projects to reinforce our technical product and architectural standards- Collaborate with Business Analyst team members to diagnose and resolve complex defects identified throughout testing phasesWhat You Need for this PositionCollege experience and knowledge of:- .NET- VB.NET or C#- WCF- WinForms- Oracle, DB2, or SQL Server- RUP- Agile- NHibernate or Entity- Spring.NET or StructureMap- SharePoint- JavaScript- Ajax- CVS- Ant or MavenNice to haves:- SilverlightWhat's In It for You- Relocation to Saint Louis, MO- Extremely comprehensive benefits package- Competitive salary commensurate of experienceSo, if you are a .NET Software Architect with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Emma Goulden is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: EG1-1296251 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Emma.Goulden@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: EG1-1296251 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Emma Goulden | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/software-architect-relocation-to-st-louis-provided!-job-kansas-city-mo-us-168989411.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=14,,,7fa1e67acb20487d3f4e55009cdf6289
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:06:30:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"NetSuite Implementation Manager - ERP, Finance - WE offer RELO! Job in Charleston 29492, South Carolina US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders NetSuite Implementation Manager - ERP, Finance - WE offer RELO! Apply Charleston, SC Full-Time $100,000 - $140,000 Job Details If you are a Financial Systems Implementation Manager with a finance background please read on!NetSuite Implementation Manager Location: Charleston, SC -- we offer excellent relocation package!Salary: $100k - $135k + BONUSTop Reasons to Work with Us- Work alongside some of the best engineers in the world- Learn from the best!- Cutting Edge Technologies- Reward of knowing you are part of a community that is enabling meaningful change- Location, location, location- Large room for advancementWhat You Will Be Doing- Manage the implementation of Netsuite ERP.- Communication within Finance and Accounting to ensure that instructions and deadlines from the PMO are understood within the different functional workstreams. -C oordinate all workstream activities and design the Global model including Chart of Accounts, Global coding schema, standard reporting packages, etc. - Partner with the PMO and Finance leadership to plan and prioritize resources required for deployment.What You Need for this Position-At least 7 years implementing financial systems- Have knowledge in these functional accounting areas (Procure to Pay, General Ledger, Consolidation, Financial Reporting, Cost Accounting, Internal Controls, Travel and Expense (TandE) and Reporting) of experienceWhat's In It for You- Office by the beach in beautiful Charleston, SC! You'll never want to leave!- Amazing Health Benefits- Stock Options- Aggressive Bonuses- Strong Salary Packages- 401k matching- Paid Time OffSo, if you are a Manager, Financial Systems Implementation with experience, please apply today! Or simply send your resume to Madeline@cybercoders.comI look forward to hearing from you! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Lauren Formby is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: ML2-1292863 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Lauren.Formby@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: ML2-1292863 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Lauren Formby | Recruiting Manager | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",NetSuite Implementation Manager - ERP,,"NetSuite Implementation Manager - ERP, Finance - WE offer RELO! Job in Charleston 29492, South Carolina US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders NetSuite Implementation Manager - ERP, Finance - WE offer RELO! Apply Charleston, SC Full-Time $100,000 - $140,000 Job Details If you are a Financial Systems Implementation Manager with a finance background please read on!NetSuite Implementation Manager Location: Charleston, SC -- we offer excellent relocation package!Salary: $100k - $135k + BONUSTop Reasons to Work with Us- Work alongside some of the best engineers in the world- Learn from the best!- Cutting Edge Technologies- Reward of knowing you are part of a community that is enabling meaningful change- Location, location, location- Large room for advancementWhat You Will Be Doing- Manage the implementation of Netsuite ERP.- Communication within Finance and Accounting to ensure that instructions and deadlines from the PMO are understood within the different functional workstreams. -C oordinate all workstream activities and design the Global model including Chart of Accounts, Global coding schema, standard reporting packages, etc. - Partner with the PMO and Finance leadership to plan and prioritize resources required for deployment.What You Need for this Position-At least 7 years implementing financial systems- Have knowledge in these functional accounting areas (Procure to Pay, General Ledger, Consolidation, Financial Reporting, Cost Accounting, Internal Controls, Travel and Expense (TandE) and Reporting) of experienceWhat's In It for You- Office by the beach in beautiful Charleston, SC! You'll never want to leave!- Amazing Health Benefits- Stock Options- Aggressive Bonuses- Strong Salary Packages- 401k matching- Paid Time OffSo, if you are a Manager, Financial Systems Implementation with experience, please apply today! Or simply send your resume to Madeline@cybercoders.comI look forward to hearing from you! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Lauren Formby is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: ML2-1292863 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Lauren.Formby@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: ML2-1292863 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Lauren Formby | Recruiting Manager | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/netsuite-implementation-manager-erp-finance-we-offer-relo!-job-charleston-sc-us-168992554.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=15,,,81083d2207269599041f807ebcab6690
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:06:30:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Research Information Specialist Job #:  672163Junior Programmer Location- Triad area, NCOne of our clients in the triad area is looking to add a member to their team who has a passion for market research and technology. This person will create marketing research questionnaires, and perform tasks involving QA and survey data coordination.If you're interested in learning more about this position and/or applying, please contact Jarrod Brady at jsbrady@apexsystemsinc.com Requirements:Basic programming experience preferred, including understanding of JavaScript/VBscriptAbility to multi-task,prioritize,and work under tight deadlinesStrong attention to detail and commitment to superior quality workCritical thinking ability; skilled in questioning results and taking the initiative to investigate the “why”Excellent written and oral communications skills; collaborative team memberStrong aptitude in skills such as logical thinking, analytical reasoning, process mappingProficiency with MS Office requiredSQL knowledge strongly preferredMarket research experience helpful        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More",Research Information Specialist Job in Winston-Salem,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Research Information Specialist Job #:  672163Junior Programmer Location- Triad area, NCOne of our clients in the triad area is looking to add a member to their team who has a passion for market research and technology. This person will create marketing research questionnaires, and perform tasks involving QA and survey data coordination.If you're interested in learning more about this position and/or applying, please contact Jarrod Brady at jsbrady@apexsystemsinc.com Requirements:Basic programming experience preferred, including understanding of JavaScript/VBscriptAbility to multi-task,prioritize,and work under tight deadlinesStrong attention to detail and commitment to superior quality workCritical thinking ability; skilled in questioning results and taking the initiative to investigate the “why”Excellent written and oral communications skills; collaborative team memberStrong aptitude in skills such as logical thinking, analytical reasoning, process mappingProficiency with MS Office requiredSQL knowledge strongly preferredMarket research experience helpful        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/research-information-specialist-job-winston-salem-nc-us-169021690.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3641dd6b09d943d96fbd3e8485137e27
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:05:25:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Modis' client has a new opportunity for a UI/UX Designer in downtown San Francisco. *If you would like to apply directly please email stacy.song at modis.com* Job Description: As a UI/UX Designer, you’ll have the challenge of not only designing the user experience for a new Intranet, but designing tools to help our end users build their own enterprise applications — with an interface forward approach!  Key responsibilities include, but are not limited to the following: Designs interfaces that are beautiful, modern, easy to use, and balance client needs with business goalsFacilitate workshops for conceptual exploration, brainstorming, vision sessions, and requirements gathering Communicate scenarios, end-to-end experiences, interaction models, and screen designs to stakeholdersEstablish directions and design solutions, work with technical development teams to drive UI/UX concepts to production that meet quality standards and deliverable requirementsMeet with internal teams and stakeholders to ascertain requirements, identify and manage scope, and release planningWork collaboratively across functions employing a consistently high standard of user-centered designResponsible for the quality and delivery of the User InterfaceProduce both low and high fidelity wireframes that match business and technical requirementsMaintain design, mockups, and specifications as neededPerform UI validation and unit testing prior to deployment across environmentsDefect tracking and management on within User Interface  Knowledge and skills required: 5+ years of experience in online user interface development and designHigh standards of quality and attention to detailDemonstrates an excellent navigation and architecture POV, strong experience in rapid prototyping tools, and a current portfolio that demonstrates a strong understanding of online design.Deep understanding of UX design principles and methodologies as they relate to software developmentAdvanced skills in interaction design, information architecture, usability evaluation, and/or user research;Experience building rich, interactive prototypes or web applications using HTML, CSS and JavaScriptAbility to respond quickly and manage time effectively in a fast-paced, dynamic environment;Proficient in creative UI/UX tools such as Adobe Creative Suite, Sketch, and InVisionAbility to gather, analyze, and document end user requirements  Required business skills: Strong communication skills (verbal/written)Solid understanding of project management principles with expertise to manage large-scale projects to successDemonstrated ability to analyze, consolidate and communicate complex technical topics to all levels of staff, including but not limited to IT executives, business/technical managers, developers and system administrators, in verbal and written formComfortable presenting to executive staff, senior leadership, and large groups across the organizationAble to navigate through ambiguities and flexible to changing prioritiesProven ability to build partnerships and influence others that are not in the direct sphere of controlStrong detail orientation, follow-through capabilities and escalation of key issuesProficiency in MS Office suite  Experience with the following is a plus: Experience developing for mobile interfacesExperience branding SharePoint  ",UI/UX Designer Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Francisco, CA 94105",,http://jobview.monster.com/ui-ux-designer-job-san-francisco-ca-us-169019455.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,b51db2ed59d87cd4d53b821eb12acdf4
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:05:23:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ten or more (10+) years of experience in network and transport service management, with project management and customer service training or experience. Plans, manages and supervises IP network and transport service hardware and software installation and maintenance. Mentors subordinates in developing knowledge of and skill with Open Systems Interconnection (OSI) layers 2 through 4, and of Information Technology Infrastructure Library (ITIL) incident, problem, change, and availability management. Supervises and manages the network and transport service configuration change request process, ensuring that new or expanded capabilities are implemented within cost and schedule goals. Designs and supervises implementation of new and modified network interfaces. Supervises and manages the implementation of firmware and software updates to network and transport components. Develops and manages implementation of network and transport service delivery and continuous improvement processes. Develops recommendations for improving the network and transport infrastructure, and its associated incident, problem, change, and availability management processes. Supervises and manages implementation of network transport service security, integrity and business continuity controls. Leads the planning and execution of special network transport service projects. Required: H.S./GED, Final Secret, Security+ and CCNP",IT Service Delivery Rep Senior (Government) Job in Baltimore,,"Baltimore, MD",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-service-delivery-rep-senior-government-job-baltimore-md-us-168747338.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,,,0083898eb30f9539f02b5f3869a27944
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:03:22:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Senior Project Manager (IT) Job #:  670201Location: Folsom, CASr. Project Manager - DescriptionManage all facets of large scale, cross functional technical projects with broad scope to ensure deliverables are met within schedule, budget, and quality goals.Clear understanding of project framework, high-level design, and execute with the coordination of remote teamsExecuted various projects in a timely manner, within budget and consistent with the high standards of quality.Translate idea into artifacts using various tools.Skills - RequiredSolid understanding of system migration (moving application into new platform) preferably Cloud based project migration.Must have clear understanding of published high-level design and their components/tools used, enforce during implementation.Must be able to handle agile projects, gathering business requirements, create test-cases from project requirement/use-case document and also execute the testing.Must have outstanding communication when executing the project with remote team's member of development and prod-support.Proficient in most personal computers and client server platforms.Work with architecture team and convert their ideas into a presentation using various artifacts of charts/diagrams/VisioSolid understanding of Microsoft office, especially project management software with dependenciesWorking experience with JIRARun multiple agile sprintsOptional:Familiar with Cloud terminologiesAble to interpret UNIX shell scripts        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Senior Project Manager (IT) Job in Folsom,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Senior Project Manager (IT) Job #:  670201Location: Folsom, CASr. Project Manager - DescriptionManage all facets of large scale, cross functional technical projects with broad scope to ensure deliverables are met within schedule, budget, and quality goals.Clear understanding of project framework, high-level design, and execute with the coordination of remote teamsExecuted various projects in a timely manner, within budget and consistent with the high standards of quality.Translate idea into artifacts using various tools.Skills - RequiredSolid understanding of system migration (moving application into new platform) preferably Cloud based project migration.Must have clear understanding of published high-level design and their components/tools used, enforce during implementation.Must be able to handle agile projects, gathering business requirements, create test-cases from project requirement/use-case document and also execute the testing.Must have outstanding communication when executing the project with remote team's member of development and prod-support.Proficient in most personal computers and client server platforms.Work with architecture team and convert their ideas into a presentation using various artifacts of charts/diagrams/VisioSolid understanding of Microsoft office, especially project management software with dependenciesWorking experience with JIRARun multiple agile sprintsOptional:Familiar with Cloud terminologiesAble to interpret UNIX shell scripts        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-project-manager-it-job-folsom-ca-us-169021943.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0b722853f4c3cae8bb77c59cd71175f7
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:03:18:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is hiring an Interactive Web Developer for our client, who ranks as one of the Top 10 companies to work for in the Kansas City metro.REQUIREMENTS:- Front end development (web developers)- Javascript/jQuery experience- Javascript frameworks- HTML5 experience- CSS3 experience- Angular JS (desired)- Interactive web development- Strong communication skills within development teams- Ability to work in a fast-paced environmentThese are open-ended long-term contracts with the expectation to convert to direct hireExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Web Developer Job in Prairie Village,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Web Developer,"Prairie Village, KS",http://jobview.monster.com/web-developer-job-prairie-village-ks-us-168910676.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,a82bcb4ea38e4690a274ea64690a2304
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:03:17:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Program Support RepWarren, NJPR: 16.54 Job Description:• Support Rep for Opus in Bedminster will handle incoming calls from customers dealing with loyalty/Rx discount cards for different pharma companies. Candidates with a healthcare or medical background preferred. • Answers incoming calls from pharmacies and patients and gathers information from the caller to troubleshoot the issue. • Provides pharmacy co pay assistance for loyalty card programs • Navigates multiple screens to research callers request. • Logs all calls in web trax. • Enrolls patients into co pay programs. • Support transactions by interacting between pharmacies and patients • Makes outbound calls following up on rejected claims and other issues • Escalates more complex issues to Supervisor/Manager as necessary • Candidates with adminstrative experience in a Drs office that can analyze/understand EOBs (explanation of benefits) forms are highly desired. • Candidates should have some phone customer support experience, medical, pharmacy or healthcare background is a huge plus • Must be computer literate and familiar with MS Office REQUIREMENTS:Looking for personnel with Medical billing knowledge. Ability to interpret EOB(explanation of benefits) and are able to interpret billing codes Please note that attachments. ",Program Support Rep Job in Warren,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Warren, NJ 07059",,http://jobview.monster.com/program-support-rep-job-warren-nj-us-169013533.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=15,,IT/Software Development,6ca85d3f88926d5193b76388d47dbe40
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:02:33:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overall Purpose: Responsible for end-to-end project or program management throughout the life cycle of a software/system development project/program (may be internal or external client facing). Directs and leads the efforts of a project/program team to deliver a completed project/program and/or service. Consults directly with internal or external clients on business goals, tools, strategy and best practices of software development. Has full accountability for managing concurrent projects/programs of any complexity including projects/programs that span multiple regions, functions and/or business units. Directs team's activities utilizing the organization's software development life cycle (SDLC). Interacts with other project/program managers and with the Account Management organization to ensure alignment of project goals and progress with client needs and client priorities. Utilizes knowledge of business, industry and technology to incorporate business process improvements into the organization and/or to develop business strategies and function/business/technical architectures. Must have thorough understanding of the software development life cycle (SDLC) processes and tools and must advocate for adherence to standards. Must have working knowledge of business practices in at least one specific business software domain. Key Roles and Responsibilities: Conducts end to end project management of large or multiple large projects. Works as a team member or runs individual projects and is responsible for completing projects within allotted timeline and budget. Defines project scope and objectives, coordinates activities of a project team, and identifies resources. Projects are complex in nature, sometimes follow a repeatable framework, typically span multiple groups, and require analytical skills in defining scope and objectives. Recommends and takes action to direct the analysis and solutions of problems. Develops detailed work plans, schedules, project estimates, resource plans, and status reports. Conducts project meetings and is responsible for project tracking and analysis. Ensure adherences to quality standards and reviews project deliverables. Manages the integration of vendor tasks and tracks and reviews vendor deliverables. Provides technical and analytical guidance to project team. Recommends and takes action to direct the analysis and solutions of problems. Communicates to client/vendors. Job Contribution: Intermediate level technical professional. Subject matter technical knowledge within a discipline and sound understanding of ATT technologies. Education: Preferred Bachelor of Business/Information Systems/Engineering/Math/Science degree or equivalent experience. PMP Certification desired. Experience: Typically requires 3-5 years experience. Supervisory: No.",Professional Software Delivery Proj Mgmt Job in St Louis,,"St Louis, MO",,http://jobview.monster.com/professional-software-delivery-proj-mgmt-job-st-louis-mo-us-168958231.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,,94b77c8eabdfcdebdab1c6a773e82cf5
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:02:08:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Function: 911 Installation and Maintenance Work Location: Flagstaff, AZPrimary duties:Installation and maintenance of 911 equipment and services.Works with vendors (Intrado, Airbus) and inter-company departments (CPE, Global Markets, 911 billing and alarm center).Works with regulatory agencies, PSAP’s (Public Safety Answering Points ) government offices and sales account teams and inter company departments. Inventorying crash kits.Participates in site surveys, project meetings and technical assistance to the sales team.Trains PSAP agencies to maneuver through their systemsResponsible for 911 PSAP’s provisioning and maintenance technicians that provide provisioning and repair of 911 equipment and software.Responsible for 911 and help with 911 PSAP’s across Arizona.This position requires communication skills and the ability to coordinate essential testing requiring maintenance workThis position is also responsible for performance management, quality and safety and must take ownership of the service results and other performance indicators.Interacts with customers to ensure the highest levels of customer satisfaction and to earn our customers’ continued business and loyalty.Partners with internal (central office, repair & provisioning centers, LRAC etc.) and external (local municipalities, OSHA, etc.) organizations.Interacts with Network managers in successfully responding to and resolving service escalations to meet customer requests and expectationsBasic Job Qualifications:Prefer a minimum of three (3) years of experience installing and maintaining current Cassidian Vesta 911 and or Intrado 911 equipment and systemsPrefer three (3) years of concurrent experience installing and maintaining switches, routers and or phone systems. Working knowledge of LANS is a plus.Minimum of three (3) years experience working on servers and computersPrefer a minimum of two (2) years of experience working in a Telco environment with designed services, POTS or central office installationsPrefer  Cisco Certs  CCNA CCNP or equivalenceWorking knowledge of copper and fiber cable facilities both outside plant and inside cablingBasic electricity knowledge as it relates to telecommunications (through classes or on the job related training) including: reading & interpreting circuit diagrams, equipment drawings, & technical manuals, AC/DC usage and measurements.Working knowledge of test equipment (e.g. Volt-ohm meter, Transmission Measuring) sets or comparable testing equipment.Experience working on a computer in Windows based systems and Microsoft Outlook is a must. Must have knowledge and experience using PC’s Windows associated with telephony equipment. Includes configuring customers’ computer hardware and softwareAbility to perform strenuous physical activities including, but not limited to lifting and/or moving up to 100 pounds.Requires state drivers’ license and current satisfactory driving record.Ability to perceive differences in telecom wire and cable colors. Excellent interpersonal skills required in order to provide efficient, quality service to both internal and external customers both face-to-face and over-the-phone.Ability to work well with others to achieve common goals and to foster a cooperative climate, as well as to work independently in the field with little supervision.Ability to perform job activities outdoors in different weather conditions (e.g., extreme cold and/or heat, inclement weather).Ability to work in confined spaces (e.g., attics and crawl spaces).Willing to  be scheduled on a rotation basis and pager duty will be required. Requires varying tours and hours including possible mandatory overtime and holidays. Must be able to prioritize multiple projects and perform under pressure. Must negotiate timeframes for completion and meet critical deadlines. Must be willing and able to work with other coworkers to complete job assignments.Successful completion and passage of all applicable employment testing and interview.Overnight travel to perform and attend training classes will be required.Preferred Job Qualifications:Experience working in teams or alone problem solving, coordinating testing and troubleshooting customer lines or toll lines.Associated or Baccalaureate degree in telecommunications and electronics is a plusOther Job Requirements:Successful completion and passage of all applicable employment testing and interview.Selected candidate is required to remain in the position for a minimum of 30 months (Time in Title) and 18 months (Time in Location).Alternate Location: US-Arizona-TucsonRequisition #: 59907 Company StatementCenturyLink is an industry-leading provider of communications, high speed Internet and entertainment services from coast to coast.  Our combination of business and residential service solutions – including home and wireless voice solutions and digital television – provide innovative solutions to our customers.  CenturyLink is proud to be a participant in the U.S. General Services Administration Networx program, the largest communications services contract in the world.  CenturyLink offers you the opportunity to develop and cultivate your career as we lead the communications industry into the future.Disclaimer:The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",CUSTOMER DATA TECHNICIAN  Job in Tucson,Full Time Employee,"Tucson, AZ 85716",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-data-technician-1-job-tucson-az-us-168951025.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=14,,,080e593dde8d525471f315ededf1e4af
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:01:43:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"The .NET Web and Developer (Back-End) translates visual and user-centered design specifications and business requirements into functional, standards compliant websites and web applications that generate revenue, increase productivity, or minimize ongoing costs. This individual leverages OOP patterns along with enterprise class technologies to coordinate development of highly scalable web applications. Specific focus will be given to the backend development process and architecture of web applications, and team mentoring. The right candidate will perform all traditional development tasks, mentor other team members, participate in project planning, and help protect corporate assets and intellectual property. An appreciation for and history of collaboration across multiple teams in technology is a must. Bachelor or Associate's degree in computer or technical-related field with courses and training in web design, usability, and development or equivalent experience. Clear and consistent experience participating in planning and leading the development of search engine optimized ecommerce experiences and web applications. Expert understanding of a broad range of development languages and frameworks including but not limited to ASP.NET (Web Forms, MVC), Workflow Foundation, Communication Foundation, ADO.NET, LINQ, MS SQL Server, and web standards (XHTML, CSS, REST, XML, etc.). a strong understanding of source code management technologies (Subversion, Team Foundation Server, etc.) Strong mentorship and leadership skills with respect to junior developers and others across IT Shared Services. Ability to support and migrate legacy technologies (ASP, PHP, VB, etc.) Familiarity with administration of IIS, networking, web farms and load balancing, and web caching technologies. Ability to prioritize tasks and deliver results in a timely manner as an individual and as a technical lead on web projects. Strong organizational skills and dedication to quality. Familiarity with business process management, analytics, sales and marketing a plus.",Backend .NET Developer Job in Juno Beach,Full Time,Location:,Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/backend-net-developer-job-juno-beach-fl-us-168963518.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,68b4225e504ea60b1a7a6b8ed610a970
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:01:41:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Project Manager in Minneapolis, Minnesota (MN). In support of the Imaging / Content Management Portfolio PMO, the individual will be responsible for project management of technical application projects.Duties Include: Responsibility will include the delivery of technical components of business and technology driven initiatives Accountable for the successful delivery and installation of projects primarily in support of the Imaging Portfolio Platform Will manage projects within a matrixed management organization, adhering to company policies and the Technology Project Methodology Will collaborate with business partners and technology teams spanning the organizationREQUIREMENTS: Previous Technology Project Manager experience Imaging / Content Management / Content Viewer Project experience System Conversation / Merger Project experience (preferred) Proven ability to lead a work stream within a large-scale, challenging, ambiguous, enterprise level project IT applications project management experience Strong verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills Ability to work on multiple complex tasks simultaneously Ability to work independently, as well as in team environment Strong financial management skills Intermediate skills in the use of MS SharePoint, MS Project, Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint, and VisioPreferred Skills: Knowledge and experience with PMUWS (Project Management Universal Workstation), STAMP, CREST and Technology Project Methodology",Project Manager Job in Minneapolis,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Minneapolis, MN 55467",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-minneapolis-mn-us-168923496.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),699fdfa6b7e0f2041d53c34365702b12
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:01:28:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Java Developer -Relocation to St. Louis provided! Job in Oklahoma City 73101, Oklahoma US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Senior Java Developer Apply Oklahoma City, OK Full-Time $90,000 - $130,000 Job Details If you are a Senior Java Developer with experience, please read on!Title: Senior Java DeveloperSalary Range: $90K - $130KLocation: Relocation to St. Louis provided!We are a top tier consulting firm with a 30 year proven track record of success and over 1,000 employees in 7 cities nationwide. You will be developing solutions for unpredictable and varied problems for multiple clients across different industries. We want you to be well-rounded in a broad range of languages with the ability to adapt to new clients and learn as you go.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Work with a variety of clients on a wide range of projects- Zero to extreme minimal turnover - our consultants stick around for the long haul- Interesting/challenging workWhat You Will Be Doing- Design, develop and test Java application code- Work with business analysts to understand and implement complex business functionality- Participate in the Agile SLDC- Collaborate with DevOps, Release Engineering and Operations to automate deployments- Meet and exceed enterprise standards for quality and processWhat You Need for this PositionCollege experience and knowledge of:- Java- J2EE- Agile/Scrum- DI frameworks (Spring, CDI, JBoss, Tomcat)- Hibernate Configuration (Connection, Dialect, Mappings)- SOA implementations (SOAP, REST, JMS, JAX/RS, JAX/WS)- Test-Driven Development practicesWhat's In It for You- Relocation to Saint Louis, MO- Extremely comprehensive benefits package- Competitive salary commensurate of experienceSo, if you are a Senior Java Developer with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Emma Goulden is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: EG1-1296665 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Emma.Goulden@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: EG1-1296665 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Emma Goulden | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",Senior Java Developer,,"Senior Java Developer -Relocation to St. Louis provided! Job in Oklahoma City 73101, Oklahoma US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Senior Java Developer Apply Oklahoma City, OK Full-Time $90,000 - $130,000 Job Details If you are a Senior Java Developer with experience, please read on!Title: Senior Java DeveloperSalary Range: $90K - $130KLocation: Relocation to St. Louis provided!We are a top tier consulting firm with a 30 year proven track record of success and over 1,000 employees in 7 cities nationwide. You will be developing solutions for unpredictable and varied problems for multiple clients across different industries. We want you to be well-rounded in a broad range of languages with the ability to adapt to new clients and learn as you go.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Work with a variety of clients on a wide range of projects- Zero to extreme minimal turnover - our consultants stick around for the long haul- Interesting/challenging workWhat You Will Be Doing- Design, develop and test Java application code- Work with business analysts to understand and implement complex business functionality- Participate in the Agile SLDC- Collaborate with DevOps, Release Engineering and Operations to automate deployments- Meet and exceed enterprise standards for quality and processWhat You Need for this PositionCollege experience and knowledge of:- Java- J2EE- Agile/Scrum- DI frameworks (Spring, CDI, JBoss, Tomcat)- Hibernate Configuration (Connection, Dialect, Mappings)- SOA implementations (SOAP, REST, JMS, JAX/RS, JAX/WS)- Test-Driven Development practicesWhat's In It for You- Relocation to Saint Louis, MO- Extremely comprehensive benefits package- Competitive salary commensurate of experienceSo, if you are a Senior Java Developer with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Emma Goulden is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: EG1-1296665 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Emma.Goulden@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: EG1-1296665 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Emma Goulden | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-java-developer-relocation-to-st-louis-provided!-job-oklahoma-city-ok-us-169024456.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,,67da301879d332bf7ba9ccc297c14727
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:01:24:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Service Desk Position - Bilingual Candidate Job #:  664499Apex Systems, the 2nd largest IT staffing company in the nation is seeking a Service Desk Analyst for a leading Client of ours in West Whiteland, PA. The ideal bilingual candidate will have experience in providing technical leadership to a large network of employees and business.For immediate consideration please, send your most updated Word resume to Technical Recruiter, Jayme Richards, at jmrichards@apexsystemsinc.com or call 215-591-9065.   JOB PURPOSETo provide a single point of contact / level one support for all user incidents and service requests.  The role will be responsible for ensuring a disciplined, systematic, yet empathtic approach is delivered for incident and service request resolution.PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTABILITIESActively identify, assess, record, resolve or escalate incidents and service requests ensuring they are handled within an agreed time limit, within agreed processes and in a professional and customer sensitive manner.Provide support and advice on IT related issues, ensuring the best use of IT systems, influencing changes to working practices where a need is identified.Offering advice to end users on all areas of IT, troubleshooting issues and ensuring trust and confidence in BIS is maintained.Ensure standards are met – this includes working as part of a team, sharing knowledge and working together to increase performance standards.To ensure effective communication within BIS teams and the business through the systematic execution of incident and service request processes – this includes making timely announcements to the business on systems availability and maintenance windowsTo actively promote and market BIS, including assisting with quality assurance and customer satisfaction surveys.To improve user confidence in the use of IT, being empathetic to a variety of new and experienced learners needs.Where necessary, act as the Major Incident Manager or “Controlling Mind” to restore a critical service to normal operationTo carry out any other duties which are within the employee’s skills and abilities whenever reasonably instructed.Ensure that at all times company Policies, Standards and Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) are adhered to.As a member of the global BIS community you will be a champion of the function’s values and culture, while demonstrating and openly encouraging the behaviours expected from a professional, best in-class IT team.SCOPE Level 1 support, third parties and partnersThe role will be regional, with the function acting as the face of ITDelegated authority to act as the Major Incident Manager SPECIAL FACTORSGroup BIS consists of geographically dispersed teams and therefore all roles include working with remote and cross-cultural teams.The working environment is fast paced and there will be a requirement to deal with multiple enquiries at any one time.The role will need to serve Spanish and the Latin America markets.           EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More",Service Desk Position - Bilingual Candidate Job in Wayne,Full Time Employee,"Wayne, PA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/service-desk-position-bilingual-candidate-job-wayne-pa-us-168902720.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),18a400ac472f1965216da1ba347a1c6d
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:01:23:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Technical Systems Integrator. Seeking an Enterprise Architect with Connected Vehicle experience working within a multi-vendor environment. Will work in Atlanta, GA for the first few months and then Auburn Hills, MI. Contract-to-hire preferred however will consider contract. This job will have the following responsibilities:Enterprise Architect with Connected car experience Establish an umbrella reporting relationship among all parties setting expectations that all project vendors and service providers are responsible for and must work together to achieve the final client deliverables. Assure the completeness and clarity of the technical requirements and design of the solution including necessary corner case coverage, stability and customer based feature performance. Ensure that a comprehensive testing plan clearly defines test scenarios, acceptance criteria, and acceptable defect levels. Ensure that a comprehensive operational readiness and cutover plan is in place. Ensure solution adherence to well defined, comprehensive and measurable SLAs. Lead cross-functional issue/defect root cause analysis and integration workshops to ensure timely and accurate resolution and solution readiness. Document, track, review and implement program best practices. Keep management and/or stakeholders informed of pertinent project risks and escalations.Qualifications & Requirements:Vehicle Connectivity Architecture development and deployment REQUIREDRequirements gathering and specification development Connectivity platform design Connectivity platform validation Connected feature deployment and operationsSkillsLeadership Connected vehicle enterprise architecture design Supplier Management Root Cause Analysis FMEA When and how to escalate effectively ",Technical Systems Integrator Job in Auburn Hills,"Full Time, Employee","Auburn Hills, MI",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-systems-integrator-job-auburn-hills-mi-us-169020553.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,c2969f48f456daafcade7f9e89d64655
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:01:22:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cognizant’s Analytics and Information Management Practice (AIM) is seeking a Senior Analytics Lead to join its growing organization. We are currently looking for someone in Dallas, TX. Candidates must be local or willing to relocate to this location.   Our Analytics and Information Management Practice creates solutions that cover the entire lifecycle of information utilization, from ideation through implementation. At the outset, we offer consulting and development services to help our clients define their strategy and solution architecture. Then our teams deliver and manage data warehousing, business analytics and reporting applications that provide tangible business benefits.   The Senior Analytics Lead will be responsible for sales and delivery of analytics and digital solutions and services within the retail and consumer goods industry. This position will serve as a key driver in the growth and development of the practice. He/she will maintain deal focused relationships to scope, solution, propose, close, and deliver data and analytics projectsKey Responsibilities: • Responsible for advanced analytics business in specific account(s) • Perform pre-sales consulting and business development in the space of advanced analytics • Manage senior level client relationships on the advanced analytics • Work with business stakeholders to translate business problems into advanced analytics problem statements • Define data and analytics requirements to support business priorities • Define and oversee development of advanced statistical models • Own and drive advanced analytics project delivery • Ability to take business context and strategy married with current state of analytics and derive future state analytics and the requirements necessary to achieve client’s strategic business objectives • Ability to leverage internal and client resources as well as knowledge of market, competitors, and industry to assess implications for clients’ business strategy, identify potential business, analytics, and data challenges, frame potential solutions, and drive these solutions in the overall business and analytics strategy processBasic Qualifications • 10+ years of overall IT experience • 10+ years business intelligence and analytics experience • 10+ years of experience in management consulting, analytical consulting, business process consulting or equivalent • 5+ years of overall retail or consumer goods industry experience • Proven experience with various data and statistical analysis tools such as SAS/SPSS/R • Experience with visualization tools such as Tableau • Experience building long term data and analytics strategic plans that support overall corporate and departmental business objectives and future visionPreferred Skills • Thought leadership in the areas of data, data structure, analytics, and strategic consulting • Strong communication, presentation and writing skills with emphasis on demonstrated ability to translate complex concepts between business and technical resources • Strong analytical skills and intellectual curiosity • Strong ability to take business issues and transform them into analytics requirements Strong interpersonal and teamwork skills • Innovative thinker that can paint a vision of the possible for colleagues as well as clients and then drive the implementation of that vision through effective project planning and execution • Multi-industry experience is highly valued in this role   About Cognizant Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centers worldwide and approximately 233,000 employees as of March 31, 2016, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on Twitter: USJobsCognizant.",Senior Analytics Lead - Dallas Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75205",All,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-analytics-lead-dallas-job-dallas-tx-us-168973161.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=9,,IT/Software Development,92cb51ab801192d3841f70ee81ae4aef
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:00:22:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Senior PeopleSoft Developer Location: WDC Duration: 10 months+ Our large transit client is seeking seasoned a seasoned PeopleSoft Functional Analyst to support a PeopleSoft Funds effort: Serve as a Functional Analyst on the PeopleSoft Funds Management Automation Project Team by tracking a project plan, overseeing project resources, and working with the system owner to address Project Costing data integrity issues within the prescribed timeline. Minimum Job Requirements: Report to work on July 1, 2016 to support a five day a week work schedule if living in the Washington, D.C. area or a ten hour, four day work week (in by 10am on Monday morning out after 4PM on Thursdays) if fifty miles outside the cityTransit (bus, rail) experience a must to provide the functional expertise unique to most transit organizations Last assignment must be directly involved with the Project Costing module for an implementation, upgrade, or production support. 10+ years with PeopleSoft Financials; experience must include version 9.1 Capable of writing complex SQL scripts to resolve data issues Capable of configuring Project Costing module independently to align with the clients business processes Functional experience with Draw Downs associated with Federal Grants Project Costing implementation and/or production support experience with at least three separate companies that includes experience with multi-year capital budgets Sound understanding of the Project Costing table structures in version 9.1 Sound understanding of Funds Distribution process Sound understanding of PC Pricing processExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Expert PeopleSoft Functional Analyst Job in Washington,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Title: Senior PeopleSoft Developer Location: WDC Duration: 10 months+ Our large transit client is seeking seasoned a seasoned PeopleSoft Functional Analyst to support a PeopleSoft Funds effort: Serve as a Functional Analyst on the PeopleSoft Funds Management Automation Project Team by tracking a project plan, overseeing project resources, and working with the system owner to address Project Costing data integrity issues within the prescribed timeline. Minimum Job Requirements: Report to work on July 1, 2016 to support a five day a week work schedule if living in the Washington, D.C. area or a ten hour, four day work week (in by 10am on Monday morning out after 4PM on Thursdays) if fifty miles outside the cityTransit (bus, rail) experience a must to provide the functional expertise unique to most transit organizations Last assignment must be directly involved with the Project Costing module for an implementation, upgrade, or production support. 10+ years with PeopleSoft Financials; experience must include version 9.1 Capable of writing complex SQL scripts to resolve data issues Capable of configuring Project Costing module independently to align with the clients business processes Functional experience with Draw Downs associated with Federal Grants Project Costing implementation and/or production support experience with at least three separate companies that includes experience with multi-year capital budgets Sound understanding of the Project Costing table structures in version 9.1 Sound understanding of Funds Distribution process Sound understanding of PC Pricing processExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Washington, DC 20001",http://jobview.monster.com/expert-peoplesoft-functional-analyst-job-washington-dc-us-169017335.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,f51dc10e67f06f9c7d4ce8e6712a202e
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:00:20:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More IT - Systems Analysis Consultant - Senior Job #:  670689IT Database Analyst/Developer7 month contractWhat Project/Projects will the candidate be working on while on assignment? MA HIX - RRVIs this person a sole contributor or part of a team? Part of a teamIf so, please describe the team? (Name of team, size of team, etc.)MA HIX M&O; 35What are the top 5-10 responsibilities for this position? (Please be detailed as to what the candidate is expected to do or complete on a daily basis)- Database/SQL analysis, Database tuning, SQLperformance tuning, writing data base scripts to do data corrections, custom Java development- Work on planning and execution of change, problem, incidents, and service requests.- Provide fixes for application errors reported- Escalate unresolved issues to proper personnel- Analyze and drive root cause analysis- Maintain technical support documentation- Perform implementation, maintenance, remediation, and troubleshooting services for applications.- Meet contract SLAs for problems & incidents.- Some DBA activities.What software tools/skills are needed to perform these daily responsibilities?- 8 Years of IT experience,- 6 years of Strong Database performance tuning experience,- Oracle DB expertise- SQL - expertise- Java/J2ee - exposure- ITIL - exposure- JIRA - exposure- Monitoring tools - intermediate-Unix - intermediateWhat skills/attributes are a must have?- Database/SQL analysis and tuning skills- Excellent problem solving and analytical skills- Ability to troubleshoot complex issues- Excellent written and verbal communication skills- Good organization and communication skills. Strong aptitude for attention to details.- Exposure to ITIL framework, industry delivery and support standards and processes, knowledge management systems, and ITSM toolsWhere is the work to be performed?Eden Prairie, MN with some travel to MA.What are the work hours? (ex. 9am-5pm, day/night shifts, rotating shifts, etc)9am-5pm and after hour support for urgent issuesWhat type of interview process is preferred? (Face to face, phone, Skype, or a combination of the three)Face to face/Skype       EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More",IT - Systems Analysis Consultant - Senior Job in Eden Prairie,Full Time Employee,"Eden Prairie, MN",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/it-systems-analysis-consultant-senior-job-eden-prairie-mn-us-168998345.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),728913e69551e7deca9b70e04779e531
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:24:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRN LVN (Weekends as PPV)North Houston, TX 77380Job #: prnLPNHHhousTX054276a A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a Home Health Licensed Vocational Nurse (LVN) to provide services in the North Houston, TX area. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on health, wellness and prevention for all our patients.Your responsibilities: * Medication administration for the department * May be required to supervise other staff positions * Provide general consultation regarding health-related concerns within the community * Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management * Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans * Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed * Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations * Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications:* Current practical nursing licensure within the state of practice required* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus * At least two years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Vocational Nurse LVN Job in Houston,Part Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77380",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Vocational-Nurse-LVN-Job-Houston-TX-US-166660440.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,1699513ae0265bd23888e97058d6268d
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:24:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:-Client is seeking an ECMS Modeler and DeveloperQualifications:-Will be writing and re-writing very extensive modeling code on the production platform. -Must also be able to program in SQL and have knowledge of standard ETL processes. -Must have very extensive knowledge and experience developing in a SAS environment.-In particular, expert knowledge of BASE SAS, SAS EBI, SAS Meta Data Server, and SAS DI Studio.-Must have very extensive knowledge and experience developing in a SAS environment. In particular, expert knowledge of BASE SAS, SAS EBI, SAS Meta Data Server, and SAS DI Studio,",ECMS Modeler and Developer Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Columbus, OH",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/ECMS-Modeler-Developer-Job-Columbus-OH-US-166751609.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,e8cc114ae3ddb88036e3fc6752be3159
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:23:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"FT / LVN- LPN / Dispensing Nurse needed at our Hayward, CA Clinic Education:  LPN / LVNRequirement:  Must be licensed in the State of California Blood Draw Certification preferred, but not mandatory  ·        Must be able to draw blood samples, if certified·        Using an automated dispensing system, administers methadone to patients accurately and timely as directed by doctor’s orders and policies and procedures.·        Produce and maintain appropriate records and reports as required by Company protocol and Federal and State Regulations.·        Ensure compliance with security standards for the distribution and storage of controlled substances as set forth in the Code of Federal regulations.·        Handle and dispense methadone in accordance with State, Federal and DEA regulations.·        Excellent documentation and computer skills required.  Experience in substance abuse a plus.  MedMark Services, Inc. is committed to Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and to compliance with all Federal, State and local laws that prohibit employment discrimination on the basis of race, color, age, natural origin, ethnicity, religion, gender, pregnancy, marital status, sexual orientation, citizenship, genetic disposition, disability or veteran’s status or any other classification protected by State/Federal laws. ",Dispensing Nurse-Hayward,Full Time Employee,"Hayward, CA 94544",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Dispensing-Nurse-Hayward-Ca-Job-Hayward-CA-US-166088635.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,7f25cff8e980926c56fd3a97a00b1763
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:23:54,No,jobs.monster.com,Works with physicians and multidisciplinary team members to develop a plan of care for each assigned patient from admission through discharge. Ensures patient is progressing towards desired outcomes by continuously monitoring patient care through assessments and/or evaluations. Assesses and responds to patient/family needs by coordinating efforts of other team members. Identifies and resolves barriers that hinder effective patient care.Experience: 5+ years. Education: Minimum of an Associate's Degree and Registered Nurse license required.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled,RN Case Manager-Case Management- PT-Day/Weekend-San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78229",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Case-Manager-Case-Management-PT-Day-Weekend-San-Antonio-TX-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166627369.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,66684891fa18c93d829748b63e682b92
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:20:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"About CapgeminiWith more than 180,000 people in over 40 countries, Capgemini is one of the world's foremost providers of consulting, technology and outsourcing services. The Group reported 2015 global revenues of EUR 11.9 billion. Together with its clients, Capgemini creates and delivers business and technology solutions that fit their needs, enabling them to achieve innovation and competitiveness. A deeply multicultural organization, Capgemini has developed its own way of working, the Collaborative Business ExperienceTM, and draws on Rightshore�, its worldwide delivery model. Learn more about us at www.capgemini.com Rightshore® is a trademark belonging to Capgemini     Capgemini is an Equal Opportunity Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.       This is a general description of the Duties, Responsibilities and Qualifications required for this position. Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed. Whenever necessary to provide individuals with disabilities an equal employment opportunity, Capgemini will consider reasonable accommodations that might involve varying job requirements and/or changing the way this job is performed, provided that such accommodations do not pose an undue hardship.     Capgemini's robust Outsourcing offerings include: Applications Management, Infrastructure Management and Business Process Management. We combine these services with our deep industry knowledge and experience to provide the change agent to accelerate business growth. We generate quality and speed through our proven tools, methods and global centers. These capabilities, coupled with our program management expertise are tailored to fit the most challenging business needs.   With their expertise in a specific technology environment, Applications Consultants are responsible for software-specific design and realization, as well as testing, deployment and release management, or technical and functional application management of client-specific package based solutions (e.g. SAP, ORACLE). These roles also require functional and methodological capabilities in testing and training. You focus on building solutions and on maintaining, optimizing and improving a client’s applications and systems. You contribute to a business and technical blueprint and customize the respective Software Package Core Module. You may also be responsible for unit testing, contribute to integration testing, and/or be responsible for the design and delivery of end-user training. Certification: Has or seeking SE Level 1.   Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law This role is for onshore Application Support Lead for the JDE Applications. Technical skills needed: 6+ years experience in JDE 9.0.2. Accounts Payable, Invoicing, General Ledger module, E1 9.0.2 ERP, Tax Calculation. Additional tech skills needed: OS/400, DB2 7.x or earlier, C++, Visual Studio 10, Websphere 8.5.5. Excellent verbal and written communication skills required. Provide leadership to the onshore and offshore JDE team and serve as the key client contact for JDE level 2/3 application support.       70%  JDE 9.0.2 application support level 2/3.   30 %  Management and oversigt of JDE team.   Specialized/ Practical Knowledge JDE 9.0.2.   Management Skill The resource would manage the client interactions and help oversee the Offshore team in India for the JDE application.   Interaction Interactions with client employees and Capgemini India Team.   Complexity/Problem Solving A high level of problem solving is required as the JDE applications can be very complex.   Accountability Resource would be responsible to ensure Capgemini meets it's SLA's and provides a high level of client satisfaction and service.   Additional Information:",Applications Consultant - LEAD - JD Edwards ..,Full Time,"Lees Summit, MO 64086",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Applications-Consultant-2-LEAD-JD-Edwards-9-0-2-ERP-TAX-Inver-Grove-Heights-MN-Job-Lees-Summit-MO-US-166618207.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=3,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),46237b42d8998c6165ce9d55c53dca81
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:17:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"MEDUSTRIAL HEALTHCARE STAFFING SERVICE (GREER LOCATION) ARE SEARCHING FOR LPN'S,  ACROSS THE UPSTATE FOR FULL TIME, PART TIME, AND PRN POSITIONS.WEEK DAY SHIFTS AVAILABLE (MON-FRI): DAYS, EVENINGS, OVERNIGHTSWEEKEND SHIFTS AVAILABLE (SAT-SUN): DAYS, EVENINGS, OVERNIGHTS Positions are available for hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, nursing homes, assisted living, correctional facilities, sitters, and others.Flexible hours available (you tell us the days/hours YOU can work each week) Pay is determined by position and by experience. Referral Bonus program available. Background and drug testing required. All required medical (PPD, flu vac, etc) Proof of license or certification required. CPR/BLS required. Please submit your resume to bwhite@condustrial.com Job Purpose:Serves patients by providing educational information; helping with daily living; monitoring vital signs and functions; administering medications.Duties: * Educates patients and their families by assisting in preoperative, postoperative, and relevant health teaching. * Administers medications by preparing medications; administering specified medication orally or by subcutaneous or intermuscular injection; recording dosage and time in patient record; maintaining logs. * Provides ancillary medical care by dressing wounds; giving enemas, douches, alcohol rubs, and massages; applying compresses, ice bags, and hot water bottles. * Maintains patient stability by taking and recording vital signs. * Maintains patient nutrition by examining food trays for prescribed diet; feeding patients; recording food and fluid intake and output. * Helps patients with daily living by bathing, dressing, and assisting patients in walking and turning. * Keeps nursing supervisors informed by observing patients and reporting adverse reactions to medication or treatment. * Maintains equipment and supplies by keeping catheters, tracheotomy tubes, and oxygen supplies available. * Performs routine laboratory tests by collecting samples, such as urine, blood, and sputum. * Prepares cadavers for motuary by washing and dressing deceased persons. * Serves and protects the hospital community by adhering to professional standards, hospital policies and procedures, federal, state, and local requirements, and jcaho standards. * Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations. * Enhances nursing and hospital reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.Skills/Qualifications:Administering Medication, Pain Management, Nutrition, Informing Others, Hospital Environment, Bedside Manner, Nursing Skills, Listening, Multi-tasking, Medical Teamwork, Acute/Critical Care",Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) Job in Greer,Full Time Employee,"Greer, SC 29650",Healthcare ServicesStaffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-LPN-Job-Greer-SC-US-166749034.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=8,20.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,Medical/Health,2622d39cc2146318adc2c0005b8e5274
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:15:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an Army National Guard Cryptologic Linguist, you learn to interpret the words, intent and tenor of foreign communications. In this role, you will perform or supervise the detection, acquisition, geolocation, identification, and exploitation of foreign communications using specialized signals equipment. Specific duties of the Cryptologic Linguist may include: identification of foreign communications; categorizing signals by activity type; foreign communication analysis; recognizing changes in transmission modes and reporting the change; providing translation expertise to analysts; supporting Signals Intelligence tasking, reporting, and coordination; and providing transcriptions or translations of foreign communications. By joining the Army National Guard, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career. The skills you learn as a Cryptologic Linguist will help prepare you for a future with government agencies, embassies, universities, and companies that conduct business overseas as a civilian translator or interpreter. There is also potential for you to pursue a career as a government service executive. You'd be involved in determining and formulating policies, providing overall direction of federal, state, local, or international government activities, as well as planning, directing, and coordinating operational activities at higher management levels. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for a Cryptologic Linguist requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and three to 80 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field. Soldiers who don't possess foreign language fluency will attend foreign language training at the Defense Language Institute for six to 18 months prior to attending Advanced Individual Training. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Cryptologic Linguist Job in Indianapolis  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Indianapolis 46241,,http://jobview.monster.com/Cryptologic-Linguist-Job-INDIANAPOLIS-166726854.aspx?mescoid=5501110001001&jobPosition=6,,Telecommunications Administration/Management,36ff85fa14eddccd67b0ae6c3ad6a47e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:14:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Physical Therapist Per diem\PRN or part time Milwaukee, WIUSA Company: Wheaton Franciscan Healthcare SE WiscLocation: Varies Between Wheaton Acute Care SitesFTE: .001Shift: 1stShift Start Time: variableShift End Time: variableProvides ongoing teaching/education to patients, family and the health care team to optimize the understanding and achievement of the patient's full potential. Understands and complies with the Practice Standards from the PT Professional Organization.Positions available in a variety of settings -- inpatient, rehab, subacute, and/or outpatient. Opportunities available at multiple Wheaton Franciscan facilities. Flexibility in scheduling available -- part-time, weekends, pool/PRN. Pick your schedule, pick your location(s), pick your level(s) of care....give us a call to discuss how a Physical Therapy position with Wheaton Franciscan Healthcare fits into your life. Skills/Requirements: Wisconsin Physical Therapy License required. PT experience preferred. BLS from AHA required. #TrackingJobBody br{line-height:2px;}",Physical Therapist Per diem\PRN or part time Job in Milwaukee,"Full Time , Employee","Physical Therapist Per diem\PRN or part time Milwaukee, WIUSA Company: Wheaton Franciscan Healthcare SE WiscLocation: Varies Between Wheaton Acute Care SitesFTE: .001Shift: 1stShift Start Time: variableShift End Time: variableProvides ongoing teaching/education to patients, family and the health care team to optimize the understanding and achievement of the patient's full potential. Understands and complies with the Practice Standards from the PT Professional Organization.Positions available in a variety of settings -- inpatient, rehab, subacute, and/or outpatient. Opportunities available at multiple Wheaton Franciscan facilities. Flexibility in scheduling available -- part-time, weekends, pool/PRN. Pick your schedule, pick your location(s), pick your level(s) of care....give us a call to discuss how a Physical Therapy position with Wheaton Franciscan Healthcare fits into your life. Skills/Requirements: Wisconsin Physical Therapy License required. PT experience preferred. BLS from AHA required. #TrackingJobBody br{line-height:2px;}",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Physical-Therapist-Per-diem-PRN-or-part-time-Job-Milwaukee-WI-US-166700851.aspx?mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ce4b8de3cd443a589aeae41117a51cd5
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:08:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"? ??Medical Diagnostic Laboratories (MDL) is a CLIA certified clinical laboratory with multiple state licensing, specializing in state of the art, automated DNA based molecular analysis of a variety of chronic and infectious illnesses. MDL specializes and performs Polymerase Chain Reaction (PCR) with a larger menu of testing available in the field of infectious disease. Our main theme of research is in the field of Gynecology, Infectious Diseases, Infectious Arthritis, Tick-borne Diseases, Mycology, and Chronic Fatigue Syndrome (CFS). MDL is currently expanding and is looking for Full-Time reliable 3rd Shift (overnight) Laboratory Technicians in our Hamilton, NJ facility. ?Requirements: Clinical Laboratory Technician: - Perform Real-Time method PCR - Properly load and start Rotor-Gene machines-?Perform Real-Time method PCR -?Perform analysis on completed Real-Time PCRs-?Perform conventional method PCR-?Properly load and start Thermocycler machines-?Remove completed PCR and place away to be gelled?Requirements:?-?Bachelor's Degree in Medical Technology, Biology, Microbiology or related Science field REQUIRED?-?Experience or familiarity with the PCR method, Molecular Biology, Bacteriology or Virology a plus?? We Offer:?-?Competitive Salary?-?Medical, Dental & Vision Insurance?-?Short and Long Term Disability?-?Life Insurance?-?Dependent Care Flex Spending Account?-?Voluntary Policies (Accident, Hospital Indemnity, Critical Illness & Supplemental STD)-?Legal Plan & Identity Theft Protection-?401(k) Plan - Paid Vacation & Holiday-?Business Casual Environment?-?Credit UnionVisit us at http://www.mdlab.com .Medical Diagnostic Laboratories, LLC is an equal opportunity employer. Apply Now! $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",rd Shift Laboratory Technician Job in Hamilton,,"Hamilton, NJ 08690",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/3rd-Shift-Laboratory-Technician-Job-Hamilton-NJ-US-166163715.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=3,,Biotech/R&D/Science,125ca1e490efe336a525994b85f1a9cc
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:00:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Registered Nurse, you will:Provide admission, case management, and follow-up skilled nursing visits for home health patients.Administer on-going care and case management for each patient, provide necessary follow-up as directed by the Clinical Manager.Confer with physician in developing the initial plan of treatment based on physician's orders and initial patient assessment.  Provide hands-on care, management and evaluation of the care plan and teaching of the patient in accordance with physician orders, under Clinical Manager's supervision.  Revise plan in consultation with physician based on ongoing assessments and as required by policy/regulation.Coordinate appropriate care, encompassing various healthcare personnel (such as Physical Therapists, Occupational Therapists, Home Health Aides and external providers).Report patient care/condition/progress to patient's physician and Clinical Manager on a continuous basis. Implement patient care plan in conjunction with patient and family to assist them in achieving optimal resolution of needs/problems. Coordinate/oversee/supervise the work of Home Health Aides, Certified Home Health Aides and Personal Care Workers and provides written personal care instructions/care plan that reflect current plan of care.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Discharge patients after consultation with the physician and Clinical Manager, preparing and completing needed clinical documentation.Prepare appropriate medical documentation on all patients, including any case conferences, patient contacts, medication order changes, re-certifications, progress updates, and care plan changes.  Prepare visit/shift reports, updates/summarizes patient records, and confers with other health care disciplines in providing optimum patient care.Required SkillsQualificationsDiploma, Associate or Bachelor Degree in NursingMinimum of one year nursing experience preferredStrong med surg, ICU, ER, acute experienceHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Required ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.  To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVAJob LocationFt Myers, Florida, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Per Diem Home Health Registered Nurse-KAH Job in Ft Myers,,"Ft Myers, FL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Per-Diem-Home-Health-Registered-Nurse-KAH-Job-Ft-Myers-FL-US-166746296.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=11,,,b4410ad3aa9bfc649c1e490366f23f41
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:00:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"The importance of efficient and qualified administrative personnel in the medical field can't be overstated because accurate information is crucial for planning and managing hospital operations. This means that you make it possible for patients to receive the proper care.As a Patient Administration Specialist, you will make sure that hospital and patient information is recorded, stored, and delivered in order to keep everything running smoothly. Your responsibilities will include scheduling office visits and keeping patient records up to date at Army hospitals or other medical facilities.Health care is one of the most wide open and promising career fields available today. Use your Patient Administration Specialist experience to prepare for jobs in civilian hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, or rehabilitation centers. You may even qualify for related careers with insurance carriers, public health departments, or Government agencies.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for Patient Administration Specialists consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and seven weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Patient Administration Specialist Job in Watervliet  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Watervliet 12189,,http://jobview.monster.com/Patient-Administration-Specialist-Job-WATERVLIET-166735026.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=12,,General/Other: Medical/Health,f2cca226dcfae2af5ee1091d56b67f0f
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:37:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years. Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care. Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures. Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department.Job Requirements Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. Current Texas State RN license. CPR (American Heart Association) ACLS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. PALS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. One-year experience in surgical services nursing preferred Able to assess, plan, implement and evaluate nursing care.",Registered Nurse - Recovery Room Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Recovery-Room-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166644176.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,e32f7936392d35d19c3632ce90796b14
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:37:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"IT Technician (Part Time), Visual Basic, MySQL, Hardware/Software - Akron, OH - JOB 16-02715 Salary Range: $13.75 per hour, Part Time Contract (20 hours weekly)Only U.S. Citizens or persons with a Green Card work permit may apply. A custom programming, software developer & business management firm servicing the outdoor power equipment, agricultural, power sports and marine industry is seeking a part time IT Technician to provide technical support clientele.  Part Time Hours = approximately 20 hours a week.  This position requires strong communication skills. REQUIREMENTSAssociates degree or Technical College or Self-Taught2 years or more experience with Visual Basic, Hardware & Software Knowledge (Networking, Routers, Switches, Drivers, etc...)MySQL, .NET, C#, C++ is a plusSeeking a junior level IT Technician with good communication skills and proficiency with Visual Basic.  Other desired experience is MySQL, .NET, C#, C++Only U.S. Citizens or persons with a Green Card work permit may apply.Candidates are required to pass a Criminal Background Check and a 10 Panel Drug Screen. Salary Range: $13.75 per hour Part Time Contract (20 hours weekly) Due to the large amount of resumes we expect to receive only the most qualified candidates will be contacted. We will retain all other resumes for any future job considerations. Integrity Technical Services, Inc.14 Whitehall Drive Suite 102Akron, Ohio 44278Toll Free: 1-888-262-3226Akron: 330-633-6500 Cleveland: 440-257-3232Website: www.integrityjobs.com (To view all of our open positions please visit our website) Integrity Technical Services, Inc. does not charge a fee for finding anyone a job. Integrity Technical Services is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",IT Technician Job in Akron,Full Time,"Akron, OH 44311",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Technician-Job-Akron-OH-US-166236107.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=18,13.75 - 13.75 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),f9e7ba4ec5bf9752ad1a53ae3279f3da
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:36:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking to advance your nursing career at a Skilled Nursing Facility?  If so, your job search stops here at Forest Ridge Health & Rehabilitation center.  We provide a center that makes a difference in the lives of our residents, embraces the skills of our staff and allows for growth in their careers.  Outside of providing the support and resources needed to do a job well, we additionally offer ongoing training and continuing education assistance to our nurses. Through doing all of this we have seen staff longevity and success in meeting our center goals. So if you thrive on providing leadership and guidance and want to grow your skill set, APPLY TODAY AT FOREST RIDGE HEALTH & REHABILITATION. http://forestridgeskillednursing.com/ In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for FT Licensed Nurses and all non-union positionsPAY BY EXPERIENCEMedical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/monthOver 1 week vacation (eligible after only 90 days) PLUS 1 week of sick timeEducational Assistance up to $2,500/yr401 (k) Retirement Program, ST and LT Disability as well as FREE Life InsuranceNew attendance program where you can earn up to 4 ADDITIONAL DAYS OFFAt our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.At our center, you will be able to grow your career. At our center, we provide support and resources. At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans.POSITION SUMMARY: Under the supervision of the Unit Manager / DON, a RN assumes responsibility and accountability for a group of residents/patients for a shift of duty.  Nursing care is provided through assessment, implementations, and evaluation of the plan of care.  The RN adheres to the standards of care for the area, manages the environment to maintain resident/patient safety, and supervises the resident/patient care activity performance by nursing assistants and helpers.  Follows all Center’s policies and procedures.  Performs duties as defined by the State Nurse Practice Act.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: Oversees assigned nursing staff   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.    Makes frequent rounds to note resident/patient conditions and to ensure nursing personnel are performing their work assignments in accordance with acceptable nursing standards.2.    Gives/receives the nursing report upon reporting in and ending shift duty hours.3.    *Ensures assigned work area (i.e. nurse station, med. Cart, medication room, etc.), resident/patient care rooms and treatment areas are maintained in a clean and sanitary manner.  Monitors supplies and orders as needed.4.    *Attends regularly conducted staff meetings as scheduled by the Director of Nursing/Unit Manager and participates regularly in continuing education in-service programs.5.    *Handles on-call responsibilities as required.6.    Provides the following nursing functions:·         *Responsible for resident/patient care during his/her respective shift.·         *Provides required patient assessments and interventions.·         Reviews care plans, at least daily, to ensure appropriate care.·         Appraises the DON / Unit Manager of resident /patient status changes in condition.·         *Takes and records blood pressure and vital signs.·         *Administers catheter care as required (may include catheter insertion).·         *Provides respiratory care, e.g. oxygen, nebulizer treatments.·         *Assists the physician in therapeutic measures, as needed.·         Participates in care plan development and attends resident/patient care conferences.·         Helps determine policies for improvement of care.·         Receives and transcribes physician’s orders to resident’s/patient’s charts, Kardex/Care Plan A, Medication Administration Record (“MAR”), treatment/care plans, as required.·         *Prepares and administers medications and performs treatments as ordered by the physician.·         Charts nurses notes in an informative and descriptive manner that reflects the care provided as well as the resident’s/patient’s response to the care.·         Documents all pertinent data as required by Medicare, Medicaid, Center standards and policies.·         Completes the required forms upon admission, transfer, and/or discharge.·         Informs physician of resident/patient change of condition.7.    *Counts all controlled drugs with other nurse at shift change and notifies the DON / Unit Manager of all drug and narcotic discrepancies noted on your shift.8.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart locked according to regulations.  Responsible for security of keys. 9.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart clean and orderly.10.  Conducts weekly shift meetings with nursing assistants.11.  Participates in the Interdisciplinary Plan of Care (“IPOC”) process as assigned.12.  *Complies with laws and regulations applicable to position and acts in accordance with Center’s Corporate Compliance Program.13.  Treats all residents, visitors, and staff with courtesy.14.  *Attends and participates in in-service classes, performance improvement (“PI”) committees, and other meetings as assigned.15.  Follow facility dress and hygiene policies.16.  Safety·         Knows and follows facility rules.·         Demonstrates proper use of equipment.  Reports equipment needs or repairs.·         Follows facility smoking policies.·         Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents, staff or visitors to the appropriate facility personnel.·         Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment to Supervisor.·         *Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents, as assigned in Facility Disaster Plan.·         Uses required protective equipment.·         Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.17.  Resident Rights·         Knows Resident Rights.  Help the residents/patients exercise and/or protect their rights.·         Reports resident/patient complaints to management.·         Maintains confidentiality of resident/patient information.18.  HIPAA·         Follows and adheres to Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.·         Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks (applies only if position requires access to PHI under Role Based Access Grid).·         Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Facility Privacy Designee. Other Duties: •             Participates in all-hands dining.•             *Performs other duties as directed by facility management.•             Participates in marketing events.•             Works overtime, holiday and weekend hours as scheduled. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Possesses a current license to practice in the State as an RN. Experience: One year of experience preferred. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Ability to manage and supervise nursing staff. Ability to make independent decisions. Ability to read, write, speak and understand English. Meets all health requirements, as required by law. Ability to relate positively, effectively, and appropriately with residents, families, community members, volunteers and other facility staff.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word, MS Access, MS Excel, E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer.  ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, pushing, pulling and twisting.  The tasks on this position description marked with an asterisk (*) are those that regularly require these physical activities.  All employees of nursing homes may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents.  Lifting and/or transferring some residents will require use of a lifting device and /or assistance of other staff.",RN $,Full Time,"Bremerton, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-5-000-Sign-On-Forest-Ridge-Health-Rehab-Job-Bremerton-WA-US-166705629.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,,8a8742b81c1616395be215841747d441
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:36:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking an Application Development Senior Project Manager in San Antonio, Texas (TX).Summary:The IT Project Manager is responsible for managing all aspects of IT's project management methodology with primary focus in Application Development projects. The position is responsible for the management of project-level scope, financials, bottom up work plans, issues and risks, and coordination of organization change management. This project manager position will be working on small to medium sized projects in the Application Development area. The role demands proficiency in communication as well as organizational and time management skill sets.REQUIREMENTS: Successfully managed large projects as a project manager from Initiation to closure Highly skilled in project scope definition and management, including creation of work breakdown structures (WBS) Strong proficiency with preparing and managing project schedules Very proficient in Microsoft Project Excellent knowledge of project cost management including: preparing cost estimates to determine project budgets, projecting Estimates to Complete (ETC), Estimates at Completion (EAC) and managing to total project budget as well as in-year allocated budget Able to manage project risks and issues and prepare mitigation and action plans Very strong in task and time management, delegation and accountability for oneself and project team members Experience with SDLC methodologies such as Waterfall and Agile/Scrum Proven ability to manage Procurements for vendor purchases and the financial impact to projects Operated in a global environment Very proficient with MS Office applications including: Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook Strong communication, facilitation and presentation skills across technical and senior operational management audiences Ability to manage project stakeholder expectations with scope, schedule and budget constraints Highly adept at building relationships and navigating the corporate environment across the business and IT teams Resourceful, quick learner, able to perform self-study Open to change and able to adapt in a fast-paced environmentPreferred Qualifications: PMP Certification Six Sigma, Lean or other process improvement disciplines Experience with PPM tools such as HP PPM Familiarity with an offshore model M&A experience a plus Website Rollout experience a plus",Application Development Sr. Project Manager Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Antonio, TX 78201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Application-Development-Sr-Project-Manager-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166752154.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=20,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),a1c14522bf0640d51fbd68671e2b82fa
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:36:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking part time dental receptionist with great people skills and an attention to detail.  Experience preferred, but will train the right person.  Responsibilities include answering phones, scheduling appointments, presenting treatment plans, and other administrative tasks associated with a dental office.  Knowledge of dental terminology very helpful.",Dental Office/Front Desk Job in Mequon,Part Time,"Mequon, WI 53092",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Dental-Office-Front-Desk-Job-Mequon-WI-US-156731938.aspx?mescoid=4300748001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,52ad1da92770ff5db9ff9cacbb6279c5
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:09:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"If only those X-ray glasses advertised in comic books actually worked, medical professionals would be able to determine if a bone is broken. But fortunately for you and your future, you can be the next best thing as a Radiology Specialist.Radiology (the use of X-rays) is one of the many tools doctors use to detect injuries and illnesses. Working with Medical Corps Officers, Radiology Specialists operate X-ray and X-ray-related equipment to perform radiographic examinations. Radiology Specialists also prepare, assemble, and adjust X-ray instruments and materials, and assemble and disassemble radiology equipment and shelters.Health care related fields are some of the most wide open and promising career fields available today. Use your Radiology Specialists experience to prepare for a future as an X-ray technologist or a Nuclear Medicine Technologist with civilian hospitals, diagnostic clinics, and medical laboratories. You may also be able to specialize in other radiology disciplines and obtain certifications through continued study and experience. Certain restrictions apply and specific educational criteria must be met.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for Radiology Specialists consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 24 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Radiology Specialist Job in Gainesville  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Gainesville 32091,,http://jobview.monster.com/Radiology-Specialist-Job-GAINESVILLE-166723642.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=7,,General/Other: Medical/Health,2c547e7e9c32e258741b4199dd4897c9
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:09:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: BI Product ManagerLocation: Sunnyvale, CATerms: 12+ month contract We are looking for a Senior Consultant to join the Global Business Intelligence team in creating custom solutions for our clients Financial area, as Product Manager. Ideal candidate should have 15+ years experiencing leading development teams in creating solutions that support large volume processing as well understanding what is required to ensure the proper IT controls for SOX. Responsibilities include: •         Drive teams to meet project timelines while ensuring quality output•         Actively participate in technical design discussions•         Escalation point of contact for production support issues•         Oversee the development activities of vendor resources•         Regularly review/approve various documentations such as functional specifications, technical specifications and test plans as well as any change requests for production Key Qualifications: •         Degree/MBA or equivalent•         Experience working on Teradata, Oracle and Hadoop Platform with very high volume data.•         Program Management experience in software development•         Experience in implementing data warehouse/data marts and/or other BI solutions•         Domain experience in two or more areas (e.g. finance, order management, sales etc…)•         Strong communication and presentation skills•         Experience in leading project teams of 10+ or more•         This position requires a person with the ability to oversee multiple projects where timelines are aggressive. In order to succeed in the position the candidate is a self-starter who thrives on chaos while maintaining a positive attitude. For consideration email Kari Crowley at kari.crowley@redoaktech.com",BI Product Manager Job in Sunnyvale,Full Time,"Sunnyvale, CA 94085",,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/BI-Product-Manager-Job-Sunnyvale-CA-US-166597987.aspx?ch=houstonchronicle&mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=12,,,1dc52f67756c4b261b316c7d34cb3474
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:09:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Volt has been serving some of the nation's strongest companies for over 60 years. We have a talented and upbeat staffing team focused on the quality of your career. As a Volt employee, you can expect the highest level of on-site support. We have a long-standing tradition of developing lasting and mutually beneficial relationships with our employees. We are a Six Sigma company that also offers many direct hire, temp and temp to hire positions.Currently we have DBA position for our client in Quad Cities.If you are Application Database Administrator (DBA), we'd love to chat with you! Please reach out to Erica Wainwright at 630-874-9942 or ewainwright@volt.com ***Please Note: No 3rd party inquiries, must be legally authorized to work in the US. Thank You*** Knowledge and experience with AWS RDS offerings (Oracle, MySQL, Aurora) Working knowledge of DBA best practices (e.g., schema management, index optimization, DB-level tuning, Security ) Implementing database auditing and monitoring user access to the databases and generating audit reports Excellent communication and interpersonal skills Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",DBA in the Quad Cities Job in Davenport,Full Time Employee,"Davenport, IA",,http://jobview.monster.com/DBA-in-the-Quad-Cities-Job-Davenport-IA-US-166688654.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=15,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,cedb50bc863e7bc30c3af1b4affe6824
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:08:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Registered Nurse, you will:Provide admission, case management, and follow-up skilled nursing visits for home health patients.Administer on-going care and case management for each patient, provide necessary follow-up as directed by the Clinical Manager.Confer with physician in developing the initial plan of treatment based on physician's orders and initial patient assessment.  Provide hands-on care, management and evaluation of the care plan and teaching of the patient in accordance with physician orders, under Clinical Manager's supervision.  Revise plan in consultation with physician based on ongoing assessments and as required by policy/regulation.Coordinate appropriate care, encompassing various healthcare personnel (such as Physical Therapists, Occupational Therapists, Home Health Aides and external providers).Report patient care/condition/progress to patient's physician and Clinical Manager on a continuous basis. Implement patient care plan in conjunction with patient and family to assist them in achieving optimal resolution of needs/problems. Coordinate/oversee/supervise the work of Home Health Aides, Certified Home Health Aides and Personal Care Workers and provides written personal care instructions/care plan that reflect current plan of care.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Discharge patients after consultation with the physician and Clinical Manager, preparing and completing needed clinical documentation.Prepare appropriate medical documentation on all patients, including any case conferences, patient contacts, medication order changes, re-certifications, progress updates, and care plan changes.  Prepare visit/shift reports, updates/summarizes patient records, and confers with other health care disciplines in providing optimum patient care.Required SkillsQualificationsDiploma, Associate or Bachelor Degree in NursingMinimum of one year nursing experience preferredStrong med surg, ICU, ER, acute experienceHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Required ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.  To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVAJob LocationSebring, Florida, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Per Diem Home Health Registered Nurse Job in Sebring,,"Sebring, FL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Per-Diem-Home-Health-Registered-Nurse-Job-Sebring-FL-US-166611052.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=17,,,a8f29c80e336bb72c68b3c7e4e87292c
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:08:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"MEDICAL ASSISTANTBusy specialty office seeking experienced, compassionate, full-time medical assistant to join our team-oriented practice. In addition to a positive and professional demeanor, applicant must possess excellent interpersonal skills and good working knowledge of computers (eClinicalWorks a plus). Excellent benefit package and competitive wages offered. Qualified candidates may apply by sending cover letter and resume to Record-Eagle, Box 1321, 120 W. Front St., Traverse City, MI, 49684This job listing brought to you by The Traverse City Record Eagle",Medical Assistant Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,49684,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Medical-Assistant-Job-US-166684834.aspx?ch=newstrcy&mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),959a4bb1d97a07f19f9d17b20aa03e16
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:17:07:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Licensed Vocational Nurse II - Starting Salary for this position: $3,137.89/month. Provides routine vocational nursing work. Work involves providing for the care, treatment, and general welfare of patients. May train others. Works under moderate supervision, with limited latitude for the use of initiative and independent judgment. Works under the direction and supervision of the Registered Nurse, and performs Nursing duties within the assigned areas and assigned shift. The LVN performs basic and complex nursing tasks to fulfill the health needs of the individuals. The LVN keeps informed of and follows all agency, facility and unit policies and procedures. Essential Job Functions:1. Administers medications and treatments orally, rectally, internally, or by injection. 2. Performs technical Nursing procedures according to facility and state regulations after demonstration for competency. 3. Documents and reports pertinent observations. 4. Communicates orally and in writing to other team members’ pertinent information. Documents according to facility policy. 5. Responds to emergency situations to ensure safety of individuals. Follows safety and Infection Control Procedures of facility. 6. Monitors patients for treatments and procedures. 7. Collects samples for laboratory examination and performs routine lab tests on samples, as required. 8. Counsels patients with specific health goals. 9. LVN II assists other staff in turning/repositioning individuals to administer treatments. 10. Ensures that supplies are available. 11. Locates, transports and handles client record. 12. Attends work on a regular and predictable schedule in accordance with agency leave policy and performs other duties as assigned. Other duties as assigned include but are not limited to actively participating and/or serving in a supporting role to meet the agency’s obligations for disaster response and/or recovery or Continuity of Operations (COOP) activation. Such participation may require an alternate shift pattern assignment and/or location. Knowledge Skills Abilities:Experience in nursing work. Knowledge of nursing procedures and techniques and the principles and process used in providing patient care. Ability to provide patient care and to prepare and maintain records, to communicate effectively and to train others. Ability to apply principles and practices to assess, prevent and control diseases. Skills in using reasoning to identify problems, in considering appropriate resolution of situations, and in the operation of computers and applicable computer software. Must maintain current CPR certification. Must have strength and flexibility to safely perform Cardiopulmonary Resuscitation (CPR).Must be able to demonstrate a working knowledge of emergency procedures and emergency equipment. Registration or Licensure Requirements:Licensed to practice as a licensed vocation nurse in the state of Texas (or a state that recognizes reciprocity through the Nurse Licensure Compact). Initial Selection Criteria:Licensed to practice as a licensed vocation nurse in the state of Texas (or a state that recognizes reciprocity through the Nurse Licensure Compact). Additional Information:Starting Salary for this position: $3,137.89/month. All applicants must pass: pre-employment drug screen, fingerprint criminal background check, and Client Abuse/Neglect Reporting System (CANRS), Employee Misconduct Registry and Nurse/Aide Registry checks. Males between the ages of 18 – 25 must be registered with the Selective Service. All State Supported Living Center employees are subject to Random Drug Testing. Flexibility in work hours may be required for this position. The position may be required to work overtime and/or extended hours.",Licensed Vocational Nurse II-Group Home Job in Corpus Christi,Full Time,"Corpus Christi, TX 78405",,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Vocational-Nurse-II-Group-Home-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166716385.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=5,"3,137.89 - 3,865.66 $ /month",Experienced (Non-Manager),5894055fb704c4ff31368dfe6b3d2f95
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:16:19:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Information Security Administrator is responsible for the support and maintenance of the IT security systems and devices and working directly with the Security Analyst, taking direction from the Information Security Manager. Daily tasks will include, working on trouble tickets, moves/add/changes and installation of security related products and services. The Information Security Administrator should have advanced knowledge of McAfee and the many different security facets it has a representation in.Essential Duties and Responsibilities (other duties may be assigned):Manages user authentication, authorization and access controls for systems and applicationsDocuments changes to systems and networks that impact securityImprove security efficiency, streamlines work processes and works collaboratively with IT department personnel to accomplish objectiveImplementation, administration and support and monitoring of the preventative and detective IT security controlsEnsures security controls are kept up-to-date and are configured for appropriate effectiveness, as mandated by the Information Security ManagerResponds to and resolves alerts/anomalies through monitoring to ensure appropriate behaviorGenerates and maintains administrative documentation such as architecture diagrams and admin manuals, operational procedures and processesReviews and evaluates patch reconnaissance performed by the IT Security Analyst. Recommends software upgrades and performs upgrades in productionPerforms security tasks during BCP exercise and actual disasters Education/Experience: Direct Security Experience is a must!!! Bachelor's degree, or progression towards completion of degree, preferably in Cybersecurity, Management of Information Systems, or Computer Science Minimum 5 years' experience in Information Technology Operations, preferably Security Operations Minimum 3 years' experience in working full-time as an Information Security Professional, End-Point Security, Web Security, Fire Wall Detection, SIEM (SEM), etc. Professional security certification strongly preferred, such as CISSP, CISA, CEH, applicable SANs programs or other industry certifications i.e. Cisco, Microsoft, VMware Prior experience in developing information security standardized configuration guides and procedures Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: Required knowledge of McAfee Enterprise Security products including, but not limited to the following: McAfee ePo, End Point Protection, Web Security, Email Security, Enterprise Security Manager, Web Identity Manager, and Data Loss Protection Experience in a public sector agency would be a plus, but not essential Extensive knowledge of Intrusion Protection Systems, specifically McAfee Extensive knowledge of Firewalls and Web Application Firewalls, specifically Cisco and F5 products Good knowledge of security pertaining to Microsoft back-office platforms, including Windows Server, SQL Server, SharePoint and ISS Good knowledge of Local Area Networking technologies such as TCP/IP, configuration and security of Cisco switches and Routers Familiarity with multi-factor authentication and the process of deploying such technology Familiarity with Incident Response processes and procedures Familiarity with Business Continuity and Disaster Recovery process, procedures and testing Skilled in configuring, deploying, and monitoring corporate security tools Ability to resolve security issues in diverse and decentralized environments Skilled in scripting, PowerShell and other automation tools a plus, but not necessary Wireless security technologies and program implementations Ability to use discretion when handling confidential information Ability to set priorities and adapt to changes in a quick, professional manner Demonstrated technical independence in highly complex and integrated environments. Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals. Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and coworkers. Certificates and Licenses: Professional security certification strongly preferred, such as CISSP, CISA, CEH, applicable SANs programs (GSEC, GCIH, GPPA, GCWN, GISF, GSLC, GISP or GCPM). Will consider certifications in-progress if candidate can provide evidence of commitment. Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer!",Information Security Administrator Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Information-Security-Administrator-Job-Austin-TX-US-166688924.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=9,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,e38bc1c50affeb0677450168e19a4266
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:16:19:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:-Client is seeking a Program Manager II.-SMB Program Manager Summary:-The area: SMB The PeopleDev GBO programs team is passionate about developing the capabilities of all the clients within the sales organization.-We aim to think big, deliver practical solutions, and move fast to provide the clients with the support and resources they need within a dynamic and rapidly changing environment. -We currently have an opening for a Program Manager to execute on the delivery of learning programs in the US and internationally.-The Team: GBO PeopleDev, Strategy & Programs A-s part of the People Operations organization, GBO PeopleDev supports the various Global Business Organizations both regionally (Americas, EMEA, APAC) and globally to meet revenue targets, improve productivity and stay current in job related skills and knowledge through offering world class learning experiences. Responsibilities: -Program Management of various sales, business and leadership development programs -Proactively schedule sessions as applicable, and partner with LDBPs and clients on custom sessions of the content -Manage vendor facilitators and budget management -Support and grow the global pool of internal facilitators and ensure they are confident in delivering the content; plan and drive the recruitment of facilitators & running of train the trainers in regions when necessary -Run impact analysis and evaluate programs to make any content improvements which are necessary -Field inquiries from PeopleDev and PeopleOps partners as well as business stakeholders on the program and be able to make recommendations related to the content Qualifications: -Bachelor's Degree in Business Management, Project Manager and/or working experience in related field - 3-5 years of Program Management experience -Excellent project and/or program management skills -Strong attention to detail -Demonstrated ability to multi-task and apply initiative and creativity on challenging projects. -Demonstrated success in working in a team environment with multiple projects, stakeholders and changing priorities. -Demonstrated success in working with remote team members and/or a remote manager. -Highly adaptable and flexible; agile learner -Strong written and verbal communication skills -Strong strategic and systems thinking - able to help others make connections and see the big picture -1-3 years in a Client Services experience -Experience with learning programs, program design and redesign -Facilitation experience",Program Manager II Job in Mountain View,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Mountain View, CA",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Program-Manager-II-Job-Mountain-View-CA-US-166613616.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=1,,IT/Software Development,0a5a96fdf50d9e3087a23537032d6731
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:15:58:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dispensing Nurse LPNMedMark Treatment Centers118 E Choccolocco StreetOxford, AL 36203 Education:  LPN Requirement:  Currently licensed in the State of AL  Our clinic has an opening for a Part-Time Dispensing Nurse. Must have current LPN license by the State of AL.·        Administers methadone to patients accurately and timely as directed by doctor’s orders and policies and procedures.·        Produce and maintain appropriate records and reports as required by Company protocol and Federal and State Regulations.·        Ensure compliance with security standards for the distribution and storage of controlled substances as set forth in the Code of Federal regulations.·        Handle and dispense methadone in accordance with State, Federal and DEA regulations.·        Excellent documentation and computer skills required.  Experience in substance abuse a plus.  MedMark Services, Inc. is committed to Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and to compliance with all Federal, State and local laws that prohibit employment discrimination on the basis of race, color, age, natural origin, ethnicity, religion, gender, pregnancy, marital status, sexual orientation, citizenship, genetic disposition, disability or veteran’s status or any other classification protected by State/Federal laws.",Dispensing Nurse-Oxford,Part Time Employee,"Anniston, AL 36203",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Dispensing-Nurse-Oxford-AL-Job-Anniston-AL-US-165904589.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,076e67eec48141ce8da2ac816ba45f85
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:15:49:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Physical Therapist, you will:Plan and administer prescribed skilled physical therapy treatment and training for patients suffering from various injuries, illnesses and functional disabilities to attain highest level of physical function. Test/screen the patient’s physical strengths to assist the physician in evaluating the patient’s level of function and records findings to develop or pursue treatment programs and establish measurable training objectives.Develop/implement a conditioning/rehabilitation program consistent with physician’s Plan of Treatment and the overall goals of the patient/rehab team.  Adjust treatment as needed to achieve maximum results.Confer with physician and clinical team members to obtain adivitional patient information and assist in developing, implementing and revising the therapy treatment program and Plan of Treatment.Provide Physical Therapy Assistants and Home Health Aide staff with written instructions/care plan that reflects current plan of care as related to therapy, supervise/evaluate staffs' performance.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by physical therapy assistants and home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Accurately, promptly and thoroughly document patients' care observations, interventions and evaluations.  Assure that interim (verbal) orders received from the physician and physical therapist are promptly and accurately documented, submitted for physician signature and implementedReport patient's progress to the patient's physician, Clinical Manager, staff, patient and family.  Submit evaluation, treatment plans, progress reports and discharge summary to the supervisor and care management staff.  Required SkillsQualificationsDegree from an accredited Physical Therapy Program (approved by the APTA)Minimum of one year physical therapy experience preferredHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Physical Therapy licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Required ExperienceKeywords:Acute care, ADL, ADLs, ALF, Balance dysfunction, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, clinical rotation, geriatric, geriatrics, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, inpatient, inpatient PT, inpatient P.T., inpatient physical therapist, inpatient therapist, licensed therapist, licensed PT, licensed P.T., licensed physical therapist, modalities, neuro, neurological, ortho, ortho PT, ortho P.T., ortho therapist, ortho physical therapist, orthopedics, orthopedic, orthopedic PT, orthopedic P.T., orthopedic physical therapist, PT, P.T., physical therapist, physical therapy, DPT, doctorate PT, doctorate P.T., doctorate physical therapist, medical, medical care, therapist, therapy Care Manager, therapy case manager, therapy case management, therapy Job, therapy Jobs, PT job, PT jobs, P.T. job, P.T. jobs, physical therapy job, physical therapy jobs, physical therapist job, physical therapist jobs, Oasis, outpatient, outpatient clinic, out patient, outpatient rehab, outpatient PT, outpatient P.T., outpatient therapist, outpatient physical therapy, outpatient physical therapist, PRN, PDM, rehab, rehab PT, rehab P.T., rehab physical therapist, rehab setting, rehabilitative, therapeutic, safe strides, safe strides PT, safe strides P.T., safe strides physical therapist, skilled visit, SNF, sports med, sports medicine, sports med therapist, sports med physical therapist, sports medical physical therapist, subacute, sub acute, post acute, therapy, travel PT, travel P.T., travel therapist, travel physical therapist, traveling PT, traveling P.T., traveling physical therapist, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVAJob LocationPalm Beach, Florida, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Per Diem Home Health Physical Therapist Job in Palm Beach,,"Palm Beach, FL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Per-Diem-Home-Health-Physical-Therapist-Job-Palm-Beach-FL-US-166610252.aspx?mescoid=2900496001001&jobPosition=11,,,4782a66a3fc1cab0726c11d556ec1b15
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:15:46:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Produces or modifies computer programs of all sizes and complexity. Solves systems and program problems. Recommends courses of action on new application jobs, while considering the total system spectrum, from source document origination to final systems output and handling. Handles extensive research, analysis, definition and documentation on all facets of the job. Recommends the appropriate hardware solution (Personal Computer, LAN, Mainframe, Client Server, etc.) for the application. Provides mentoring support for less experienced programming staff. Works with minimal supervision and is responsible to make an established range of decisions, escalates to manager when necessary and updates manager on a regular basis. Position Responsibilities:Researches, designs, defines, develops, tests, documents and implements new computer applications or changes to existing applications Installs software packages and/or personal computer software. Assures that hardware and software operate efficiently.Utilizes programming tools effectively to ensure accuracy and enhance productivity.Assembles and analyzes data relating to processing problems, soliciting help as needed from IS and business unit associates.Consults and/or advises business unit associates by written and/or oral communication on inquiries concerning existing or proposed systems.Participates in committee meetings on developmental projects, large-scale improvement projects and internal Information Services technical committees. May chair committees and/or subcommittees.Provides training and mentoring to other programming staff, systems managers, business unit management or business unit associates on technical topics or systems definition.Handles multiple assignments with multiple deadlines simultaneously.Performs other duties as assigned by management.",.NET Developer Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",InsuranceFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/NET-Developer-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-166655230.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=13,,General/Other: IT/Software DevelopmentSoftware/Web Development,399d4247d64897497ea61d5f497fd535
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:15:00:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Nurse Practitioner/ Physician Assistant Judge Healthcare is actively seeking a full time Nurse Practitioner/ Physician Assistant for California's largest hospital system!! This position is located in Nashville, TN!The following qualifications must be met to be considered for this opportunity:Active RN license in the state of TennesseeBLS certification1+ years of Nurse Practitioner experience REQUIRED1+ years of acute care, medical center and/or hospital experience REQUIREDPlease send your MOST UP TO DATE resumes to Meghan at mtalpash@judge.com or call Meghan 949-527-4552.Thank you so much!Sincerely,Meghan Talpash",Nurse Practitioner/ Physician Assistant Job in Nashville,"Full Time, Employee","Nashville, TN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Practitioner-Physician-Assistant-Job-Nashville-TN-US-166632700.aspx?mescoid=2900505001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,c8e08077efd52bfa39ee01a5a9d5ac8e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:14:48:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Riverton  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Riverton 84065,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-RIVERTON-166741129.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=4,,General/Other: Medical/Health,f8afba463550c52c9ee2b622e2aaa14c
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:14:27:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client in Cleveland Ohio has a need for a Workday Integration Engineer for an estimated 9-month project.Responsibilities: Creating and supporting Workday Integrations Assists in design, development and support of the application and data integrationREQUIREMENTS: Workday Studio experience Workday Core Connect experience EIB experience XSLT experience Document Transformation experience",Workday Integration Engineer Job in Cleveland,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Cleveland, OH 44131",,http://jobview.monster.com/Workday-Integration-Engineer-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-166667032.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e85225b20b6a4268e24f7822f16904f7
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:14:26:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us            Vertical Screen is one of the world's leading applicant screening firms. Operating through three subsidiaries — Business Information Group, Certiphi Screening and Truescreen, as well as a sister-company, Fieldprint — we serve the largest and most respected organizations, institutions, corporations and government entities worldwide.  Job Description  We are currently seeking an experienced IT Project Manager to work in our IT Department for Vertical Screen.  This exciting position comes with an excellent benefits package that includes medical and dental insurance, 401(k) plan with company match, bonus program, paid time off, a casual work environment and much more!  Responsibilities  Drive estimation, work project breakdown and resource allocation. Define and manage a complex set of upstream downstream business and technology requirements and dependencies.Own the schedule, drive intermediate deliverables and ensure project commitments are met.Responsible for project coordination, developing project plans, status reporting and issue escalation.Define and track weekly work goals, while managing developer activities and priorities to meet expectations.Maintain visibility on day-to-day activities with project teams and ensuring sufficient face-time with key stakeholders.Escalate and drive issues to resolution.Engage with client leadership to ensure proper expectation setting and to fully understand requirements.Mitigate risks and address program / project obstacles as needed.Work collaboratively and professionally with outside organizations while dealing with organizational complexity and competing priorities.Manage offshore/3rd party resources.Manage project financials. The following skills are a plus: Previous experience as a software developer.Previous experience applying Agile, Scrum or Iterative Development Methodologies.Demonstrated experience delivering web or server software projects to successful completion. Required Skills    Written and oral presentation skills, along with excellent communication skills. Critical thinking and problem solving skills. Planning and organizing, decision-making. Ability to influence and lead others and delegate tasks. Strong negotiation, conflict management skills. Proficiency in project management software (MS Project), and office products (MS Word, Excel, Visio, PowerPoint). Minimum 3 years of demonstrated Information Technology project management experience with 4500 hours leading and directing projects and 35 hours of project management education. Strong interpersonal communication and relational skills, good organizational and project management skills; sound judgment; initiative; flexibility; detail-oriented. Documented working experience with Microsoft Windows Environments. PMP certified or able to take the PMP test within 1 year of date of hire.   Education   Bachelor degree or equivalent work experience is preferred. All candidates are subject to a drug test and a background screening and must meet FBI requirements. EOEFor consideration, please apply at https://verticalscreencareers.silkroad.com/ Resumes sent directly through Monster will not be considered. Visit us at www.verticalscreen.com  ",IT Project Manager Job in Mt. Laurel,Full Time,"Mt. Laurel, NJ 08054",,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Project-Manager-Job-Mt.-Laurel-NJ-US-163686052.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=16,,,ee090aa0645db66f8ed51c9b071c1b6e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:14:17:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Water Treatment Specialist in the Army National Guard, you will make sure your fellow Soldiers have clean water and live and work in sanitary conditions.Water Treatment Specialists are part of the Army National Guard's environmental health and safety team, using their acquired knowledge and skills to fulfill several vital needs. These skills include site reconnaissance and preparation for water treatment activity, as well as setup of equipment and facilities; operation and maintenance of water treatment equipment; management of potable water supplies; monitoring the storage, transport, and disposal of waste; water quality analysis and testing; and the inspection of facilities and food supplies for the presence of disease, germs, and other environmentally hazardous conditions.These are skills that are in demand by local, state, and federal government agencies for food and drug inspectors, public health inspectors, health and safety inspectors, and industrial hygienists. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Water Treatment Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! As an Army National Guard Water Treatment Specialist, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After nine weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 10 weeks of Advanced Individual Training that will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn how to identify health hazards and how to inspect food products, food service operations, wastewater, and waste disposal facilities. You may even qualify for a certified apprenticeship in this occupation. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Water Treatment Specialist Job in Mountain View  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Mountain View 94035,,http://jobview.monster.com/Water-Treatment-Specialist-Job-MOUNTAIN-VIEW-166722594.aspx?mescoid=5100986001001&jobPosition=18,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,e71cbcedf03fd0441a148a070ba7a596
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:14:16:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sr. UX Designer Our client, a well-known leading global retailer, is seeking a Sr. UX Designer who is exceptionally skilled in Interaction Design, spanning desktop to mobile and everything in between. The ideal candidate has deep experience working on mobile and desktop consumer user interfaces.  The role is located in San Francisco, CA and is a long-term contract (1 year+). Full job description below. iTalent offers our W2 employees benefits such as medical, dental, vision, life insurance and 401K plus matching. We are a great company to work for!  Job Description: We are a cutting edge, innovating retailer that likes to disturb the market. We need to stay ahead of the curve and we need people like you to help get us there.  Our success hinges on recognizing the value of every individual contribution. We give high-fives to people who enjoy the freedom of taking ownership of a problem and deciding how to solve it.  We don’t need reliable doers right now. We need thinkers, and we’ll measure you by what you create.  You will join a team of highly intelligent product managers and exceptionally talented user experience folk.  You will be influential with your big ideas supported by smart roll out plans.  You know that winning = the best products + an awesome client experience. You will be ready to face the toughest challenges in your career and apply yourself generously to the success of your projects and ultimately our client’s satisfaction. Requirements: The Senior UX designer needs to be competent in all of facets of the design process, and exceptionally skilled in Interaction Design, spanning desktop to mobile and everything in between.  A well-rounded UX professional who connects the dots between business and product needs, innovation and good design. Experienced at driving a user experience from start-to-finish that delivers results and connects emotionally with our client. Obsessed with good user-centered design practices and has an exceptional eye for detail. Deep experience in creating and revising interaction design artifacts including: high level conceptual work, diagrams and flows, detailed wireframes with annotations, experience maps, modernizing UX patterns and animations, expert understanding of native app UX design systems (Material Design, iOS 9 and 10), prototyping, establishing and delivering against UX standards.Passionate about understanding (and keeping the team and stakeholders in formed about) current and emerging UX trends. Familiar with HTML, JavaScript, CSS design, and other front end technologies.Fluent in responsive design, mobile/tablet UI UX; Have deep experience working on mobile and desktop consumer user interfacesKnow the value in iterating quickly on a design and welcome feedback.Is comfortable working in an unpredictable and demanding environment.Participate in user research, including prototyping and creating other artifacts used in testing.   4232   ",Sr. UX Designer (Leading Global Retailer) Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA 94105",,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-UX-Designer-Leading-Global-Retailer-Job-San-Francisco-CA-US-166406265.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,,,9bda44a1e1d38574a00a0530debb823a
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:14:10:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Provides professional nursing care for the comfort and well-being of patients. Prepares equipment and assists physician during examinations and treatments. Administers prescribed medications, changes dressings, cleans wounds, and monitors patient vital signs. Observes and maintains records on patient care, condition, reaction, and progress.Job Requirements Graduate of a State Board accredited School of Nursing or equivalent. Experience: Six (6) months experience preferred. Licensure: Current license or permit to practice professional nursing in the State of Texas.",Registered Nurse,"Full Time, Employee","Port Arthur, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Surgery-Job-Port-Arthur-TX-US-166643994.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=18,,Medical/Health,cf5a04ae950ce1b524f383c30395c8de
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:14:09:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Communication is the heartbeat of any Army National Guard unit. By joining the Army National Guard as a Signal Support Systems Specialist, you will keep the information flowing by making sure all communications equipment is in top working order. And while you maintain signal support devices and terminals in the Army National Guard, you will be building skills that will help you in your civilian career. Signal Support Systems Specialists are responsible for integrating signal systems and networks; performing signal support functions and unit-level maintenance on authorized signal equipment; and installing, operating, and maintaining radio and data distribution systems. In this role, you will train and provide technical assistance to users of signal equipment and learn to operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on vehicles and power generators. And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers; maintain and install signal support systems and terminal devices; provide technical assistance and training for automation and communications equipment; prepare maintenance and supply requests for unit-level signal support; and operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on assigned vehicles. Plus, the skills you learn will prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in communications equipment, radio, and teletype repair. These skills are also in demand by the federal government. Civilian positions may require additional study in electronics, where you will have the opportunity to qualify for certification as an Associate Certified Electronics Technician. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 17 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training. This is where you will learn mechanical, electronic, and electrical principles; line installation; wiring techniques; preventative maintenance procedures; and communication security policies and procedures. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Signal Support Systems Specialist Job in Ada  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Ada 74820,,http://jobview.monster.com/Signal-Support-Systems-Specialist-Job-ADA-166735323.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=2,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,db18fe7e7b0ee8458eedae2bc4c97bc0
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:14:09:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Adelphi  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Adelphi 20783,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-ADELPHI-166729094.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=10,,General/Other: Medical/Health,2a15dbe2ac1a467f1aba237e9e62fa34
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:13:54:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position is accountable for all functions of the physician credential process to ensure that physicians meet the health plans requirements for employment as a contracted physician. The applicant may assist in the implementation of procedures and activities related to the credential, re-credential and privilege of network providers. Coordinate the credential process for all new facilities. Review current files and close any gaps the remains in process. Ensure compliance with NCQA standards through maintenance of policy and procedure manuals. Maintain provider profiling system, communicates with providers by phone, mail regarding the credential status and information. Maintain the credential database. Perform any other duties as required.RequirementsThe applicant must have minimum 1 year of healthcare related experience. Ability to manage multiple priorities and excellent organization skills include computer literate in Microsoft office. The applicant should have strong communication and interpersonal skills.EducationAssociate degree or equivalent required. ClientThe client company is a global health services organization. Its insurance subsidiaries are major providers of medical, dental, disability, life and accident insurance and related products and services. If you are interested in this position, send your resume to apply@kochdavis.com Original Job Posting: http://www.kochdavis.com/credentialing-associate /",Credentialing Associate Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Credentialing-Associate-Job-Houston-TX-US-166683791.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=6,,,20cc85d193cf2bcff222c981776f12a4
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:13:54:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Extensive years of experience, with the ability to quickly ramp up on new concepts and platform. Sterling Commerce manual testing with good experience in functional and integration testing. Familiarity to Sterling OMS product is highly desired. Need to have strong technical skills especially in J2EE technologies and also good understand Database concepts. Overall understanding of Ecommerce and Multi-Channel Commerce strategy, with the ability to bring a perspective of best and latest in Retailing. Build, unit test and review code and configuration of the Sterling MCF product Conduct POC as required.         Good experience in application development, maintenance, support and testing in waterfall methodology. Comprehensive knowledge of manual testing of web application, executing test cases and various bug tracking systems like JIRA, HP Quality Center / ALM. Requirement Analysis, Estimation, High Level & Low Level Application Design, Design Review, Programming, Code Review, Integration Testing, Unit Testing, Mentoring and Offshore coordination             Organization Marketing Statement Cognizant(NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centres worldwide and approximately 221,700 employees as of December 31, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on https://twitter.com/USJobsCognizant/. Additional Information:",Sterling Commerce Job in Charlotte,Full Time Employee,"Charlotte, NC 28201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Sterling-Commerce-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-165627186.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=4,,IT/Software Development,a59a2339e6bfd53ac4afeeb9064fd152
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:13:54:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Communication is the heartbeat of any Army National Guard unit. By joining the Army National Guard as a Signal Support Systems Specialist, you will keep the information flowing by making sure all communications equipment is in top working order. And while you maintain signal support devices and terminals in the Army National Guard, you will be building skills that will help you in your civilian career. Signal Support Systems Specialists are responsible for integrating signal systems and networks; performing signal support functions and unit-level maintenance on authorized signal equipment; and installing, operating, and maintaining radio and data distribution systems. In this role, you will train and provide technical assistance to users of signal equipment and learn to operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on vehicles and power generators. And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers; maintain and install signal support systems and terminal devices; provide technical assistance and training for automation and communications equipment; prepare maintenance and supply requests for unit-level signal support; and operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on assigned vehicles. Plus, the skills you learn will prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in communications equipment, radio, and teletype repair. These skills are also in demand by the federal government. Civilian positions may require additional study in electronics, where you will have the opportunity to qualify for certification as an Associate Certified Electronics Technician. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 17 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training. This is where you will learn mechanical, electronic, and electrical principles; line installation; wiring techniques; preventative maintenance procedures; and communication security policies and procedures. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Signal Support Systems Specialist Job in Anderson  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Anderson 29625,,http://jobview.monster.com/Signal-Support-Systems-Specialist-Job-ANDERSON-166737796.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=13,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,38daf5c8c1726f7b206e279475701005
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:13:54:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Medical Imaging Contractor in Sunnyvale, CA Location: Sunnyvale, CADuration: 4+ months with possible extension.For immediate consideration please send resumes to Candice Branyon at Cbranyon@judge.com Primary Function of Position: We are seeking multiple contractors to support our research team focused on image-guidance for robotic surgery. The contractors will perform manual and/or semi-automatic segmentation and annotation of the medical images, including Computer Tomography (CT) and CT Angiograms. Qualifications Skill/Job Requirements: •Must have excellent communication and documentation skills •Familiar with Microsoft Windows, Word, Excel •Experience with Mac OS X is a plus •Experience with medical images and medical imaging software platforms is a plus •Knowledge of human anatomy is a plus •Knowledge of DICOM standard is a plus •Great work ethic and enthusiasm for problem solving and data analysis •Desire to achieve accurate results in limited time •Desire to deliver consistent outcome in a repeated process for hundreds of datasets •Desire to overcome technical obstacles and challenges and improve processes •Self-starter and able to work in a collaborative and results oriented environment Learning Outcomes: •Gain knowledge of anatomy and experience with medical image segmentation •Gain experience with medical image viewing and processing software platforms Commitment: Must be available to work full-time hours, M-F for 4-6 months beginning April. For immediate consideration please send resumes to Candice Branyon at Cbranyon@judge.com ",MEDICAL IMAGING TECH Job in Sunnyvale,"Full Time, Employee","Sunnyvale, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/MEDICAL-IMAGING-TECH-Job-Sunnyvale-CA-US-166666362.aspx?mescoid=2900538001001&jobPosition=3,,IT/Software Development,65fdce697d3c7e766138583f9a0563cd
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:13:53:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Everything begins with solid communications. And in this hyper-networked world, that won't change anytime soon. So set yourself up in a promising civilian career by learning the Information Technology skills you need in the Army National Guard.Computers are essential to every division of the military. In the Army National Guard, you will learn what you need to know to maintain, process, and troubleshoot military computer systems and operations. The skills learned as an Information Technology Specialist can easily be transferred to the civilian workforce. You'll be able to work as a network support technician, data processing technician, or computer programmer in just about any company that uses computers.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for an Information Technology Specialist consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and approximately 15 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT) with classroom instruction.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHelpful attributes include an interest in working with radios, fiber optics, and transmission equipment; an ability to apply electronic principles and concepts; as well as a general understanding of math and physics. You must meet the following requirements to qualify for service:High School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekendPrograms and benefits are subject to change.",Information Technology Specialist Job in Charleston  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Charleston 29403,,http://jobview.monster.com/Information-Technology-Specialist-Job-CHARLESTON-166737861.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=12,,Computer/Network SecurityGeneral/Other: IT/Software Development,ebe10dcc8f68d7cfaff043ad83484a0c
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:13:52:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARYProvides professional support services to the Foundation and Development office for the Hamilton County area which reflects positively on the Center's management and facilitates the fundraising efforts of the Foundation.  Must maintain strict confidentiality of client, donor and staff information. Coordination and development of media, government, volunteer, community and United Way relationships.HRMC is an EOE. HRMC conducts Background Checks, Drivers License Record, Degree Verification, and Drug Screens at hire. Employment is contingent upon clean drug screen, background check and driving record. Additionally, certain programs are subject to TB Screening and/or Testing.  Bilingual applicants are encouraged to apply.JOB REQUIREMENTSEducation/Knowledge: Must have at least a Bachelor's degree in business or communications with experience in the area of fundraising, direct sales or public relations/marketing. Excellent verbal and written communication skills. Familiarity with software programs used for publication and marketing materials.Experience: Three to five years of direct fundraising or sales experience preferred. High degree of familiarity with the Hamilton County community preferred.Physical: Hearing of normal and soft tones. Close eye work. Valid driver's license. Lifting up to 50 lbs. Pushing/pulling up to 150 lbs. Frequent sitting, standing, walking, bending, stooping, and reaching.Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1112&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Hamilton County Development Coordinator Job in Chattanooga,Full Time,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Hamilton-County-Development-Coordinator-Job-Chattanooga-TN-US-166130348.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,9e2d77b86343e91f70f093c048812302
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:13:52:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an Army National Guard Chemical Operations Specialist, you'll be there and prepared whenever a community is flooded, an earthquake shakes the foundations of a city, a hurricane makes landfall, or an enemy uses biological or chemical warfare. You will know what to do to evacuate the area, control the situation, and solve the problem.In order to perform these functions, you will be trained to expertly handle nuclear, biological, and chemical (NBC) detection and decontamination equipment so you can assist in the application of NBC defense measures. You will also be asked to maintain disaster plans, operate and perform maintenance on smoke generating equipment, and coordinate with civilian personnel on what to do in an emergency. These are skills that are in demand by federal, state, and local governments, as well as civil defense agencies. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Chemical Operations Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend 19 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn defensive procedures for NBC warfare and preparation of emergency plans. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Chemical Operations Specialist Job in Anaconda  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Anaconda 59711,,http://jobview.monster.com/Chemical-Operations-Specialist-Job-ANACONDA-166731777.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,bb7a71d305c92b688b364b6d2fafa854
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:13:24:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Demonstrate the following knowledge and/or experience: In depth experience designing and maintaining DoD messaging systems; Understanding of enterprise operational and technical requirements for messaging services; Expert knowledge of enterprise messaging applications and systems; Operational experience designing and operating enterprise level messaging service for a global DoD service provider; Experience designing robust enterprise messaging solutions with specific governance requirements; Excellent written and verbal communication skills, and have demonstrated ability to present material to senior DoD and non-DoD officials; In depth experience providing Tier III or higher support for enterprise messaging services; Experience incorporating emerging technologies into existing environments.At least 7 years of demonstrated experience leading senior technicians in an enterprise network environment consisting of 250k user. At least 5 years of experience supporting an Active Directory, Microsoft Exchange, SAN, and Virtualization environment. ITIL v3 Foundation certified. Either CISA, GSE, CISSP, or GCIH certified. Two of the following Certifications MCP, MCSA, MCSE, MCTS, or MCITP. Position requires a Top Secret security clearance at start of work. Must be SCI eligible.",Enterprise Directory and Messaging (EDM) Technical Lead Job in Quantico,,"Quantico, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Enterprise-Directory-Messaging-EDM-Technical-Lead-Job-Quantico-VA-US-166718602.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=19,,,1fa8f67bcaae074ac1e28c3687e0ebb7
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:12:47:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you're looking for a job that you can really sink your teeth into, then join the Army National Guard as a Dental Specialist.Dental care is one of the health services provided to Guard personnel all over the world. Dental Specialists assist dentists in the examination and treatment of patients, and help manage dental offices. Additional responsibilities may include cleaning patients' teeth, assisting with the administration of anesthesia and x-rays, and performing maintenance on dental equipment.Health care is one of the most wide open and promising career fields available today. Use your Dental Specialist experience in the Guard to prepare for jobs in civilian dental offices, clinics, and treatment centers. You may even qualify for positions with research institutions and public health departments.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Dental Specialists consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 30 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Dental Specialist Job in Danbury  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Danbury 06810,,http://jobview.monster.com/Dental-Specialist-Job-DANBURY-166723221.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=11,,Dental Practitioner,dd731f5f63d33520d6fa0201165a6f9e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:12:10:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description CHRISTUS HomeCare of New Braunfels is seeking an Occupational Therapist within Home Health. This position is responsible for managing the care plan for a group of assigned patients; directs care provided by the therapy assistants; coordinates with other disciplines and departments while maintaining accountability for care provided.Job Requirements Bachelors or Masters degree from an accredited college or university in the area of occupational therapy At least two (2) years as an Occupational Therapist, and preferably one of the two years in home care setting Licensed as an occupational therapist by the State Board of Occupational Therapy Examiners Current CPR certification Must have a current state driver's license and current automobile insurance.",Occupational Therapist (Home Health) Job in New Braunfels,"Full Time, Employee","New Braunfels, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Occupational-Therapist-Home-Health-Job-New-Braunfels-TX-US-166644012.aspx?mescoid=2900496001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,bc99116fef130f08ab1cf1048995fdd4
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:12:01:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Volt provides highly skilled contingent workers to local, national and international clients in all major industries. Volt has over 60 years of experience and is a leader in the industry. We work with many of the Fortune 500 and 1000 companies to provide workforce solutions.Capitalizing on knowledge and innovation, comprehensive resources, and technology, Volt provides top talent to the many thousands of clients across the globe. Over 60 years of unwavering focus on the issues of workforce management have gained us a reputation of being one of the most knowledgeable and accomplished strategic workforce partners in business for clients and candidates alike.We have a talented and upbeat staffing team focused on the quality of your career. As a Volt employee, you can expect the highest level of on-site support. We have a long-standing tradition of developing lasting and mutually beneficial relationships with our employees.Volt has an opportunity for you to become part of a prestigious team of professionals. We are seeking candidates for a variety of Volt positions onsite at our client's facilities located in Moline, IL.We are seeking an Infrastructure Analyst to work on site at our client facility. Implements and integrates new information technology infrastructure using approved Information Technology (IT) processes. Identifies, analyzes, selects and applies appropriate new information technology infrastructure components within a diverse environment as required to support strategic business plans and processes The scope of the work includes:This position is a member of the Identity Management Services organization and will report to the Team Leader of the Authentication and Authorization team.Responsibilities include the development, implementation, administration, maintenance and support of a variety of authentication and authorization products and servicesCA SSO, LDAP integration, SAML/Federation, Privileged Access Management, Adaptive/Multi-factor Authentication, Role Based Authorization (fine and coarse grain) systems, IGS integration, keys, tokens, certificates and a suite of internally developed authentication and authorization productsThe position includes some 7x24 support (on-call) responsibilities schedule tbd.Candidate will sit on-siteResponsible for the selection, planning, and implementation of changes to some subset of the information technology infrastructure. Bachelor's Degree Applies information analysis to resolve infrastructure problems of medium complexity and moderate in risk Primarily performs as an individual contributor, but may supervise a small work team (6 or fewer members). Integrates medium to complex changes to existing processes with minimal review. Identifies, analyzes, selects and applies appropriate new information technology infrastructure components within a diverse environment as required to support strategic business plans and processes Implements and integrates new information technology infrastructure using approved Information Technology (IT) processes Performs root cause analysis which includes detailed analysis to assist in the effective implementation and integration of Information Technology (IT) infrastructure in support and alignment of business processes. Works on systems/projects with relatively large number or interrelated processes and/or unclear relationships to other processes of moderate complexity. Responsible for coordinating and communicating changes to multiple functional, business, and suppliers•**This position is located in Moline, IL Candidates must be able to relocate to this location at their own expense.***Submit your resume today!Contact Veronica at 563-723-3710 for immediate consideration.If you do not meet all the qualifications of the position listed here, please be sure to go to http://jobs.volt.com to see the other positions we have available that you may qualify for.Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Infrastructure Analyst- Moline,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Infrastructure-Analyst-Moline-IL-Job-Los-Angeles-CA-US-166689484.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=3,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,fac5c757f9fff869dc8986b71ef038f4
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:11:59:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fast-paced, family dental practice is looking for a full-time Dental Assistant and a full-time Dental Receptionist.  Prior experience in a dental office is a plus.  Salary is based on experience.  Benefits include paid time off, healthcare, and a retirement plan.",Dental Assistant and Dental Receptionist Job in Mountain Top,Full Time,"Mountain Top, PA 18707",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Dental-Assistant-Dental-Receptionist-Job-Mountain-Top-PA-US-166595042.aspx?ch=thecitizensvoice&mescoid=3100555001001&jobPosition=3,,,1654215b2a5890a6bda395ce439fb1f7
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:11:59:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"ONLY US CITIZENS AND GREEN CARD HOLDERS PLZ APPLYOverview: The Business Entity & The TeamCisco Internet of Things System & Software Group (IoTSSG) is looking for a Software QA Engineer to test the NMS Software managing millions of smart devices including electric/gas meters, grid sensors/controllers, distribution automation devices, edge routers, etc. The platform is based on the latest open standards from IETF and IEEE to enable end-to-end IP connectivity to every device. The position is based in Cisco's San Jose campus where you will work with engineers, partners and customer’s deployments and POC projects.  Roles and Responsibilities:·         Participate and work closely with cross-functional team( Development/Product Management) at various stages ·         Review Requirements, Functional Specifications &  Design documents ·         Develop detailed test plans, tools, and utilities.·         Design, Install and Maintain Test beds, test topologies.·         Participate in Daily Scrub meetings·         Perform Dev-Test, Regression, Stress, Scale and Performance Tests and Solutions tests·         Develop/Maintain Automation framework work using Python·         Assist development engineers in product defect diagnosis.·         Initiate and participate in efforts to improve group productivity and test effectiveness.·         Participate in customer calls and assist in troubleshooting, data gathering and communicating resolution/fixes.Minimum Qualifications:·         MSEE/CS with 5-7 years of experience  or BSEE/CS combined with 7-10+ yrs related experience·         Experience with SOAPUI, RESTful API testing·         Experience in Agile Methodology and tools such as Rally·         Strong scripting experience with Tcl/Expect, Python·         UI Application testing and experience with GUI Automation tool·         Strong communication and collaboration skills are essential. ·         Strong understanding of internet protocols (IPv4/IPv6/ICMPv6/TCP/UDP/DHCPv6/Netconf/HTTPS)",Automation Engineer Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95101",,http://jobview.monster.com/Automation-Engineer-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-166606905.aspx?mescoid=1700195001001&jobPosition=4,,,c7e86080c11b711955676d1482ff9c72
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:11:28:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Registered Nurse, you will: Provide admission, case management, and follow-up skilled nursing visits for home health patients.Administer on-going care and case management for each patient, provide necessary follow-up as directed by the Clinical Manager.Confer with physician in developing the initial plan of treatment based on physician's orders and initial patient assessment.  Provide hands-on care, management and evaluation of the care plan and teaching of the patient in accordance with physician orders, under Clinical Manager's supervision.  Revise plan in consultation with physician based on ongoing assessments and as required by policy/regulation.Coordinate appropriate care, encompassing various healthcare personnel (such as Physical Therapists, Occupational Therapists, Home Health Aides and external providers).Report patient care/condition/progress to patient's physician and Clinical Manager on a continuous basis. Implement patient care plan in conjunction with patient and family to assist them in achieving optimal resolution of needs/problems. Coordinate/oversee/supervise the work of Home Health Aides, Certified Home Health Aides and Personal Care Workers and provides written personal care instructions/care plan that reflect current plan of care.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Discharge patients after consultation with the physician and Clinical Manager, preparing and completing needed clinical documentation.Prepare appropriate medical documentation on all patients, including any case conferences, patient contacts, medication order changes, re-certifications, progress updates, and care plan changes.  Prepare visit/shift reports, updates/summarizes patient records, and confers with other health care disciplines in providing optimum patient care.Required SkillsQualificationsDiploma, Associate or Bachelor Degree in NursingMinimum of one year nursing experience preferredStrong med surg, ICU, ER, acute experienceHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Required ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVA Job LocationFt Myers, Florida, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Home Health Registered Nurse-KAH Job in Ft Myers,,"Ft Myers, FL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Home-Health-Registered-Nurse-KAH-Job-Ft-Myers-FL-US-166746297.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,,39b578cff9efb3187c3e03e4631b9633
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:11:26:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Provider Data Management Manager in Sunrise, FL. This person will be responsible for establishing and monitoring Key Performance Indicators. Predominant responsibilities include completion of provider data changes, additions and terminations along ensuring validity and accuracy.REQUIREMENTS: Experience working with large volumes of data along with 3-5 years of provider data related experience Prior management experience in a high volume environment Able to create and maintain KPIs, analyze data, review team statistics, trending, needs, and risks Strong Excel and Access knowledge is required This position will work closely with the credentialing, provider relations and claims teams",Provider Data Manager Job in Sunrise,"Full Time, Employee","Sunrise, FL 33323",,http://jobview.monster.com/Provider-Data-Manager-Job-Sunrise-FL-US-166749882.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=10,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),74376f317048fb38d5c01cc9bb5a917d
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:11:21:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you're looking for a job that you can really sink your teeth into, then join the Army National Guard as a Dental Specialist.Dental care is one of the health services provided to Guard personnel all over the world. Dental Specialists assist dentists in the examination and treatment of patients, and help manage dental offices. Additional responsibilities may include cleaning patients' teeth, assisting with the administration of anesthesia and x-rays, and performing maintenance on dental equipment.Health care is one of the most wide open and promising career fields available today. Use your Dental Specialist experience in the Guard to prepare for jobs in civilian dental offices, clinics, and treatment centers. You may even qualify for positions with research institutions and public health departments.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Dental Specialists consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 30 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Dental Specialist Job in Riverton  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Riverton 84065,,http://jobview.monster.com/Dental-Specialist-Job-RIVERTON-166741120.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=6,,Dental Practitioner,27ebc3942eb1d0a14bf1498fac123c0e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:10:59:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Responsible for effective management of patient care delivery: Completes and documents assessment within period established by policy/procedure. Completes and documents reassessment of patient needs according to department standard. Initiates, updates and communicates an appropriate multi-disciplinary plan of care based in identified problems and/or patient needs Collaborate with patient/family/physician and other disciplines to coordinate the plan of care Evaluates patient response to care, revises plan of care as necessary and documents appropriately Administers and documents medications/treatments safely following Medication Administration Policy and Procedure Recognizes change or urgent situations in patient condition and intervenes appropriately. Provides patient and/or family with information relative to treatment plan, diagnostic/surgical procedures, disease process, and care after discharge. Initiates collaboration and documents appropriate teaching, considering age, cultural and religious beliefs, and barriers to learning. Evaluates effectiveness of teaching and provides appropriate follow-up. Provides leadership and direction in accordance with departmental goals and objectives. Delegates duties based on position and level of competence and the complexity of patient's needs. Performs Point of Care Testing within scope of licensure; accurately performs testing according to the approved procedure and limits testing to only those tests for which competency has been assessed and operator is deemed qualified by designated trainer. Healthstream (HLC) modules completed by assigned date. Complete Associate Self-evaluation and give to Supervisor by assigned date. Attend 2 of the Associate Round Tables per fiscal year. Maintain licensure or certification without lapse, if required for the position. Maintain BCLS/ACLS certification, if required for the position. Job Requirements Education/Skills:  Graduate from an Accredited School of Nursing. Experience:  As required by Staff RN Level and assigned area. Licenses, Registrations, or Certifications:  Current registration with eh Louisiana State Board of Registered Nurse Examiners.  BLS provider, ACLS provider as required by departmental policy.",Registered Nurse - Critical Care Job in Shreveport,"Full Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Critical-Care-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166643865.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,3ed7338394e2e0fe781c7ed227bb973f
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:10:59:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sunrise System Inc. is currently seeking for Project Coordinator III in New Brunswick, NJ for one of our top clients.            Title: Project Coordinator IIILocation: New Brunswick / NJ / 08901Duration: 13+ MonthsType: Contract W2 onlyID:  16-06334 Job Description: ·         Project Management Coordinator / Planner oversees the process implementation in support of the Global HCC&P Global Transparency Management (GTM) program which includes the implementation of an aggregate spend/transparency reporting software suite.·         The HCC&P PMO coordinator supports the GTM PMO Lead in the overall coordination of work streams with a focus on Process Readiness & Change Management; Communication & Training and Transparency Reporting Preparation. ·         This person will work with the IT PMO to track and coordinate the integrated roadmap including action items and its follow ups.  Main job tasks and responsibilities include: Program planning & scheduling o    Support to schedule and actively monitor project timelines o    Continuously monitor and report on progress of the project to all stakeholders o    Identify areas of Risk, Issue & Decision Management  Change management o    Assist with the development and tracking of a global cross-sector change management plan  Training and communications o    Assist with the development and tracking of a global cross-sector change training and communications plan  Governance Management o    Manages scheduling and agenda of core team sessions, ensures timely distribution of minutes o    Organizing / scheduling meetings (teleconference, WebEx, Face to Face); maintaining calendars, collecting topics, attending most relevant meeting, taking the minutes, occasionally leading calls / meetings  Program Status Reporting ·         Create and present status and leadership reports defining project progress, problems and solutions ·         Status collection process, weekly detailed status report, weekly scorecard status report, clarity on sensitive issues and good PM reporting ·         Maintain global / regional dashboards ·         Program Infrastructure ·         Program document library and distribution list and its management ·         Documentation and archiving (standard global project SharePoint folder)  Capabilities: Some of the key competencies crucial for success in this role include the following: critical thinking and problem solving skills, planning and organizing, decision-making, communication skills, influencing and leading, team work, adaptability, and stress tolerance. Experience working on large, global implementation and experience a plus. Must having strong working experience with standard industry software suites e.g. Microsoft office; Webex etc. Apply on-line for immediate consideration, please send your updated resume and contact info viaContact: Thirumal Raja GEmail: thirumal.g@sunrisesys.com | Phone: 732 272 0347 Transforming Business, Enhancing Careerswww.sunrisesys.com",Project Coordinator III Job in New Brunswick,Full Time,"New Brunswick, NJ 08901",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Coordinator-III-Job-New-Brunswick-NJ-US-166755590.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=1,,,39b5e25d12b6af6c0af683525a1c67ba
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:10:44:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Communication is the heartbeat of any Army National Guard unit. By joining the Army National Guard as a Signal Support Systems Specialist, you will keep the information flowing by making sure all communications equipment is in top working order. And while you maintain signal support devices and terminals in the Army National Guard, you will be building skills that will help you in your civilian career. Signal Support Systems Specialists are responsible for integrating signal systems and networks; performing signal support functions and unit-level maintenance on authorized signal equipment; and installing, operating, and maintaining radio and data distribution systems. In this role, you will train and provide technical assistance to users of signal equipment and learn to operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on vehicles and power generators. And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers; maintain and install signal support systems and terminal devices; provide technical assistance and training for automation and communications equipment; prepare maintenance and supply requests for unit-level signal support; and operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on assigned vehicles. Plus, the skills you learn will prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in communications equipment, radio, and teletype repair. These skills are also in demand by the federal government. Civilian positions may require additional study in electronics, where you will have the opportunity to qualify for certification as an Associate Certified Electronics Technician. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 17 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training. This is where you will learn mechanical, electronic, and electrical principles; line installation; wiring techniques; preventative maintenance procedures; and communication security policies and procedures. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Signal Support Systems Specialist Job in Columbus  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Columbus 68601,,http://jobview.monster.com/Signal-Support-Systems-Specialist-Job-COLUMBUS-166733269.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=11,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,dbaa0eaff005ddaf5201a6445bde84f4
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:10:40:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Patient Services Representative\Scheduler Milwaukee, WIUSA Company: Wheaton Franciscan Medical GroupLocation: WFH-St. Joseph 5000 W. Chambers St.FTE: 1.0Shift: VariesShift Start Time: VariesShift End Time: VariesThe Patient Service Representative (PSR) II greets all patients and visitors and answers incoming calls. Obtains and accurately records demographic and insurance information for patients. Schedules patient appointments, procedures and/or diagnostic tests with appropriate physicians and/or departments. Obtains pre-authorization for ancillary or referral appointments, as needed. Efficiently and accurately performs charge entry for both the medical and hospital professional encounters. Acts as a clinic based resource for patients who may have questions related to their physician and hospital bills. Interacts professionally with insurance companies and others to resolve billing issues. Effectively communicates information to internal and external customers, while maintaining a focus on patient service and patient confidentiality. Reviews hospital and/or clinic encounter tickets for completeness, assuring ICD 9 (ICD 10) and CPT codes are present. Investigates and seeks correction of errors. Per established protocols forwards applicable hospital and/or clinic encounter tickets to coder for review prior to charge entry. Assures encounter tickets are returned from coder in a timely manner for charge entry.Treats all patient information confidentially and in accordance with established guidelines.Answers telephones, screens calls, and provides information to patients and other callers.Schedules patient appointments in accordance with established department guidelines. Pleasantly greets assists and directs patients in the office setting.Informs coworkers/providers of patient arrival.Registers patients, obtaining and entering all necessary demographic, insurance and financial information to ensure accurate billing. Verifies and updates accurate patient account information using specified computer applications.Ensures that insurance eligibility is verified prior to the office visit.Prepares patient's medical record prior to office visit Collects co-pays, outstanding balances and deductibles prior to service. Issues receipt and posts paymentsPerforms daily cash handling procedures, deposits, balancing of cash drawer and end-of-day accounting functions. Assures patient signatures according to policy.Documents clear, concise, appropriate and legible messages to ensure physician and associate comprehensionResponds effectively, handles multiple priorities and meets deadlines. Practices and promotes skills which exemplify the Wheaton Franciscan values and philosophy.Communicates effectively with all patients, families and customers to exceed expectations. Promotes and maintains excellence in the patient and family experience.Review patient balances 2 days prior to patient visit. Reviews balances for accuracy along with indicating the date of service and reason for patient balance, for both clinic and hospital balances. Initiates reminder calls to all patients according to established clinic protocol.Proficiently performs data entry functions, posting all charges to appropriate patient accounts and files batches upon completion of charge entry.Communicate and works directly with patients to address billing concerns. Associate seeks to answer, explain and resolve patient billing questions relating to coverage issues and specific payments and patient health care benefits. The need may occur to contact carrier on behalf of patient.Identifies opportunities for improving, streamlining and/or eliminating processing steps between Wheaton Franciscan and payors.Performs those duties necessary to ensure all accounts are processed accurately and efficiently.Performs referral management and ancillary service functions.Processes referrals and diagnostic tests and forwards to the appropriate clinical, managed care or central sceduling associates per guidelines. Ancillary and specialty appointments are scheduled for the patient at the time of service whenever possible.Provides patient instructions for various procedures, i.e.: lab MRI, x-ray procedures, etc.Provides patient with estimate of out-of-pocket cost associated with an ancillary procedure.Determines if pre-authorization is needed for an ancillary service or referral.Obtains pre-authorization if needed.Responsible for scheduling surgeries and diagnostic testing.WFH Values• Demonstrates a visible working style, acts in a manner that is consistent with and shows commitment to the WFH ValuesSkills/Requirements: High School Diploma or Equivalent Excellent verbal and written communication skills and computer skills. Prior customer service experience required. Previous medical terminology and medical office experience required. Must be familiar with ICD-9 (ICD-10) and CPT coding. Knowledge of health care coverage and benefits preferred. Ability to analyze data, perform multiple tasks and work independently. Must be able to develop and maintain professional, service-oriented working relationships with patients, physicians, co-workers and supervisors. Must be able to understand and comply with policies and procedures. Work requires knowledge of basic grammar and mathematical principles normally required through a high school education, with some postsecondary education preferred. #TrackingJobBody br{line-height:2px;}",Patient Services Representative\Scheduler Job in Milwaukee,"Full Time , Employee","Patient Services Representative\Scheduler Milwaukee, WIUSA Company: Wheaton Franciscan Medical GroupLocation: WFH-St. Joseph 5000 W. Chambers St.FTE: 1.0Shift: VariesShift Start Time: VariesShift End Time: VariesThe Patient Service Representative (PSR) II greets all patients and visitors and answers incoming calls. Obtains and accurately records demographic and insurance information for patients. Schedules patient appointments, procedures and/or diagnostic tests with appropriate physicians and/or departments. Obtains pre-authorization for ancillary or referral appointments, as needed. Efficiently and accurately performs charge entry for both the medical and hospital professional encounters. Acts as a clinic based resource for patients who may have questions related to their physician and hospital bills. Interacts professionally with insurance companies and others to resolve billing issues. Effectively communicates information to internal and external customers, while maintaining a focus on patient service and patient confidentiality. Reviews hospital and/or clinic encounter tickets for completeness, assuring ICD 9 (ICD 10) and CPT codes are present. Investigates and seeks correction of errors. Per established protocols forwards applicable hospital and/or clinic encounter tickets to coder for review prior to charge entry. Assures encounter tickets are returned from coder in a timely manner for charge entry.Treats all patient information confidentially and in accordance with established guidelines.Answers telephones, screens calls, and provides information to patients and other callers.Schedules patient appointments in accordance with established department guidelines. Pleasantly greets assists and directs patients in the office setting.Informs coworkers/providers of patient arrival.Registers patients, obtaining and entering all necessary demographic, insurance and financial information to ensure accurate billing. Verifies and updates accurate patient account information using specified computer applications.Ensures that insurance eligibility is verified prior to the office visit.Prepares patient's medical record prior to office visit Collects co-pays, outstanding balances and deductibles prior to service. Issues receipt and posts paymentsPerforms daily cash handling procedures, deposits, balancing of cash drawer and end-of-day accounting functions. Assures patient signatures according to policy.Documents clear, concise, appropriate and legible messages to ensure physician and associate comprehensionResponds effectively, handles multiple priorities and meets deadlines. Practices and promotes skills which exemplify the Wheaton Franciscan values and philosophy.Communicates effectively with all patients, families and customers to exceed expectations. Promotes and maintains excellence in the patient and family experience.Review patient balances 2 days prior to patient visit. Reviews balances for accuracy along with indicating the date of service and reason for patient balance, for both clinic and hospital balances. Initiates reminder calls to all patients according to established clinic protocol.Proficiently performs data entry functions, posting all charges to appropriate patient accounts and files batches upon completion of charge entry.Communicate and works directly with patients to address billing concerns. Associate seeks to answer, explain and resolve patient billing questions relating to coverage issues and specific payments and patient health care benefits. The need may occur to contact carrier on behalf of patient.Identifies opportunities for improving, streamlining and/or eliminating processing steps between Wheaton Franciscan and payors.Performs those duties necessary to ensure all accounts are processed accurately and efficiently.Performs referral management and ancillary service functions.Processes referrals and diagnostic tests and forwards to the appropriate clinical, managed care or central sceduling associates per guidelines. Ancillary and specialty appointments are scheduled for the patient at the time of service whenever possible.Provides patient instructions for various procedures, i.e.: lab MRI, x-ray procedures, etc.Provides patient with estimate of out-of-pocket cost associated with an ancillary procedure.Determines if pre-authorization is needed for an ancillary service or referral.Obtains pre-authorization if needed.Responsible for scheduling surgeries and diagnostic testing.WFH Values• Demonstrates a visible working style, acts in a manner that is consistent with and shows commitment to the WFH ValuesSkills/Requirements: High School Diploma or Equivalent Excellent verbal and written communication skills and computer skills. Prior customer service experience required. Previous medical terminology and medical office experience required. Must be familiar with ICD-9 (ICD-10) and CPT coding. Knowledge of health care coverage and benefits preferred. Ability to analyze data, perform multiple tasks and work independently. Must be able to develop and maintain professional, service-oriented working relationships with patients, physicians, co-workers and supervisors. Must be able to understand and comply with policies and procedures. Work requires knowledge of basic grammar and mathematical principles normally required through a high school education, with some postsecondary education preferred. #TrackingJobBody br{line-height:2px;}",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Patient-Services-Representative-Scheduler-Job-Milwaukee-WI-US-166700687.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cb39c749ff5506cfa2b1682bb92eed56
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:10:38:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"REQ#BE0136/ BE0137/ BE0138/ BE0185 / Washington, DC – Top Secret or Interim Top Secret ClearanceAre you looking for an opportunity to join a growing company that is innovative, entrepreneurial and mission centered?  Our technical and management consultants work closely with our customers in a dynamic, solution-oriented environment and we invite you to apply to our opening for a Citrix Systems Administrator today.Citrix System Administrator supporting the enterprise Citrix infrastructure for the Department of State.  This position is responsible for maintenance and support of the Citrix platform, Tier III end user support, patching and admin support on the Citrix servers.  In depth knowledge of VDI concepts, virtualization tools required, Citrix certification a plus.  This will be for 2nd and 3rd shifts:2nd Shift: Sunday - Thursday 3pm to 11pm (2 openings)Tuesday - Saturday 3pm to 11pm (2 openings) 3rd ShiftTuesday - Saturday 11pm to 7am (2 openings)Sunday - Thursday 11pm to 7am (2 openings) Job Responsibilities and/or Success Factors:Citrix server administrationPatching Citrix environmentTier III end user supportSupport use of Zero Clients and StratoDesk throughout DoS.Customer support using RemedyReset SessionsRequired skills and experience include:2+ Years of experience, Citrix XenApp, XenServer and Citrix XenDesktop.2+ Years of experience, Windows 2008/2012, Windows 7, SQL Server, MS Office 2007/2010, Active Directory.2+ Years of experience, Application deployment process and functional network troubleshooting.2+ Years of experience, Ability to function in a fast-paced environment with shifting priorities and tight deadlines.2+ Years of experience, Providing complex technical support to end users by investigating and resolving incidents reported in Remedy.2+ Years of experience, Citrix Virtualization.2+ Years of experience, Scripting & automation; must be proficient in the use of VB Script, Power Shell or Perl scripting.2+ Years of experience, Remote access solutions such as IPSec, SSL VPNs and associated data security designs.2+ Years of experience, Strong communication skills.2+ Years of experience, Remedy.Preferred skills and experience include:VMWareAPP-VXenAppXenDesktopVDI concepts",Citrix System Administrator Job in Washington,Full Time,"Washington, DC 20006",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Citrix-System-Administrator-Job-Washington-DC-US-166666443.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7ac01b1c9ad438e8fe21db9fc9df29e9
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:10:16:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"ENERGY FAMILY DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST $12.02 Hour to start plus benefits, position located in Pt. Orchard. Requires High School Diploma or GED plus 2.5 years experience in social services or AA Degree plus one year experience. Must have excellent written and oral communication skills. Requires good basic math skills. This position requires proficiency in MS Word and Excel. Must have knowledge of social service networking, aptitude for making accurate assessments of client needs, ability to handle stress of working with people in crisis, ability to coordinate and track delivery of direct service. Must have reliable transportation to use on the job. Job description and application available weekdays 8:30 AM to 4:00 PM at 845 8th Street, Bremerton, Washington 98337, or at www.kcr.org . Position closes Thursday, May 5, 2016. Kitsap Community Resources is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Posting provided by:",ENERGY FAMILY DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST Job in Bremerton,Full Time,"Bremerton, WA 98337",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/ENERGY-FAMILY-DEVELOPMENT-SPECIALIST-Job-Bremerton-WA-US-166683101.aspx?ch=kitsapsun&mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3a51ab75a77186b30766a022270a06b3
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:10:14:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years. Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care. Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures. Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department. CHRISTUS Spohn Hospital Corpus Christi-Memorial CHRISTUS Spohn Hospital Corpus Christi-Memorial is the region's only Level II Trauma Center and one of only 10 Level II Trauma Centers in Texas. CHRISTUS Spohn Memorial is a 387 bed hospital, offering 24 hour coverage for all surgical / medical emergencies by board certified surgeons and physicians. Memorial services include Emergency Care, Critical Care, Adult Psychiatric Services, Orthopedic, Surgical, Diagnostic, Dental and Ophthalmology services, Family Health Centers and Clinics. All CHRISTUS Spohn hospitals are served by Halo-Flight air ambulance services covering a 26-county area. CHRISTUS Spohn Hospital Memorial is affiliated with Texas A&M University System Health Science Center College of Medicine -- Family Practice Residency Program and Emergency Medicine Residency Program. Job Requirements Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. Current Texas State RN license. CPR (American Heart Association). ACLS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. CPI within 90 days of hire/transfer date. TNCC within 18 months of hire/transfer date. ENPC or PALS within 18 months of hire/transfer date One year experience in emergency department or critical care nursing preferred *Sign On Bonus and Relocation Assistance Available - *Sign On Bonus amount determined by years of experience",Registered Nurse - Emergency Room Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Emergency-Room-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166644174.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,7398589620e627549a918bfd44269136
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:10:00:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryWould you like to join a dynamic development team that is developing cutting-edge analysis techniques for a dynamic language?  Are you passionate about finding user coding mistakes with program analysis?  Do you have a desire to apply compiler technologies that transform source code?  If you answered yes to these questions, we want to talk with you.Successful candidates will join an engineering team that shares a passion for getting things done and delivering well crafted, high quality C++ code.  The technology our group develops is critical to the continued success of MATLAB and over a million MATLAB users will benefit from your work.  As a part of the Language Analysis team, you’ll be working on the MATLAB Front-End to improve on the execution of MATLAB code.  You’ll also be able to improve on the static analysis of MATLAB code in the Code Analyzer, finding user coding mistakes before they have even executed the code.Responsibilities Work on lexing, parsing and IR generation for MATLAB code to improve MATLAB performance Create unified front-end services for use within MathWorks products Design and implement new features in the MATLAB Code Analyzer Actively contribute to the design and evolution of the MATLAB language Improve the quality of the existing code base through continuous refactoring Work collaboratively with cross functional teamsMinimum Qualifications A bachelor's degree and 7 years of professional work experience (or a master's degree and 5 years of professional work experience, or a PhD degree) is required. Proficiency with C++Additional Qualifications Strong software design skills and proficiency with algorithm development Experience with developing compiler technologies in either academic or professional setting Knowledge of MATLAB is a plus Why MathWorks?It’s the chance to collaborate with bright, passionate people. It’s contributing to software products that make a difference in the world. And it’s being part of a company with an incredible commitment to doing the right thing – for each individual, our customers, and the local community. MathWorks develops MATLAB and Simulink, the leading technical computing software used by engineers and scientists. The company employs 3000 people in 15 countries, with headquarters in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S.A. MathWorks is privately held and has been profitable every year since its founding in 1984. MathWorks, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",Senior C++ Software Engineer - Compiler Engineer for MATLAB Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-C-Software-Engineer-Compiler-Engineer-for-MATLAB-Job-Natick-MA-US-166661889.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bb99f6971d595693eaa221d110647ed3
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:09:52:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Marion  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Marion 62959,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-MARION-166726387.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=1,,General/Other: Medical/Health,7b334d66356696a32e45335f9a7a325b
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:09:21:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking LPNs to work for a client in the Greater Louisville, KY Area:•Primary Care Setting•Full Time Position•12 Hours Shifts / 3 Days Per Week•Day and Overnight Shifts Available•Competitive Hourly Rate•Contract Assignment•Active KY LPN License Required Assignments Beginning ASAP!Please reply with your contact information and resume to learn more.",Licensed Practical Nurses (LPN) Job in Louisville,Full Time,"Louisville, KY 40218",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurses-LPN-Job-Louisville-KY-US-166748148.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=5,,,995cec1e104381490d60bc1e700cd59b
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:09:20:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Clinical Counselor: Duties to include completion of diagnostic assessments regarding clients' needs for substance related treatment, treatment planning, group and individual and family counseling, and discharge planning.  Qualifications: LPC, LISW-CP, LMFT, LMSW, or Master's Degree in a human service-related field and working toward licensure. Applicant must be willing to explore and learn cutting-edge treatment modalities and possess excellent documentation and time-management skills.  Experience working with substance use disorders.  Experience working with children and the family unit is preferred.    Send resume to:  SBHS, Attn: Katie Howell, PO Box 136, Conway, SC  29528.     EOE.Resumes must be submitted with cover letter.",Clinical Counselor - Outpatient Facility Job in Conway,Full Time,"Conway, SC 29526",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Counselor-Outpatient-Facility-Job-Conway-SC-US-127520379.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),51fe3b839614a9dc69d85a74f62a06bd
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:09:11:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Now Offering a $10,000 sign on bonus to successful candidate!We are seeking a transformational Director of Nursing for the Women & Children’s Hospital of Buffalo who is committed to developing and implementing new initiatives, and is dedicated to share in the excitement and challenges of leading “best in class” care to our patients, families and the Western New York community.Join the Women & Children’s Hospital of Buffalo as the Maternity Services Director of Nursing and be an innovative leader of our highly skilled, patient-focused team of healthcare professional who represent the best in providing safe quality patient care.  As the regional perinatal center, with 3000 deliveries per year, Mother-Baby and High-Risk Antepartum Units, and a Level III NICU, Women & Children’s is the only hospital in Western New York with immediate access to a complete range of Pediatric Specialists, Board Certified Maternal-Fetal Specialists and, 24/7 Laborists coverage on Labor & Delivery. Quality measures include: reduction of inductions prior to 39 weeks; reduction of cesarean sections; breastfeeding with skin-to-skin at birth; and the recent launch of the “Baby Friendly” initiative demonstrating our true commitment to the education and support of our moms and their babies to increase breastfeeding rates.Women & Children’s Hospital of Buffalo, a Kaleida Health facility and teaching hospital for the University at Buffalo School of Medicine and Biomedical Sciences, is the regional center for comprehensive and state –of-the-art pediatric, neonatal, perinatal and obstetrical services in Western New York and beyond.  For more information, visit our website at www.wchob.org.  As Director of Nursing - Maternity Services, you will be a key leader and facilitator in the planning and relocation process for all Maternity Services as we prepare for our exciting new future – the John R. Oishei Children’s Hospital   On October 8, 2014, we broke ground for the construction of a new state-of- the-art 12 floor hospital.  As we continue to be the only freestanding children’s hospital in New York, the vision of the new John R. Oishei Children’s Hospital is to be recognized as the innovator, highest-quality, highest value provider and partners, and regional referral center for women’s and children’s care at Kaleida Health, Western New York and beyond. Fall 2017 is the expected completion date of the new hospital to be located on the Buffalo Niagara Medical Campus.Job Description – The Director of Nursing – Maternity Services reports to the Chief Nursing Officer and  is responsible for providing site level leadership to patient care and service delivery areas focused on Labor & Delivery, Mother-Baby and High-Risk Antepartum/GYN including oversight of staff, physician satisfaction, budgetary and quality issues.  The Director Nursing - Maternity Services is accountable for the overall administration and coordination of the service line.  Coordination involves planning and directing functions associated with the business, financial, and clinical activities including but not limited to volume growth drivers, regulatory compliance, purchasing and inventory, marketing, operational/quality performance and monitoring, physician and hospital team member education, and potential new program development. Accountable for the smooth transition of Maternity Services to the John R. Oishei Children’s Hospital inclusive of planning, process development, quality measures and successful overall move. Requirements – Current NYS Registration as a Registered Professional Nurse. Bachelor of Science degree in Nursing or related field. Master’s  degree in Nursing, Healthcare, Business Administration or a related field.  10 years of experience in obstetrical patient care delivery.  5 years of progressive management experience including, budget, quality improvement and knowledge of regulatory and accrediting agency standards.Preferred Qualification -  Labor-management relations within a unionized environment, facilitation of construction or move to new hospital/facility, knowledgeable in DNV & ISO standards.  We look forward to hearing for you and thank you for considering Kaleida Health where - Caring for you is what we do!  ",Director of Nursing Maternity Services Job in Buffalo,Full Time Employee,"Buffalo, NY 14203",,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Nursing-Maternity-Services-Job-Buffalo-NY-US-163733253.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=19,,Nursing,3edc83bbbcd1893d70df6364e576148e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:08:20:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Volt Workforce Solutions is looking for a VP of Product to work with our client, an innovative, employee owned real-estate software and service company located in Fargo, ND.The VP of Hosting is responsible for ensuring our two data centers that host the Flexmls systems are highly available (current SLA of 99.9% uptime), fast, and scalable.Job Responsibilities/Duties:•*The ideal candidate will have experience with real estate software and multiple listing services**Candidates for this position will have a Bachelors Degree in CS/IT/IS or related field and 5+ years of experience with:•Scaling data centers•Ensuring high-availability•Leading teams•Building strong relationships with colleagues on development and support teams•Creating a positive work environment•Proactive and reactive downtime communications to all stakeholders•Root cause analysis of production reliability and availability issues•Monitoring and prioritizing planned and emergency application fixes•Monitoring and determining the effects of maintenance on production systems•Coordinating with team members in deep dive debugging issues•Identifying the need and budget for resources based on current and foreseeable workload•Disaster recovery planning and dry run exercises; set and meet recovery point objective (RPO) and recovery time objective (RTO) metrics•Managing consistency of OS and patch versions across systems; decommissioning EOL systems•Monitoring service providers to ensure quality of service•Performing routine security checks and verifications of servers and networks•Directing and reviewing the work of other personnel•Reporting to the CEO and BoardThis is a direct hire opportunity located in Fargo, ND and is offered through Volt Workforce Solutions. Volt offers competitive compensation, the chance to work with some of the world's leading companies, and a staff committed to helping you take the next step on your career path.Technologies used:•Linux (Red Hat and CentOS) on Intel (Dell) hardware•SAN (Dell Equallogic)•Security, Firewall, IPS/IDS: Sonicwall and PaloAlto Networks•Databases: IBM DB2, PostgreSQL, MySQL, MongoDB, Redis•Networking infrastructure: HP Procurve, Dell Force10•Cloud Computing using Amazon AWSProvide leadership to Operations teamVolt is a dedicated IT recruiting firm, committed to simplifying the job search process. Are you searching for an IT opportunity that is both challenging and fulfilling? That's the attitude we're seeking. Great companies rely on Volt for the talent to bring their IT projects to life, so we are always looking for exceptional IT people who want to exercise and expand their skills and knowledge. We admit, we've set a high bar for the caliber of IT professionals we place, and that's why we treat our field consultants with respect every step of the way. Check us out at www.volt.com Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer",VP of Hosting Job in Fargo,Full Time Employee,"Fargo, ND",,http://jobview.monster.com/VP-of-Hosting-Job-Fargo-ND-US-166688619.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=3,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,e2b1cd380169a2850c9eeaa5f7f12226
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:08:18:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years. Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care. Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures. Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department.Job Requirements Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. Current Texas State RN license. CPR (American Heart Association. Oncology Clinical Nurse Certification (ONC™) (Chemo) or Oncology Nursing Society (ONS) preferred. Excellent interpersonal and communication skills. Review of patient records to ensure accurate ant complete nursing notes and required charting elements. Ability to assess patient and threat accordingly in emergency rooms situations. Ability to calculate BSA and ANC in patients receiving chemotherapy. Understand patient charge process for services rendered. Education of patients and caregivers about therapeutic effects and management of chemotherapy side effects.",Registered Nurse - Med/Surg Oncology Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Med-Surg-Oncology-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166644192.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,042213fa358100fbc5613db5825485ac
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:08:00:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client, a Fortune 500 located in Cupertino is looking for a Gift Card Project Coordinator.The Gift Card Project Coordinator is responsible for the execution and project management of Gift Card print production. The Coordinator will work closely with a variety of individuals and groups across the following internal organizations: Demand Planning, Product Marketing, Gift Cards Sales, Operations, and Procurement. There will also be a significant amount of external collaboration and coordination with external agencies and print manufacturers.•Issue Work Orders, ensure all projects are on schedule and follow up on milestones•Publish specs for all aspects of the gift card process (card, carrier, integrator, and data)•Maintain specification documents in the internal systems (offerings, specs, proofs)•Participate in weekly documented status calls with printers, outside vendors and key team members•Participate in weekly documented status calls with Integrators on operations•Communicate weekly pipeline reports to internal team members•Identify and troubleshoot potential ""delay"" challenges, being the expert at creating and communicating creative solutions•Work with worldwide team members, retailers and internal and external partners to capture all project requirementsIn today’s job market, “who you know” matters more than ever – and that’s why you should get to know Volt. We’re one of the world’s largest recruiting companies, yet our success is built one successful placement at a time. Each of our recruiters has niche industry expertise, committed to connecting top talent with respected companies.Through Volt's Military Heroes Program, Volt secures the talents of American's veterans and encourages their dependents and spouses to contact Volt. Volt is a member of the Military Spouse Employment Partnership and is proud to support the Wounded Warrior Project. http://www.voltmilitary.com/site/8417/commitment.html For more opportunities, connect with us online at volt.com/NorCal.Volt is an equal opportunity employer.*Bachelor's degree required and 3-5 years' experience in print, project management or supply chain management environment•Experience with PDM / PLM tools•Strong attention to detail and operational workflow dynamics to effectively track and analyze the status within the procurement process•Proactive communicator with the ability to troubleshoot issues while ensuring on-time delivery to distribution centers.•Ability to multi-task and utilize resources to execute tasks within a deadline oriented environment•Excellent communication and negotiating skills•Commitment to continuous process improvement initiatives and ability to solve problems creatively•Highly motivated and high level of initiative; inspires confidence to work independently and in support of department goals and business objectives•Ability to work in a fast paced environment•Proficient in MS ExcelAdditional Requirements:*At times the individual will be expected to work extended hours that may fall over evenings or weekends during peak periods.•Start Time: 8:00 AM Hours: 8:00am to 5:00pm•Location: Santa Clara Valley CA United States•Must be an expert in Agile•** Publishing specs in agile- Agile 50% (building bom's/ excel) 50% production orders. (data testing)•Filemaker is a plus•Volume: Around 80 projects weekly.•Work with outside print vendors publish pipeline reports, work with worldwide retailers, oversee global card shipments project lifecycle 8-10 weeks.•Must have mac experience•* Sustaining BOM'S /documents changes•Excel working with oversees vendors. (Dublin and France)•Data testing on orders.",Gift Card Project Coordinator Job in Cupertino,Full Time Employee,"Our Client, a Fortune 500 located in Cupertino is looking for a Gift Card Project Coordinator.The Gift Card Project Coordinator is responsible for the execution and project management of Gift Card print production. The Coordinator will work closely with a variety of individuals and groups across the following internal organizations: Demand Planning, Product Marketing, Gift Cards Sales, Operations, and Procurement. There will also be a significant amount of external collaboration and coordination with external agencies and print manufacturers.•Issue Work Orders, ensure all projects are on schedule and follow up on milestones•Publish specs for all aspects of the gift card process (card, carrier, integrator, and data)•Maintain specification documents in the internal systems (offerings, specs, proofs)•Participate in weekly documented status calls with printers, outside vendors and key team members•Participate in weekly documented status calls with Integrators on operations•Communicate weekly pipeline reports to internal team members•Identify and troubleshoot potential ""delay"" challenges, being the expert at creating and communicating creative solutions•Work with worldwide team members, retailers and internal and external partners to capture all project requirementsIn today’s job market, “who you know” matters more than ever – and that’s why you should get to know Volt. We’re one of the world’s largest recruiting companies, yet our success is built one successful placement at a time. Each of our recruiters has niche industry expertise, committed to connecting top talent with respected companies.Through Volt's Military Heroes Program, Volt secures the talents of American's veterans and encourages their dependents and spouses to contact Volt. Volt is a member of the Military Spouse Employment Partnership and is proud to support the Wounded Warrior Project. http://www.voltmilitary.com/site/8417/commitment.html For more opportunities, connect with us online at volt.com/NorCal.Volt is an equal opportunity employer.*Bachelor's degree required and 3-5 years' experience in print, project management or supply chain management environment•Experience with PDM / PLM tools•Strong attention to detail and operational workflow dynamics to effectively track and analyze the status within the procurement process•Proactive communicator with the ability to troubleshoot issues while ensuring on-time delivery to distribution centers.•Ability to multi-task and utilize resources to execute tasks within a deadline oriented environment•Excellent communication and negotiating skills•Commitment to continuous process improvement initiatives and ability to solve problems creatively•Highly motivated and high level of initiative; inspires confidence to work independently and in support of department goals and business objectives•Ability to work in a fast paced environment•Proficient in MS ExcelAdditional Requirements:*At times the individual will be expected to work extended hours that may fall over evenings or weekends during peak periods.•Start Time: 8:00 AM Hours: 8:00am to 5:00pm•Location: Santa Clara Valley CA United States•Must be an expert in Agile•** Publishing specs in agile- Agile 50% (building bom's/ excel) 50% production orders. (data testing)•Filemaker is a plus•Volume: Around 80 projects weekly.•Work with outside print vendors publish pipeline reports, work with worldwide retailers, oversee global card shipments project lifecycle 8-10 weeks.•Must have mac experience•* Sustaining BOM'S /documents changes•Excel working with oversees vendors. (Dublin and France)•Data testing on orders.",,http://jobview.monster.com/Gift-Card-Project-Coordinator-Job-Cupertino-CA-US-166692969.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=20,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,fe9697bbcc83176fc7db0d8b9a7ae24d
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:07:38:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client knows that connecting 1.5 Billion people around the world takes every one of us. That's why they work to find, grow, and keep diverse talent while creating an inclusive work environment where they build the best products to connect the world. The team partners directly with our Employee Resource Groups as well as our Recruitment, People Operations, and Human Resource Business Partner teams to ensure that each Person is positioned to make a meaningful impact.As the Engagement & Recruiting Lead for Veterans, you'll develop a deep understanding of our Veterans initiatives, help cultivate our longer term roadmap and work closely with multiple cross-functional partners to find, grow and keep top diverse talent across the company.o Partner with Recruiting Leads, Managers, HR Business Partners and Diversity to develop, execute and operationalize data driven, tailored strategies to find, grow and keep diverse talento Research and analyze external talent sources, partner organizations, and events, focused on qualified Veteran candidates, to create customized recruitment approacho Collaborate with Employee Resource Group leadership, HR Business Partners and Diversity to support strategies for retention, engagement and promotion of diverse talento Use influence to drive engagement and accountability across partnerso Provide relevant data, analysis and recommendations to guide decision-making related to strategic recruitment and retention effortso Ensure best practice implementation for compliance with VEVRAA requirements in the U.S., including self-id process and reportingIn today’s job market, “who you know” matters more than ever – and that’s why you should get to know Volt. We’re one of the world’s largest recruiting companies, yet our success is built one successful placement at a time. Each of our recruiters has niche industry expertise, committed to connecting top talent with respected companies.Through Volt's Military Heroes Program, Volt secures the talents of American's veterans and encourages their dependents and spouses to contact Volt. Volt is a member of the Military Spouse Employment Partnership and is proud to support the Wounded Warrior Project. http://www.voltmilitary.com/site/8417/commitment.html For more opportunities, connect with us online at volt.com/NorCal.Volt is an equal opportunity employer.o 4+ years of experience in Veteran recruitment, talent management, project management, or strategic operationso Experience building strong relationships and influencing others while working in a cross functional environment, with all levels of the businesso Detail-oriented and organized with a track record of taking the initiative to go the next step to create a better solution or product with limited guidanceo Experience designing data-driven programs through demonstrated research and analytical skillso Effective consulting, communication and facilitation skillso Bachelor's DegreePreferred Qualifications:o Prior military service, preferredo Current knowledge and experience with latest regulatory changes and reporting obligations related to affirmative action/VEVRAA compliance, preferred",Engagement & Recruiting Lead for Veterans Job in Menlo Park,Full Time Employee,"Menlo Park, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Engagement-Recruiting-Lead-for-Veterans-Job-Menlo-Park-CA-US-166692873.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=12,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,ab82771bb0e736bba24b50c59e58dacf
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:07:18:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Direct applicants only. No 3rd party submittals will be accepted.Volt Workforce Solutions is seeking a Desktop Support Technician for a temporary opportunity in Redmond, WA. We are looking for someone who can be responsible for supporting IT services and is responsible for service delivery and customer satisfaction, in a mode consistent with the franchised IT environment and architecture. This team delivers the complete lifecycle of IT services for employees, from on boarding and set up, to upgrade, installation, troubleshooting, repair and replacement of hardware and software solutions, asset recovery and protection. The person in this position must have strong overall IT technical skills, while also offering excellent customer service and superior organizational skills.Job Duties:• Provide 1st tier support to employees related to their IT resources• Install desktop computers, laptops, monitors and other IT related equipment• Utilize SCCM and WDS to image and prep computers for deployment• Ghost (backup) computers for data retention purposes• Oversee the shipping and receiving process for hardware assets• Handle all RMA requests with vendors to ensure the IT equipment is working properly• Work with purchasers to make ordering decisions based on the current ticket volume• Install and configure computers, telephones, and other common devices• Provide after-hours or weekend support when needed to perform upgrades and maintenanceThis is a temporary Desktop Support Technician position in Redmond, WA and is offered through Volt Workforce Solutions. We provide proven, flexible recruiting and workforce management solutions to companies of all sizes, from innovative startups to Fortune 500 clients.Desktop Support Technician Qualifications:• 2-4 years of experience building, deploying and troubleshooting IT systems• Associates or Bachelor's degree related to IT is preferred• A+, Network+, and other IT certifications are preferred but not required• Able to troubleshoot computer hardware, printers and IP networks in a Windows 7 environment• Working knowledge of audio visual equipment• Ability lift up to 50 pounds unassisted• Excellent written, verbal and phone communications skills are a mustTo learn more about Volt, please visit: http://www.volt.com . To see more of our job postings, you may also visit: http://jobs.volt.com Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Desktop Support Technician Job in Redmond,Full Time Employee,"Redmond, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Desktop-Support-Technician-Job-Redmond-WA-US-166688489.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=15,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,c2b868e5f4efc34ca45c29e75e05e0d0
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:07:02:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"The IT Department of the Medical Specialist of the Palm Beaches has a newly created position open for a Full-TimeDistribution Technician who is responsible for incoming/outgoing, sorting, scanning and distributing correspondence, mail and packages throughout the MSPB office’s while maintaining patient’s medical records according to MSPB standards.  Will send and receive all requests for patient information. Work return mail notifications from the post office and postmark all outgoing mail.  Liaison between MSPB Attorney and external Medical Records group to ensure that all subpoenaed medical records are completed in a timely manner.  Reconciles monthly the requests received and the requests processed by the external Medical Records group.  Coordination of the centralized supply distribution.  Distributes external and interoffice mail and packages throughout the office.  Sort daily USPS and courier mail and distribute to appropriate departments.  Check email on a daily basis.  Shall cooperatively work with outside agencies to help patients.  High school diploma or equivalent.  3 – 5 years’ experience working in a mailroom and office setting.  Intermediate Computer Literacy with basic knowledge of office procedures and business machines.  Ability to occasionally lift and/or carry such articles as file folders and small boxes up to 25 pounds.  Send resume to careers@mspb.mdDO NOT USE THE APPLY BUTTON.  FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS IN THE AD.   ",Distribution Technician Job in Greenacres,Full Time,"Greenacres, FL 33463",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Distribution-Technician-Job-Greenacres-FL-US-166163781.aspx?ch=coxwestpalm&mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=18,,,705e391deda75ea383ee6d1f5206f855
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:07:01:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:We are looking for customer service candidates for a fun opportunity here in Las Vegas with willingness to travel overseas after a 6 month training!. The role is promoting and selling a product with in food and beverage (non alcoholic) so we need candidates whom are great listeners, have a friendly and outgoing personality and who enjoy speaking to customers!You will be working in an office as well as attending trade shows. Great computer skills are needed!Down the road travel is needed. In order to communicate effectively with the market we ask that if you apply we strongly prefer you are bi-lingual in Spanish.Send your resume today! This is a base role but once trained in sales you will receive commission! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1032934 Job Experience:,, Bilingual Spanish, Chinese, Japanese",Customer Service - Fun Opportunity with travel! Bi-lingual Preferred. Job in Las Vegas,Full Time,"Las Vegas, NV 89119",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Customer-Service-Fun-Opportunity-with-travel!-Bi-lingual-Preferred-Job-Las-Vegas-NV-US-166747523.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,Up to $10.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),4fb767ec5a938d94be4be25001d98d8e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:06:23:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description CHRISTUS St. Patrick Hospital is seeking a registered nurse to become an integral part of our Surgery team.  She/he assesses, plans, implements, evaluates and documents nursing care in accordance with facility and departmental policies and in accordance with standards of professional nursing practice   Responsibilities include:  Assuming responsibility for currency of knowledge and skills; incorporating patient and associate safety practices and guidelines, to promote a safe environment; Routinely uses time management to prioritize, organize, and complete daily assignments in a timely manner; Communicates effectively and respectfully with patients, family members, hospital associates, and Licensed Independent Practitioners. This position is accountable for the quality of nursing services delivered by self or others who are under his/her direction.Job Requirements Education and Training:  Graduate of an accredited RN program. Licensure:  An unencumbered license to practice as a Registered Nurse within the state of Louisiana Experience:  one year experience within an acute care setting is required; one year experience in an acute OR setting is required Certification:  Current American Heart Association Basic Life Support or completion required; Certified Nurse of Operating Room (CNOR) preferred. Other: Excellent written and verbal communication skills; knowledge of scope and role of the Registered Nurse, Licensed Practical Nurse, Nursing Assistant, Patient Care Technician and Unit Clerk.",RN Surgery Job in Lake Charles,"Part Time, Employee","Lake Charles, LA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Surgery-Job-Lake-Charles-LA-US-166643939.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,1c134ee9c1ec58dbd3e55cfdedcdda74
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:06:22:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org)is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  TheCenter provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, earlyintervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services.The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability torelate to individualsand families of varied ethnic and cultural backgrounds, ages, educational levelsand economic circumstances with respect and dignity.  Excellent verbal,written and computer skills are necessary in order to work effectively andcollaboratively with clients, collaborating agencies and communityprofessionals, as well as, maintaining proper documentation.  Clinical staff members must be able totake and pass without major modification a course in Handle with Care, whichrequires hands-on, physical components to ensure the safety of the clients andstaff. Clinical staff members must possess reliable transportation, ability toacquire an F endorsement on driver's license and transport clients.HRMCis an EOE. HRMC conducts Background Checks, Drivers License Record, Degree Verification,and Drug Screens at hire. Employment is contingent upon clean drug screen,background check and driving record. Additionally, certain programs are subjectto TB Screening and/or Testing.  Bilingual applicants are encouraged toapply.HRMC iscurrently seeking a qualified and enthusiastic professional for the following position:  Crisis Services Masters Level Clinician.JOB REQUIREMENTSEducation/Knowledge: A Masters degree in a health-related field of counseling,psychology, social work, sociology and experience working with individuals withmental illness and/or co-occurring diagnoses. Required Master's level licensed,LMSW accepted. Experience:Must have course work and or experience in the areas of cultural diversity,human development, etiology and treatment of mental illness, alcohol and drugabuse, physical and sexual abuse, suicide, and crisis intervention.  Must have experience in working with specialpopulations including individuals with Severe and Persistent Mental Illnessesand Co-Occurring Disorders. Prefer at least 4 years of experience working withchildren and youth.  Computer experienceis helpful. Experience working in a crisis setting preferred.  Physical:Exposure to biological hazards. Hearing of normal and soft tones. Close eye work.Valid driver's license. Lifting up to 50 lbs. Pushing/pulling up to 150 lbs.Frequent sitting, standing, walking, bending, stooping, and reaching.JOB SUMMARYCrisis Services TeamLeader is responsible for administrative tasks including reports, scheduling,and training. Team Leader will provide supervision to designated employees.Clinical responsibilities include on-call and clinical direction while on site.In addition to supervisory responsibilities, team leader will completeface-to-face assessment of clients experiencing a psychiatric emergency todetermine level of service needed. Facilitate referral-related activities to link clients with neededservices.  Follow-up on client to ensuretreatment is being rendered.  Completeassessments at main site and in the community setting. Requiredto be certified in and adequately implement verbal and physical de-escalationtechniques that include a wide range of bodily movements including but notlimited to grasping, holding another person, going down on knees, running, andwalking.Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1276&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Crisis Services Masters Counselor Residential Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Crisis-Services-Masters-Counselor-Residential-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-166706419.aspx?mescoid=2100317001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,2a622b8379b207598a2a4095e95be606
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:05:27:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years. Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care. Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures. Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department.Job Requirements Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. Current Texas State RN license. CPR (American Heart Association) ACLS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. PALS within 6 months of hire/transfer date.  One-year experience in surgical services nursing preferred.  Able to assess, plan, implement and evaluate nursing care.",Registered Nurse - Out Patient Surgery Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Out-Patient-Surgery-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166644148.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,f7462b0d14e63dc0344a42770c68615d
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:05:25:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary The purpose of this position is to join and contribute to a service conscious Pharmacy team who will consistently build relationships with patients by exceeding their needs and providing safe, accurate and efficient care to achieve optimal patient, Team Member and Company outcomes. Job Responsibilities Immediately acknowledge and welcome patients with compassion and a smile at all pharmacy entry points. Model excellent patient care by respecting, engaging and enthusiatically meeting or exceeding all patient needs including processing orders in person and by phone, directing patients to products and merchandise and referring appropriate questions concerning prescriptions and over the counter medicine to the pharmacist. Adhere to all company, state and federal policies, laws and regulations including HIPAA and Pseudoephedrine sales. Finalize sales using cash register according to established procedures including the Point of Sale Policies. Maintain a neat and clean work environment to ensure company and government requirements are met. Assist with maintaining proper inventory levels by ordering, receiving, stocking and rotating drugs and other supplies per company policy and procedures. Answer telephone in a polite and timely manner and ensure accurate information is exchanged and customer is satisfied. Resolve customer questions and concerns by communicating effectively with the customer and the management team/support staff in an efficient manner. File written prescriptions daily. Assist team members with tasks to ensure department runs efficiently. Use the pharmacy computer to complete all actions necessary to maximize efficiency and provide optimal patient care at drop-off, will call, drive thru, phone, filling and order receiving, including but not limited to: search for patients and profiles, determine dates of fill and pick-up, determine prescriptions sent to Central Fill, quote cash prices of prescriptions, check on-hand counts of medications,enter invoices. Have knowledge of all appropriate service and business metrics and assist team on action plans to improve outcomes. Assist in the execution of all company initiatives and programs. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift Any Hours Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Normal office environment Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Pulling Sorting Standing Filing Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Telephone Usage Typing Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Data Entry Pushing Twisting Weighing Equipment Used Intercom System Cash Register Deposit Safe Drive Thru Fill Station Ordering Machine Safety Cutter Scale WalkieTalkie",Pharmacy Tech ( part time ) Poland Giant Eagle Job in Poland,Full Time Employee,"Poland, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Pharmacy-Tech-part-time-Poland-Giant-Eagle-Job-Poland-OH-US-166118803.aspx?mescoid=2900524001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,41058650609b2c80baa8578c926fd6d7
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:05:23:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Responsible for effective management of patient care delivery: Completes and documents assessment within period established by policy/procedure. Completes and documents reassessment of patient needs according to department standard. Initiates, updates and communicates an appropriate multidisciplinary plan of care based on identified problems and/or patient needs. Collaborates with patient/family/physician and other disciplines to coordinate the plan of care. Administers and documents medications/treatment safely following Medication Administration Policy and Procedure. Evaluates patient response to care, revises plan of care as necessary and documents appropriately Recognizes change or urgent situations in patient condition and intervenes appropriately. Provides patient and/or family with information relative to treatment plan, diagnostic/surgical procedures, disease process, and care after discharge. Initiates collaboration and documents appropriate teaching, considering age, cultural and religious beliefs, and barriers to learning. Evaluates effectiveness of teaching and provides appropriate follow-up. Provides leadership and direction in accordance with departmental goals and objectives. Delegates duties based on position and level of competence and the complexity of patient's needs. Assists team members in preparing the lab before each case; also stocking rooms with pertinentsupplies at the end of each day. Monitors supply use, charges and availability of supplies. Provides post catheterization care to patient according to established policy. Skilled in radiation safety and monitors safety of personnel. Monitors EKG and hemodynamics, prepares appropriate paperwork, checks consents prior to case and when assigned as the monitor person during cases. Prepares the patient and assist the cardiologist using sterile technique when assigned as the scrub person during cases. As circulating nurse, administers drugs as ordered by attending cardiologist when needed. Monitors status of patient and reports changes in condition to physician. Skillfully communicates with team leader and team members to provide quality care. Performs Point of Care Testing within scope of licensure; accurately performs testing according to the approved procedure and limits testing to only those tests for which competency has been assessed and operator is deemed qualified by designated trainer. Healthstream (HLC) modules completed by assigned date. Complete Associate Self-evaluation and give to Supervisor by assigned date. Attend 2 of the Associate Round Tables per fiscal year. Maintain licensure or certification without lapse, if required for the position. Maintain BCLS/ACLS certification, if required for the position. Job Requirements  POSITION QUALIFICATIONS A. Education/SkillsGraduate from an Accredited School of Nursing. B. ExperienceMinimum of 1 year of experience in a critical care setting.  Prior Cath Lab experience preferred. C. Licenses, Registrations, or CertificationsCurrent registration with the Louisiana State Board of Registered Nurse Examiners. BLS provider, ACLS provider as required by departmental policy.  ",Registered Nurse - Cardiac Cath Lab Job in Shreveport,"Full Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Cardiac-Cath-Lab-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166643861.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,8173556aca9f83b8d7570ec18454e328
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:05:17:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manager, Marketing and Business Analytics -Audience Advertising Analytics Description DIRECTV is looking for a highly motivated out of the box thinking individual with strong data analysis and strategic skills to join its research and analytics team. This individual will partner with the Ad Sales group to provide campaign analysis, insight and direction for our Audience Measurement and Addressable Advertising client businesses. Analysis will include client analytics, targeting optimization, metric performance, campaign evaluation and demographic profiling and custom reports for advertisers and campaigns. Duties/Responsibilities Perform quantitative analysis in order to provide insights and actionable recommendations to improve and optimize targeting capabilities for addressable advertising campaigns. Supports Senior Manager and Director in working in partnership with external clients and media agencies to evaluate the business impact of DIRECTV addressable advertising. Help to establish processes, methodologies and benchmarks for addressable advertising analytics. Formulate individual analysis plans, determine the data requirements from both internal and external systems, extract and manipulate the data, conduct analyses, determine the conclusions and communicate to senior management and to the working team in a concise, organized fashion. Effectively work with cross-functional teams and/or with various departments that include, but not limited to: Advertising Sales, Business Analytics, Business Intelligence, Engineering and Revenue-Strategy-Planning. Experience working with external data vendors. Drive additional client specific custom report(s)ing Experience creating dashboards and insightful actionable analytics. Some travel may be required. Requirements Must possess at least 3-5+ years in data analytics or related field Must possess bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science or related quantitative fields. Preference will be given to candidates with an advanced degree Must demonstrate experience doing hands-on analysis and strategic thinking ability Must be able to convey analytic findings into strategic implications and actionable recommendations Must be proficient in SAS and/or SQL. Accessing and formatting big data a big plus. Experience with large transactional databases is required. Subscription data experience is a plus Basic knowledge of advertising sales industry, measurement currency, dynamics is required Interest in, and experience working with campaigns and targeting is required. Conceptual knowledge of direct marketing or addressable advertising, STB data, RPD data is a big plus Experience in cable, broadcast, and/or television industry a plus, but not required Must be detail-oriented Must be able to work in high-stress environment with constantly shifting priorities Must possess expert abilities in Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint, and Word",Sr Marketing Database Mgr Job in Chicago,"Full Time , Employee","Chicago, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Marketing-Database-Mgr-Job-Chicago-IL-US-166613273.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,770bd23e7c1758a091554c560ee5f8ff
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:04:47:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients.  Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care.  Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development. 1. Uses critical thinking skills to assess the basic physical, psychological, social, cultural, spiritual, and developmental needs of patients and families.  Communicates findings to appropriate healthcare team members. a.       Collects data from all applicable resources; organizes assessment data so that it is complete and accessible; and then documents findings (legibly) in the medical record or other appropriate documents. b.      Recognizes alterations in health status, anticipates onset of patient care crisis situation and communicates findings appropriately. c.      Assesses, reassesses, and manages pain.2. Develops and uses a specific plan of care and modifies it to meet individual patient needs using evidence-based practices.  Implements patient care and therapeutic procedures.  Monitors and documents progression of treatment and teaching goals. a.      Identifies and prioritizes the patient's present/potential problems. b.      Plans appropriate nursing interventions specific to the patient's problems, incorporating the patient's cultural, age-specific, and developmental needs. c.      Competently performs nursing interventions and procedures for the patient population (s) served consistent with scientific principles of nursing and policy and procedure.   d.      Provides education to patients and family concerning diagnosis, treatment, and hospitalization. e.      Reviews and updates plan of care according to patient's needs and/or regulatory agency requirements. f.       Documents and involves patient, family, and other healthcare workers in plan of care decisions in accordance with HIPAA requirements.3. Evaluates the care and treatments provided to the patient and the patient response to the care and treatments.  Performs timely re-assessment and documentation:a.      Evaluates patient's response to treatment/care and modifies plan of care as needed. b.      Evaluates patient and/or significant others ability to perform self care and procedures prior to discharge.c.      Records patient's response to prescribed treatment and other significant data.1. Anticipates admission/discharge/transfer needs to facilitate patient flow.a.      Identifies potential/actual discharge/transfer needs of patients upon admission and as patients' conditions change.b.      Identifies need for and/or follows-up on referrals to ensure identified problems are addressed.c.      Incorporates other disciplines into plan of care according to patient's needs.d.      Evaluates patients and/or significant other's understanding of discharge instructions based on ability to verbalize and/or give return demonstration.e.       Expedites admission/discharges/transfers.f.       Participates in a process of communication with the multi-disciplinary team to facilitate the progress of the patient through the continuum of care. #LI-SH1Job Requirements 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Orthopedic-Full-Time-Night-Weekend-Rotation-Medical-Center-San-Antonio-TX-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166644053.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,10c99082634de9eac3461610c3d68fa1
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:04:12:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fortune 500 global manufacturer seeks new grad or lesser-experience Electrical Engineer to work on PLCs, process design improvements, and similar activities. Join a leading global supplier with state-of-the-art technology and equipment. Huge investments have been made to this site in the past few years. Local to Detroit MI with a strong relocation package available for non-local candidates. Start your career out right!Responsibilities for the Controls EngineerMaintain and improve PLC systemsTroubleshoot PLC and line-associated failuresDiagnose and implement process design improvementsImprove quality and productivity while reducing costAnalyze process dataRequirements for the Controls EngineerBS Electrical Engineering or higher requiredKnowledge of basic industrial control systemsKnowledge of PLCs and AC/DC motor drivesFamiliarity of project engineering and working on project teamsBenefits for the Controls EngineerGreat benefits as befit a permanent direct-hire position with a strong Fortune 500 manufacturerThis Job is located in Detroit, MI -> United States",Controls Engineer - Electrical Engineering/PLCs/Manufacturing Job in Detroit,Full Time Employee,"Detroit, MI 48201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Controls-Engineer-Electrical-Engineering-PLCs-Manufacturing-Job-Detroit-MI-US-166118650.aspx?mescoid=1700195001001&jobPosition=10,"60,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",,6b72d7c280f08d3628b46ab5e2bde455
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:04:11:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"DESCRIPTION:As a Registered Nurse you will be responsible for administering healthcare to ill, injured, convalescent, or disabled patients. You may advise patients on health maintenance and disease prevention or provide case management.Additional responsibilities of the Registered Nurse include:� Monitoring, recording, and reporting symptoms or changes in patients' conditions� Maintaining accurate, detailed reports and records� Recording patients' medical information and vital signs� Ordering, interpreting, and evaluating diagnostic tests to identify and assess patient's condition� Modifying patient treatment plans as indicated by patients' responses and conditionsQUALIFICATIONS:To qualify for the Registered Nurse, you must have effective communication skills and be able to work with individuals of all ages.Additional requirements of the Registered Nurse include:� Current active and valid Licensure or certification� Excellent communication skills� Ability to organize and prioritize with good interpersonal skills� CPR Certification or ability to achieve upon employment� Basic Computer SkillsADDITIONAL INFORMATION:*M*Good Samaritan Society - Prophets Riverview- a skilled care, NO-LIFT, 5-star facility is seeking compassionate RNs to answer the call to serve our residents on a part time basis. A career with us is a chance to touch people on a personal level and play a profound role in their lives. Long-term care & supervisory experience is preferred, but will train the right mission-minded individual.**$3000 bonus will be awarded to a qualified RN that stays employed with the Good Samaritan Society - Prophets Riverview for 1 year.Please complete the online application for consideration.All qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, color, religion, national origin, citizenship, age, disability, veteran status, genetic information, marital status or other protected status.CONTACT INFORMATION:Missy Knepp815-537-1206*If you need assistance to complete this application or during the interview process such as sign language interpreters, readers or other accommodations, please contact the person listed.",Registered Nurse (RN) - Healthcare Nursing Staff RN Job in Prophetstown,Full Time Employee,"Prophetstown, IL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Healthcare-Nursing-Staff-RN-Job-Prophetstown-IL-US-165648039.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,3f0c76e38dca48703dc1eaed3cfc288a
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:03:54:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Opportunity: Cognizant’s Quality Engineering & Assurance Practice (QE&A) is seeking a Guidewire Product Testing Specialist for our Insurance Space within the organization. We require this individual to be at Warwick, RI.  Required Skills: 8 - 10 years of hands-on QA experience on all STLC phases. P&C Insurance Domain Knowledge with hands-on Test Automation experience Experience in Test Automation testing is must – QTP  Guidewire Product working knowledge SQL experience in must;  QTP automation skills is must Test Reporting and Metrics  Test Automation on Insurance Products Should be able to work individually and be able to report to Customer organization directly Experience in test optimization techniques Agile QA & Understanding on TDD/ATDD/BDD development patterns Required a Bachelors Degree and minimum of 8 - 10 years of experience in IT.  Additional Information:",Sr. Product Specialist - Testing Job in Warwick,Full Time Employee,"Warwick, RI 02886",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Product-Specialist-Testing-Job-Warwick-RI-US-166659997.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,b18c98e40991aeab9c53c35ca8827cb8
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:03:09:04,No,jobs.monster.com," Cognizant Business Process Integration (BPI)BPI is Technology Services Group providing end to end solutions in Middleware space across Enterprise Application Integration (EAI), Business Process Integration(BPI), Enterprise Architecture Management(EAM), Business Process Management (BPM), Business Activity Monitoring (BAM), Business Process Analysis (BPA), Business Rule Management (BRMS), Service Oriented Architecture (SOA), Enterprise Service Bus (ESB) & Business Partner Integration (B2B/EDI), Complex Event Processing(CEP) and Master Data Management(MDM). BPI has significant experience, gained over a decade, in delivering large-scale, complex, cutting-edge integration solutions across industries. These solutions, derived from years of cross-industry experience and technology expertise, are highly scalable and flexible, so that they can be readily adapted for future requirements. Mandatory Skills: -        Year of Exp – 10+-        Hands-on knowledge on OracleBPM 12C, BPEL and Oracle BAM.-        Experienced with Solution designing of multiple systems using OracleBPM 12C Suite-        Strong understanding of Integration capability of OracleBPM12C with-        Knowledge of ADF is nice to have-        Coordination with different client teams(both IT and Non IT) and project teams, Requirement gathering and fitment Analysis-        Play the role of COE Lead (Carryout workshops, BPM fitment assessment for business cases, Infrastructure sizing, helping the project team for technical issues resolution) Benefits include:   Medical, Dental & Vision Insurance. 401k & Employee Stock Purchase Plans. 2 weeks of vacation and major holidays off. Tremendous opportunity for growth and advancement. A professional, challenging environment as part of a world class talented team  Cognizant is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V.Cognizant is committed to ensuring that all current and prospective associates are afforded equal opportunities and treatment and a work environment free of harassment.      Technical Skills SNo Primary Skill Proficiency Level * Rqrd./Dsrd. 1 Oracle SOA Suite Admin PL1 Required 2 Webservices - SOAP PL1 Required 3 Aspect SOAP API based Agent PL1 Required 4 Oracle SOA Governance PL1 Required 5 Oracle SOA Suite PL1 Required 6 PL/SQL PL2 Required     * Proficiency Legends     Proficiency Level Generic Reference PL1 The associate has basic awareness and comprehension of the skill and is in the process of acquiring this skill through various channels. PL2 The associate possesses working knowledge of the skill, and can actively and independently apply this skill in engagements and projects. PL3 The associate has comprehensive, in-depth and specialized knowledge of the skill. She / he has extensively demonstrated successful application of the skill in engagements or projects. PL4 The associate can function as a subject matter expert for this skill. The associate is capable of analyzing, evaluating and synthesizing solutions using the skill.       Organization Marketing Statement Cognizant(NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centres worldwide and approximately 221,700 employees as of December 31, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at http://www.cognizant.com/ or follow us on https://twitter.com/USJobsCognizant/       Additional Information:",Sr.Oracle SOA Tech Architect Job in Miami,Full Time Employee,"Miami, FL 33101",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Oracle-SOA-Tech-Architect-Job-Miami-FL-US-166094880.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,254389332c43ee08fed3769c9ff27fda
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:03:07:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description This position is responsible for the day to day operations of the ENT Clinic: Supervises nursing service activities in assigned care unit. Provides professional nursing care for patients in assigned care unit. Assesses, plans, evaluates, and documents the nursing process of assigned care unit as needed.    To perform all coordination of care for the Vascular Anomolies Program Triage patients that call in with medical concerns Perform all peer to peer reviews with insurance companies in order to obtain authorizations for testing/procedures Triage for medication management for vascular patients Database maintenance for vascular patients Develop and maintain ongoing advertisement for the team including website and brochures Participate in inpatient hospital rounds Job Requirements A. Education 1.Bachelor's of Science in Nursing from an accredited School of Nursing preferred.   B. Experience 1. Minimum 3 yrs of previous experience in ENT specialty area. 2. Case Management experience and/or coordination of services experience required. 3. Prior supervisory experience a plus.   C. LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION: 1. Texas State Nursing License Required. 2. CPR Required.",RN Clinical Coordinator- ENT Clinic Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Clinical-Coordinator-ENT-Clinic-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166644088.aspx?mescoid=2900502001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,9fe217ea4d41502e863678cb06ec8b87
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:12:30:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Delivery Driver / Courier  Medifleet is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theAtlanta area for same day medicaldeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Medifleet is technology driven tohelp you best manage your business from services provided to reliable invoicepayment. TheMedifleet Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle: Car.*Contract(s) available in the Atlanta MetroArea area. *Routes available Monday through Sunday.Routes start at 2:00PM to 8:00PM. Route starts in Atlanta and goes toChatsworth and returns to Hartsfield-Jackson Atlanta International Airport.*Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer. www.fleetgistics.com Respond online today.​ Location: Atlanta, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 31500 Vehicle Type: Car Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Atlanta,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Delivery Driver / Courier  Medifleet is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theAtlanta area for same day medicaldeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Medifleet is technology driven tohelp you best manage your business from services provided to reliable invoicepayment. TheMedifleet Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle: Car.*Contract(s) available in the Atlanta MetroArea area. *Routes available Monday through Sunday.Routes start at 2:00PM to 8:00PM. Route starts in Atlanta and goes toChatsworth and returns to Hartsfield-Jackson Atlanta International Airport.*Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer. www.fleetgistics.com Respond online today.​ Location: Atlanta, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 31500 Vehicle Type: Car Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-atlanta-ga-us-178644745.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,411bafd314ad4187cbc252e56e035115
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:12:52:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job • Recruiting for a locum or Permanent Pediatrician for Atlanta, GA area that can begin as soon as 1/23/17 • Federally Qualified Community Health Center • Must be board certified in Pediatrics • Work hours are 8:30am to 5pm M-F • Average 25 patients per day • BLS required • Will see patients from birth to age 18 including healthy checks • Must have experience working with electronic medical records • Client prefers us to credential the physician even though perm • Client has quick credentialing process • Student loan repayment • medical, dental, vision, paid life insurance, disability, hospital and cancer policy, 22 days of paid time off, 10 paid holidays, 5 CME days, etc. Perm Salary of $130,000 - $145,000 Report","Randstad Healthcare Job Application for Pediatrician - General Pediatrics | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Alex Grabowski Phone 216.763.3107 Address 30083,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/pediatrician-general-pediatrics-job-stone-mountain-ga-us-178446891.aspx?mescoid=2900467001001&jobPosition=8,,,51f774ae1dd924b3028ce02bf5a48c7b
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:13:22:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Environmental Services Technician Responsibilities: Clean building floors by sweeping, mopping, scrubbing, or vacuuming them. Gather and empty trash. Service, clean, and supply restrooms. Clean and polish furniture and fixtures. Clean windows, glass partitions, and mirrors, using soapy water or other cleaners, sponges, and squeegees. Dust furniture, walls, machines, and equipment. Steam-clean or shampoo carpets. Greet patients, visitors, and customers in a kind and professional manner Qualifications: 2+ years of cleaning/janitorial experience 2+ years of customer service experience Strong record of attendance and punctuality in previous positions Must be able to pass background check. drug screen and nicotine testing #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Environmental Services Tech Job in Atl,Full Time Employee,"Atl, GA 30329",,http://jobview.monster.com/environmental-services-tech-job-atl-ga-us-178595786.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f091984f8080fac033d1ff10e5d4875f
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:13:42:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad is currently seeking an Administrative Assistant with Accounts Receivable experience to work for one of our clients in the Fulton Industrial area. This is a small office within a warehouse setting with a very laid back atmosphere. Someone with a fun and outgoing personality would be a great fit! Qualified candidates will have recent Accounts Receivable experience and be comfortable performing basic Administrative duties as assigned by the Supervisor. Please see details below. If your skills match what is required, please email your resume and contact information to tye.brooks@randstadusa.com Working hours: 40Skills:Job Duties May Include:-Answering phones/taking memos-Sending/receiving correspondence-Posting customer payments-Posting revenues by verifying transactions-Maintaining records of invoices-Adjusting entries-Resolving collections by examining customer payment plans, payment history, credit line and coordinating with collections departmentSchedule:Full time 40 hours with flexible schedule. Candidate can work 5 days; 8 hours each or 4 days; 10 hours each.Requirements:-Experience using Excel-Recent Accounts Receivable experience-Bilingual (Spanish) is preferred but not required-Willingness to comply with required screeningsCompensation ranges from $14-$16 per hour depending on level of AR experience. Full benefits and PTO are available.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Accounts Receivable Clerk Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30336",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-clerk-job-atlanta-ga-us-178467093.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=10,,,d2d73c2707e1378d3fbb62df6d7c07d9
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:13:53:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"positions available in Forest Park for a great customer with excellent working conditions.Candidates must have the ability to work in a fast-paced working environment that requires physicality and accuracy. Positions will be required but not limited to:unloading, packing and unpacking boxes of merchandise. Sorting, tagging, and hanging all items as necessary. Removing cartons from conveyors and sorting onto proper pallets/dollies. Some positions may require use of RF Scanner and hand jacks. Loading completed orders on pallets onto trucks for shipment. Some positions are very physical and may require Two-Person teamwork. All positions require concentration on accuracy and must produce daily at the highest productivity level.Working hours: Sunday-Saturday (8-10 hr Shifts)Skills:WE HIRE the best talent that can reach their full potential to be hired on by our client.WE SCREEN for - Safe quality workers - General warehouse knowledge- Ability to lift up to 50lbs and stand for long periods-Works to produce above expectations-Team player with a positive attitudeWE DELIVER TO YOU- Great pay and benefits available!- Weekly Direct Deposit and Money Network options!- Professional on-site managers to provide you performance reviews and safety rewards- Referral bonus options!- Keys to successRequirements:- Able to stand, walk, bend, and stoop for up to 10hrs a day- Able to work a flexible work schedule (Days & Hours)- Able to comply with strict attendance policy- Extensive Background check and drug screenDesired:- At least 1yr experience in distribution environment- RF Scanner experience a plus- Reticketing/Repricing experience- Loading & Unloading trucks- Orderfilling / Picking If you are interested please create a profile and apply today at www.randstadusa.com ALL CORRESPONDENCE WILL BE VIA EMAILRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad.",Warehouse positions in Forest Park Job in Forest Park,Full Time Employee,"Forest Park, GA 30297",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-positions-in-forest-park-job-forest-park-ga-us-178459012.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=2,9.00 - 9.00 $ /hour,,4debc680b9cf148452f8b5e9bc3525ec
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:08:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"SummaryProvides services and care for residents and patients.Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesProvides personal care and services such as:Assisting with activities of daily living (turning and positioning, toileting, bathing and grooming, feeding, and mobility)Obtains and records vital signs and weight as assigned.Accurately documents all care as required by company policy and in compliance with state and federal regulations.Provides non-resident services such as, but not limited to, washing wheelchairs and cleaning resident / patient areas in compliance with infection control procedures.Contributes to the resident assessment and care plan.Makes routine rounds on each assigned resident and patient in accordance with established procedures.Promptly communicates any significant changes in behavior or condition to supervisor.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Performs other duties as assigned. QualificationsMinimum high school diploma or equivalent, or related experience and / or training.Successful completion of State-approved Nursing Assistant Certification course. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Resident Care Specialist,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/resident-care-specialist-cna-job-tucker-ga-us-178090647.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=2,0.00 - 1.00 $ /year,,c1a90a8178fdf79597f5303b1fdf6317
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:08:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Service Desk Technician Location: Atlanta, GA Northern Perimeter Length: 4 Months CTH Hours- 2 Shifts 12pm-9 pm                             9pm to 6am Summary:   Responsible for the day-to-day support of technical operations at all Client locations. Provides a high level of support to ensures tickets, calls, and emails are clearly documented & tracked, manages dispatches with third-party vendors, follows up on unresolved tickets, calls and emails, identifies trends of incoming issues for appropriate escalation.Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesProvide technical support and service of desktop systems and software, including PC, laptops, MAC, printers, VOIP and digital phones, mobile devices, user account administration and remote connectivityAct as Technical Support Services point of contact for remote office locationsWork with vendors to troubleshoot and resolve hardware and software issuesProvide friendly, courteous and helpful service to all customersWork closely with team members to ensure that service  and trouble requests are addressed in a manner that meets service level agreements and business goals and objectivesProvide technical assistance and support for incoming queries and issues related to computer systems, software, and hardwareRespond to queries by phone, email, or through the ticketing systemRemotely install, modify, and repair IT hardware and softwareResolve technical problems with networks and other systemsFollow up with customers to ensure issues have been resolvedMeet and exceed team performance metricsPosition QualificationsProficiency in front-office applications and hardware, desktop operating systems (Windows), Active Directory user maintenance, mobile messaging devices and system administration, DNS and DHCP technology platforms and systemsAble to effectively communicate technical concepts in common terms Administrative and organizational skills, including attention to detailAble to build teams and function well within a cohesive team environmentManage multiple tasks and deadlines in a fast-paced environmentFunctional SkillsHelp DeskIT Standards, Procedures, and PoliciesTechnical troubleshootingEducation/Experience3+ years experience in management of networks and systemsBachelor's degree or equivalent work experienceTechnology and industry training or certification a plus (Cisco, Microsoft, VM, Storage, VOIP, Security, etc.)Job Factors/Work EnvironmentUp to 25% travel, some travel with short noticeOn call 24/7 on a rotational basisWork is primarily sedentary in nature  Report","BlueAlly LLC Job Application for Service Deck Technician | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Service Desk Technician Location: Atlanta, GA Northern Perimeter Length: 4 Months CTH Hours- 2 Shifts 12pm-9 pm                             9pm to 6am Summary:   Responsible for the day-to-day support of technical operations at all Client locations. Provides a high level of support to ensures tickets, calls, and emails are clearly documented & tracked, manages dispatches with third-party vendors, follows up on unresolved tickets, calls and emails, identifies trends of incoming issues for appropriate escalation.Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesProvide technical support and service of desktop systems and software, including PC, laptops, MAC, printers, VOIP and digital phones, mobile devices, user account administration and remote connectivityAct as Technical Support Services point of contact for remote office locationsWork with vendors to troubleshoot and resolve hardware and software issuesProvide friendly, courteous and helpful service to all customersWork closely with team members to ensure that service  and trouble requests are addressed in a manner that meets service level agreements and business goals and objectivesProvide technical assistance and support for incoming queries and issues related to computer systems, software, and hardwareRespond to queries by phone, email, or through the ticketing systemRemotely install, modify, and repair IT hardware and softwareResolve technical problems with networks and other systemsFollow up with customers to ensure issues have been resolvedMeet and exceed team performance metricsPosition QualificationsProficiency in front-office applications and hardware, desktop operating systems (Windows), Active Directory user maintenance, mobile messaging devices and system administration, DNS and DHCP technology platforms and systemsAble to effectively communicate technical concepts in common terms Administrative and organizational skills, including attention to detailAble to build teams and function well within a cohesive team environmentManage multiple tasks and deadlines in a fast-paced environmentFunctional SkillsHelp DeskIT Standards, Procedures, and PoliciesTechnical troubleshootingEducation/Experience3+ years experience in management of networks and systemsBachelor's degree or equivalent work experienceTechnology and industry training or certification a plus (Cisco, Microsoft, VM, Storage, VOIP, Security, etc.)Job Factors/Work EnvironmentUp to 25% travel, some travel with short noticeOn call 24/7 on a rotational basisWork is primarily sedentary in nature ",,http://jobview.monster.com/service-deck-technician-job-atlanta-ga-us-177775783.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=5,,,241c14d04d2a6f8eff11f86f1b9b1ac3
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:12:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Inventory Supervisor position must possess an in depth knowledge of e-commerce and fulfillment operations, including experience with high transaction operations and inventory management, with on emphasis customer service. This ""hands on"" position holds responsibility for inventory management including accuracy, slotting, cycle count and physical inventory programs, and reporting/business measurements.Job Description:o Promotes the organizational values.o Demonstrates safety consciousness at all times and reports safety questions/concerns.o Promotes safety as a business value vs. business priority, through training, focusing, and informing others about company safety practices and procedures.o Maintains a clean working environment.o Supports ISO 9001-2008.o In addition to the tasks, duties, and responsibilities of the Inventory Specialist, the Inventory Supervisor performs the following:o Develops and implements purchasing and inventory control procedures and sequence of operations within department to optimize workflow.o With customers, reviews market, price, delivery conditions, and trends to determine present and future material availability. Directs inventory programs accordingly.o Oversees disposal of surplus material or scrap products.o Monitors order claims and contracts for conformance to company policy and customer contracts.o Reviews weekly inventory trends and discusses variations with appropriate staff members and customer.o Deals with supplier when serious variations arise in delivery, quality, price, or conditions.Working hours: 40 plusSkills:ISOInventory ManagementLogistics ExperienceFlexible to work over timeRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Inventory Supervisor Job in Fairburn,Full Time Employee,"Fairburn, GA 30213",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/inventory-supervisor-job-fairburn-ga-us-178627469.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=10,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",,1f6e35f9fd27d7391c19358d4cc16f6f
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:12:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"MOUNTAIN, LTD. is currently seeking an Insurance Defense Attorney for a major Property & Casualty Insurance provider in Atlanta, GA. This is a contract opportunity initially scheduled to run for Three toFour Months with the potential for longer term employment.  Pay Rate will be $40.00 per hour. Must be eligible to work in the United States without Sponsorship.No Corp-to-Corp inquiries please. DESCRIPTIONLooking for an attorney who has a Georgia Bar License.Completion of law school with LLB or JD and admission to the Georgia Bar.Should have experience in litigation to include taking depositions, attending mediations and Magistrate Court trials.This is a liability insurance defense position.Insurance Defense experience a plus.Good with computer systems a must.",Insurance Defense Attorney Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30339",,http://jobview.monster.com/insurance-defense-attorney-job-atlanta-ga-us-178683505.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=8,,Legal,c228dd1d5b50dd1b62f299065a6d725f
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:17:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Environmental Services Technician Responsibilities:Clean building floors by sweeping, mopping, scrubbing, or vacuuming them. Gather and empty trash. Service, clean, and supply restrooms. Clean and polish furniture and fixtures. Clean windows, glass partitions, and mirrors, using soapy water or other cleaners, sponges, and squeegees. Dust furniture, walls, machines, and equipment. Steam-clean or shampoo carpets. Greet patients, visitors, and customers in a kind and professional manner Qualifications:2+ years of cleaning/janitorial experience 2+ years of customer service experience Strong record of attendance and punctuality in previous positions Must be able to pass background check. drug screen and nicotine testing #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",PART TIME Environmental Services Tech Job in Atl,Full Time Employee,"Atl, GA 30342",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-environmental-services-tech-job-atl-ga-us-178595672.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4eb475b70fc3138e0559992a363819eb
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:17:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Volt Workforce Solutions is currently hiring for general laborers. This position is working for an adhesive manufacturing company in Mableton, GA.The responsibilities for this role will include light manual labor activities such as; lifting, moving, breaking down boxes, loading/unloading, picking and packing, shipping, etc. This is a very fast paced environment where you will be lifting up to 60 lbs.Shift Hours 8:00 a.m. to 4:30 pm - Must be available for scheduled overtime, if needed.Volt Workforce Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Requirements:"" Must have proof of GED or high school diploma"" Must be dedicated and flexible in hours"" Must be able to lift up to 50lbs"" Ability to stand for 8-10 hours"" Must wear and provide steel toe shoesMust successfully complete all pre-employment screening requirements.",General Labor/Warehouse Job in Austell,Full Time Employee,"Austell, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/general-labor-warehouse-job-austell-ga-us-178336949.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=7,,Other,f065b48553eb7e149d0c590c8b6b508d
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:17:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad is currently seeking Electrical Maintenance Technicians for permanent hire on the south side of Metro Atlanta for several companies.****Must be open to 2nd and 3rd shift******The maintenance technician position is responsible for performing highly diversified duties to install, troubleshoot, repair and maintain production and facility equipment according to safety, predictive and productive maintenance systems and processes to support the achievement of the site's business goals and objectives.Superior mechanical aptitude, perform PM- requirements, demonstrate facility maintenance skills, basic understanding of hydraulics, pneumatics, and electrical components, perform basic diagnostics and troubleshooting.Perform highly diversified duties to install and maintain production machines and the plant facility's equipment. Provide emergency/unscheduled repairs of production equipment during production and performs scheduled maintenance repairs of production equipment during machine service. Perform simple machinist duties and responsibilities. Perform mechanic skills including, but not limited to, mechanical, hydraulic, troubleshooting and repair of production machines. Read and interpret equipment manuals and work orders to perform required maintenance and service. Diagnose problems, replace or repair parts, test and make adjustments. Perform regular preventive maintenance on machines, equipment and plant facilities. Perform a variety of plumbing maintenance and carpentry functions. Use a variety of hand and power tools, electric meters and material handling equipment in performing duties. Detect faulty operations, defective material and report those and any unusual situations to proper supervision. Comply with safety regulations and maintain clean and orderly work areas.Working hours: 40Skills:No phone calls please. Please submit resume to be considered for position.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Electrical Maintenance Technician Job in Fairburn,Full Time Employee,"Fairburn, GA 30213",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/electrical-maintenance-technician-job-fairburn-ga-us-178465093.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=15,"45,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",,dc0c0d24a321d416380ac877539394e0
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:17:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Maintain a positive attitude and smile and be polite with customers throughout the transaction Greet customers as they approach the cash register Take the customer’s order and prepare the order according to brand specifications and the customer requests Must have knowledge of menu items and recipes to effectively service the customer Effectively and efficiently complete the financial transaction Maintain the balance of the cash drawer at all times Distribute and post marketing materials as required Maintain daily temperature logs Adhere to additional standards set by designated brand Proper use of station machinery and equipment Ability to understand and follow directions given by management Maintain a neat and clean beverage station and a presentable work area Ability to stand for extended periods of time, up to 6 hours Ability to lift up to 25lbs and frequently lift, push, pull, or carry up to 30 lbs Ability to walk or stand for extended time periods, up to 6 hours Involves repetitive motion Involves working with chemicals, heated equipment, steam and at other risk conditions Assist management team with administrative functions and daily food prep during down times Additional Job Functions: Work in other areas and departments as necessary Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team Qualifications Required Qualifications: Excellent interpersonal skills and a positive attitude Ability to work independently Posses good time management with daily tasks required by the management team Math skills for counting money and providing correct change Knowledge of running a cash register, and credit card machine transactions Desired Qualifications: Experience in the food service industry as a barista (smoothie) food service worker Great customer service skills Work Environment: Front-of-house barista station. Occasionally requires the ability to work in the kitchen area and possible interaction with hot food items, heated equipment, steam, noise and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion.",Student Worker/Barista/Cashier- Georgia Pacific Center GAMET Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30303",All,http://jobview.monster.com/student-worker-barista-cashier-georgia-pacific-center-gamet-job-atlanta-ga-us-177600438.aspx?mescoid=3500613001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c88f45c545005206a1647a73733d9dfa
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:26:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"***PLEASE DO NOT CALL IN ABOUT THIS POSITION! ALL APPLICANTS WILL BE CONSIDERED EQUALLY***Randstad at Cobb is currently hiring a Bookkeeper/Administrative Assistant for a client in the local Marietta, GA area. Come join a company which provides competitive compensation plans with growth potential, ongoing leadership and specific role training. They are looking for recent Accounting/Finance grads who are ready to start their careers!Responsibilities include:-Prepare monthly sales tax returns for various state-Maintain annual licensing and registration in various states-General filing duties-AP/AR management-Collections as needed (minimal)-Documents financial transactions by entering account information-Summarizes current financial status by collecting information from accounting software: pulling balance sheet, profit and loss statement, and other reports-Substantiates financial transactions by auditing documents-Reconciles financial discrepancies by collecting and analyzing account information-Secures financial information by completing database backups-Maintains financial security by following internal controls-Prepares payments by verifying documentation, and requesting disbursements-Complies with federal, state, and local financial legal requirements by studying existing and new legislation, enforcing adherence to requirements, and advising management on needed actions-Prepares special financial reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing account information and trendsWorking hours: 8:00am-5:00pmSkills:Skills and Qualifications:-Bachelor's Degree in Accounting or Finance is preferred (but not necessarily required with the right experience)-Experience in Sage or Peachtree is preferred-Excellent communication skills, attention to detail, deadline-oriented, time management, data entry, and general math skills are a mustRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",RECENT ACCOUNTING/FINANCE GRADS: Bookkeeper Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30060",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/recent-accounting-finance-grads-bookkeeper-job-marietta-ga-us-178461712.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=1,"32,000.00 - 45,000.00 $ /year",,903fd9afbec50418249512fbb19b1744
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:32:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Plumbing ApprenticeWe are looking for hard-working, highly-motivated individuals who would like to join the Plumbing trade as their career.  We are a growing plumbing company looking to hire enthusiastic and eager individuals who have a keen desire to learn and grow in the plumbing trade. If you're tired of working in a fast-food or retail position with no future or security, this is your chance.  Our apprentices are paid to work hard assisting our plumbers and to receive training to become service plumbers, where they can easily make $50k-$70k within the first year, and even more as they gain more experience. We are looking for people who want to make being a service plumber their lucrative full-time career.  Applicants must be willing to supplement their continued plumbing education on their own time.  The service plumbing industry is not easy, and requires long hours of dedication and hard work.  Applicants must be capable of performing basic math skills, basic problem solving skills, able to use hand tools and must maintain a professional appearance with grooming and hygiene.  Job Stipulations:  If you cannot show up to work on time, there is no need to apply. If you are unwilling to ask questions because you feel you know better/more than anyone else, there is no need to apply. If strangers have trouble understanding you because you are unable to speak clearly and distinctly, there is no need to apply.  If you cannot write legibly or have trouble reading the English language, there is no need to apply.  If you are unable to maintain confidence and assertiveness while engaging in conversation with strangers, there is no need to apply.  If you must have nights and weekends off to hang out/go partying with your moocher, unemployed friends, there is no need to apply.  If you only want a job for a few months until you decide to start attending classes to become a yoga instructor or a video-game tester, there is no need to apply.  If the thought of getting dirty or sweaty is ""beneath you"", there is no need to apply.  If you feel that jobs requiring college degrees are more important than ""blue-collar"" jobs, you are unquestionably wrong, and there is no need to apply.Job Requirements: • All positions require the ability to lift at least 85 pounds, climb ladders, bend, twist, reach and stoop without issue.  Must be able to pass a drug test.Required Education: • High School or equivalent diplomaRequired License/Transportation: • Valid Georgia Driver's License with clean driving record• Must have reliable transportation to meet with service plumbers on job sites or at main office.If you are local to the Lilburn area, you can also stop by our office to fill out an application at 4276 Stone Mountain Hwy Lilburn, GA 30047.Job Type: Full-time, and for the rest of your life.  Report","Royal Flush Plumbing Job Application for Plumbing Apprentice | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Dave Werner Phone 770-385-5911 Fax 678-609-1380 Address 4276 Stone Mountain HwyLilburn, GA 30047",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/plumbing-apprentice-job-lilburn-ga-us-167131598.aspx?mescoid=4700825001001&jobPosition=8,,,255a328d881ba7eb72db8e364e6ab5ce
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:33:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad at Cobb is seeking a Customer Service Representative for a Wholesale Distribution client in the Marietta area. Come join a family oriented company which is People Focused, respecting and listening to both internal employees and external customers. (Please note that the position is part-time for now, and and has potential to become full-time down the road)Responsibilities include but not limited to:- Maintain goodwill of all existing customers during the processing of all customer orders- Organize and coordinate the most efficient and expeditious handling of customer orders, quotations and special requests- Provide or direct information of a technical nature to customers when needed- Handle any service issues that customers may have- Enter, place and ensure special distribution of sales orders- Provide quotations as needed based on information provided from sales and/or customers- Perform other related duties as assigned by managementWorking hours: 8:00 AM - 12:00 PMSkills:- College degree preferred- Must have excellent verbal and written communication skills- Candidates with experience in industrial markets a plus- Strong attention to detail - Honesty, integrity, and great work ethics a MUST- Strong computer internet skills- Excellent organizational skills- Excellent interpersonal skills to interact professionally with customers and staffRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Customer Service Representative Job in Marietta,Part Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30062",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-marietta-ga-us-178640061.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,15.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,,0b4a98d9cbd40e3540acf55e726ca33c
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:34:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad at Cobb is currently hiring an Office Administrator for a client in the local Smyrna, GA area. Come join a company which provides competitive compensation plans with significant bonus potential, ongoing leadership and specific role training. Responsibilities include:AdministrationAs the equivalent to a Chief Operations Officer, the Office Administrator is responsible for all systems in the office to include:- Hiring and managing receptionists and Assistant Office Administrators- Interacting with staff, associates, and vendors- Purchasing supplies and equipment- Ensuring the professional appearance of all physical facilities- Coordinating the maintenance of office equipment and monitoring maintenance agreements- Overseeing Computer Hardware Specialist, Computer Software Trainer, and Internet Specialist AccountingAs the equivalent to a Chief Financial Officer, the MCA is responsible for accurate banking and accounting services to include:- Full business accounting- Computerized bookkeeping and general computer experience- Staff payroll coordinated through a Professional Employment Organization (PEO)- Acting as the Market Center liaison to the CPA- Being detailed and action oriented- Maintaining office files, including accounting files, general ledger files, associate files, employee files, listing files, contract pending files, and closed contract files- Monthly reporting to KWRI of all production and accounting figures for the month - Responsible for processing and paying associate commissions- Responsible for budget setting and trackingWorking hours: 8:00am-5:00pmSkills:Skills and Qualifications:- 5+ years of experience in a high profile organization as an Office Administrator or Manager capacity- Bachelor's Degree preferred but not required- Professional, organized and a multi-tasker who understands business concepts and how their role can directly affect overall profitability of the businessRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Office Administrator Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30080",Real Estate/Property ManagementBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/office-administrator-job-smyrna-ga-us-177422407.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,"45,000.00 - 45,000.00 $ /year",,d8d8f3ba4dcb53897a0c03509a1eb406
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:39:19,No,jobs.monster.com," City:  AtlantaState:  GeorgiaPostal/Zip Code: 30338 Deputy Labor Relations Director Responsibilities Works with management to develop labor and employee relations strategies to support the objectives of the organization.Provides a full range of labor relations consultation services to all operations, administrative and human resources departments, including compliance with company employment policies.Contributes to company-wide standardized practices, processes and forms.Establishes and maintains professional and productive relationships with union leadership.Handles escalations for grievances and monitoring of contract terms.Acts as company advocate for labor arbitration cases.Serves as Chief spokesman for contract negotiations, representing and operationally defining labor policies that are competitive and ensure cost effective labor agreements across assigned divisions.Drives excellence in negotiations preparedness, including negotiation of and execution of labor contracts.Manages the preparation and presentation of charges related to the National Labor Relations Act.Assesses and develops (with client partners) training needs specific to labor and employee relations.Directs the interpretation and administration of collective bargaining agreements and agency actions during union campaigns, elections and work stoppages.   Requirements A minimum of 5 years of experience with increasing responsibility in collective bargaining, labor relations, employee relations, union prevention and contract administration in a large, multi-state organization.Working knowledge of federal labor law. Minimum of a Bachelor’s degree.Demonstrated decision-making ability and excellent judgment required.Ability to work autonomously, with minimal staff support or external resources.Up to 80% travel.Location anywhere in US but must be in close proximity to a major airport.Strong analytical and problem solving capability, along with the ability to communicate both orally and in writing in a clear concise, organized and persuasive manner.Demonstrated interpersonal leadership and project management skills.Superior negotiating skills (grounded in the arena of collective bargaining). What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Join our Talent Community to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs & career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Oldcastle is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. ",Deputy Labor Relations Director - Atlanta,Full Time Employee," City:  AtlantaState:  GeorgiaPostal/Zip Code: 30338 Deputy Labor Relations Director Responsibilities Works with management to develop labor and employee relations strategies to support the objectives of the organization.Provides a full range of labor relations consultation services to all operations, administrative and human resources departments, including compliance with company employment policies.Contributes to company-wide standardized practices, processes and forms.Establishes and maintains professional and productive relationships with union leadership.Handles escalations for grievances and monitoring of contract terms.Acts as company advocate for labor arbitration cases.Serves as Chief spokesman for contract negotiations, representing and operationally defining labor policies that are competitive and ensure cost effective labor agreements across assigned divisions.Drives excellence in negotiations preparedness, including negotiation of and execution of labor contracts.Manages the preparation and presentation of charges related to the National Labor Relations Act.Assesses and develops (with client partners) training needs specific to labor and employee relations.Directs the interpretation and administration of collective bargaining agreements and agency actions during union campaigns, elections and work stoppages.   Requirements A minimum of 5 years of experience with increasing responsibility in collective bargaining, labor relations, employee relations, union prevention and contract administration in a large, multi-state organization.Working knowledge of federal labor law. Minimum of a Bachelor’s degree.Demonstrated decision-making ability and excellent judgment required.Ability to work autonomously, with minimal staff support or external resources.Up to 80% travel.Location anywhere in US but must be in close proximity to a major airport.Strong analytical and problem solving capability, along with the ability to communicate both orally and in writing in a clear concise, organized and persuasive manner.Demonstrated interpersonal leadership and project management skills.Superior negotiating skills (grounded in the arena of collective bargaining). What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Join our Talent Community to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs & career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Oldcastle is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. ",,http://jobview.monster.com/deputy-labor-relations-director-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-177361983.aspx?mescoid=1300083001001&jobPosition=20,,,54d5718e5ce140cec695786539706e82
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:39:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"LPN / Health Improvement Nurse – Industrial Setting - Atlanta, GA Work with health care team that provides proactive prevention, outreach and education, testing, health improvement, and acute injury management to employees in a contemporary and dynamic industrial work environment. Duties include limited number of injections, vision, hearing, and urine screens.  Great salary and benefits package with significant growth opportunity offered. Candidate should have excellent clinical, communication, problem solving, and customer service skills. Background or interest in fitness, nutrition, coaching, and occupational medicine a plus. GA LPN license and CPR required. RN’s welcome to apply. Qualified candidates please send resume and salary expectation.",LPN / Health Improvement Nurse Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30354",,http://jobview.monster.com/lpn-health-improvement-nurse-job-atlanta-ga-us-178574913.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,57ec179fd903e45ed32e3f127f81e5cf
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:46:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Get to know us. At Randstad, we're always looking for great people. Our customers rely on us to deliver them talented workers for a wide variety of positions. If you're looking for work, or looking to change jobs, come to our office and meet with our team. Exciting new opportunities with several manufacturing/logistics facilities in West Atlanta.Job Duties to include:*at least 6 months recent warehouse experience (within the last year)*ability to perform physical demands of fast paced production environment*knowledge of machine operations, pick/pack, forklift, and material handling*flexibility to work different shifts and overtime as requiredWorking hours: All ShiftsSkills:Please submit a resume to be consideredall positions will require background and drug testingPositions will pay between $9.40 and $11Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Material Handler Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/material-handler-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178464652.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=15,9.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,,5fa4dbbd4cebb7b29c09582668fb6b65
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:59:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Senior Network Engineer Senior Network Engineer Summary:We are looking for a senior Network Engineer to design, implement, maintain, and support our growing network infrastructure.  This individual will be part of a team that is responsible for designing and developing scalable, maintainable, highly available network architectures that meet business objectives and SLAs. Senior Network Engineer Responsibilities:Configure and install various network devices and services (e.g., routers, switches, firewalls, load balancers, VPN, QoS, wireless devices)Perform network maintenance and system upgrades including service packs, patches, hot fixes and security configurationsMonitor performance and ensure system availability and reliabilityMonitor system resource utilization, trending, and capacity planningProvide level 2/3 support and troubleshooting to resolve issuesWork within established configuration and change management policies to ensure awareness, approval and success of changes made to the network infrastructureSelect and implement security tools, policies, and procedures in conjunction with the company’s security teamLiaise with vendors and other IT personnel for problem resolution10% travel required Senior Network Engineer Experience:5+ years of hands-on network engineering experienceCCNP or similar Cisco certificationDeep understanding of networking communications (e.g., IPSEC, HSRP, BGP, EIGRP, OSPF, 802.11, QoS, GRE)Preferred vendors experience: Cisco, Brocade, Aruba Wireless, Solarwinds, ScrutinizerSolid understanding of the OSI and TCP/IP modelsSolid understanding of VOIP communicationsHands-on experience with monitoring, network diagnostic and network analytics tools  Report","Resolution Technologies Job Application for Senior Network Engineer | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name John Hamilton Address 6 Concourse PKWYAtlanta, GA 30328",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-network-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-178683377.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=14,,,7acf211c6f988ade26848e4bd5d7e5c0
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:02:11:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"THE JOB:Under direction, performs mental health evaluations including psycho-social assessments of individuals, establishes psychiatric diagnosis; orders and evaluates diagnostic tests; formulates treatment plans and manages follow-up care; and performs other work as required. Immediate full-time and part-time vacancies are available. The list established from this recruitment will be used to fill the current vacancies and any future full-time, part-time, extra-help and/or substitute vacancies during the life of the list. THE REQUIREMENTS: Any combination of education and experience which would provide the required knowledge and abilities is qualifying, unless otherwise specified. A typical way to obtain these knowledge and abilities would be:Possession of a master’s degree in nursing, master’s degree in a clinical field related to nursing, or a graduate degree in nursing.   SPECIAL REQUIREMENTS/CONDITIONS: Completion of a Psychiatric/Mental Health Nurse Practitioner program. Possession and maintenance of a valid license to practice as a Registered Nurse issued by the California Board of Registered Nursing. Possession and maintenance of a valid Nurse Practitioner Certificate issued by the California Board of Registered Nursing. Possession and maintenance of a valid Nurse Practitioner Furnishing Certificate issued by the California Board of Registered Nursing (Furnishing Certificate enables a Nurse Practitioner to administer and/or order medications). Possession and maintenance of a valid Controlled Substance Registration Certificate – Schedules II – V issued by Department of Justice, Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) (Controlled Substance Registration Certification [DEA #]) enables a Nurse Practitioner the ability to order level II – V controlled substance medications). Possession and maintenance of a valid California C driver license or the ability to provide suitable transportation which is approved by the appointing authority  Background Investigation: Fingerprinting is required. Environmental Factors:  Exposure to odors, blood and other bodily fluids, communicable diseases, hostile or violent individuals, exposure to noise and people yelling; and may be exposed to cigarette smoke. Hours:  Availability to work a flexible schedule, if needed.HOW TO APPLY: Apply online at www.santacruzcountyjobs.com or mail/bring an application and supplemental questionnaire to: Santa Cruz County Personnel Department, 701 Ocean Street, Room 310, Santa Cruz, CA 95060. For information, call (831) 454-2600. Hearing Impaired TDD/TTY: 711. Applications will meet the final filing date if received: 1) In the Personnel Department by 5:00 p.m. on the final filing date, 2) Submitted online before midnight of the final filing date. Following a review for minimum qualifications, applicants who are selected to move forward in the recruitment process will be notified that they must submit a completed conviction history questionnaire in order to continue to the examination phase of the process.",PSYCHIATRIC MENTAL HEALTH NURSE PRACTITIONER Job in Santa Cruz,Full Time,"Santa Cruz, CA 95060",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/PSYCHIATRIC-MENTAL-HEALTH-NURSE-PRACTITIONER-Job-Santa-Cruz-CA-US-166611831.aspx?mescoid=2900500001001&jobPosition=16,"126,006.00 - 141,773.00 $ /year$8,000 Recruitment Incentive Pay may be available.",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),c1d15fcdeb3f7aafd81202b98a7dd7f5
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:02:11:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Programmer III for their San Mateo, California (CA) location. This position is virtual, however end client is located in San Mateo, CA.ServiceNow Developer will: Create a bi-directional web services call to the client's vRealize System where the VM Instance will be provisioned; once the provisioning is complete a status as well as the virtual machine attributed will be sent back to ServiceNow (instance name, IP address, etc.) Build (or modify) 12 Catalog Items of simple complexity; one approval (12 blueprints) Developer will build a single catalog item so the client can present the VM choices to their customers Create one Workflow to be used across the 12 catalog items which manage the call out toREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's or equivalent years of experience in the field Technical Skills: ServiceNow ITSM Application Creating bi-directional integration using Rest API's Service Catalog Workflow Creation CMDB",Programmer III Job in San Mateo,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Mateo, CA 94401",,http://jobview.monster.com/Programmer-III-Job-San-Mateo-CA-US-166657205.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3be47ccab889b0d5713d18345fe65d20
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:02:03:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Immediate contract opportunity for Oracle Identity/Access Manager Administrator with direct client in Queens, NY.Description:The Client is seeking an Oracle Identity/Access Manager administrator to join the existing project team. The successful candidate will have strong knowledge and hands-on experience using the Oracle Identity Manger/Access Manager product suite with a good knowledge of single-sign-on concepts. This position will need to work in shifts for handling a 24X7 production support schedule. This position will be based in New York.Responsibilities: Candidate will be responsible for server administration /configuration /troubleshooting /performance monitoring. Responsibilities for this position will include: • Installation and configuration of Oracle Identity Manager 11g • Installation and configuration of Oracle Access Manager 11g • Installation and configuration of Oracle Adaptive Access Manager 11g • Tier 3 production support for OIM/OAM/OAAM • Determine monitoring requirements to ensure system availability and assist in their implementation • Provide and implement performance-tuning recommendations.Experience• 5+ years of hands-on experience using the Sun/Oracle Identity Manager 10.x/11g, Sun Directory Server 7.x and Oracle Access Manager 10.x/11g. • Significant experience in implementing a Single-Sign-On environment with multiple applications spanning different technologies. • Hands on experience in installing/configuring/tuning Red Hat Linux 6.x, Apache, Tomcat, Glassfish and SOA. • Hands on experience in LDAP and AD administration • Prior experience with XML, LDAP, JDBC, JAAS, SAML, OpenAuth and OpenID. • Experience with relational databases, Oracle preferred, and a good working knowledge of structured query language including stored procedures and triggersTrigyn provides its employees with the following benefits:·         Medical and Prescription Drug Insurance (Contribution Required)·         Dental Insurance (Optional Benefit)·         401(k) Plan through Fidelity with Company Match  ·         TransitChek® Commuter Benefit Program·         Paid Time Off (PTO) (Salary Option)·         Paid Holidays (Salary Option) TRIGYN IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER About Trigyn: Trigyn is an Information Technology Services Company with over 1,500 resources and more than 30 years of experience. Trigyn is ISO 9001:2008 and CMMI Level 3 Certified. Trigyn is an E-Verify® Employer. ",Oracle Identity/Access Manager Administrator Job in Queens,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Queens, NY 11101",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Oracle-Identity-Access-Manager-Administrator-Job-Queens-NY-US-166724866.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=13,,,560de8f8601d4e97e248d94f2feca076
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:02:01:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Software Engineering Services (SES) is searching for entry level developers who are US CITIZENS (required), and security clearance eligible (clean criminal, financial, travel background) for opportunities in Bellevue, Nebraska.We are open to any language background including but not limited to Java, C#.NET, ASP.NET, Web languages, C++, etc.Please send resumes and availability to: acaldwell@SESsolutions.com",Entry Level Developers Job in Bellevue,Full Time,"Bellevue, NE 68005",,http://jobview.monster.com/Entry-Level-Developers-Job-Bellevue-NE-US-166669455.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=20,,,b4dca3b98dde1eb708170da9c182905c
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:02:01:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Ishpeming  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Ishpeming 49849,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-ISHPEMING-166729965.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=7,,General/Other: Medical/Health,0be68f8c63cb2315d1740db57f88a228
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:01:06:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Franklin  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Franklin 46131,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-FRANKLIN-166726747.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=17,,General/Other: Medical/Health,bdb10afcc224dce0362ebaa0903a652a
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:01:06:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"The primary purpose of your job position is to provide direct nursing care to the residents, and to supervise the day-to-day nursing activities performed by nursing assistants. Such supervision must be in accordance with current federal, state, and local standards, guidelines, and regulations that govern our facility, and as may be required by the Director of Nursing Services to ensure that the highest degree of quality care is maintained at all times.·     Make written and oral reports/recommendations concerning the activities of your shift as required.·     Perform administrative duties such as completing medical forms, reports, evaluations, studies, charting, etc., as necessary.·     Complete and file required recordkeeping forms/charts upon the resident’s admission, transfer, and/or discharge.·     Perform routine charting duties as required and in accordance with established charting and documentation policies and procedures.·     Make daily rounds of your unit/shift to ensure that nursing service personnel are performing their work assignments in accordance with acceptable nursing standards. Report problem areas to the Director of Nursing.·     Administer professional services such as; catheterization, tube feedings, suction, applying and changing dressings/bandages, packs, colostomy, and drainage bags, taking blood, giving massages and range of motion exercises, care for the dead/dying, etc., as required.·     Any other duties as assigned by Director of Nursing and/or Administrator.Regent Care Centers® offers a competitive compensation and benefit package that includes:*PTO*Paid Holidays*Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance*Company-Paid Life insurance*Flexible Spending for Medical and Dependent Care*401(k)CALL AND ASK ABOUT OUR AVAILABLE SIGN ON BONUS Regent Care Centers® is committed to being an equal opportunity employer and will not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, disability, age or national origin or any other protected status.",LVN/RN - Generous Sign On Bonus Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX 78218",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/LVN-RN-Generous-Sign-On-Bonus-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166718162.aspx?ch=houstonchronicle&mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=13,,,d2579a528425e1dfc11bc03e1b37cd02
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:00:22:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:-Our client is seeking a Project Manager - Reporting Specialist.Summary:-A key member of a small Program Management team overseeing priorities, schedule and budget for the Information Management (Data Warehouse) division, supporting all lines of business. Total 2015 budget for the division exceeds $100 million.-Responsible for tracking and reporting status of projects on the 2015 Information Management Roadmap. -Environment: Microsoft Office, Project, PowerPoint, Visio and SharePoint, ClarityResponsibilities: -Seeking a strong Project Manager-Reporting Specialist who has worked within a PMO. Possess the ability to multi-task and prioritize work. -Will be responsible for the management of project action items, detailed integrated project plans and milestone tracking. Experience with MS Project or excel for managing thousands of project tasks in one document. -Must be comfortable and have ability to interface with Senior managers to help facilitate the resolution of their action items. -Candidates should have 4-5 years of large projects/programs. -In addition to MS Project, the client uses MS Outlook OneNote for communication and SharePoint for document sharing. PMP a plus. Client also uses Clarity.-Responsible for managing team contributions to the 2016 Information Management Roadmap.-Responsible for planning and tracking tasks, milestones and communications for the Chief Development Office.-Coordinating activities across development teams and lines of business.-Managing multiple projects and work streams at an executive level in a fast-paced, high-stress environment.-This position will report directly to the manager of Project / Program Managers with in the Program Management Office. -Responsible to manage projects through the application of generally accepted project management principles, based in PMI disciplines.-Responsible to manage the project budget, including assistance with the business case, project estimates, and management to the approved spend.-Responsible to develop comprehensive work schedules and to manage project execution to the schedule.-Responsible to manage the project scope, including the creation of quality business requirements, functional requirements, and the application of a stringent change control process.-Responsible to appropriately resource the project, through collaboration with impacted development managers, business managers, test managers, risk managers, architecture managers, and governance personnel within the Business Management Office.-Responsible to ensure the quality of the project through the management and control of project test results, and through the enforcement and execution of quality checkpoints and the formal sign-off of key project artifacts.-Responsible for the coordination and communication between key project stakeholders, including planning meetings, execution meetings, and the creation of standardized project reporting.-Responsible for risk management and control, including the ongoing process of risk identification, and the development of appropriate risk response.Qualifications:-MS PowerPoint (Requied)-MS EXCEL (Requied)-Clarity Administration Experience - Highly Desired.-Candidate MUST be very senior with MS Excel, MS Powerpoint.-Candiate MUST have very strong communication skills, giving Status updates to C-level Management on multiple projects.",Project Manager-Reporting Specialist Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Columbus, OH",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Reporting-Specialist-Job-Columbus-OH-US-166751643.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,IT/Software Development,e4a141526b8a5b6ff51d244604f6c210
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:00:20:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in San Antonio  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,San Antonio 78218,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-SAN-ANTONIO-166740420.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=10,,General/Other: Medical/Health,1ef5fffe10e48425d194364dabda376a
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:00:11:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provides assessment, education, and monitoring of persons with co-occurring behavioral and physical health disorders. PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES: Provides integrated community support services, initial/annual Behavioral Health Assessments (BHA), and treatment planning for persons enrolled in a Community Support and the Health Care Home.  The level of care is based on assessed needs, utilizing professional and independent judgment. Behavioral Health Assessments and treatment plans include the participation of persons served and are completed according to agency policy with regard to timelines and quality indicators. Works in collaboration with Health Care Home team to provide assistance to clients regarding their overall physical health by using wellness coaching techniques and coordinating Health Care Home services. Completes initial, annual and discharge Adult/Youth status reports. Completes all required documents in accordance with agency policy and procedure.    Maintain billable expectation and complete all paperwork in adherence to agency timelines.  Serves as a resource for treatment team and be available to staff problematic consumer issues or situations which may arise which require clinical discussion for best practice outcomes. In conjunction with the Eligibility Coordinator, ensures consumers are applying for and obtaining necessary entitlement. Utilize all available IT resources/tools to supplement assessment and treatment planning including Cyber Access, OrderConnect, CMT, ProAct, and Avatar. Maintains knowledge of agency technology programs and/or systems needed to do the job and uses them effectively. Other duties and/or responsibilities may be assigned by supervisor.REQUIREMENTSMaster’s Degree1-3 Years of related experienceFirst Aid/CPR CertificationAnnual TB testing PREFERRED3-5 years of related experienceLPC/CSWCSAC I or II",QMHP - Healthcare Home Job in Kansas City,Full Time,"Kansas City, MO",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/QMHP-Healthcare-Home-Job-Kansas-City-MO-US-166706632.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4155c5f32b08b8e4d150735f72bbb731
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:00:03:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Responsible for effective management of patient care delivery: Completes and documents assessment within period established by policy/procedure. Completes and documents reassessment of patient needs according to department standard. Initiates, updates and communicates an appropriate multidisciplinary plan of care based on identified problems and/or patient needs. Collaborates with patient/family/physician and other disciplines to coordinate the plan of care. Administers and documents medications/treatment safely following Medication Administration Policy and Procedure. Evaluates patient response to care, revises plan of care as necessary and documents appropriately Recognizes change or urgent situations in patient condition and intervenes appropriately. Provides patient and/or family with information relative to treatment plan, diagnostic/surgical procedures, disease process, and care after discharge. Initiates collaboration and documents appropriate teaching, considering age, cultural and religious beliefs, and barriers to learning. Evaluates effectiveness of teaching and provides appropriate follow-up. Provides leadership and direction in accordance with departmental goals and objectives. Delegates duties based on position and level of competence and the complexity of patient's needs. Assists team members in preparing the lab before each case; also stocking rooms with pertinentsupplies at the end of each day. Monitors supply use, charges and availability of supplies. Provides post catheterization care to patient according to established policy. Skilled in radiation safety and monitors safety of personnel. Monitors EKG and hemodynamics, prepares appropriate paperwork, checks consents prior to case and when assigned as the monitor person during cases. Prepares the patient and assist the cardiologist using sterile technique when assigned as the scrub person during cases. As circulating nurse, administers drugs as ordered by attending cardiologist when needed. Monitors status of patient and reports changes in condition to physician. Skillfully communicates with team leader and team members to provide quality care. Performs Point of Care Testing within scope of licensure; accurately performs testing according to the approved procedure and limits testing to only those tests for which competency has been assessed and operator is deemed qualified by designated trainer. Healthstream (HLC) modules completed by assigned date. Complete Associate Self-evaluation and give to Supervisor by assigned date. Attend 2 of the Associate Round Tables per fiscal year. Maintain licensure or certification without lapse, if required for the position. Maintain BCLS/ACLS certification, if required for the position. Job Requirements POSITION QUALIFICATIONSA. Education/SkillsGraduate from an Accredited School of Nursing. B. ExperienceMinimum of 1 year of experience in a critical care setting.  Prior Cath Lab experience preferred. C. Licenses, Registrations, or CertificationsCurrent registration with the Louisiana State Board of Registered Nurse Examiners. BLS provider, ACLS provider as required by departmental policy. ",Registered Nurse - Cardiac Cath Lab Job in Shreveport,"Part Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Cardiac-Cath-Lab-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166643853.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=18,,Medical/Health,02f1d6c70321043d7d6fb8d63d7abf8d
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:00:00:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that the care we give can make every moment count.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s how our Hospice improves quality of life in the final stages of life. By delivering palliative care by hospice professionals, our patients can spend their remaining days in comfort and peace. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. We believe that every moment matters. We believe in compassionate care. Most of all, we believe in dignity and respect for each patient we serve.As an Admissions Coordinator, you will:Contact the patient and family within 1 hour of referral, and coordinating all admissions within the 3-hour admission Commitment.Process referrals by obtaining sufficient admission and insurance information in order to ensure appropriate and timely admission of patients.Maintain communication with pending patients, their families, and referral sources and routinely follow the progress of prospective patients and those referrals not taken under care (NTUC).  Participate in morning “Stand-Up” meetings.Participate as a member of the marketing team by: actively seeking new referral sources; developing and maintaining positive relationships with referral sources; assist in developing strategies and plans for Site and Company growth; participating in marketing meetings, staff meetings, department meetings, staff meetings, in-services, committees, community-education events and other activities as needed.Prepare marketing reports regarding referral statistics. Ensure high level of integrity of referral data within Company computer system.Maintain working knowledge of, and assist in, accessing community resources.Participate in evening/weekend on-call or overtime as required.Perform admissions presentations in the field and via phone, as directed by ED, to assist admission team in meeting 3-hour admission standard.Ensure maximum reimbursement through initial payer source, benefits, and eligibility verification, authorization processes, and accurate data entry into Company computer system. Completes required payer source verification forms.Required SkillsQualificationsStrong customer service experiencedHospice or medical office experience highly preferredLPN/LVN certification or Bachelor’s degree in business, social work, psychology or nursing or equivalent business experience preferredAble to work in an interdisciplinary settingAbility to maintain business and clinical files in a systematic and orderly fashionMust have strong communication, organization, negotiation and public relation skillsProficient with the PC including the MS suite of productsRequired Experience Keywords: Admissions Nurse, Hospice Nurse, Admissions RN, Hospice RN, Hospice LPN, Hospice LVN, Hospice social worker~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. Job LocationTroy, Missouri, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Admissions Coordinator - Hospice Job in Troy,,"Troy, MO",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Admissions-Coordinator-Hospice-Job-Troy-MO-US-166610132.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=18,,,2b3254144bb13f3c8e3a92dbe1020900
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:25:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business / Systems Analyst-Redmond, WA-12 Month ContractDid you know that Gartner positioned CompuCom as a Leader in its Magic Quadrant for End User Outsourcing? Come work for the leader today!Our client is the world's leading software organization seeking a candidate to create, maintain and evaluate diverse business requirements for Service Now Performance Analytics reporting solution.Tasks: * Creating reports and dashboards * Working on the list of reports to be created and self-managing reports getting done * Possibly assisting colleagues in understanding / providing knowledge on the report work * Understanding issues / functions not working properly in production and providing analysisRequirements: * 2-5 years' experience in the creation, updates and maintenance of dashboards; includes creating jobs, sources, indicators, breakdowns, and custom dashboards * ServiceNow experience * Experience working independently and running ServiceNow Performance Analytics requiredPosition is open to out-of-state candidates willing to relocate at their own expense.W2 only, no Corp to Corp. We are unable to sponsor H1B visas at this time.**CompuCom supports Employment Equity and Diversity**CompuCom Systems, Inc., a global company headquartered in Dallas, Texas, provides IT managed services, infrastructure solutions, consulting and products to Fortune 1000 companies committed to enhancing their end users' experience. Founded in 1987, privately held CompuCom employs approximately 11,500 associates. For more information, visit www.compucom.com",Business / Systems Analyst  Job in Los Angeles,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project","Los Angeles, CA 90013",Computer Hardware Computer Software Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-systems-analyst-2-job-los-angeles-ca-us-169018995.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f751772fa77136c56808bbbd4fd80f81
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:25:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Data Architect for a contract-to-hire position, located in Cary, NC.  The Data Architect will support enterprise-level and project-level data architecture needs by developing logical (business) data models based on business requirements; integrating them into the corporate data model repository; leveraging existing models, and ensuring minimal data redundancy.  In addition, this role will support enterprise-level and project-level data architecture needs by developing logical (business) data models based on business requirements. Required skills and experience include: Minimum of 5 years of experience as a Data Architect and Data Modeler and 10 years in software development. Data Architecture and Data Modeling experience. Technical proficiency on data architecture tools. Experience developing central data architecture artifacts and repository. Understanding and use of database management systems (Oracle, DB2). SDLC. SAS experience. Detailed level of architecture skills and experience spanning various technologies and platforms. Strong business analysis skills and the ability to translate business requirements into technical architecture. Strong analysis skills. Bachelor’s degree in a technology related discipline. Excellent written and verbal communications skills, including those needed for formal and informal presentations.   ",Data Architect Job in Cary,Full Time,"Cary, NC",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/data-architect-job-cary-nc-us-168977834.aspx?mescoid=1500142001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,cb61847716786c5e8840b6dca5bb9752
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:17:13:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Live IT Up at Ciber   At Ciber, we believe the most inspired, innovative and industrious companies should win, regardless of size or legacy. We?re the small company that cares and the big company that can. We deliver breakthrough performances and powerful solutions that are anything but cookie cutter in order to give our clients the competitive advantage they deserve.  Work. Role Description: Ciber Inc., has an opening for a DevOps Administrator, located in Charlotte, NC.The position is for a Senior Applications Analyst on the Software Team with a focus on the DevOps application administration configuration and implementation. Expected allocation is 90% project delivery and 10% support, providing DevOps services and support to the client application delivery project teams. The team provides software delivery solutions to the client's software projects. The team provides 24 x 7 end user support; application broke/fix issue resolution for software change management applications This position is a working DevOps subject matter expert position that is required to provide application administration, configuration, implementation consulting and process design services to software delivery projects. The candidate is expected to develop and implement DevOps Continuous integration automated code builds and automated code deployments to software development, test and production environments. Also to recommend and document DevOps best practices related to our DevOps software applications and processes. Perform application maintenance, and technical consulting services, and application development services as needed. Responsibilities & Duties:Perform as a DevOps subject matter expert and consultant on the Software Change Management Team . Work closely with other Senior Level Developers, Technical Leads, Solutions Architects and Project Delivery Managers to provide DevOps consulting services, DevOps application configuration, requirements documentation participate and support all application aspects of the ITDM and SDLC process for the implementation of software solution delivery services. Convert business request into technical designs and specification to estimate solution delivery cost and hours. Develop and maintain effective application support documentation. Design Code and maintain effective IT application solutions. In addition the position can be requested to perform application software development for IT Solution Delivery Projects and support Software Change Management and DevOps processes and applications.    Basic/Required Qualifications: Bachelors? degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or related discipline; OR 4 years of prior equivalent work related experience in lieu of a degree. Five or more years of experience in application development, application support, and application solution delivery. Five or more years of demonstrated, applied, high efficiency working experience with programming languages and tools such as Java, C#, Visual Studio.NET, Javascript, Beanshell, SOAP, XMl. Demonstrated experience with Windows and Linux application environments. Five or more years? experience administering and configuring DevOps applications specifically Subversion, Jenkins, and NexusPro. Five of more years? experience developing Maven, Gradle and Nuget scripts. Working knowledge of the Software Solution Delivery Lifecycle Process (SDLC). General understanding of code deployment application such as IBM Urban Code. Demonstrated self-starter that can transfer business requirements into technical solutions Ability to write solid code quickly with minimum defects.Desired Qualifications: Working level skills in development framework tools and technologies including software service virtualization, software development continuous integration processes and delivery applications. Development of SOAP and REST web services, as well as development of MQ or JMS messaging protocols is recommended. Experience with application testing is also desired. Demonstrated ability to solve challenging technical issues. Excellent customer interfacing and service Skills. Self - Starter with the ability to work with little supervision. This position requires the successful completion of a background investigation and/or drug screen.  Ciber, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.  Learn. Talent Services bring clients a range of staffing solutions, from a single contractor to a team of experts to help achieve their key business goals on target and within budget. Our talent sourcing model uncovers the right IT talent and aligns critical skills with client technology, culture, and expectations.  Grow.  For more than 40 years, Ciber has delivered the technical savvy and IT solutions that help businesses achieve strategic goals. A global IT consulting company with some 6,500 people, Ciber has offices on four continents and in 15 countries. Founded in 1974, Ciber remains client focused and results driven. The company trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE: CBR). For more information, visit http://www.ciber.com/.",DevOps Administrator Job in Charlotte,"Full Time, Employee","Charlotte, NC 28201",,http://jobview.monster.com/devops-administrator-job-charlotte-nc-us-168924728.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,9ebce8ffba21ec462b551d9d028d3dfe
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:17:12:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Career opportunity for a Support Specialist Lead (Office 365) in St. Louis, Missouri.  Join this new team tasked to transform the company’s ability to obtain and consume information vital to operate and grow the business in a data driven world.  This individual will assist with the delivery and implementation of new cutting edge tools and technologies in our Endpoint Technology Services space. This team is focused on delivering global enterprise solutions as a part of our transformation to the Cloud using Microsoft Office 365. Responsibilities:As a Support Specialist Lead working on the Office 365 deployment, you will be responsible for providing key leadership and executives with proactive and  in-depth on-demand training, service and remediation of issues related to Office 365.  Provide exceptional customer service ensuring that each employee interaction results in a fully satisfied customer.    Qualifications:Must be committed to incorporating security into all decisions and daily job responsibilities Experience interacting with and counseling mid-level and senior executives Must be committed to delivering exceptional customer service and building relationships 5+ years of experience with direct troubleshooting, installation and configuration experience 3+ years of experience in a deskside support role 2+ years of experience specifically supporting Office 365 MCSA - Office 365 Certification  Must be extremely professional with polished communication skills Experience working in a large corporate environmentTo be considered for this opportunity be sure to APPLY via Monster and forward your updated resume with relevant experience and technical skills to Debbie Hogan at dhogan@sbscreatix.com ",Lead Support Specialist - Office  Job in Saint Louis,Full Time,"Saint Louis, MO",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-support-specialist-office-365-job-saint-louis-mo-us-168928606.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=4,Employee Health/Dental Benefits; 401k Employer Match,Experienced (Non-Manager),5530b4b8a46236907eceec6431a383ab
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:16:56:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Technical Support - Linux in Irving, Texas (TX) Responsibilities: Works on problems of moderate and varied complexity where analysis of data may require adaptation of standardized practices or precedent; acts independently to identify and select appropriate methodologies; work customarily and regularly (50% of time or more); requires the exercise of discretion and independent judgment Normally receives general instructions on non-routine work assignments; requires additional instructions and guidance on more complex or new assignments; decisions are made independently; assigned tasks or projects are generally reviewed after completion Contact is typically coordinative in nature and involves exchanging detailed technical information; may deal with both internal and external contactsREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree, or equivalent and 4 - 5 years of job related experience 2 - 4 years of UNIX experience in a customer support environment (RHEL v5 and 6) 2 - 4 years of VMWare experience Demonstrates working level of knowledge in job-related functional area and of the business Direct customer support experience Must be able to work nights and weekends Candidates must be authorized to work in the US without sponsorshipDesirable: Backup software experience Basic Network Troubleshooting",Technical Support - Linux Job in Irving,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Irving, TX 75038",,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-support-linux-job-irving-tx-us-168916985.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c29bfea539171fbf609c00b2e8d7bf03
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:16:56:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"AS/400 RPG ILE Programmer Analyst opportunity with a Fortune 100 company recognized by Forbes as one of America’s most admired companies. Company offers competitive pay, aggressive quarterly bonuses, full benefits package with 401K matching, paid training and relocation assistance. The corporate office offers an on-site cafeteria, on-site work out facilities, personal trainers, fitness classes, walking trails, indoor/outdoor basketball courts, sand volleyball court, 18-hole Frisbee golf course and much more!! This is an opportunity to join a company that emphasizes work/life balance, promotes from within and a community like company culture!The AS/400 RPG ILE Programmer Analyst will participate in our application design and development process by working with internal customers and Information Systems system design team members and perform these essential duties:Analysis, code development, documentation and maintenance of new applications and substantial enhancements to existing applicationsRequired skills include a demonstrated expertise in development of ILE RPG based applications using free-format RPG and embedded SQLExperience with browser based and/or GUI application development a plusHTML and JavaScript a plus Note: Job location in on-site in Knoxville, TN. This is not a telecommute position. Relocation assistance is available. AS/400 RPG ILE Programmer Analyst Requirements: The ideal candidate will be a service-oriented, customer-focused team member able to function at a senior level by managing multiple project assignment and meeting deliver due datesDemonstrated proficiency with CL, ILE, and free-format RPGExperience with service programs, modules, binding and embedded SQLMust have an ability to prioritize effectively, handle shifting priorities professionally, and exhibit a high level of project ownershipThe ability to communicate clearly with IT team members and internal customers is essentialAttention to detail and ability to investigate problems are critical to support project plans and schedulesA four year degree or equivalent work experience is required Keywords: iSeries Programmer Analyst, iSeries Developer, RPG Programmer, RPG Developer, AS400 Programmer, AS400 Developer, AS/400 RPG ILE Programmer ",AS/ RPG ILE Programmer Analyst Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/as-400-rpg-ile-programmer-analyst-job-knoxville-tn-us-166026586.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=6,"72,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",IT/Software Development,18a51f585e2bb8905620b32d0b63a53d
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:16:52:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is looking for a User Tester (UX) with Sales Experience to join their team in Piscataway, New Jersey (NJ).Summary:The Customer/User Experience Testing role is primarily for the client's Retail Stores. The candidate would test (not limited to) New/Modified Products and Service and National Company Retail policies. This person will be analyzing data from reporting and also data retrieved from Usability Testing Tools from Survey Monkey, OpinonLabs, Foresee, usertesting.com, Customer/User Focus Groups, and Optimal workshops.REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor degree in Marketing/Behavioral Science/Psychology is a plus * 2+ years of professional experience with usability analysis/testing and research analysis for user/customer experience (UX) Person who has written test cases from requirements A great communicator eager to learn and be in fast paced enterprise environmentA Plus: Retail experience Has both the usability testing and research analysis background",User Tester (UX) and Sales Experience Job in Piscataway,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Piscataway, NJ 08854",,http://jobview.monster.com/user-tester-ux-sales-experience-job-piscataway-nj-us-168959186.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8ec2abef6033c63a0cc94fd42eebaf3d
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:15:56:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is hiring a Visual Designer for a 4+ month opportunity for a client of ours in Hoffman Estates!The Visual Designer III for Strategic Initiatives is a hybrid design professional well versed in high-level graphic design and strongly influenced by the visual design and merchandising disciplines. This senior level creative, in partnership with the experience design team, leads and directs from concept through completion, integrating 2D, 3D design and technology into holistic presentation packages for internal and external business consideration. The Visual Designer III incorporates responsive design, informational design, and touch screen strategies into a comprehensive end to end user experience flow. It is the charge of the Visual Designer III to translate desired moods, messages, and concepts into cohesive presentations.The Visual Designer III for Strategic Initiatives is a critical design leadership position responsible for partnering with the Art Director and co-mentoring a team of two designers supporting the Business Units, Format Strategy and REIT initiatives at 40+ hours per week. This key role will support the team with strategy and design for the following key projects: 6 Concept Stores targeting a $2.3M sales increase (20% revenue increase), 10 Apparel Showcase stores with a targeted $68.8M sales increase, REIT Initiatives in up 50 stores a year with marked improvement of margin per square foot, and Stand Alone Appliance and Mattress concepts to deliver 53%-70% IRR for test markets in 4 locations.This team leadership is also actively engaged in creating curated Member Journey destinations that ladder directly leadership vision and directives. Past success stories have been Home Reinvention in Fox Valley and North Riverside which have increased department sales. This effort will launch will be phased into an additional ten stores in 2016. The Visual Designer III will be called upon to: o Design and develop creative solutions that are unique and award winning o Be a team player and collaborator o Articulate ideas and demonstrate a willingness to bring new ideas to the forefront frequently o Demonstrates effective verbal skills while building constructive and effective relationships with colleagueso Exhibit attention to detail with a high degree of accuracy o Utilize current and new programs to maximize efficiencieso Build and maintain a rapport with cross-discipline team members.Requirements: o A Bachelor's degree in fine arts and design (or comparable work experience o Strong design background o Advanced knowledge of Photoshop and Illustrator o Portfolio that displays an understanding of user-centered design (PLEASE include link to ONLINE portfolio in submission body) o Ability to work with User Experience Designers and design from the wireframes that they have created Must be able to deliver high quality work consistently and on time o Attention to detail, while also considering the big pictureExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Visual Designer Job in Hoffman Estates,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Visual Designer,"Hoffman Estates, IL",http://jobview.monster.com/visual-designer-job-hoffman-estates-il-us-168953562.aspx?mescoid=2700410001001&jobPosition=10,,IT/Software Development,68fbc88022db701a91f43bd05abb1473
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:15:56:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Technical Writer contract opportunity with a client located in the Minneapolis, MN area. This position will be responsible to research, write, and electronically produce instructional documentation such as operator’s manuals, installation instructions, and setup instructions..Local candidates preferred.Responsibilities for the Technical WriterCreate accurate, instructional documentation using text, graphic storyboards, line art, animations, and videos.Define and translate customer requirements into clear concise instructional documentation.Study and apply storyboard concepts for the creation of graphics as well as study and apply the concept of reuse for text and graphics to obtain reduced translation cost.Create and route workflow requests for changes and new material to the editor, team lead, and product teams (engineering, test, legal, and service) for review and incorporate appropriate changes in the documentationManage a multi-project workload and complete projects on time to meet production schedule requirements.Apply appropriate metadata to graphic communications for searching and reusePerform other duties as directedRequirements for the Technical WriterBachelor’s degree from an accredited college in Scientific and Technical Communications, English, or related engineering field or applicable experience as a writer/artist.Strong mechanical knowledge and the the ability to understand and the ability to communicate technical and mechanical conceptsExperience with creating animation and line graphicsProficiency with Adobe Illustrator and Corel Draw as well as experience with Creo Illustrate and Creo Parametric CAD software preferred. Basic Office / Arbortext Editor experienceFamiliarity with XML document editing Experience using data content repository and workflow systemAbility to read detail and assembly drawings and schematicsBenefitsThis Job is located in Bloomington, MN -> United States",Technical Writer - Mechanical/Operator Manuals/Commercial Products Job in Bloomington,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Bloomington, MN 55431",,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-writer-mechanical-operator-manuals-commercial-products-job-bloomington-mn-us-168972749.aspx?mescoid=2700440001001&jobPosition=15,30.00 - 40.00 $ /hour,,51c7e7e75b5d06392a2bb21b40c4bb96
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:00:20:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Come work a great short-term assignment. Looking for someone with copy center experience for one week.Working hours: 7am-4pmSkills:- Must have copy center experience- Binding experience a huge PLUSRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Copy Center Associate Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/copy-center-associate-job-norcross-ga-us-178463869.aspx?mescoid=4300759001001&jobPosition=13,14.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,,f71aa3db7ffbbb9b04d168d396d321f3
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:00:22:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theDecatur area for same day auto partsdeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Partsfleet II is technology driven to help you bestmanage your business from services provided to reliable invoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Decatur area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer. Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Decatur, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25363 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Decatur,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theDecatur area for same day auto partsdeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Partsfleet II is technology driven to help you bestmanage your business from services provided to reliable invoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Decatur area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer. Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Decatur, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25363 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-decatur-ga-us-178644863.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=19,,Logistics/Transportation,d4c0264d26c59eac44ada256e0d1c69b
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:00:42:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"We focus on people. Our residents. Their lives. Their health. Their families. We are one of the largest providers of short-term and long-term health care services in the United States. Through our affiliated entities, we provide services through skilled nursing facilities in 22 states. We are committed to providing compassionate, family oriented short-term and long-term care. We focus on individualized care that respects the dignity and rights of our residents. Our aim is to care for every resident the way we would our family members. We strive to provide our residents with services designed to achieve quality care and quality of life. To reach these outcomes we subscribe to quality treatment with a combination of ""caring and curing"". Select facilities provide Intravenous Therapy Services, Respiratory Therapy Services, Dementia Services and all facilities provide Rehabilitation Services. Our affiliated facility Anderson Mill Health & Rehab Center in Austell, GA (Greater Atlanta, GA) is seeking an experienced and licensed SNF or LTC therapist (Occupational Therapist, Speech Therapist or Physical Therapist) to join our in-house RehabTeam! Please apply online via this posting for an expedited process. For more information please contact Lesley Mastalerz at 866-275-8111 or lmmastalerz@savasc.com.SummaryResponsible for the overall administration, clinical planning, development, and operations of the Rehab Program. Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesRecruits, hires, provides orientation/training, and retains a sufficient number of qualified staff to carry out the responsibilities of the Rehabilitation department. Ensures employee performance meets or exceeds expectations and periodic performance appraisals are conducted on a timely basis.Ensures rehabilitation staff is providing appropriate care to Resident in keeping with established standards for quality and in accordance with generally established principles of care.Supervises the scheduling of residents for therapy services considering available treatment hours, staff resources and overall plan of care.Manages the evaluation and development of in-house therapy programs including equipment assessment and staffing ratios.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.May be required to perform patient care duties as their licensed discipline.Performs other duties as assigned. QualificationsBachelors or Masters degree in Occupational Therapy, Physical Therapy, or Masters degree in Speech Therapy.Current valid state licensure as an OTR, RPT, or SLP-CCC.One to three (1-3) years' previous clinical experience preferred.Physical Demands & Environment Shift work may be required. Employee is frequently required to stand, walk, use hands or fingers, reach with hands and arms, feel, talk and hear. Employee will occasionally assist to lift and / or transfer patients weighing between 100 to 250 pounds. Employee is occasionally exposed to blood or other body fluids, fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Rehab Program Manager / Director in Austell,Full Time Employee,"Austell, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rehab-program-manager-director-in-austell-ga-atlanta-job-austell-ga-us-178341472.aspx?mescoid=1100053001001&jobPosition=6,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b26fb51c29622ba75ec16895b08ec317
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:00:42:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client is seeking a material handler/forklift operator for a small warehouse/retail facility in Marietta. Talent will be working in a small but very well organized facility, helping to pull customer orders and load customer vehicles with product after purchase. This talent will be responsible for accurate inventory counts and inventory management, ordering product/supplied from the main facility when needed, etc. Talent will be using a forklift to move product around warehouse and place into proper storage/holding areas as needed.Working hours: 7:00 am- 3:30 pmMonday- FridaySkills:Talent must have 2+ years of prior forklift experience with prior forklift certification thru OSHA. Talent must be able to work with little to no supervision and must be very driven, taking ownership of their work area and the warehouse in general. Must be able to work with small team and work in location where the work pace is often quite slow! This client is seeking someone who has exceptional work ethic, someone who will be incredibly reliable with need to take little time off from work and someone who is laid back in nature but also very respectful of their manager and others while being dedicated to 100% customer satisfaction!Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Material Handler/Forklift Operator needed in Marietta Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30062",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/material-handler-forklift-operator-needed-in-marietta-job-marietta-ga-us-178466253.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=16,10.00 - 10.00 $ /hour,,43fa027df53d2e902ca3a4c2b98a6f4c
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:01:32:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Immediate need for a Senior Mechanical Engineer located near Marietta, GA at a world wide leading heavy industrial manufacturer. This role is responsible to plan, organize, execute, and document results of Pilot Line trials and product performance investigations Must have a BS Degree in Engineering (Mechanical, Metallurgical or Materials Engineering is coveted) with at least seven (7) years experience handling research and new product development projects within the Metal, Steel or Aluminum industries. This is a great opportunity to join a growing and expanding organization. This is a direct hire opportunity. APPLY NOW!Responsibilities for the Senior Mechanical EngineerPlan, organize, execute, and document results of Pilot Line trials and product performance investigations Analyze the commercial and technical viability of new products and processesAssist with design and developments of experimental rigs, tooling and processes Ability isolate a problem and draw upon knowledge and experience to identify cause and possible solutions.Requirements for the Senior Mechanical EngineerBachelors Degree is required (Mechanical, Metallurgical or Materials Engineering is coveted)Must have at least seven (7) years experience handling research and new product development projects within the Metal, Steel or Aluminum industries.Strong design experience with AutoCAD and InventorMust have prior research and development experience within a research/lab based environmentBenefitsFull benefits packagePTO / Vacation planRelocation assistanceBonus potentialThis Job is located in Marietta, GA -> United States",Senior Mechanical Engineer - Research/Product Development/Manufacturing Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30061",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-mechanical-engineer-research-product-development-manufacturing-job-marietta-ga-us-178090385.aspx?mescoid=1700184001001&jobPosition=19,"100,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",,84118831217ee53c890957d4c185c22d
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:01:33:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking to gain experience in the warehouse? This is just the job for you!My client is seeking entry level job seekers to assist in the Kitting department of the warehouse. Job duties include but not limited to: packaging items, setting up promotional displays, prepare items for shipment and assist with labels and making boxes. The ideal candidate is someone who pays attention to detail, loves to work in a team environment and eager to learn the daily job functions of being in a warehouse.Location: We are located in Atlanta, GA near Union City, Riverdale and Fairburn areaShift Schedule: Monday through Saturday; 6:30AM-6:00PM (occasional Sundays required) Pay Rate: $9/hourly (once you complete your 30 day training, the rate will move to $10/hourly)Working hours: MONDAY THROUGH SATURDAY; 6:30AM-6:00PMSkills:Skills/Abilities:Ability to develop, update and interpret data through MS Excel spreadsheetsMust be able to lift and carry boxes weighing up to 35lbs. for periods of 15-30 minutesAbility to work in a fast-paced environmentNo experience required!!! We will train!!!!If you are ready to make a change into manufacturing and logistics, apply today!!! We look forward to having you on board!Please feel free to contact me for any additional questions regarding the position: alyse.wynn@randstadusa.com Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Kitting Associate Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30349",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/kitting-associate-job-atlanta-ga-us-178460512.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,9.00 - 9.00 $ /hour,,cacab1455a1e64325a7e95095d7f4849
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:01:56:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary of essential job functions:Support parts sales by performing various shipping and receiving duties including but not limited to:-Verifies and keeps records on incoming and outgoing shipments and preparesitems for shipment.-Parts pick-up and delivery to/ from local customers and vendors using companyvehicle.-Utilize computer for shipping, receiving and inventory control.-Responsible for sorting and placing materials or items on racks, shelves, or in binsaccording to predetermined sequence such as size, type, style, color, or productcode.-Moving materials and items from receiving or storage areas to shipping or otherdesignated areas.-Report defective materials or questionable conditions to the supervisor.-Maintain adequate levels of shipping materials. Forward all purchase request tothe supervisor.-Maintain work area, warehouse and equipment in a clean and orderly conditionand is accessible and safe for employee and customer traffic-Assisting in counting of physical inventory-Follow prescribed safety regulations-Perform other duties as assignedWorking hours: 7:30AM-4:30PMSkills:MUST have forklift experience (stand-up lift) please apply directly to this posting and I will reach out to you if you are qualified.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Shipping/Receiving Clerk Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30080",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-receiving-clerk-job-smyrna-ga-us-178464723.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=12,11.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,,93390d0a3cfa8dc80c791299a094f331
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:01:56:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Regional Account ManagerCompany:Cogent Communications is a multinational, Tier 1 facilities-based ISP, consistently ranked as one of the top five networks in the world and is publicly traded on the NASDAQ Stock Market under the ticker symbol CCOI. Cogent specializes in providing businesses with high speed Internet access and Ethernet transport services. Cogent's facilities-based, all-optical IP network backbone provides IP services in over 190 markets globally. Since its inception, Cogent has unleashed the benefits of IP technology, building one of the largest and highest capacity IP networks in the world. This network enables Cogent to offer large bandwidth connections at highly competitive prices. Cogent also offers superior customer support by virtue of its end-to-end control of service delivery and network monitoring. A generous base salary, structured tenure pay increases and an uncapped commissions plan offers you an unlimited earnings potential. A full benefits package takes effect within 30 days of employment. Matching 401k and stock options are also included.Responsibilities:Hunting to identify new business opportunities within a Regional Sales Territory and target market segment of SMB and Mid-Market corporate customers (up to 499 employees) Through direct calling, email and other contact efforts you will identify, qualify, and generate these new business opportunities by working directly with Key Decision Makers Compliment prospecting and selling efforts through field work such as building walks, lobby events, property management relationships, and customer face to face meetings Leverage consultative and relationship building selling techniques you will identify current and future connectivity solutions Help Cogent customers and prospects by positioning our services for new business Achieve monthly revenue goals by selling into the nation's largest commercial and retail buildings; office parks and professional campusesQualifications:1-4+ years of solid, sales experience, preferably B2B in the technology field Previous sales experience (recent experience strongly preferred) with a track record of success is required Strong oral and written communication skills are a must Ability to work in a fast paced, team environment with revenue deadlines Working knowledge of computer applications such as Microsoft Office and Salesforce are a plus A college degree is preferredTo apply for the Regional Account Manager position, please submit your resume and cover letter to careers@cogentco.com .Cogent Communications is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Regional Account Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Internet Services,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-account-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-168575577.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e5def06c955dd07462248ef61c733a88
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:02:01:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking anAssistant Restaurant Managerwith a minimum of 1 year of management experience to run quality shifts and drive sales/profit performance for the restaurant. This role is to primarily assist with the opening or closing of the restaurant. This position supervises and oversees daily store operations to ensure profitability through outstanding store presentation and Guest service.Job Responsibilities:• Makes daily decisions that involve time management (must have a sense of urgency), upholding product quality, cleanliness, and all other Company standards.• Builds sales and maximizes profits by effectively interviewing, developing, and communicating Company and Guest expectations to the entire team.• Coaches, teaches and motivates team to maintain high-quality Guest service and safety.• Understands cost control procedures, financial accounting, inventory levels, and labor management.Minimum Qualifications:• Must be able to work 40 hours a week.• Must have a high-school diploma or GED.• Must be at least 21 years of age (20 years of age may be allowed if restaurant does not serve alcohol).• Minimum of one (1) year experience managing people, preferably in the food service industry, OR experience as an Opening Coordinator for at least six (6) months.Key Competencies:• Coaching and Developing Others• Effective Communication• Composure• Resourcefulness• Demonstrates Ethics & Integrity• Time and Priority ManagementEssential Job Functions and Work Environment:• Must be able to lift or carry objects weighing 0-50 pounds during scheduled shift.• Must be able to stand, bend, kneel, reach, push/pull, walk and squat during scheduled shift.• In addition to the essential job duties stated above, the ability to handle job stress and interact effectively with others, including guests and co-workers, are essential functions of the job. The work environment includes flashing and flickering lights, moving mechanical parts, and loud noises.Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.The CompanyFor nearly 40 years, CEC Entertainment has proudly served as the nationally recognized leader in family dining and entertainment and the place Where A Kid Can Be A Kid®. As the award-winning, number-one, kid-friendly restaurant for millions of families across the world, the company and its franchisees operate a system of more than 590 Chuck E. Cheese's stores located in 47 states and 11 foreign countries and territories, and a system of over 140 Peter Piper Pizza franchise and company-owned locations. More than 17,000 employees are dedicated to ensuring Every Guest Leaves Happy!BenefitsCEC Entertainment offers a wide variety of benefits including medical, dental, vision, life, disability and 401(k) to eligible U.S. employees as part of their overall employment package. We also offer job training and career growth opportunities.* * *At CEC Entertainment, we believe that our workforce should reflect the diverse backgrounds, experiences and perspectives of the many guests we serve. As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we do not discriminate against applicants due to race, ancestry, color, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, religion, age, physical or mental disability, genetic information, pregnancy, veteran status, or on the basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. Employment is contingent upon a successful background and reference check, drug testing. Applicable positions also requires a Motor Vehicle Review and Credit Check. Applicants must be eligible to work in the United States.",Assistant Restaurant Manager Job in Jonesboro,"Full Time , Employee","Jonesboro, GA 30236",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-restaurant-manager-job-jonesboro-ga-us-178515044.aspx?mescoid=3500602001001&jobPosition=8,,Food Services/Hospitality,7e43dc8fc3d2eeca6a882385384d7b4a
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:02:01:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A company in Buckhead, GA is seeking a Logistics Load Coordinator to take responsibility for routing company freight. The position requires a good working relationship between 3rd party shipping locations and the carrier base. This role will work closely with the following teams: Sales, Procurement, Supply Chain, manufacturing facilities staff and will have some customer contact.Responsibilities: Manual load building, dispatch, track and trace of freight, and reporting of results Ensuring the most cost efficient carrier, route, and weight compliance Support the Logistics Department to identify lower cost opportunitiesREQUIREMENTS: Previous experience in dispatching freight & utilizing a TMS (Transportation Management System) preferred PC literate with emphasis on Word and Excel Excellent verbal and written communication skills Strong mathematical skills Analytical problem solving skills Even temperament Creative problem solver Possess good understanding of DOT hours of service regulationsKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Logistics Load Coordinator Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA 30326",,http://jobview.monster.com/logistics-load-coordinator-job-atlanta-ga-us-178092275.aspx?mescoid=1100026001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),042cac1a73c845d6319d5f2711c84cfa
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:03:09:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad Stockbridge will be holding a Career Day on Thursday, Jan. 12, 2016. We are looking for experienced warehouse professionals in the following job categories:1. Picker/Packers2. Inventory Clerks3. Shipping/Receiving Clerks4. Forklift Operators5. Loader/Unloaders* You must have at least 6 months experience in 1 or more of these categories.* Forklift operators must have at least 2 years experience.DATE & TIME: Thursday, Jan. 12, 2016 - 9 AM to 1 PM (We will not except any candidates after 1 PM)LOCATION: 1060 Eagles Landing Parkway. Stockbridge, GA 30281. (Behind Starbucks)Working hours: 9 AM to 1 PMSkills:Dress professionally and bring 2 forms of ID.Please allow for up to 3 hours to complete the full process.Please do not bring anyone with you who will not be interviewing. Seating is limited.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Randstad Career Day Job in Stockbridge,Full Time Employee,"Stockbridge, GA 30281",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/randstad-career-day-job-stockbridge-ga-us-178686264.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,9.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,,ec422783ca57ef232a82d8b23ea1c5fb
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:03:10:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Want to finally earn what you’re worth? We have a job opportunity for the independent-minded professional. American Income makes a difference by helping protect people financially. We also believe in giving back to the communities around us. Our people make us a great company, and we’re always looking for community-focused individuals to join our team.We are currently interviewing entry level and senior level applicants who are service-minded and want to help people, gain experience and earn the money they deserve. This is a Sales Representative position working one-on-one with families in the community. There is flexibility and room for advancement.5 Reasons To Choose A Job With American IncomeYou will be supporting the needs of people in the community and making an impact.You get hands-on training while you manage relationships with existing and new customers.The compensation is very competitive.You can benefit from performance awards, incentives and advancement opportunities.You only need a high school diploma or equivalent, be independent-minded and a good communicator.American Income Life Insurance Company is one of the largest providers of supplemental insurance coverage to labor unions, credit unions, and associations. American Income Life Insurance is licensed in 49 states, the District of Columbia, Canada and New Zealand. We pride ourselves on our rapid growth and expansion, superior industry ratings and the difference we make in people's lives. Our life insurance protects the lives of hardworking families.Get to know the people who make our organization successful by visiting us at https://agent-jobs.ailcareers.com . Take our people’s word for it, not just ours. Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider4.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","American Income Life Job Application for Professional Customer Service Position | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Phone 1-888-767-7100,All,http://jobview.monster.com/professional-customer-service-position-job-atlanta-ga-us-178284209.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,,,44727680764b01a0e4db2d68c23e1390
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:12:00:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"National Account Manager (NAM) - North America Company:Cogent Communications is a multinational, Tier 1 facilities-based ISP, consistently ranked as one of the top five networks in the world and is publicly traded on the NASDAQ Stock Market under the ticker symbol CCOI. Cogent specializes in providing businesses with high speed Internet access and Ethernet transport services. Cogent's facilities-based, all-optical IP network backbone provides IP services in over 180 markets globally. Since its inception, Cogent has unleashed the benefits of IP technology, building one of the largest and highest capacity IP networks in the world. This network enables Cogent to offer large bandwidth connections at highly competitive prices. Cogent also offers superior customer support by virtue of its end-to-end control of service delivery and network monitoring. A generous base salary, structured tenure pay increases and an uncapped commissions plan offers you an unlimited earnings potential. A full benefits package takes effect within 30 days of employment. Matching 401k and stock options are also included.Responsibilities:·         Hunting to Identify new business opportunities within National Sales Territory focused on the Mid Market and non-named National Account target market segments (up to 500 – 999 employees)·         Through direct calling, email and other contact efforts you will identify, qualify, and generate these new business opportunities by working directly with Key Decision Makers·         Compliment prospecting and selling efforts through field work such as building walks, lobby events, property management relationships, and customer face to face meetings·         Leverage consultative and relationship building selling techniques you will identify current and future connectivity solutions·         Help Cogent customers and prospects by positioning our services for new business·         Achieve monthly revenue goals by selling into the nation's largest commercial and retail buildings; office parks and professional campusesQualifications:·         2-5 years of solid, sales experience, preferably B2B and in the technology field·         Previous sales experience (recent experience strongly preferred) with a track record of success is required·         You must be able to demonstrate your ability to identify, qualify and generate new business through extensive prospecting and research·         Strong oral and written communication is required·         Ability to work in a fast paced, team environment with revenue deadlines·         Working knowledge of computer applications such as Microsoft Office and Salesforce are a plus·         A college degree is preferred but not requiredTo apply for the National Account Manager position, please submit your resume and cover letter to careers@cogentco.com .Cogent Communications is an Equal Opportunity Employer. ",National Account Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/national-account-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-168575612.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=7,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,3eee76cf87575bd7356885b870d58d4b
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:50:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Job ID:  93551  Summary The Content Manager will be responsible for creating, improving and maintaining content to support the overall communications strategy for Oldcastle and achieve our overall business goals. Primary responsibility includes researching, sourcing, writing and editing and curating interesting content for various communication channels.This position will also be responsible for the production of company newsletters (print and electronic), development of presentations, maintaining intranet sites and external websites, managing, supporting the communications team with content for multi-channel distribution and expanding the company’s social media presence. The ideal candidate is an experienced professional with demonstrable creative writing coupled with CMS and social media skills. As a Content manager, you should perform well under deadlines and be detail-oriented. Responsibilities Collaborates across functions to deliver an effective content strategy and editorial plan to meet the business objectivesDevelop and maintain an editorial calendarCreate and publish engaging contentBuild a photo and collateral archiveEdit, proofread and improve messagingDevelopment of editorial governance so content is consistent with our brand voice, style and tone.Use content management systems to analyze website traffic and users engagement metricsBuild, manage and expand the company’s social media profiles and presenceChannel management of digital content hubs and all supporting social channels including email / newsletter distribution.Solid understanding of basic best practices of communication channels, which content and approaches work on each and whyActively hunt, gather and tell stories — see connections where others don’t Qualifications  EducationBA/BS degree Experience 2+ years as a writer/content manager ( experience in the B2B industry preferred), maintaining a high-impact, high-paced editorial calendarExcellent writing skillsKnowledge of journalism standards and best practices, as well as AP styleHighly organized & proactive with strong ownership sensibility and a true passion for content curationExcellent communication and presentation skills – Oral and writtenInterpersonal savvy- Relates well to all levels of people in and out of the organizationAttention to detail; Looks for ways to improve and promote qualityHands on experience with CMS (including SharePoint and Joomla) and MS Office SuiteBasic technical knowledge of HTML and web publishingKnowledge of SEO and web traffic metricsAbility to successfully manage multiple schedules and projects simultaneouslyTeam-oriented and collaborative with the ability to manage relationships with internal and external partners Experience creating content for the web and growing a social audienceEditorial mindset that seeks to understand what audiences consume and how to create itProject management skills and understanding how to manage the priorities of multiple stakeholders in a complex environment and focus on the delivery of quality resultsExperience with graphic design is a plusProficiency in Spanish is a plus What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Join our Talent Community to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs & career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Oldcastle is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. ",Content Manager - Corporate Communications - Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/content-manager-corporate-communications-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-177361848.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=1,,,372dcbcf29279b49135e276f1e1279df
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:50:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Document Solutions Specialists are outside sales representatives who focus on expanding the sales of Managed Print Services, small format and wide format equipment sales, reprographics sales and placements of the ARC Skysite SmartScreens. Document Solutions Specialists drive new business growth by scheduling presentations with new prospects as well as our existing clients with the goal of closing sales or expanding the solutions already in place. Find out more about ARC Document Solutions at (www.e-arc.com)Required Skills:Job Duties of the Document Solutions Specialist:Identifies development potential in accounts by studying current business metrics; interviewing key customer contacts, uncovering and presenting additional new business opportunities.Utilizes salesforce.com on a daily basis to manage the sales pipeline and close opportunities consistently in all products assigned.Initiates and follows sales process by understanding client's business drivers, building relationships; qualifying potential opportunities; presenting and closing business. Is able to close business by overcoming objections.Is responsible for building and managing an active pipeline of opportunities within assigned territory.Is able to prepare and present to all levels within client organization.Interacts with sales leadership and operational leaders to develop sales strategies that win new business.Understands the ARC Document Solution's Value Proposition and competitive advantages with the ability to deliver it formally to clients.Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; training sessions; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in industry events and organizations.Understands components of margin and manages to maximize profitability.Performs position expectations as detailed in the ARC Standards of Performance document for this position.Ability to be a collaborative, consultative, innovative, positive professional who is customer focused, organized and self-motivated.Exhibits professional demeanor and is an effective verbal and written communicator.Required Experience:Experience with prospecting, cold calling, use of Salesforce (salesforce.com), and managing a pipeline.Experience working in the print industry2+ years of Outside Sales/hunting experienceKnowledge of construction industry preferredKnowledge of large and small format printing as well as managed printing servicesEducation: Prefer a Bachelor's degree in Business, Marketing or related field.",Outside Sales - Document Solutions Consultant () Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Printing and Publishing Architectural and Design ServicesConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/outside-sales-document-solutions-consultant-1009-job-atlanta-ga-us-178678112.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=16,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,02fd323ee972e265dbae7afc87e16fff
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:50:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"A local HVAC company is looking for a Technician to Provide controls equipment installation, tests, repairs, and training for our customers.- Perform controls equipment installation, investigative tests, programming, commissioning, repairs and overhauls- Train on controls product and service - Perform controls maintenance on software tools, test equipment, etc. - Maintain documents of all installations, inspections, maintenance and repair work, and failures - Interface with customers to provide quality service and feedback on problem evaluation and resolution- Assess controls product/equipment performance - Present and negotiate the administration of service or systems contracts - Coordinate, implement and/or perform technical product support - Create and/or verify point database - Create and review job specific programming for various systems - Sets up and configures PC workstations, user interfaces; data servers, IP Networking devices, protocols, routers, switches, mass storage devices and hubs. Confirm proper network performance- Coordinate startup services as needed - Coordinate network drops, IP addresses and monitoring tools with customer's IT Department - Work with equipment vendors to coordinate communication protocols, encryption, and database requirements for integration to their systems- Run reports to analyze system operation- Demonstrate system operation and verify consistency with the contracted scope of work- Participates in final inspection and testing- Other duties as assignedWorking hours: 1st shiftSkills:--Bachelor's Degree in Construction Management, IT, Engineering or related field preferred--Specialized skill training/certification in Siemens Talon and Tridium--5-8 years' experience with Control Systems --Previous Building Automation or DDC Controls experience --Must possess a valid Driver's license in good standingOTHER INFORMATION:Travel Requirement - Up to 85% travel to customers, site visits, and prospective customers requiring some overnight stay, travel to industry related conferences and training requiring some extended stay.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Control Service Technician Job in Norcross,Part Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30092",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/control-service-technician-job-norcross-ga-us-178447706.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=4,15.00 - 25.00 $ /year,,34eb3a8e1072d918bf60d3687df39560
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:50:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Duties:- Read slip sheets, order forms, and other written instructions- Pick orders using a combination of a RF scanner and a pick sheet- Pull orders using a sit down forklift, reach lift, or walkie rider - Stage the product onto pallets- Receive and unload incoming product and compare information on packing slip with purchase order to verify accuracy of shipment - Sort, count, package, label, insure, unpack, and/or log inventoryWorking hours: Monday-FridaySkills:Skills/Qualifications:- 6+ months experience working in a warehouse preferred- 6+ months experience using hand-held scanners preferred- 6+ months experience in receiving and/or inventory preferred- Must be able to perform basic math calculations- Must have a sense of urgency to meet deadlines, quotas, etc. - Must be able to stand for long periods of time- Must be able to maintain regular, consistent attendanceRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse/ Order Puller Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-order-puller-job-norcross-ga-us-178468706.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=11,10.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,,e3d6c0888266b41fbd50a806fb1190d4
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:50:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fields incoming customer calls, assists walk-in and will-call customers with product or service inquiries.Provides product recommendations and/or quotes to customers; enters sales orders for processing.Retrieves, labels, stages, and/or loads materials into customer vehicle ensuring customer signatures are on all orders.Replenishes and restocks store shelves to ensure adequate inventory levels per instructions from Branch Manager.Works with Branch Manager to develop, set up, and execute sales promotions and branch counter activities.Unloads, scans, and puts away all inventory transfers delivered by the designated transfer truck daily; loads outgoing transfers.The ability to operate a forklift; may require lifting of up to 50 lbs.Maintains neat and organized aisles and displays.Working hours: 40Skills:1-3 years experience in HVAC sales, counter sales or other pertinent industry sales experienceExcellent customer service skills; good computer skills required (Microsoft applications)Our Products are commercial and residential HVAC parts and equipment, therefore, experience working with contractors is desired.Randstad's Manufacturing & Logistics Career Expo/Job FairTuesday, September 13th7am - 7pmRandstad invites you to stop in at the Kennesaw Office to meet with our staffing consultants during our Manufacturing & Logistics Career Expo! If you're looking for Machine Operator, Packing, and Shipping & Receiving positions, please stop by. We look forward to seeing you! When: Tuesday, September 13, 2016Where: Kennesaw Randstad USA1200 Ernest Barrett ParkwaySuite 248Kennesaw, GA 30144Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift/HVAC Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30062",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-hvac-job-marietta-ga-us-178460612.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,14.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,,9dca55d26bc50ec1c958db2e4dae3683
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:23:32:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job PROJECT MANAGER POSITIONFORDIVISION 7 CONSTRUCTIONBirmingham, AL Division 7 Construction, Inc., is a Firestop/Fireproofing/Waterproofing contractor that is fast-growing with work throughout the Southeast predominantly, though we are based in Birmingham, AL. D7 is known for professional, quality work and out-of-the-box solutions. DAILY DUTIESThe Project Manager will be responsible for the full life-cycle of multiple projects concurrently.  This may include but is not limited toestimating, assembling submittals, managing the project once it is awarded:communicating work scope internally, material procurement, field management and consulting, and logistics for each project.  Works in conjunction with Operations, other Estimators, and superintendents. Other responsibilities include:Heavy multi-taskingAnswering incoming calls from the field and customersContract and change order negotiationsDelivering materials to the jobsiteCultivating relationships/rapport with customersTravel to jobsite or customer locations as neededOther duties as needed SKILLSRequired:Bachelor’s degree in related fieldComputer literate – MS Word and ExcelReading construction documentsMust be able to lift up to 50 lbs.Problem solvingOut of the box thinkingEntrepreneurial spiritTime management skillsCustomer-orientedListening skillsValid Drivers LicenseAbility to pass drug test Preferred:Waterproofing, Firestopping, Fireproofing, or EIFS experienceAdobeTake-off software: I Sq FtBilingual OTHER Travel:  30% as projects dictate (local and interstate) Must be willing to work on the jobsite and learn the company from the bottom up.  This includes climbing ladders, caulking, insulating, and any other responsibilities that would be required of the workers on the site. As this is a small company with a flat management structure and a very fluid working environment. This person must be a team player and willing to do ANY job no matter how menial.  Everyone pitches in to make Division 7 Construction a success, no matter what the title is. Report",Division  Construction,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 205-803-1007 Fax 205-238-6916 Address 2773 BM MontgomeryBirmingham, AL 35209, AL 35209",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-estimator-job-birmingham-al-us-172012025.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=4,,,5ed4bcf92b6d247aa5875f5c6abd2381
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:23:31:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70476 # Positions  1 State  WA City  Olympia Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5278 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747734.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=4,,Project/Program Management,a51193c4f9e5c019afb068529742dead
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:23:26:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Insight Global is seeking an Epic Engineer for one the premier health care organizations on site at a non-profit hospital in Burlington, MA. We are seeking someone to support their 500 end users in resolving issues through their ticketing ques. There is a great deal of project based work, optimization request, in order to implement epic in their client hospitals. We are looking for someone who can help transition the team and hit the ground running. We are looking for someone who is responsible for identifying, evaluating, analyzing, and recommending changes in support of assigned applications and systems. Additionally, this candidate will be responsible for planning, designing and developing the applications. t5+ years of a clinical and healthcare IT background tExperience in working with an epic implementation tWork with radiology or cardiology tComfortable working in a fast-paced, team oriented environment",Epic Project Manager Job in Burlington,Full Time,Location:,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/epic-project-manager-job-burlington-ma-us-172732227.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=13,,Project/Program Management,22bd31fc523067fe61c8348be4c7389f
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:23:24:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"A manufacturing company, considered one of the world’s leading innovators in materials science, is looking for a Construction Inspector in the Denver and Colorado Springs area. Candidates must live within reasonable commute of Denver and Colorado Springs. This is a 1-year CONTRACT position.Responsibilities for the InspectorConduct pre-construction site surveys to verify cable routing, identify any obstacles that may result in additional construction costs, and take field measurements. Assist in the creation of splice plans, test plans, and other documentation items as directed by the project manager. Monitor fiber optic plant construction activities to ensure products are being installed within customer guidelines and manufacturer standard recommended procedures. Requirements for the InspectorHigh School diploma or equivalent Working knowledge of fiber optic testing proceduresHands-on experience splicing and testing fiber optic networks in a field or classroom environment, as well as having knowledge of building/understanding splice plans, preferred.Ability to speak Spanish or other languages is a plusBenefitsHealth Insurance401kThis Job is located in Denver, CO -> United States",Inspector - Materials Science/Industrial/Manufacturing Job in Denver,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Denver, CO 80002",,http://jobview.monster.com/inspector-materials-science-industrial-manufacturing-job-denver-co-us-172661985.aspx?mescoid=1700183001001&jobPosition=6,21.00 - 30.00 $ /hour,,6b4966b4c1b23773f5e2c9bd08120925
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:22:04:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70408 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Santa Cruz Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5979 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747837.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=11,,Project/Program Management,2fc61b16e0cf86442c1768f24c9fa2dd
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:21:56:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70215 # Positions  1 State  NY City  Ridgewood Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  4873 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience: This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience: This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor - Overnight Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-overnight-job-camphill-pa-us-172747861.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=4,,Project/Program Management,a9f0fcc4e268032a67e8a5bf55e1bfc2
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:21:56:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Agfa Corporation's plate manufacturing facility located in Branchburg, New Jersey produces analog as well as thermal, visible light and chemistry-free digital plates that offer advanced solutions for different printing applications. Approximately 180 employees in manufacturing, engineering support and other administrative and production support functions work in this facility.AGFA’s Branchburg, NJ location is looking for a Production Planning Intern (paid) to join our team.   Agfa Corporation's plate manufacturing facility located in Branchburg, New Jersey produces analog as well as thermal, visible light and chemistry-free digital plates that offer advanced solutions for different printing applications. Approximately 180 employees in manufacturing, engineering support and other administrative and production support functions work in this facility.AGFA’s Branchburg, NJ location is looking for a Production Planning Intern (paid) to join our team.   This position is responsible for assisting the Planning team in the planning process. Under the guidance of the Planning Manager, the Production Planning Intern will work closely with Planning Team assist in the logistical planning and supply chain processes for the Branchburg site. Become familiar with material and data flow within the production environment. Gain an understanding of the data structure and functionality of production modules within SAP with the objective of piloting projects. Follow Standard Operating Procedures (SOP). In addition, will also have the opportunity to pilot projects and work side-by-side with respected engineers/supply chain/I.T./etc   The Production Planning intern will be expected to gradually work with minimal direction while exemplifying leadership through proven drive and personal initiatives. Complete projects in the planning department. These projects can be related to: master data maintenance, production optimization, phase in/phase out #DNP This position is responsible for assisting the Planning team in the planning process. Under the guidance of the Planning Manager, the Production Planning Intern will work closely with Planning Team assist in the logistical planning and supply chain processes for the Branchburg site. Become familiar with material and data flow within the production environment. Gain an understanding of the data structure and functionality of production modules within SAP with the objective of piloting projects. Follow Standard Operating Procedures (SOP). In addition, will also have the opportunity to pilot projects and work side-by-side with respected engineers/supply chain/I.T./etc   The Production Planning intern will be expected to gradually work with minimal direction while exemplifying leadership through proven drive and personal initiatives. Complete projects in the planning department. These projects can be related to: master data maintenance, production optimization, phase in/phase out #DNP Education   Must be enrolled in their junior or senior year with major in planning, business, logistics, supply chain. APICS membership or accreditation - a plus   Experience   Previous internship experience - preferred Experience working in a manufacturing or warehouse environment, preferred. Specific skills (core competencies, key specialties, technical, human relations or managerial skills, and knowledge areas necessary) Knowledge of Materials Management, MRP, Capacity Planning, BOM's and Routings Must have excellent verbal and written communication / comprehension skills Experienced in Microsoft Office Suite - Focus on Access & Excel Statistical methods knowledge   Specific skills   Manages and prioritizes workload Demonstrates ability to multi-task; Possesses strong analytical skills Demonstrates a customer orientation; strength in analytical, math, and reasoning skills Effectively communicates verbally and in writing Possesses proficiency in MS Office application Access experience (intermediate or better) highly desired Must have the ability to speak, read and write English.   Agfa Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities/Women/Individuals with Disabilities/Protected Veterans   ""Accessibility""   Agfa is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with physical or mental disabilities.   If you need special assistance or an accommodation while seeking employment, please e-mail AccessAgfaJobs@agfa.com or call: 201-373-4010. We will make a determination on your request for reasonable accommodation on a case-by-case basis.""  ",Production Planning Intern Job in Branchburg,Full Time Employee,"Branchburg, NJ",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/production-planning-intern-job-branchburg-nj-us-172744233.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=1,,Project/Program Management,35dc82df4dbb3745622570418e3c4805
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:21:52:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"The QTI Group is recruiting for a Quality Assurance Technician to join a company in Milwaukee. The Quality Technician performs quality inspections of; manufactured products, RMA (Returned Material from Customers), purchased parts and components to ensure customer specifications and production quality standards are being met.Responsibilities:Conduct qualitative and quantitative testing throughout the entire production process.Execute current gage calibration program.Audit feeder department through assembly area to ensure proper operations.Conduct quality inspection and quality audits and isolate product that does not meet standards.Perform Incoming Inspection of supplier product/raw materials prior to production process.Process Returned Material Authorization (RMA) items.Utilize all measurement gauges.Process nonconforming material reports.Perform manual dimensional lay-out of parts using appropriate tools and gauges.Perform first article Inspection and document results.Maintain highest possible housekeeping standards.Qualifications:Two year degree is preferred1 - 3 year's prior production/manufacturing experienceAbility to reading and interpreting drawings/blueprints, GD&THands on experience with electronic and mechanical inspection equipment: Calipers, Micrometers, Height stands, Gage blocks/Pin gages, Thread gages, etc.Strong analytical skills, generate graphs and chartsStrong Root Cause Analysis, 8D problem solvingMicrosoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)ISO 9001, TS16949 experience a preferred",Quality Assurance Technician Job in Brown Deer,"Full Time, Employee","Brown Deer, WI",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-technician-job-brown-deer-wi-us-172588207.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=17,,Quality Assurance/Safety,bb6c557870692bb5a5c4ff649d03c3bc
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:20:57:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  695901Title: Senior Project ManagerLocation: Columbus, OHContract: 1 year+Apex Systems is seeking a Senior Project Manager to manage Composite Software Replacement efforts.Roles & Responsibilities:Experience in a Document Solution area – could be in an IT capacity or an Operations capacityHP Exstream implementation experiencePrevious experience managing vendor/3rd party relationshipsHP-PPMHP Quality CenterExperience in the CCM (Customer Communication Management) spaceExperience managing large projects with multiple cross impacted teams of large size (20 or more)Experience with managing a system replace and decommissioning the former systemManaging 20+ colleagues on a projectManaging a project with 10+ impacted applicationsThe candidate needs to be a senior level PM (at least 5 years)Capable of handling difficult/challenging situations – mitigating risks and issuesAble to run with a project with little guidanceAbility to communicate at the LT levelIf you are interested in applying please contact Brittany Mullen: bmullen@apexsystemsinc.com 614-467-4200EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Project Manager -HP Exstream Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  695901Title: Senior Project ManagerLocation: Columbus, OHContract: 1 year+Apex Systems is seeking a Senior Project Manager to manage Composite Software Replacement efforts.Roles & Responsibilities:Experience in a Document Solution area – could be in an IT capacity or an Operations capacityHP Exstream implementation experiencePrevious experience managing vendor/3rd party relationshipsHP-PPMHP Quality CenterExperience in the CCM (Customer Communication Management) spaceExperience managing large projects with multiple cross impacted teams of large size (20 or more)Experience with managing a system replace and decommissioning the former systemManaging 20+ colleagues on a projectManaging a project with 10+ impacted applicationsThe candidate needs to be a senior level PM (at least 5 years)Capable of handling difficult/challenging situations – mitigating risks and issuesAble to run with a project with little guidanceAbility to communicate at the LT levelIf you are interested in applying please contact Brittany Mullen: bmullen@apexsystemsinc.com 614-467-4200EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-hp-exstream-job-columbus-oh-us-172750839.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),791b4df91f59b2700b62a7d0f3eef0e3
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:20:56:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking to work in an environment which respects and values your passion and commitment to the customer?  How about working for a company that develops and rewards people while working with the openness and integrity?Then uncover your true potential at Williams Lea.Position summary■    This position is responsible for handling all day-to-day facilities issues including direct liaison with clients, vendors, security and building management as well as maintaining the overall integrity and operational functionality of the office, including aesthetics.Job duties■    * Perform including regular inspections of the client space (doors, furniture and fixtures) and escalate to relevant vendors for resolution■    *Respond to employee facility related requests – temperature, parking, etc.■    *Coordinate with Building Management on any issues relating to janitorial services, security, parking, etc.■    Support emergency evacuation plans/fire drills■    Interact with vendors for vending machines, coffee service, Life Safety Equipment, day porter, and other facility related services■    Obtain working knowledge on thermostats, HVAC controls, Fire Controls, Security alarm system■    *Coordinate minor moves■    *Coordinate furniture orders/minor furniture changes■    *Manage building access/badges and internal keys■    *Coordinate onboarding and offboarding of client staff■    *Assist Account Manager/Facilities Manager with overall maintenance of offices and ad hoc/special administrative projects in support of client initiatives■    *Work with manager to update Site Procedures Manual■    *Set tone for the environment by maintaining a positive personality, sense of urgency, independent thinking, self starting and high-spirited “can-do” dispositionJob qualifications■    Minimum of 1 year of work experience in the area field of facilities, property management or building operations■    High School diploma or GED required■    Strong written and verbal skills■    Proven customer service skillset■    Experience with Microsoft Office (Word, PowerPoint and Excel), including Outlook email and calendar■    Experience in navigating a high-profile, high-paced environment■    Ability to problem solve, rationalize and mitigate/manage obstacles presented■    Self starter, task-oriented leader■    Ability to work overtime as needed■    Ability to handle sensitive and/or confidential information■    Proven ability to multi-task, meet deadlines and complete projects in a timely manner■    Demonstrate initiative and proactive thinking■    Ability to work well with others in a team atmosphere■    Maintain a professional appearance and high level customer service mindset at all times■    Ability to commit and adhere to all client values, principles and proceduresIt is the policy of Williams Lea to ensure equal employment opportunity without discrimination or harassment on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, alienage or citizenship status, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity of expression, marital or domestic/civil partnership status, disability, veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law.Williams Lea is a drug-free workplace and performs pre-employment substance abuse testing.WLRSR",Facilities Associate Job in Chicago,"Full Time, Employee","Chicago, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/facilities-associate-job-chicago-il-us-172674378.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=8,,Project/Program Management,88ade594c427294139b4573588757fd2
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:19:35:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position PurposeThis is an event based fundraising position. As Development Manger, you will be responsible for the Collier County March for Babies and Bikers for Babies events. Also responsible for donor recruitment, development, cultivation, and activation, leading assigned fundraising events, and meeting fundraising objectives of the March of Dimes in the assigned market.Principle roles and responsibilities include revenue development, volunteer leadership development, and staff development.• Increase overall market revenue by implementing core tactics for fundraising events, resulting in aggressive and sustainable year over year growth.• Identify prospects, research and analyze development options in order to predict business opportunities. Manage a personal portfolio of prospects.• Develop relationships with constituents, referral partners, or existing volunteer leaders in order to obtain personal introduction to prospective constituents.• Develop and present sales presentations in order to educate and sell mission engagement opportunities to prospects or constituents.• Research prospects’ needs, concerns and objectives in order to create effective sponsorship proposals. In many cases, serve as lead staff on all significant sponsorship asks in the market and engage potential national sponsors in a relationship with March of Dimes. Drive all sponsors in the market to activate their sponsorship aggressively.• Identify candidates for top volunteer leadership roles. Create plans to gain access to volunteer leadership prospects and candidates. Recruit qualified candidates and articulate goals, outcomes and objectives for performance in order to enable candidates to make good decisions regarding the acceptance of critical revenue generation goals.• Develop, execute and monitor development strategies to enhance cultivation, solicitation and stewardship of donors.• Make periodic visits, explore specific needs, and resolve problems in order to build and maintain constituent relationships.• Coach and guide staff and volunteers in the execution of the event and achievement of expected outcomes according to core tactics.• Plan performance expectations, monitor and appraise the team member’s job results and performance in order to develop, coach and recognize direct reports. Provide ongoing feedback and guidance to direct reports on overall performance. Provide information, educational opportunities, and experiential growth opportunities in order to develop staff. Focus on the development of leadership skills and business acumen of direct reports.• Communicate the mission of the March of Dimes with staff, volunteers and within the community in order to connect current and prospective donors with Mission outcomes.• Utilize electronic data management tools in order to review and analyze pertinent information and monitor financial and mission related results.• Perform other duties from time-to-time in order to ensure the attainment of market financial goals.• Accountable for all activities within the functional areas of responsibility that support the market goals and objectives, assuring they are met on time and within budget.• Represent the March of Dimes as an official spokesperson and provides a high degree of expertise within his/her area and in broad and organizational areas to internal and external contacts. Contacts are critical to motivating, negotiation with, developing and collaborating with others.• Decisions, or decisions this position leads in making, have significant impact on fundraising success of the market.Position Qualifications• Previous Experience: Minimum of 3 years of directly related work experience in increasingly responsible positions• Education: Bachelor’s degree strongly preferred and/or directly related professional skills and experience• Physical Demands: May involve lifting and carrying boxes; may involve traveling by car or plane to meetings and training.",Fundraising Manager Job in Fort Myers,"Full Time, Employee","Fort Myers, FL",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/fundraising-manager-job-fort-myers-fl-us-171861602.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=17,,Project/Program Management,1f36ea69eb43b9bd49975e31e89cc800
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:19:28:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70263 # Positions  1 State  VA City  Arlington Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  11229 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747848.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=9,,Project/Program Management,8337aadc3bfef03e8c2d7fb26c88ab0f
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:17:55:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Quality ManagerWe filled this position 2 years ago and the candidate is being promoted and they need a new QA Manager.  Our client is a growing 85+ person company in the food industry.  The objective of the position is to ensure product quality and safety meet regulatory and third party audit requirements, conformance of all products to specifications, continually improve quality management and assurance program, and manage the quality staff.  This is a great job looking for someone to take the next step in their career in to management, 6 reports.Requirements:Bachelor's degree in food science, biological science or related discipline.3+ years prior experience in a quality assurance role with a food manufacturing facility, in labExperience and understanding of food ingredients, nutritional labels, governmental regulations, Hazard Analysis & Critical Control (HACCP) programs and Global Food Safety Initiative (GFSI) standards.Must have HACCP certificationProficient computer skills.Excellent written and verbal communication skills.Duties:Manage all quality assurance systems, food safety, sanitation, Good Marketing Practices (GMP) and Hazard Analysis & Critical Control (HACCP) programs, contaminant and allergen controls, microbiological testing, and kosher and Halal certifications; train employees regarding such programs and controls.Ensure compliance with all applicable food laws and regulations, and the Food Safety Modernization Act.Responsible for managing FSSC22000 standard, and all corresponding activities.Research and qualify vendors through facilitation, training and vendor audit programs.Approve and monitor chosen suppliers of ingredients and packaging materials via vendor assurance and quality monitoring programs, including, but not limited to, sampling, testing and reporting on raw material quality.Establish, design and facilitate internal audits and monitor all in-process samples and finished products as per established quality methods.Manage company’s complaint program; this includes, but isn’t limited to ensuring that all complaints are adequately documented, trend reports are prepared, corrective action initiated, and appropriate dialogue with the customer is completedMaintain all necessary quality assurance records.Lead and prepare third-party audits and plant inspections with key customers.Act as a liaison with outside customers on quality system requirements and resolve product complaints and recalls.Manage equipment testing and calibration.Troubleshoot equipment problems and initiate corrective actions.Manage team of 6+ quality assurance technicians and technical associates.Communicate effectively with management and other employees.The company offers a comprehensive benefits package, competitive salary, a bonus and help with relocation if needed.  Sorry, no visa sponsorship is available. Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee",Phone 608-742-7300 x304,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals; Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing; Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-manager-job-oshkosh-wi-us-172583315.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=4,,,1d2996944453f916c25c9e9fc57f8e14
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:17:51:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a Quality Control Technician to work for a leading food manufacturing company in Rossville, TN. This is a contract position that is on 3rd shift with 12 hour shifts and it is expected to last a year.Responsibilities for the QA/QC TechnicianMaintaining accurate food safety and quality documentation.Coordinates daily management food review.Administers quality record management program (HACCP, COA, Operator Quality Reports, etc.)Assists in QAR operator training and QAR program effectiveness auditsInputs PES (Product Evaluation System) and QAR resultsRequirements for the QA/QC Technician1-2 years of laboratory workMust have a Bachelor's Degree with related experience OR 8 years in the Quality or Food Safety.BenefitsMedical, Dental, Vision, PTO, etc. This Job is located in Rossville, TN -> United States",QA/QC Technician - Quality Control /Food Safety /Quality Documentation Job in Rossville,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Rossville, TN 38066",,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-qc-technician-quality-control-food-safety-quality-documentation-job-rossville-tn-us-172654954.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=15,17.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,,083b749d5979df424293595437306b43
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:17:49:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70422 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Santa Rosa Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  6023 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747813.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=19,,Project/Program Management,26d620cd3c239d22f0bd8e9bccad291e
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:17:11:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Title: Project Manager Location: Charlotte, NC Type: Contract Job Description:  Our client, a leading financial institution, seeks a Project Manager.   Qualifications: More business savvy and heavy database knowledge rather than a true technical PM. 1. Managing technology projects, especially managing resources working with numerous databases. 2. Documentation of all project aspects (technical and non-technical). 3. Jumping into the middle of a project, and following documented processes, to maintain consistency with earlier phases of the project. 4. Ideally, someone with previous Insurance experience. Responsibilities include:  • Responsible for leading project teams and managing all activities in a project life-cycle (initiation planning, executing/controlling, and closing) associated with high visibility projects that are long-term, across one or more lines of business and carry a substantial impact to the relevant businesses.  • Interacts with senior leadership and major stakeholders to establish strategic plans and objectives for programs or projects.  • Consults with business partners to clarify and define complex project requirements, budgets and business cases, including statements of work.  • Creates and delivers presentations on program or project goals and plans, including progress reports.  • Responsible for end-to-end program or project management, demonstrating ownership of the entire process from beginning to end.  • Develops and implements program and project level processes, procedures and performance metrics.  • May be responsible for sourcing, negotiating and managing outside vendors.  • Typically manages a family or series of projects associated with a specific business strategy to obtain benefits and controls.  • Ensures program/project-related risks are managed according to the Project Management Policy.  • Leads project staff, including training and providing input to performance evaluations.   • May directly manage 1 or 2 project staff team members. ***Will consider H1B transfer candidates***   Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xmatrix/cjt/image1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xmatrix/cjt/image2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xmatrix/cjt/image3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",Monster,Full Time,"Title: Project Manager Location: Charlotte, NC Type: Contract Job Description:  Our client, a leading financial institution, seeks a Project Manager.   Qualifications: More business savvy and heavy database knowledge rather than a true technical PM. 1. Managing technology projects, especially managing resources working with numerous databases. 2. Documentation of all project aspects (technical and non-technical). 3. Jumping into the middle of a project, and following documented processes, to maintain consistency with earlier phases of the project. 4. Ideally, someone with previous Insurance experience. Responsibilities include:  • Responsible for leading project teams and managing all activities in a project life-cycle (initiation planning, executing/controlling, and closing) associated with high visibility projects that are long-term, across one or more lines of business and carry a substantial impact to the relevant businesses.  • Interacts with senior leadership and major stakeholders to establish strategic plans and objectives for programs or projects.  • Consults with business partners to clarify and define complex project requirements, budgets and business cases, including statements of work.  • Creates and delivers presentations on program or project goals and plans, including progress reports.  • Responsible for end-to-end program or project management, demonstrating ownership of the entire process from beginning to end.  • Develops and implements program and project level processes, procedures and performance metrics.  • May be responsible for sourcing, negotiating and managing outside vendors.  • Typically manages a family or series of projects associated with a specific business strategy to obtain benefits and controls.  • Ensures program/project-related risks are managed according to the Project Management Policy.  • Leads project staff, including training and providing input to performance evaluations.   • May directly manage 1 or 2 project staff team members. ***Will consider H1B transfer candidates***  ",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-charlotte-nc-us-172751889.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,,,4130be0b4a4283e9f639a8fb343e7603
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:16:32:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"A leader in power and automation technologies is currently seeking a Project Manager in Auburn Hills, MI. This is a 6-month CONTRACT position. Local candidates only. Responsibilities for the Project ManagerPlans, monitors and controls project activities, proactively to maximize cash flow.Works proactively to set customer expectations to assure a smooth project including acceptance of project deliveries and timely payment, even under challenging circumstances.Understands and utilizes Corporate Full Cost Calculation Model and different revenue recognition methods.Reports status/progress to customer and other stake holders with appropriate detail for desired understanding (e.g. to assure payment, set expectation, etc).Requirements for the Project ManagerBachelor’s Degree and 8 years of experience managing projects or Associate’s Degree and 10 years of experience managing projects or High School Diploma and 12 years of experience managing projects.PMP® certification from Project Management Institute or certified by major competitor as Project Manager or IPMA Level C/D certification recommended if recruited from an external organization.Benefits for the Project Manager401KHealth InsuranceThis Job is located in Auburn Hills, MI -> United States",Project Manager - Manufacturing/Automation Job in Auburn Hills,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Auburn Hills, MI 48321",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-manufacturing-automation-job-auburn-hills-mi-us-172662203.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,35.00 - 47.00 $ /hour,,b7d0e97d9056bcdaf6082c7dc9c97e5f
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:12:43:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"A trusted civil consulting firm in Laguna HIlls, CA that provides land development services for commercial, residential and public works markets is looking for a Project Manager for immediate and direct hire. Company has a strong track record in delivering the optimal solutions for all types of development projects. The Project Manager must be comfortable handling ten or more projects at a time, and must have excellent communications skills. Additional requirements are listed below. Responsibilities for the Project ManagerPrepare engineering drawings and reports, manage 10 or more projects at a timeCoordinate with clients and consultants virtually, some on-site visits are requiredBuild, direct and lead technical support staffEvaluate new CAD strategies and proceduresEnsure deadlines and cost targets are metMaintain required project documentationServe as a liaison between business and technical aspects of projectsRequirements for the Project Manager5+ years experience in land development requiredBachelor's degree in Civil Engineering, PE certification is a HUGE plusMust have strong communication skills - client facing experience is preferredStrong AutoCAD Civil 3D proficiency Deadline and detail orientedBenefitsHealth, PTOThis Job is located in Laguna Hills, CA -> United States",Project Manager - Civil/AutoCAD/Land Development Job in Laguna Hills,Full Time Employee,"Laguna Hills, CA 92653",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-civil-autocad-land-development-job-laguna-hills-ca-us-172662403.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,"84,990.00 - 104,000.00 $ /year",,a157edea3629db35ba38e57872dd44fe
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:12:43:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Safety/Compliance Manager Discover the Difference You Can Make at Gate Gourmet Gate Gourmet, a gategroup company, is the world’s largest independent provider of catering and provisioning services for the airline industry.  For the past 70 years, we have served over 250 carriers in more than 30 countries. Gate Gourmet combines culinary expertise with the highest standards of food safety and production to deliver delicious, healthy, and affordable meals to over 270 million travelers around the globe. Job Summary: Position is responsible for food safety and quality engineering and control on processes supporting operation, system, policy and procedure auditing; leads quality improvement projects, drives defect prevention on flight attendant comments and detections. Acts as the primary business quality project manager for Corporate Quality Assurance requirements and regulations.   Main Duties and Responsibilities: Supports all customer and regulatory audits within the responsible facilities Works side-by-side with Operation Managers to assure compliance to HACCP requirements are met Works as part of the corrective action team to address non-conformities related to product, process and service Executes monthly self-assessments on the elements of food safety Executes the required food safety related testing as defined in HACCP plan Plans for quality (capital, supplier quality, plant quality). Evaluates and reports on performance trends related to quality Manages Quality Engineering projects, including operative supportive functions Leads and monitors improvement projects as assigned Audits implementation of quality systems for effectiveness by verifying activities Responsible for maintain and managing the corrective action system Monitors the accuracy and compliance of HACCP records as defined in the corporate procedures Reinforces quality awareness to the management and work staff Schedules and manages the daily activities and task of the sanitation porters (if defined as a responsibility) Manages continuous improvement projects in quality elements Plays a key role in implementing the business management system Implements the quality system detailed in the quality manual Champions quality improvement efforts and initiates problem solving efforts and assures implementation Drives prevention vs. detection of defects tracking key performance indicators and daily patrol of production areas Responsible to lead product defect investigations Responsible to lead investigations of alleged food poisoning, Hard-foreign and soft foreign objects Responsible to manage the compliance with USDA / APHIS regulations Responsible to manage food product suppliers of the unit including auditing of local suppliers Coordinates actions to prevent the occurrences of nonconformities to internal, Federal and State laws Maintains customer compliance resolution on defects including alleged food poisoning if needed Responsible for the identifying and maintaining of key performance metrics for the Quality organization Continuously improves plant procedures for monitoring and ensuring conformance to specifications for incoming raw materials as well as for finished products Acts as the primary liaison to Corporate QA Compliance Team Plays a key role in training and coaching of quality requirements to all levels in the business unit’s organization Responsible for safety, quality and compliance to customer specification   Ensures optimum business processes to support full customer and regulatory compliance in terms of quality and food safety Stays attuned to and prepares adaptation to changes in customer, company and regulatory changes in requirements At times liaises with customers and regulatory agencies Responsible for performance evaluation, coaching, counseling and preparing corrective action for employees and liaises appropriately with HR and other support functions   Qualifications   Education: Bachelor's degree in food science, quality, technical or business related field from an accredited 4-year college or university required   Work Experience: Minimum of 5 years quality assurance experience in a manufacturing environment, with preference in food manufacturing   Job Skills: Advanced technical knowledge in catering processes and design functions, manufacturing methods, inspection, statistical methods and quality auditing Knowledge of lean standard tools, TQM methodology Basic lean, six sigma knowledge, and continuous improvement understanding a plus Detail oriented Project management experience Strong organizational skills, able to prioritize responsibilities and multi-task   Technical Skills: (Certification, Licenses and Registration) ServeSafe certification preferred HACCP certified   Language / Communication Skills: Strong interpersonal skills, interact well with multiple departments as required Able to work with little supervision Excellent reading, writing, and oral communication skills Change Agent Multi-lingual a plus   Job Dimensions   Geographic Responsibility: US   Type of Employment: Full time   Travel %: 20%   Exemption Classification: Exempt   Internal Relationships:   External Relationships:   Work Environment / Requirements of the Job: Regularly stands, bends, lifts and moves intermittently during shifts.  Must be to lift, pull, push, and move products, equipment, and supplies daily.  There may be physical discomfort due to temperature in production area, coolers, and freezers   Budget / Revenue Responsibility:   Organization Structure   Direct Line Manager (Title): General Manager   Dotted Line Manager (Title, if applicable):   Sr. Compliance Manager   Number of Direct Reports:   Number of Dotted Line Reports:   Estimated Total Size of Team:   gategroup Competencies Required to be Successful in the Job: Thinking – Information Search and analysis & problem resolution skills Engaging – Understanding others, Team Leadership and Developing People Inspiring – Influencing and building relationships, Motivating and Inspiring, Communicating effectively Achieving – Delivering business results under pressure, Championing Performance Improvement and Customer Focus   Demonstrated Values to be Successful in the Position Employees at gategroup are expected to live our Values of Excellence, Integrity, Passion and Accountability. To demonstrate these Values, we expect to observe the following from everyone: We treat each other with respect and we act with integrity We communicate and keep each other informed We put our heads together to problem solve and deliver excellence as a team We have passion for our work and we pay attention to the little details We foster an environment of accountability , take responsibility for our actions and learn from our mistakes We do what we say we will do, when we say we are going to do it We care about our coworkers, always taking an opportunity to make someone’s day better   The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by the individual(s) assigned to this position.  They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required.  Management reserves the right to modify, add, or remove duties and to assign other duties as necessary.  In addition, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.   Candidates will be required to go through Pre-employment drug screen, criminal background check, and/or airport fingerprinting.   Gategroup is an equal opportunity employer committed to workforce diversity.  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran status, disability status or other category under applicable law.   For further information regarding Equal Employment Opportunity, copy and paste the following URL into your web browser:   http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf     #ggi# #jobcopy p {margin: 5px 0 0;}",Safety/Compliance Manager Job in Seattle body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,"Full Time, Employee",Seattle,Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/safety-compliance-manager-job-seattle-wa-us-172739435.aspx?mescoid=1100057001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),89f9d9b42c0dbf8e54c5accc3438dbbe
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:12:43:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"EHS TechnicianCottage Grove, MN5 month contractQualificationsBachelor degree in a Science, Engineering, Industrial Health, or Safety discipline from an accredited universityNew graduate or 1-2 years of experience at a related positionProficient in SharePoint Preferred QualificationExperience with Environmental, Health & Safety (EHS) inspection and audit programsField work experience, such as sample collection, inspections, etc.Highly proficient in SharePoint, Word, Excel, and AccessExperience writing Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs)Knowledge of EHS Regulations and Requirements Primary Responsibilities/Job DutiesHousekeeping InspectionsEHS TrainingData ManagementEHS Data AnalysisYou can see it. More challenging work. A more interesting work environment. The opportunity to use your finely honed skills to make a real difference. And to collect pay that reflects your talent and expertise. If this is what you see for yourself, you need to talk to Experis.Through our reach and resources, Experis brings you career options you couldn't find on your own. We're experts at placing each of our candidates into his/her ""dream job"" - one perfectly matched to skills, ambition and lifestyle.We've got the right opportunity. Tell us why you're the right person. Apply today!""The successful candidate will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States""Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Environmental,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Environmental, Health and Safety Technician","Cottage Grove, MN 55016",http://jobview.monster.com/environmental-health-safety-technician-job-cottage-grove-mn-us-172582042.aspx?mescoid=2900541001001&jobPosition=5,1.00 - 1.00 $ /hour,Quality Assurance/Safety,24098e69f909d5f031fec26f0efb05a4
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:12:43:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  687721 Description: Tasks Include, Minimum 3-5 Years of Project Management Experience including but not limited to building a team of subject matter experts, Initializing Conference calls,Creating Resource plans and cost estimates based on scope of work, communicate and delegate tasks accordingly, coordinate and implement plan of action, support implementation and remove roadblocks, Effectively Conduct post implementation review.Candidate must be proficient in Microsoft Office Products, including Excel, Word, and Project with an emphasis on effective communication both in writing and orally. Must have the ability to Multi-Task and handle fast paced environment. Self - StarterPre-Identified Candidate/Extension: NoIf yes, Enter Name of Applicant: (No Value)Tasks to be Performed: Tasks Include, Minimum 3-5 Years of Project Management Experience including but not limited to building a team of subject matter experts, Initializing Conference calls,Creating Resource plans and cost estimates based on scope of work, communicate and delegate tasks accordingly, coordinate and implement plan of action, support implementation and remove roadblocks, Effectively Conduct post implementation review.Skillset Details: Candidate must be proficient in Microsoft Office Products, including Excel, Word, and Project with an emphasis on effective communication both in writing and orally. Must have the ability to Multi-Task and handle fast paced environment. Self - Starter Minimum 3-5 Years of Project Management ExperienceEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Project Lead - Mid Job in Elk Grove Village,Full Time Employee,"Elk Grove Village, IL",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-lead-mid-job-elk-grove-village-il-us-172750809.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6c1792c7b6f0d8e765f3e3f5ce858ed9
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:12:42:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"CareersUSA, a leader in the staffing industry with over 35 years of experience, has another job opportunity for you:Our client is seeking a QA Line Technician in Pennsauken, NJ.Earn $16.25 per hour at this full-time, temp-to-hire position. Work 12-hour shifts, 40 hours per week, Monday through Sunday, 6:00 AM - 6:00 PM or 6:00 PM to 6:00 AM. Associate will be working: 2 days on, 2 days off, 2 days on, 2 days off, 3 days on, 3 days off and this repeats.Job Description:Perform required testing of products (raw & finished), recording product specificationsAnalyze batch samplesAnalyze liquid ingredientsRecommend adding or subtracting of ingredientsMonitor the filler to ensure weights, chart codes, labeling, pasteurizer temps are accurate by performing hourly checksPlace batches or finished product on holdCopy batch cards for kitchen operatorsTest run samples as requestedMaintain paperwork and files to ensure accurate administrationReport food safety & quality problems to personnel with authority to initiate actionOther duties as assignedRequirements:High School Diploma or GEDPrevious experience in quality controlAbility to wear personal protective equipment (bump cap, hair net, ear plugs, beard net (if applicable), Kevlar gloves, safety glasses and leather skid resistant work shoes/boots)Ability to apply intermediate computer and communication skills, math functions, and reasoningAbility to use tools/gauges (refractometer, salt titrator, acid titrator, PH meter, color meter, moisture meter, viscometer, constrometer)Contact Information:CareersUSA - Cherry Hill Ph: 856-667-0700 Fx: 856-667-2188 E-mail: cherryhill@careersusa.com",QA Line Technician Job in Pennsauken,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Pennsauken, NJ 08110",Manufacturing - Other;Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-line-technician-job-pennsauken-nj-us-170395688.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=6,16.25 - 16.25 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),0c95dd54e4bd18c0aedb0e930b94b50b
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:12:42:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Who we are: Meridian’s mission is to be the #1 health organization based on quality, innovative technology and service to our Meridian Family. As an organization that is in an exciting period of growth, we are driving the rebirth of Detroit as a leading employer of software engineers and programmers. The software programs that our IT Team is engineering will rival the top software solutions used by today’s largest healthcare companies. Our employees work hard, play hard, and give back. Meridian employees enjoy: Happy hours, special events, technical training, company sports teams, bagel Fridays, weekly Executive Lunches, and volunteer opportunities.  A Day in the Life of a Project Manager:  This position provides leadership, guidance and/or facilitation on activities related to current initiatives and future business opportunities.  The Project Manager serves as a liaison for senior management in ensuring successful outcomes to key initiatives through development, implementation and evaluation activities.  The Project Manager may act as a champion, coach or counselor of a project or initiative depending on the stage of the project.Responsibilities: Building on managed care and organizational knowledge, act as a resource for researching, developing and operationalizing initiatives that promote company success and growthApply practical advice and expertise to projects that promote innovation, efficiency, cost effectiveness, quality improvement and resource managementAct as a change agent in the implementation of key initiativesFoster a participatory and collegial team atmosphere in interactions with othersLead or assist in the development of surveys, audits and monitors to assess the performance of MHP and/or contracted entities.  Compile and/or analyze survey results identifying system barriers, opportunities for improvement and potential initiatives to improve performanceUtilize knowledge of accreditation and regulatory guidelines in assisting the organization to prepare and maintain necessary compliance documents and activities including policies and proceduresChair or facilitate organizational committees, as necessary, to insure progress toward meeting regulatory requirements or organizational commitmentsAttend meetings and conferences as necessary to stay updated on regulatory and accrediting rules and regulationsPerform other duties as assignedQualifications: What you can bring to Meridian:Bachelor’s degree in healthcare or business related field is requiredMaster’s degree is a plusPMP Certification is a plus3 - 5 years of experience in a managed care organizations preferred3 - 7 years of experience in managing projectsPrevious experience in preparing for an accreditation review is requiredExperience in developing and delivering presentations to various types of audiences is requiredExperience in managing committees is requiredDemonstration of business plan or report writing experience is requiredKnowledge of project management processes and methodologyKnowledge of managed care principles a plusKnowledge of State Managed Medicaid rules and regulations a plusKnowledge of Medicare rules and regulations a plusKnowledge of quality and process improvement strategiesKnowledge of National Committee for Quality Assurance (NCQA), URAC or general accreditation requirements a plus What Meridian can offer YOU:Our healthcare benefits include a variety of PPO plans that are effective on the first day of employment for our new full-time team members Meridian offers 401k matching that is above the national average Opportunities for growth are abundant; full-time MHP employees are eligible for tuition reimbursement and all employees have access to a variety of training through Meridian University Meridian Health Plan was named Detroit's #1 Fastest Growing Company by Crain's Magazine, so it is a great time to get involved with Meridian",IT Project Manager Job in Detroit,Full Time Employee,"Detroit, MI 48226",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-project-manager-job-detroit-mi-us-171255829.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=16,,Project/Program Management,121a7159f07bf25be83bec6436479032
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:12:42:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"DTS is looking for a Quality Engineer in Somerville, NJ with one of our medical device client.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS 1. Under the guidance of Manufacturing and Quality Operations, performs non-conformance investigations including NCR origination, bounding, product control, failure investigation, correction, and documentation within the non-conformance system. 2. Leads cross functional teams to assure causes of non-conformances are identified and understood and that sound corrective/preventive actions are implemented. 3. Supports responses to internal and external audit findings by completing failure investigations and corresponding action plans to correct the initial findings. 4. Utilizes failure analysis tools (i.e. 5M analysis) to conduct robust investigations. Analyzes data and recommends actions for process, equipment, and system improvement. 5. Provides recommendations for the enhancement of processes and systems. Utilizes document change control system to update procedures and write protocols. 6. Implements corrections and process improvements. EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, & SKILLS 1. Bachelor degree in Engineering, Sciences, Math, Applied Manufacturing Technology, similar related degree required. 2. Prior Experience in the QSR/ISO regulated medical device operation strongly preferred. 3. Strong computer skills and use of software application(s). Experience with Word and Excel required. Experience with Minitab strongly preferred. 4. Basic statistical and analytical problem solving skills required; experience with problem solving tools such as DMAIC, Fishbone Analysis, 5 Whys is strongly preferred. 5. Proficient in the preparation of technical reports and presentations. 6. Strong communication and interpersonal skills. Kindly send your resumes to engjobs@dts-it.com Contact Leena @ 248-438-8547",Quality Engineer Job in Somerville,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Somerville, NJ",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-job-somerville-nj-us-172504603.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=7,,Quality Assurance/Safety,32cc4f10ef506ed132690dd95b56db93
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:12:42:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  687104Position: QA AnalystJob Description: Looking for a motivated individual to join our Quality Assurance team to help perform testing and validation across a number of different application sets. We are in a rapidly growing and developing ecosystem, so you need to be able to learn quickly, pull clarity out of the noise, and excel in the challenge of connecting the dots!Job Duties & Responsibilities:• Design and execute test plans and test cases for infrastructure and software applications used in the delivery of multi-vendor cloud services• Work collaboratively in a team environment• Work with the Architecture, Engineering, and Operations groups to provide appropriate test plan coverage, incorporate test requirements and determine success criteria• Provide technical and logical input on test plans and use cases• Be accountable for the planning and implementation of comprehensive test plans that meet our business requirements on high-impact projects• Document test cases and track issue lifecycles via issue tracking system (JIRA)• Follow work through to completion and provide feedback to teamsSkills & Qualifications:• BA/BS in Computer Science or related discipline (or equivalent work experience)• 3+ years’ experience in test plan design and execution• Experience with manual and automation methodologies used for software testing• Experience with tools & scripting languages used to test infrastructure deployments• Experience & diverse background in software testing, software development, and infrastructure management (Cloud, hosting, or systems integration)• Self-starter with exceptional organizational skills and the ability to learn quickly and work independently• Highly motivated team player able to work on a variety of projects and project styles• Expert documentation skills• Strong presentation, written and verbal communication skills• Maybe you have worked with some of these:o Cloud or hosted environments Azure, AWSo Physical and virtual environmentsIf interested, please send resume to Tyler Suite at tsuite@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",QA Job in Cary,Full Time Employee,"Cary, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-job-cary-nc-us-172761887.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),72bcf817da3e4c887194d48fea1da2e1
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:11:24:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"WORK IN AN ENVIRONMENT WHERE: Management not only LISTENS but also CARES about your wellbeing Co-workers assist one another to minimize stress and prevent burnout Safe work practices are a priority  ABCM EMPLOYEES ALSO ENJOY: Competitive Wages and Benefits     Sign-on Bonuses for Qualifying Positions Flexible Scheduling Free Meals &Uniform and Shoe Reimbursement Scholarship and Tuition Assistance Merit Evaluations & Opportunities for Growth and Advancement  Description/Requirements: Plan, develop and implement a comprehensive activity program which is meaningful and appropriate to the needs and interests of each resident (e.g. assess residents' lifelong hobbies/areas of interest and enable them to continue in their pursuits of this nature)Assist residents in setting measurable goals for activity involvement within their planofcareEvaluate each resident’s progress and response over time and regularly revise and adapt the program's scheduled offerings as the interests, needs and abilities of current residents changeStimulate interest of elderly and disabled residents in activity therapy with enthusiasm yet compassionEstablish and maintain effective relationships with staff members from all departments and with the public, including volunteers, the media and residents’ interestedpartiesQualifications: Within six months of employment, complete an activity coordinator’s orientation course approved by the Iowa Department of Inspections and Appeals (DIA), or, have a bachelor’s degree in therapeutic recreation, or have other education, training and experience approved by the DIAOutstanding customer service and organization skills, excellent oral and written communication skills specific to the English languageResourceful, self-directed, and able to perform responsibilities with limited oversight or supervisionMust be able to work a varied schedule including evenings and weekendsFor more details about this position please visit www.abcmcorp.com/employment   The ABCM Difference: Person Directed Care (PDC) -We believe in a Person Directed Careapproach to long-term care, encouraging the individuals who live in our communities tomake choices about the care and services they receive. More Than 50 Years of Service to Iowa in 31 Locations!                                           ",Activity Coordinator - Long-term Care Job in Oelwein,Full Time Employee,"WORK IN AN ENVIRONMENT WHERE: Management not only LISTENS but also CARES about your wellbeing Co-workers assist one another to minimize stress and prevent burnout Safe work practices are a priority  ABCM EMPLOYEES ALSO ENJOY: Competitive Wages and Benefits     Sign-on Bonuses for Qualifying Positions Flexible Scheduling Free Meals &Uniform and Shoe Reimbursement Scholarship and Tuition Assistance Merit Evaluations & Opportunities for Growth and Advancement  Description/Requirements: Plan, develop and implement a comprehensive activity program which is meaningful and appropriate to the needs and interests of each resident (e.g. assess residents' lifelong hobbies/areas of interest and enable them to continue in their pursuits of this nature)Assist residents in setting measurable goals for activity involvement within their planofcareEvaluate each resident’s progress and response over time and regularly revise and adapt the program's scheduled offerings as the interests, needs and abilities of current residents changeStimulate interest of elderly and disabled residents in activity therapy with enthusiasm yet compassionEstablish and maintain effective relationships with staff members from all departments and with the public, including volunteers, the media and residents’ interestedpartiesQualifications: Within six months of employment, complete an activity coordinator’s orientation course approved by the Iowa Department of Inspections and Appeals (DIA), or, have a bachelor’s degree in therapeutic recreation, or have other education, training and experience approved by the DIAOutstanding customer service and organization skills, excellent oral and written communication skills specific to the English languageResourceful, self-directed, and able to perform responsibilities with limited oversight or supervisionMust be able to work a varied schedule including evenings and weekendsFor more details about this position please visit www.abcmcorp.com/employment   The ABCM Difference: Person Directed Care (PDC) -We believe in a Person Directed Careapproach to long-term care, encouraging the individuals who live in our communities tomake choices about the care and services they receive. More Than 50 Years of Service to Iowa in 31 Locations!                                           ",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/activity-coordinator-long-term-care-job-oelwein-ia-us-172660376.aspx?mescoid=3900662001001&jobPosition=19,,Project/Program Management,3ce5111ab4d038d45a2a9995b9e2c6ff
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:11:24:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position PurposeThis position will implement, coordinate and manage cost-effective fundraising activities to assist the local business unit attain its financial goals. This is a sales position where the majority of the performance review is based upon achieving aggressive annual revenue goals. Also solicits trains and manages an effective volunteer base of community leaders to assist in meeting the financial goals. This position acts as liaison between the March of Dimes, its volunteers, and the local community. Is responsible for recruiting, training and managing high-level volunteers as well as corporate participation and sponsorship within that community.Recruit, orient, train, and monitor performance of volunteers to organize events that meet or exceed the established fundraising goals. Develop a successful business plan using the organizations core business tactics to reach this goal.Develop strong networks within the local community, cold call or develop and grow prospects for potential revenue streams, event sponsorships, volunteer opportunities and to increase March of Dimes visibility and brand awareness.Manage and provide leadership to volunteer committees on each event to ensure that committee members are fully supported and accomplish tasks required for successful events.Prepare and maintain accurate records/data to evaluate cost-effectiveness, profitability, and public awareness of events and/or mission/program activities. This may include preparing income/expense budgets, compilation/analysis of event statistics, evaluation of media coverage, researching and analyzing community fundraising potential versus actual revenues, etc.Work with media or recruit a volunteer with this expertise to publicize mission/events, and secure local sponsorship for events to heighten public awareness and reach fundraising goals.Develop and implement events to recognize, reward, and motivate successful volunteers to ensure ongoing commitment.Work with program staff and volunteers to ensure that every special event or March for Babies contains program content to enhance the knowledge of the audience and general public regarding the March of Dimes mission, programs, special services and benefits for mothers and babies.Position QualificationsBA or BS degree or equivalent2 to 5 years of prior related work experience, preferably in sales event fundraising in a not-for-profit setting.Should be able to demonstrate successful fund raising experience including knowledge of sales best practices and current trends.Excellent computer skills including Word, PowerPoint, Excel and Outlook scheduler.Excellent verbal and written communications skills required – the ability to gracefully handle rejection and bounce back assuring goals are met. Strong interpersonal and presentation skills required; ability to cold call, grow local contacts and build and nurture effective business relationships to increase March of Dimes visibility, brand awareness, volunteer staff and revenue.Detail oriented, adaptable, organized and demonstrated ability to successfully manage multiple projects and tasks.Must be able to read, comprehend and analyze financial goals and fundraising reports and also generate required reports on a timely basis.Must successfully complete a credit and criminal background checkMust be able and willing to travel extensively throughout assigned geographic area and to work evening; mornings and weekends as necessary",Development Manager Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/development-manager-job-columbus-oh-us-172741489.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=6,,Project/Program Management,d85c12f2be14569e8283de99115df09e
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:11:24:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"*TOP JOB*Landscape WorkerFull-time. Shepherd University.For details and to apply, go to https://jobs.shepherd.edu EOEprovided by The Martinsburg Journal",PROGRAM ASSISTANT I Job in Shepherdstown,Full Time,"Shepherdstown, WV 25443",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/program-assistant-i-job-shepherdstown-wv-us-172753898.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bb1bb7167e70bf9f8110a6e4857aa216
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:11:24:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"PTC (NASDAQ: PTC) is a global provider of technology platforms and solutions that transform how companies create, operate, and service the ""things"" in the Internet of Things (IoT). The company's next-generation ThingWorx® technology platform gives developers the tools they need to capture, analyze, and capitalize on the vast amounts of data being generated by smart, connected products and systems. The company's field-proven solutions are deployed in more than 26,000 businesses worldwide to generate a product or service advantage. PTC's award-winning CEO, considered an industry thought leader, co-authored the definitive guides to the impact of the IoT on business in the Harvard Business Review. Are you a proven B2B demand generation professional? Are you a creative thinker? Do you have an analytical eye through which you look at the range of marketing activities that drive audience engagement and lead conversion? If so, then you might be the fit for this role in our marketing team.We are seeking an energetic, detail oriented and experienced Campaign Manager with a strong track record in planning, designing, and executing marketing programs to drive customer interest and demand. This person is highly motivated individual and an outstanding communicator who thrives in a fast-paced team environment, and consistently produces results on time and within budget.Your responsibilities will primarily focus on manufacturers and helping make the journey to smart, connected products; encompassing our IoT (Internet Of Things), product development, and product lifecycle management solutions.Responsibilities:•Plan, create and execute inbound and outbound programs to drive awareness and demand generation on a global basis•Manage the day-to-day operational aspects of campaign tactics and scope•Generate engaging content and copy for campaign elements (e.g. emails, landing pages, social media and high value content offerings)•Work closely and collaboratively with team members across product marketing, regional marketing, marketing automation and web◦Clearly articulates goals, expectations, and schedules to extended team members◦Make sure materials and programs are communicated to regional marketing•Develops project timelines and manage projects to a set budget and resource•Proactively engage with sales team to coordinate, communicate and optimize the impact of the demand generation marketing activities•Monitors campaign impact and effectiveness to formulate recommendations to improve resultsExperience:•Strong understanding of digital inbound and content marketing•Bachelor's degree in Marketing or Business or comparable education/experience•Minimum of 5 years in roles of increasing responsibility in B2B demand generation and inbound marketing•Intellectual curiosity and not afraid to try new things - driven to constantly improve results•Strong written and verbal communications skills•Highly organized and able to run multiple projects simultaneously•Analytic skills with the ability to analyze and present qualitative and quantitative results.•Experience with international marketing is a plus",Campaign Manager Job in Needham,"Full Time, Employee","Needham, MA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/campaign-manager-job-needham-ma-us-172159525.aspx?mescoid=1100005001001&jobPosition=11,,Project/Program Management,682de0c16bd608e1b37abbcc15645c48
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:11:21:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Telecommunications | Telecom Project Coordinator needed for a Long-Term Contract with Yoh's client located in Plainfield, IN The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess: - Valid driver's license and ability to drive a company vehicle (F-150 Truck). - Able to lift 50lbs. - Available for 40-50 hours per week with some night and weekend work. (10%) - 5 years Telecom Experience - Basic computer skills (Email, Excel, Visio) - Work with Project Mgt and Engineering Teams on project costs, resource needs and scheduling efforts. - Ability to provide technical oversight to a variety of vendors and Employees performing Telecom work. This work list includes installation of Structured cabling, fiber splicing, Data equipment(routers and switches), Transport equipment(Fiber and microwave), DC Power systems and communications tower work. - Work with engineering and support teams to ensure documentation is accurate and work completed successfully. What You'll Be Doing: - Support Project Management - Work with the PM to ensure that financial obligations and requirements are achieved. - Keep PM up to date on all major purchases. - Project Initiation customer request Review project status reports to ensure hours and in-service dates are correct. - Assist Project Coordinator or Customer Relationship Manager with the management of small projects following IT PMO process. - Support Engineering when field information is needed to support estimates and engineering design. - Assist PM and Engineers in performing site-surveys as requested Assist in determining the resource needs for field implementation for project estimates. - Provide Cable Plant scope of work, design, and estimates (Still TBD) - Provide Telecommunications support to IT and Business initiatives which do not require project management or engineering support. - As requested, provide contract, and field implementation support to business initiatives. - Ensure the work completed meets the project schedule. - For example, installation of Rugged Hardware in Distribution/Transmission vehicles. - Funding - Ensure corporate contract management processes are follow for work performed. - Ensure contractor/vendors have an active master contract and work authorization, as well as, are green light safety rated. - Fulfill DR designee by executing work releases. - Working with contracts Ensure proper work authorizations and work release letters are issued for contract services to ensure complete scope of work and time frame for work to be completed. - Ensure IT and business change management processes are followed. - Communicate and gain approval from key stakeholder and customers for project work. - Complete the IT change management process to include entering the change management 11 questions with scope to change manager. What's In It For You? We welcome you to be a part of the largest and legendary global staffing companies to meet your career aspirations. Yoh's network of client companies has been employing professionals like you for over 65 years in the U.S., UK and Canada. Join Yoh's extensive talent community that will provide you with access to Yoh's vast network of opportunities and gain access to this exclusive opportunity available to you. - Medical, Dental & Vision Benefits - 401K Retirement Saving Plan - Life & Disability Insurance - Direct Deposit & weekly epayroll - Employee Discount Program's - Referral Bonus Program's Get Hired, Apply Now! Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: INFOTECH TAX TERM: CON_W2 MONJOB J2WBRCHAR Ref: 1079356 Branch: IT & Telecom Nearest Major Market: Indianapolis Job Segment: Telecom, Telecommunications, Medical, Power Systems, Engineer, Technology, Healthcare, Energy, Engineering #TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Telecommunications | Telecom Project Coordinator Job Job in Plainfield,Full Time Employee,"Plainfield, IN",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/telecommunications-telecom-project-coordinator-job-job-plainfield-in-us-171984201.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=3,,Project/Program Management,6a0ad65b919be914128fa634b6735b6f
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:11:21:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"An industry leading automotive supplier is searching for a Program Manager with experience leading new programs and new product launches. This person will lead the program team(s) through the program life cycle in order to achieve customer expectations and company mandated targets for all assigned program(s). Our client is a $2B automotive manufacturer and is one of the fastest growing automotive suppliers in North America. The company has doubled in size over the last 6 years and shows no signs of slowing down in the future. Responsibilities for the Program ManagerActs as primary customer interface for all program issuesEnsures engineering targets (BOM cost, quality, delivery timing, tooling, performance, project engineering budget, etc.) for all assigned programs are met.Provides technical leadership in directing the efforts of cross-functional project team in the development and production release of all relevant project deliverables in compliance with the product development process and customer expectations.Provides onsite customer support from their team for vehicle level issues related to the assigned programs.Requirements for the Program ManagerBachelor's degree in engineering (preferred), manufacturing engineering, or business.Experience launching new programs with any automotive customer (Ford, GM, Chrysler, Honda, Nissan, Toyota, Subaru)BenefitsExcellent medical benefits, bonus, relocation assistanceThis Job is located in Farmington, MI -> United States",Program Manager - Program Manager/Automotive Job in Farmington,Full Time Employee,"Farmington, MI 48332",,http://jobview.monster.com/program-manager-program-manager-automotive-job-farmington-mi-us-172662481.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=18,"90,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",,9be8465730dcbcca88ee4c4decbf7f74
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:11:21:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Leading Automotive manufacturer has an immediate need for TWO Project Managers to join their team on a long term contract assignment (12-18 months). Both PM's are needed for a large conveyor modification and install project. One PM will have an Electrical background and the other will possess a Mechanical background. Most of the contract will be in the Detroit, MI area, however, some extended trips to other facilities will be required. Contractor benefits, PTO and 401k available. Responsibilities for the Project ManagerProvide either Electrical or Mechanical Project Management on conveyor modification and install projects. Coordinate with contractors and end client, run meetings, track project progress and provide updates to MGMT. Identify open issues, review Engineering drawings to ensure adherence to specifications, oversee buy off procedures and prepare punch lists. Requirements for the Project ManagerBSEE or BSME is preferred. Previous automotive Conveyor project experience is required. 5+ years of Project Management/Supervisory experience is required. Must be willing to spend 3-4 months on-site at other facilities as part of the project. BenefitsContractor benefits, long term contract, PTO and 401k. This Job is located in Troy, MI -> United States",Project Manager - Automotive/Conveyor /Electrical / Mechanical Job in Troy,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Troy, MI 48083",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-automotive-conveyor-electrical-mechanical-job-troy-mi-us-172662577.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,38.00 - 42.00 $ /hour,,a9b1e9005d580ef1221c878fac86f8ef
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:10:47:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70540 # Positions  1 State  MI City  Warren Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  2509 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747710.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=12,,Project/Program Management,80649ed1df6084a6386d0c56683f63d2
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:10:44:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70456 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Alhambra Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5611 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747743.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=1,,Project/Program Management,fff28fd4314bce844df2d34e7a1ed1fd
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:10:37:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client company is one of the world's leading manufacturing producers of critical rotating components of turbine engines for aviation, industrial and military applications. The Everett WA facility specializes in highly complex precision machined blisks, IBRs, impellers, diffusers and other components in metals including titanium, Inconel and aluminum. We are looking for a highly motivated and qualified Quality Manager.Summary Description: Plans, coordinates, and directs quality control program designed to ensure continuous production of products consistent with established standards. Job Duties and Responsibilities:Develops systems, policies, and procedures to ensure consistent conformance to quality standards in the manufacturing process.Establishes quality performance measures and provides management with analyses and appropriate recommendations.Review product quotations and purchase orders for conformance to quality specifications and manufacturing standards.Formulates and implements quality control objectives in support of company mission and business goals.Participates in Continuous Improvement Projects and Material Review Board activities in cooperation with other quality managers, plant managers, customer service, program managers or production supervisors to maximize product reliability an minimize costs.Directs employees engaged in inspection and testing activities to ensure continuous control over materials, facilities, and products.Schedules and conducts periodic audits of manufacturing processed to ensure all quality standards are fully documented and implemented. Identifies and schedules appropriate education and training requirements for personnel.Initiates personnel actions including evaluations, disciplinary measures, promotions, transfers, etc., in accordance with company policies and procedures.Ensures proper staffing, training, motivation, and safety for employees.Plans, promotes, and organizes training activities related to product quality and reliability.Evaluates subcontractor and vendor capabilities in support of customer specifications and requirements.Serves as a liaison with customers to ensure that the customers’ quality standards are supported. Investigates all customer complaints regarding quality and coordinates appropriate actions to prevent further occurrences.Reviews reports and trend analysis data in order to determine appropriate corrective and preventive action when necessary.Maintain quality records and documents as required by contract or internal procedures.Provides input to the Director of Quality for annual budget considerations.Responsible for supporting an ensuring compliance to ISO 9001/AS9100 Quality Management Systems along with customer specific quality programs and processing requirements.Complies with all company rules, policies, and procedures.Works and behaves safely by following all safety rules and regulations.Performs any task required to support customer requirements and company goals. Abilities and Skills required:Ability to read, analyze, and interpret common scientific and technical journals, financial reports, and legal documents.Ability to respond to common inquiries or complaints from customers, regulatory agencies, or members of the business community.Ability to effectively present information to top management, public groups, and/or boards of directors.Ability to interpret an extensive variety of technical instructions in mathematical or diagram form and deal with several abstract variables.The ability to sit or stand for at least 10 hours a day.Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education and Experience requirements:Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in EngineeringMinimum 6 years of closely related manufacturing management experience.5 years of experience in ISO-related quality control systems, including advanced quality systems (AQS). Go Beyond. EEO Employer - Minorities / Females / Disabled / Veterans / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity.",Quality Manager - Everett WA Job in Everett,Employee,"Everett, WA 98206",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-manager-everett-wa-job-everett-wa-us-172747504.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=1,,Quality Assurance/Safety,b8a1143e89b360a0de4974366ec185b2
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:10:24:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"City: LittletonState: ColoradoPostal/Zip Code: 80125 Non-Exempt Oldcastle Precast is the leading manufacturer of precast concrete, polymer concrete and plastic products in the United States. Our products range from utility vaults, reinforced concrete pipe, catch basins, drainage and septic tanks, to retaining walls, storm shelters, wall panels, concrete barriers, a variety of prestressed concrete productsand more. With more than 80 locations nationwide and 3,000 plus employees, Oldcastle Precast is committed to upholding core values of reliability, quality and service in cutting edge ways. Job Description Summary Candidate will be responsible for performing routine tests as required on raw material,s in process components, and final product. Candidate will participate in the validation of tests, inspections, processing methods and materials qualifications. Position requires the employee to perform a wide variety of Quality Control functions including, but not limited to, the following: Perform daily compressive strength testing of hardened concrete specimens Monitor stressing operations in pre-stress area Assist when necessary with strip, setup, and pouring of products Perform daily pre/post pour inspections on products Requirements High school graduate or equivalent Experience with construction materials　 Basic computer skills Strong problem solving and communication skills　 Required to pass ACI Concrete Field Tesing Methods/maintain certification Preferences Associates degree or equivalent from of a two year college; or equivalent in years of related experience or training preferred Quality control in a manufacturing / production environment preferred What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America's largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Join ourTalent Communityto receive an email newsletter with hot jobs & career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers onFacebook,Twitter,Instagram,Google+,Pinterest,WordPress (Career Blog)andLinkedIn! Oldcastle Precast is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on thislink. Oldcastle Precast is part of theOldcastlecareers™network.",Quality Control Technician / Manufacturing - Littleton,Full Time Employee,"Littleton, CO",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-control-technician-manufacturing-littleton-co-job-littleton-co-us-172602545.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=15,,,cffc4e79a05fecbb09c2ed0d96d612d6
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:09:28:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Child Welfare City Research Scientist will join the Office of Research and will work on a variety of projects that involve the application of sophisticated analytic techniques in order to understand and assess the child welfare system's performance in critical areas. The candidate will be required to work in a team, but will also have the opportunity to work independently and demonstrate initiative to lead and design new projects. Individuals with strong technical and analytical experience working with complex relational databases and knowledge of NYS child welfare systems are encouraged to apply.Key responsibilities include: Write SQL to query data from Oracle databases Coordinate and perform data matches with datasets from external agencies Perform statistical analyses using individual or case level data on child welfare related subject matters Draft summary write-ups to document the insights gathered from the analyses Provide data analysis support to other units within the Division of Policy Planning and Measurement and other ACS units, as neededPREFERRED SKILLS:Critical to this position is strong technical skills research skills. The preferred candidate should possess: (1) experience analyzing large administrative databases; (2) expertise programing in SQL and in SPSS and/or SAS, (3) proficiency in R programing a plus, (4) ability to work on multiple projects effectively and efficiently, both independently and collaboratively with a team. Background in child welfare policy and operations is strongly preferred.",Predictive RIsk Analyst Job in Manhattan,Full Time Employee,"Manhattan, NY 10038",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/predictive-risk-analyst-job-manhattan-ny-us-172655025.aspx?mescoid=1300119001001&jobPosition=1,,Project/Program Management,e3649119585feff3cf6124f910735159
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:08:02:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70417 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Vallejo Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5945 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor - Part-Time Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-part-time-job-camphill-pa-us-172747822.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=16,,Project/Program Management,a9b4737687fea8785d4a80eca43fde11
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:08:01:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionEaton Hydraulics has an opening for a Senior Quality Assurance Analyst located in Eden Prairie, MN. As the Quality Assurance Analyst, the incumbent is expected to provide global oversight for all backend operational activities related to the Hydraulics Web & Mobile customer facing program.  This includes the migration of PowerSource into the ETN.com/hyd site and when the migration is complete will include the ETN.com/hyd site and the my eaton portal.  This role will be expected to be the subject matter expert and responsible for key areas including application functional specifications, data load and workflow processes, quality assurance testing, support and defect resolution, feedback pipeline, analytical reporting and general project support. Strategically aligned to the Commercial Excellence program, the objective of this position is to create, standardize and improve all backend operations to contribute to the achievement of world class front end systems. The incumbent will serve as a key liaison to several teams such as IT Governance and Operations, IT CFCOE, TCS Managed Services, Vendors and all HYD functions.   Essential Functions include: Manage customer feedback channel through designed closed loop process to classify, route and fulfill requests within defined service level agreements to achieve customer satisfaction and promote a rapid response culture. Determine KPIs and report metrics related to operational channels including feedback, defects, enhancements, content, support, training, usage analytics, order and registration, etc. Standardize, document and improve backend processes to achieve a lean and sustainable business model. This includes feedback management, content playbook, user registration, testing and performance reporting. Govern version control of application technical specifications for production web and mobile solutions to ensure business rules, functional requirements, data refresh cycle times and workflows are maintained. Validate all bug fix requests, submit support ticket with detailed work instruction for managed service, coordinate weekly prioritization/status calls and effectively manage delivery to monthly release schedule. Leverage solution expertise to provide “first point of contact” troubleshooting support to customers via email, phone or web share when possible. Support new development project teams through requirements gathering, validation testing and production audits.  Participate in project status meetings, help identify risks and provide thought leadership. Lead all quality assurance efforts for web and mobile. This includes writing, planning and executing test scripts for weekly smoke screens, monthly bug releases, quarterly enhancement releases and projects. Support business teams on batch data/content load and conversion initiatives. This includes managing a small activity matrix of events, template validation and process coordination with managed services. Owner of order and user registration process and execution. These must be completed within in a timely manner and will require coordination with channel manager for conflict resolution. Maintain close liaison with the IT Operations, Hydraulics IT and TCS Managed Service teams to remain aligned with current quality assurance tools and production support best practices. Expected to be a thought leader for business process improvement opportunities. Maintain close liaison with IT CFCOE, Hydraulics IT, TCS Managed Service and Vendors to support requirements and be final testing validation for all new web and mobile development efforts.  Responsible for general user training for the short term and transitioning of training curriculum to the Training Department for long term (webinars, classroom, Eaton U, etc.).Basic Qualifications (Including Educational Requirements) Basic Qualifications: Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited institution. Minimum of 3 years of experience in application life cycle management, application development, information systems, or application quality assurance.   Ability to work in the United States without company sponsorship Relocation benefit is not offered for this position, must be located within 50 miles of Eden Prairie, MN.   Preferred Qualifications: Master’s Degree in Business, Information Systems, and/or Computer Science from an accredited institution. Project and/or Application Lifecycle Management is desirable Experience working with managed services is highly desirable Experience with Eaton’s ProLaunch and/or a systematic gated launch process is highly desirable   Position Criteria: Basic understanding of closed loop processes and customer support is highly desirable Experience working in project and team environments Possesses excellent verbal and written communication skills. A thorough technical knowledge of web and mobile application ecosystems and able to lead operational excellence in backend process planning, documentation, testing and general project support with both in-house and contracted teams.Eaton is a power management company with 2015 sales of $20.9 billion. Eaton provides energy-efficient solutions that help our customers effectively manage electrical, hydraulic and mechanical power more efficiently, safely and sustainably. Eaton has approximately 97,000 employees and sells products to customers in more than 175 countries. For more information, visit www.eaton.com At Eaton, we see things differently. We see opportunities to innovate, go above and beyond, and we work hard because what we do reflects who we are. If you see things differently—if you’re determined, motivated and focused on improving the world around you—then it’s time to see where a career at Eaton can take you. For more information, visit www.eaton.com/careers Eaton is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Eaton is committed to ensuring equal employment opportunities for all job applicants and employees. Employment decisions are based upon job-related reasons regardless of an applicant's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, marital status, genetic information, protected veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",Senior Quality Assurance Analyst,"Full Time, Employee","Eden Prairie, MN 55346",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-quality-assurance-analyst-hyd-web-mobile-front-end-systems-job-eden-prairie-mn-us-172125562.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=15,,Quality Assurance/Safety,946769f0a78839159e43814039def8bd
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:07:48:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have experience with CAPAs or investigations? Have you worked in pharmaceutical manufacturing? Are you looking to join a company with extensive growth opportunities? If so, look no further!Who are they?A Fortune 100 and Forbes 100 pharmaceutical company is looking to add talented Quality Engineer Investigators to their team. The positions are located in Kansas, near Wichita. This company is a global leader in the pharmaceutical industry and is committed to positively impacting the lives of their customers and patients while delivering value to their stakeholders.These are permanent positions and generous relocation assistance will be provided to you if you are not local to the Wichita, KS area.Who are you?You'll be the perfect fit if you are a Quality Engineer with experience writing investigations in a pharmaceutical manufacturing environment. Ideally, you have the following qualifications:3+ years of CAPA, investigations and/or manufacturing quality assuranceExperience in a pharmaceutical manufacturing facilityWhat will you do?As the Quality Engineer, you will write exception reports regarding plant issues and critical defect audit failures. You will conduct personnel interviews and system reviews and evaluate corrective actions. In this role, you will also identify and implement preventative actions.What's in it for you?As the Quality Engineer, you will gain additional experience in an aseptic processing environment - a highly sought after skill set! You will also be able to share your expertise with an enthusiastic team of engineers and production operators. This company is passionate about helping you grow within the company long term and growth opportunities are readily available within the organization. In addition to working in a state-of-the-art facility, you'll receive tons of great benefits including:Competitive salaryBonus target and retirement plan matchTuition reimbursementComprehensive healthcare benefitsGenerous relocation packageThis is a fantastic opportunity to take the next step in your career and to share your expertise in Quality investigations with an innovative multinational pharmaceutical company!If this opportunity sounds like a good fit and you would be interested in learning more, apply on-line to be contacted directly to discuss the next step.",Quality Engineer Job in Wichita,"Full Time, Employee","Wichita, KS",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-job-wichita-ks-us-172722795.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=3,,,3068c155e6ccd1557782969996ac24aa
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:07:48:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70515 # Positions  1 State  CA City  San Jose Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5988 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747725.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=7,,Project/Program Management,15ada6d29439862d7a8760bed0e07f22
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:07:48:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Temporary Rework Technician Classification:Temporary (1-2 months); Non-Exempt Objective: The purpose of the position is to perform rework mechanically as required and updating firmware on electronic pet doors Summary of position:Rework Pet doors by updating the firmware, minor mechanical changes and repacking the product in new boxes.   Job Responsibilities:  Update firmware on pet doorsUpdate pet doors mechanically as requiredPerform a final function test on the pet doorRepack door in new boxes and prepare for shipping  Specifications:Excellent written and oral communication skills required.Ability to work independently and as a team to accomplish tasks.Ability to prioritize work in order to meet deadlines.Occasional lifting up to 20 pounds.Manual dexterity required in operating small hand tools and machining equipment.Working knowledge of how to use Digital Voltage Meters, Oscilloscopes, Power supply.Minimum 2 years’ experience in manufacturing of products.Minimum 2years’ experience in testing.Two year technical degree or equivalent experience required.",Temporary Rework Technician Job in Knoxville,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Knoxville, TN 37932",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/temporary-rework-technician-job-knoxville-tn-us-171743560.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=10,,Quality Assurance/Safety,73acf8bfe4ec7e78d2922b4355b36a22
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:07:05:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70189 # Positions  1 State  AL City  Andalusia Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  7095 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747876.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=19,,Project/Program Management,2b5191ebed9677a8c2682dbdb0fbcdaf
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:07:04:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Job Purpose:To ensure sanitation and food standards are maintained for the overall success of the company. Duties/Responsibilities:?Along with (primary SQF Practitioner) oversees entire SQF program.?Work with Research & Development Team on matters pertaining to ingredients and packaging materials and communicate to Supply Chain Team regarding sourcing needs.?Develop final product specifications capable of being scaled?Document product development and testing?Responsible for handling product storage and shelf life?Document processes of each product?Ensuring food supplied complies with legislation through the product release program?Develop and maintain documentation for safe handling of non-conforming materials?Maintaining records of all products released?Design and develop corrective and preventive action plan?In charge of inspecting, analyzing, and documenting products at all stages?Follows proper handling and right temperature of all food products.?Maintains food preparation handling and correct storage standards?Function as part of the Product Development TeamSkills/Qualifications: Hands on experience with bakery, trained with sanitation and safety requirements, coordination in purchasing, inventory, maintenance and food cost control. HACCP Certified (cert on file), SQF practitioner certified (on file).FSMS Responsibilities: SQF Practitioner We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074293 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Plant Manager Production Job in South San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"South San Francisco, CA 94080",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/plant-manager-production-job-south-san-francisco-ca-us-172591064.aspx?mescoid=1100015001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6d9ca14015bef2805d0b67d23df528f0
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:06:24:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ellucian is the world’s leading provider of software, services and insight to higher education. Ellucian helps the higher education community—students, faculty, and staff—achieve their goals more efficiently, effectively, and with reduced risk. Ellucian’s comprehensive suite of software solutions includes student information systems (SIS), finance and HR systems, recruiting and retention systems, among other offerings. With more than 1,500 institutions subscribing to Ellucian’s cloud services and SaaS offerings, the company is one of the largest providers of cloud-based solutions. Ellucian also supports the higher education community with a range of professional services, such as application software implementation, training, education, and management consulting. More than 2,400 institutions in 40 countries rely on Ellucian to help enable the mission of higher education. location - remote from home (can reside anywhere in the US) - will have to travel to the client site.Project Delivery: Develop and lead a high-performing team of consultants, clients and vendors using proven skills to motivate performance excellence and encourage cross-functional collaboration throughout the full project lifecycle, resulting in the successful implementation of Ellucian’ s suite of solutions and business process improvements within a cloud based environment. Proactively monitor and control all aspects of the project to support status reporting to various constituent groups including project financial reports, schedule status, risks, issues, dependencies, team cohesiveness and performance, client satisfaction, barriers to success and overall project health. Recommend and lead corrective action based on qualitative and quantitative information to address project escalations and drive to satisfactory resolutions. Work with client and with Ellucian delivery teams to manage current environment evolution on a fixed schedule. Relationship Building: Build trusted relationships with clients, Ellucian resources and vendor partners to support smooth and timely delivery of all services and establish expectations of project team roles, responsibilities and level of participation. Demonstrate business acumen and technical experience necessary to communicate with appropriate leadership and key sponsors and negotiate key decisions related to the triple constraints (time, cost, scope) while exceeding client expectations.   This may involve negotiations to manage competing priorities and conflicting goals to drive the most appropriate outcomes, while managing risks.Develop communication channels to facilitate project planning, execution and the adoption of change necessary to successfully achieve operational goals.  Internal Responsibilities: Contribute to Ellucian’s learning environment through candid and constructive internal feedback, recommendations for delivery improvements, open engagement in internal initiatives and willingness to engage in new and challenging opportunities.  Identify opportunities for improvement in internal processes and work with the appropriate Ellucian resources in moving those improvements to reality.Work collaboratively within the Project Management Organization to improve delivery and outcomes for all projects.Manage, track, and advise on key performance indicators and metrics that define the overall project health and financial position on a week by week and month by month basis.  Elevating awareness of significant risks to ensure appropriate focus on issue resolution. Qualifications: Project Management Professional (PMP) certification preferred.Bachelor’s Degree in IT, MIS or Business Administration or at least 10 years of experience in a related field.Minimum of 5 years of professional project management experience implementing projects to support complex ERP system implementation and maintenance.High level of technical aptitude managing and working with Ellucian Banner or Colleague ERP systems through life cycle management of the solution across multiple versions.Experience implementing solutions deployed both on-premise and in the cloud is highly desired. Proficient in project tracking and presentation tools such as MS Project, Excel, Visio, PowerPoint etc.Experienced Project Lead with accountability for all aspects of the full project lifecycle; successfully applying Project Management disciplines such as resource, quality, risk, issues and change management while accountable for meeting time, cost and scope constraints for software implementations and system life cycle management. Proven self-directed, pro-active, results-orientated approach with demonstrated ability to meet contractual obligations, promote teamwork and achieve business goals.Demonstrated success creating safe communication environments, facilitating difficult conversations, building consensus, applying analytical thinking, gathering and presenting relevant information, negotiating favorable outcomes under strained circumstances and guiding conflict resolution. Superior communication skills working with all project stakeholder at all levels across multiple mediums; verbal, written, in person, and virtual.Proven ability to effectively manage service delivery based on Time and Materials or Fixed Price contracts preferred. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Technical Project Manager (MUST have Colleague/Banner ERP imp exp) Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77001",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-project-manager-must-have-colleague-banner-erp-imp-exp-job-houston-tx-us-172745054.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=20,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),3fe0027add00c31a3a445c992af0ad2c
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:06:23:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Title:                Project Manager, Petroleum Oil and Lubricants (POL) Location:         Anchorage, AlaskaDepartment:   Project ManagementReports To:     Program Manager, Operations Manager, or PresidentFLSA Status:   Exempt___________________________________________________________________________ SupervisesAssistant Project Managers, Superintendents___________________________________________________________________________ General FunctionPerforms project management responsibilities for the complete and satisfactory execution of various sized projects and or multiple task orders. This role develops a complete understanding of the contract and any relevant subcontracts in order to provide full support and direction to the project management team. The PM will manage, plan, and coordinate, with the superintendent, all activities of the project to ensure that goals and/or objectives of projects are accomplished within the project time frame and budget.  The project manager may be involved from the initial conception and design of the project through its construction, to its completion.   The work includes design and construction work for Department of Defense (DoD) Petroleum Oil and Lubricants (POL) fuel storage complexes, or portions thereof, in support of fuel distribution systems. Manage task order projects including fuel system design services, inspection services and other services needed to complete each task order construction projects.___________________________________________________________________________ Essential Duties and Responsibilities·         Works with estimating group through design and pre-construction activities to develop estimatesAssist in defining the project scope and objectives, involving all relevant stakeholders and ensuring technical feasibility·         Lead design and pre-construction activities·         Reviews project proposal/plan with Superintendent to determine time frame, funding limitations, staffing requirements, self-performance or subcontract·         Organizes and oversees job site administration and field supervision·         Assists in the procurement of subcontractors and suppliers·         Monitors the progress schedule and its periodic revisions ensuring project stays on track·         Ensures site safety is at the forefront of each project·         Works with the Superintendent to identify and resolve any project related issues/changes·         Develops long term schedule, goals and projections for projects·         Establishes and maintains relationships with the owner, design professionals, building officials, local businesses, and emergency support·         Prepares project budgets and cost codes·         Prepares project reports, financial updates, and scorecards for management, client, and others·         Prepares and submits RFI’s and change orders·         Develops project schedule with Project Superintendents_____________________________________________________________________________QualificationsEducation: Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, Construction Engineering, Construction Management, or related field preferred.Experience: Possess at least ten (10) years of relevant construction experience or a combination of education and directly related experience equal to ten (10) years.  Relevant experience includes, but not limited to, experience as Project Manager in the construction industry.  Past project experience must reflect DoD fueling type project experience and experience with design-build projects. Training: OSHA 30 Hour and U.S. Army Corps of Engineers Quality Control Manager (QCM) training preferred. Underground Storage Tank worker and decommission license preferred._____________________________________________________________________________Knowledge, Skill, and Abilities·     \Ability to thoroughly understand and follow plans and specifications with proficiency in the installation of DoD fueling projects ·         Advanced leadership and management skills·         Knowledge of pipe weld procedures for CS and SS.  AWS QC1 preferred.·         Knowledge of hydrant system tuning and commissioning·         Past experience and familiarity with pigging, flushing and cleaning pipelines·         Familiarity and experience with specific safety hazards associated with fuels type work·         Estimating practices for fuel related projects·         Familiarity with API 653 and STI SP001·         Thorough familiarity with the general contract requirements, with the ability to identify changes and conflicts.·         Ability to lead projects through design and work with design teams·         Through knowledge of construction techniques to derive the most efficient method of completing a task·         Foresight to predict problems before they develop·         Enforces all regulatory, base and company specific safety rules·         Performs job site inspections for both quality and safety·         Significant experience with earned value reporting and baseline management·         Demonstrated ability to work accurately, follow procedures and schedules, and prioritize multiple tasks·         High degree of sensitivity and ability to maintain confidential client and employee information·         Proficiency with all MS Office products (Word, Excel, Access, PowerPoint, Projects) ·         Ability to work in a team environment and fit in with company culture and processes ·         Effective professional oral and written communication skills·         Must possess a strong work ethic and values that are above-reproach ·         Strong organizational, interpersonal skills___________________________________________________________________________  Required Contacts·         Executive management, project management, and staff within CIRI Services and subsidiaries·         Government and customer representatives·         Joint venture partners·         Outside vendors and subcontractors___________________________________________________________________________ BenefitsExcellent salary and benefit package to include: paid time off, paid holidays, comprehensive health insurance plan including medical, dental, and vision, life insurance, short and long term disability insurance; 401(k) plan with employer match. For the full job description and employment application, please visit the following website: https://ciriservicescorporation.bamboohr.com/jobs/. .   Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Title:                Project Manager, Petroleum Oil and Lubricants (POL) Location:         Anchorage, AlaskaDepartment:   Project ManagementReports To:     Program Manager, Operations Manager, or PresidentFLSA Status:   Exempt___________________________________________________________________________ SupervisesAssistant Project Managers, Superintendents___________________________________________________________________________ General FunctionPerforms project management responsibilities for the complete and satisfactory execution of various sized projects and or multiple task orders. This role develops a complete understanding of the contract and any relevant subcontracts in order to provide full support and direction to the project management team. The PM will manage, plan, and coordinate, with the superintendent, all activities of the project to ensure that goals and/or objectives of projects are accomplished within the project time frame and budget.  The project manager may be involved from the initial conception and design of the project through its construction, to its completion.   The work includes design and construction work for Department of Defense (DoD) Petroleum Oil and Lubricants (POL) fuel storage complexes, or portions thereof, in support of fuel distribution systems. Manage task order projects including fuel system design services, inspection services and other services needed to complete each task order construction projects.___________________________________________________________________________ Essential Duties and Responsibilities·         Works with estimating group through design and pre-construction activities to develop estimatesAssist in defining the project scope and objectives, involving all relevant stakeholders and ensuring technical feasibility·         Lead design and pre-construction activities·         Reviews project proposal/plan with Superintendent to determine time frame, funding limitations, staffing requirements, self-performance or subcontract·         Organizes and oversees job site administration and field supervision·         Assists in the procurement of subcontractors and suppliers·         Monitors the progress schedule and its periodic revisions ensuring project stays on track·         Ensures site safety is at the forefront of each project·         Works with the Superintendent to identify and resolve any project related issues/changes·         Develops long term schedule, goals and projections for projects·         Establishes and maintains relationships with the owner, design professionals, building officials, local businesses, and emergency support·         Prepares project budgets and cost codes·         Prepares project reports, financial updates, and scorecards for management, client, and others·         Prepares and submits RFI’s and change orders·         Develops project schedule with Project Superintendents_____________________________________________________________________________QualificationsEducation: Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, Construction Engineering, Construction Management, or related field preferred.Experience: Possess at least ten (10) years of relevant construction experience or a combination of education and directly related experience equal to ten (10) years.  Relevant experience includes, but not limited to, experience as Project Manager in the construction industry.  Past project experience must reflect DoD fueling type project experience and experience with design-build projects. Training: OSHA 30 Hour and U.S. Army Corps of Engineers Quality Control Manager (QCM) training preferred. Underground Storage Tank worker and decommission license preferred._____________________________________________________________________________Knowledge, Skill, and Abilities·     \Ability to thoroughly understand and follow plans and specifications with proficiency in the installation of DoD fueling projects ·         Advanced leadership and management skills·         Knowledge of pipe weld procedures for CS and SS.  AWS QC1 preferred.·         Knowledge of hydrant system tuning and commissioning·         Past experience and familiarity with pigging, flushing and cleaning pipelines·         Familiarity and experience with specific safety hazards associated with fuels type work·         Estimating practices for fuel related projects·         Familiarity with API 653 and STI SP001·         Thorough familiarity with the general contract requirements, with the ability to identify changes and conflicts.·         Ability to lead projects through design and work with design teams·         Through knowledge of construction techniques to derive the most efficient method of completing a task·         Foresight to predict problems before they develop·         Enforces all regulatory, base and company specific safety rules·         Performs job site inspections for both quality and safety·         Significant experience with earned value reporting and baseline management·         Demonstrated ability to work accurately, follow procedures and schedules, and prioritize multiple tasks·         High degree of sensitivity and ability to maintain confidential client and employee information·         Proficiency with all MS Office products (Word, Excel, Access, PowerPoint, Projects) ·         Ability to work in a team environment and fit in with company culture and processes ·         Effective professional oral and written communication skills·         Must possess a strong work ethic and values that are above-reproach ·         Strong organizational, interpersonal skills___________________________________________________________________________  Required Contacts·         Executive management, project management, and staff within CIRI Services and subsidiaries·         Government and customer representatives·         Joint venture partners·         Outside vendors and subcontractors___________________________________________________________________________ BenefitsExcellent salary and benefit package to include: paid time off, paid holidays, comprehensive health insurance plan including medical, dental, and vision, life insurance, short and long term disability insurance; 401(k) plan with employer match. For the full job description and employment application, please visit the following website: https://ciriservicescorporation.bamboohr.com/jobs/. .  ",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure; Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-petroleum-oil-lubricants-pol-fairbanks-job-fairbanks-ak-us-172746936.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,,c61a7cd8b34a91edcfd0e1aa5abfb952
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:06:19:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70188 # Positions  1 State  AL City  Spanish Fort Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  7178 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747879.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=18,,Project/Program Management,07f13ab4e30453878a1de595fd1ba232
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:06:19:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Surge Connections is an expanding Sales and Marketing Firm looking for the right people to grow with. We are outsourced by Fortune 150 and Fortune 500 Clients to handle acquisition and retention of customers. We achieve this through face to face interaction with their customer base. We believe in fostering relationships with people we come in contact with and it is our belief that the most pure form of this is through a handshake and a smile.They outsource to us because of our ability to consistently demonstrate high return on investment and exceed our given targets. We pride ourselves on WOW-ing our clients by bringing them results they are looking for with a high level of integrity and professionalism. Because of this, our Clients trust the quality of our work and ask us to take on more of their demands. We are looking to do this with people who share our core values of honesty and respect for both our clients and our customers.To ensure these levels of integrity, we promote organic development throughout the company. Every individual starts Entry Level, regardless of their years of experience. Through merit and performance-based recognition, they are promoted through the ranks of a Management Training Program. In this program, individuals are taught the basics of business, economics, time management, finance and entrepreneurship. Through mastery of these fundamental aspects of business, they develop the qualities fit for managing the demands of one of our clients.We are not looking for the ultimate salesperson. We have a state of the art training program that every individual has access to. We are looking for someone who is willing to learn and grow. We are looking for someone who is people oriented and interested in the development of others as well as themselves. If someone is willing to develop and challenge themselves, we will take care of the rest.If this sounds like you, we want to meet you and potentially grow alongside you as business partners. What Are the Job Responsibilities?Sales and Marketing PresentationsCustomer RetentionCustomer AcquisitionDevelopment of OthersInterviewing and RecruitingBusiness AdministrationCoaching of a teamManagement of OthersRunning Daily MeetingsPublic SpeakingRequirementsWhat Does our Ideal Candidate Look Like?4 Year Degree PreferredSports MindedCompetitiveGoal OrientedAble to PrioritizeOrganizedAmbitiousTeam PlayerGreat Communication SkillsStrong Presentation SkillsDemonstrated Leadership ExperienceExceptional Customer ServiceAbility to Coach OthersPositive AttitudeStrong Student Mentality",Entry Level Manager: Full Training Job in Joliet,Full Time Employee,"Joliet, IL 60431",Advertising and PR Services Management Consulting Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-manager-full-training-job-joliet-il-us-172079006.aspx?mescoid=1100029001001&jobPosition=12,,Project/Program Management,c65540b77d80fb1a7629860917a5049e
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:06:11:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job Code: #3463Title: Journeyman Research Program Manager (NAMRU)*Date Posted: 06/23/2016Job Location: Dayton Ohio Job Description:PRIMARY FUNCTION(S)The candidate will support research program management functions of multiple research projects. The candidate&rsquo;s work will deal extensively with Department of Defense medical research and development requirements, to include regulatory and budget requirements.RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIESSpecific Responsibilities include but are not limited to: &nbsp;Research Progress report writing and editing,Budget planning and reporting,Monitoring of project milestone completion,Preparation of multi-media presentation materials for research program reviews,Coordination and execution of research program related meetings.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONSBachelor&rsquo;s Degree would be acceptable with related on the job experienceBackground in DoD ResearchOne to three years of experience in related project/program management functions, especially in the support of Department of Defense (DoD) research.PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONSMaster&rsquo;s Degree in a biomedical science or related fieldCertified Associate in Project Management (CAPM)Background in ScienceWORKING LOCATIONS &amp; ADDITIONAL INFOWright-Patterson AFB, OhioAll qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability or status as a Vietnam era or special disabled veteran.#LI-POST Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Job Code: #3463Title: Journeyman Research Program Manager (NAMRU)*Date Posted: 06/23/2016Job Location: Dayton Ohio Job Description:PRIMARY FUNCTION(S)The candidate will support research program management functions of multiple research projects. The candidate&rsquo;s work will deal extensively with Department of Defense medical research and development requirements, to include regulatory and budget requirements.RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIESSpecific Responsibilities include but are not limited to: &nbsp;Research Progress report writing and editing,Budget planning and reporting,Monitoring of project milestone completion,Preparation of multi-media presentation materials for research program reviews,Coordination and execution of research program related meetings.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONSBachelor&rsquo;s Degree would be acceptable with related on the job experienceBackground in DoD ResearchOne to three years of experience in related project/program management functions, especially in the support of Department of Defense (DoD) research.PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONSMaster&rsquo;s Degree in a biomedical science or related fieldCertified Associate in Project Management (CAPM)Background in ScienceWORKING LOCATIONS &amp; ADDITIONAL INFOWright-Patterson AFB, OhioAll qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability or status as a Vietnam era or special disabled veteran.#LI-POST",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/journeyman-research-program-manager-namru-job-dayton-ma-us-170970479.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,,fb5193d52543a934b40671ea96239cd8
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:05:54:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job Description:Total Joint Orthopedics manufactures implants and instruments used for hip and knee replacement surgeries.  The Manufacturing Quality Engineer will ensure that high quality standards are consistently met for these products, and is also responsible for company compliance per FDA Quality System Regulations. This individual will work closely with Product Development Engineering, Logistics, and Marketing to ensure that the product is safe, effective, and satisfies user needs.Organizational presence:§  Reports to Quality and Regulatory Manager§  Individual Contributor Role (No direct reports)Responsibilities may include:§  Work in partnership with contract manufacturers to resolve quality issues.  Perform initial qualification, re-evaluation, and quality system audits of contract manufacturers§  Coordinate evaluation and disposition of nonconforming product§  Identify issues requiring Corrective and Preventive Action.  Coordinate investigation to determine causes, implement corrective/preventive actions, and verify effectiveness of actions taken§  Create and/or maintain quality/inspection documents§  Review and approve engineering change orders for written procedures and product specifications§  Review/write technical protocols and reports ( Process validations IQ’s,OQ’s,PQ’s, sterilization validations, packaging validations)§  Participate as a member of new product development teams§  Work with contract manufacturers to apply Design for Manufacturability (DFM) in drawings and inspection criteria to facilitate production of high quality parts that are straightforward to manufacture and inspect§  Analyze and trend quality metrics to identify opportunities for improvement§  Identify and execute internal process improvements§  Support Regulatory functions when needed ( product release, ECO release)Requirements:§  Technical degree ( engineering preferred) or equivalent experience§  Experience in manufacturing, as well as in a regulated industry (Medical device preferred)§  Ability and willingness to work outside defined job functions. §  Detail-oriented, with strong interpersonal, critical thinking, written and verbal communication skills§  Aptitude for identifying, evaluating, implementing and verifying process improvements§  Experience with applications/limitations of various forms of inspection equipment§  Knowledge of quality statistical principles (Process Capability, Statistical Process Control, etc.)Preferred Qualifications:§  CQE/CQA/ RAPS training§  Working understanding of ISO 13485 and 21 CFR Part 820.§  Experience with tolerance analysis and part fits§  Solid comprehension of Geometric Dimension & Tolerance (GD&T)§  Understanding of hazard analysis and risk management§  Experience in verification, validation and ongoing process monitoring / control§  Familiarity with cleaning, packaging and sterilization of medical devices§  Working in an environment that depends on outsourcing for manufacturing, sterilization and packaging    Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 801-486-6070 Address 1567 E Stratford AveSalt Lake City, UT 84106",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-job-salt-lake-ut-us-172125125.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=18,,,63e7d8cd51cfb83288fa2d9d7e1766e5
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:05:27:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"IMP Manager-POS_75059912-1DescriptionSanofi, a global healthcare leader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and Genzyme.Sanofi USAt Sanofi US, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health.Headquartered in Bridgewater, NJ, Sanofi US is part of a leading global healthcare company dedicated to discovering, developing and distributing therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and Genzyme. Sanofi US employs approximately 17,000 people across the country all dedicated to protecting health, enhancing life and responding to the hopes and potential healthcare needs of seven billion people around the world.Commitment is our Strength. Ready to grow together?Sanofi US endeavors to make our career center accessible to any and all users. If you are experiencing difficulty and need assistance applying online, please call 1-800-207-8049 Option 7, then Option 3.Sanofi US Services, Inc. and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.JOB SUMMARYThe IMP Manager is responsible for the overall control of IMP management (inventory, supply, returns, and destruction) and to ensure proper timely supplies to clinical study sites for studies conducted by the US CSU. Key operational interface with both internal (US CSU, Corporate, CIP) and external ( IVRS vendors; etc) groups for the management of IMP supplies for the US CRU. Ensure IP management is conducted in compliance with all applicable Clinical Sciences Operations (CSO)/Local Quality Documents and associated regulations.PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESMaintain appropriate IMP inventories and manage IMP oversight for US CSU. Work with two key IP partners. Clinical Supplies GV Warehouse handles IP inventory and shipping which includes inventory receipt, inventory management, IP storage and IP distribution. USMA Clinical Supplies Management is US CSU partner for returns, reconciliation and destruction. Responsible for oversight of partners activities and ensure problem/issue resolution and process improvement.Develop appropriate work flow practices based on partnerships. Ensure partners are processing IP as per US CSU expectations. Generate IPSO1s. Assist with IPSO2 processing/tracking of local IMP; review IVRS specifications as needed. Manage all decode envelope/reports. Maintain IP documentation for local study files. Monitor IMP tracking tables to ensure ongoing completion by project teams. Monitor IVRS systems for accuracy. Propose solutions to improve IMP management.Provide internal IMP operational expertise to US CSU clinical project teams as the subject matter expert. Liaise with external groups for project and process initiatives as needed with Clinical Supplies platform, US Medical Affairs Clinical Supplies and others.Development of appropriate SOPs, best practices and processes (tools) for the proper management of IP supplies. Develop and deliver training to US CSU staff as needed. Need to consider SOPs belonging to partners and impact on local process.Ensures adherence to US CRU IP SOPs and other applicable rules (GMP, GCP and ICH regulations) by clinical project teams.Ensure appropriate label content for investigational product is valid per FDA CFR.Work and set IP priorities independently.Major Challenges/ProblemsEffective IMP management requires interacting with a number of groups both locally, other Sanofi sites (internationally) and with CROs (i.e., IVRS vendor; IP destruction vendor). Proactive communications is required to ensure adequate planning and appropriate designs. SOPs must be followed and enforced. SOPs must be current and applicable for the environment which will require periodic review and update. The IMP Manager will take the lead for the US CSU in conjunctions with IMP Specialist, Clinical Project Teams, CIP department, CTOMs and CROs work together to resolve problems in a timely manner.Key Internal and External RelationshipsClinical Supplies platform and GV Warehouse department members responsible for packaging, labeling and shipment of IP supplies – daily interaction. GV Warehouse staff handing IPSO2 processing - daily interaction. CROs for IVRS. US Medical Affairs Clinical Supplies Management for drug return, reconciliation and destruction - daily. CTMs as needed for study issues and authorization for destructions. Quality & Continuous Improvement group as needed to resolve problems.Decision Making AuthorityDecisions are allowed within the scope of responsibilities defined in SOPs. Any deviations, concerns, delays, etc. will be discussed with the appropriate clinical project team personnel for the appropriate actions. GMP/GCP/ICH regulations and SOPs should routinely be consulted to ensure the appropriate IMP management, the safety of the patients and the products they are taking during the conduct of US CSU studies.#LI-SAQualificationsKNOWLEDGE, SKILL, FORMAL EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTSKnowledge And SkillsKnowledge of the life cycle management of Investigational Medicinal Products (IMP) from planning to destruction. IMP subject matter expert who possesses the experience and working knowledge to make decisions and implement appropriate actions, taking the responsibility and works independently. Manages projects effectively, proactively and reactively makes corrections. Will manage and mentor others.Excellent verbal and written communication skills; strong interpersonal skills to be able to work with a diverse group of customers, including international; attention to detail, self-motivated with strong organizational and management skills; knowledge of IP operational planning and analysis required; must know and apply GCP, GMP and ICH regulations pertaining to investigational products. Computer experience with Microsoft Office, IMPACT CTMS and IVRS systems.Formal Education And Experience RequiredBachelor’s degree (advanced degree preferred). Prior management/supervisory experience in clinical operations within the pharmaceutical industry (minimum 5 yrs); preference towards experience with clinical supplies and investigational products. Any of the following is appropriate: IMP Inventory Management, Quality Assurance and Clinical Monitoring.Knowledge And Skills Desirable But Not EssentialFrench language skills and communicating at an international level.Job:QualityPrimary Location:United States-Pennsylvania-MalvernJob Posting:Sep 14, 2016, 3:08:35 PMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regularp.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal, p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast,font{font-size: 12px !important;font-family: Verdana,Arial,Helvetica,sans-serif !important;}",IMP Manager Job in Malvern,"Full Time, Employee","Malvern, PA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/imp-manager-job-malvern-pa-us-172602901.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=14,,General/Other: Quality Assurance/Safety,2513e986f782cad6e62788c2a2a178a9
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:05:25:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70538 # Positions  1 State  MI City  Washington Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  4886 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747716.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=10,,Project/Program Management,c943e013b3845aa66845c13c3cc06206
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:04:28:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Technical Cardiology Project Manager - Technical Cardiology Project Manager:Our client is in early stages of a new Phillips Xper Implementation and needs a Project Manager who can lead this implementation! The ideal candidate will have a proven track-record managing teams for implementations of Cardiology Information Management Systems. This contract opportunity is located on the West Coast.  If you have experience deploying the implementation of Xper IM systems, we would be highly interested in speaking with you! This position is looking to be filled immediately so we encourage a prompt response if you are interested in taking the next steps. Thank you, we look forward to hearing from you!Lead Contact:CoreMedical Group/CoreInformation TechnologyRachel KirshkalnRachel.Kirshkaln@CoreInfoTechnology.com603-893-4515 Ext. 1559Technical Cardiology Project Manager - Technical Cardiology Project Manager",Technical Cardiology Project Manager - Technical Cardiology Project Manager Job in Palo Alto,Full Time Employee,"Palo Alto, CA",Healthcare Services Staffing/Employment Agencies Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-cardiology-project-manager-technical-cardiology-project-manager-job-palo-alto-ca-us-172059696.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=4,,Project/Program Management,0fca92dd0398f95d9ad94aabfaf0388c
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:04:27:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"This person will be supporting the QA team. They will be testing to make sure pharmacy claims are priced correctly at the time of purchase in the pharmacy. They will be required to set up a claim and analyze the information and test the data. The client is currently using ALM and the HP suite of test tools. They are looking for a candidadte who has experience doing front-end, back-end and database testing using both manual and automated. t4 years of QA experience tFundamental QA knowledge ( experience writing test cases, executing test cases, what tests are called) tExperience with front-end, back-end testing and data mining tAbility to write SQL scripts and Data mining tLogical thinker/ Good at math",QA Analyst Job in Overland Park,Full Time,Location:,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-analyst-job-overland-park-ks-us-172097777.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=8,,Quality Assurance/Safety,27712d37975335133a7e3ea4e80df27e
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:04:26:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  696020Tasks to be Performed: The position will be the 1st point of contact for all IMACs along with processing any purchase only type requests.  Skillset Details: This position will require interaction with our internal customers, excellent customer service skills are a must, clear written and oral communication skills, organized, work well in stressful environment. Move quickly from one task to another.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Project Coordinator - Mid Job in Elk Grove Village,Full Time Employee,"Elk Grove Village, IL",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-coordinator-mid-job-elk-grove-village-il-us-172750677.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f45f75f50469b10b0d553e3ef5a05bdb
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:03:59:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Role: Automation(UFT) test engineer Full time onlyLocation: San Antonio, TX  Please find the below JD for automation(UFT) test engineer  for Onsite USA long term position as below. §  Involve in requirements gathering with the users for defining functional specifications and Use cases §  Technical Point of Contact for onshore and offshore resources§  Estimating of test automation, Approach, script standards document preparation§  Design automation framework , using UFT (VB Script)§  Fully automate by descriptive programming  when developing business functions, to minimize maintenance of object repository§  Design functional events for all standard objects§  Design and develop automation scripts using UFT.§  Design exceptional Error Handling for negative/positive test scenario’s, and Used Recovery Scenario’s for handling dynamic pop-ups§  Run the test automation suite after each release of the application and reporting them to the client in daily and weekly basis§  Use of  ALM/QC scheduler for unattended script execution§  Reporting defects in Quality Center after analysis results    Tech Mahindra (Americas) Inc.’s Equal Opportunity Policy Concerning Employment of Disabled Persons and Protected Veterans As Managing Director and Chief Executive Officer, I am committed to Tech Mahindra (Americas) Inc.’s (“Tech Mahindra”) Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity policies concerning employment of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans. I have designated Dr. Poornima Prasad, Head HR – Americas & Network Services, as the Tech Mahindra employee who will ensure dissemination and implementation of equal employment opportunity and affirmative action programs at Tech Mahindra. Dr. Prasad will establish and maintain an internal audit and reporting system to manage Tech Mahindra’s equal employment opportunity and affirmative action programs. Tech Mahindra is committed to the goal of equality of opportunity in employment. Tech Mahindra shall not discriminate because of status as an individual with a disability or as a protected veteran and shall take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities and protected veterans at all levels of employment, including the executive level. Tech Mahindra will recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job titles and will ensure that all other personnel actions are administered without regard to disability or status as a protected veteran. The Company will ensure that all employment decisions are based only on valid job requirements. Employees and applicants of Tech Mahindra will not be subject to harassment, intimidation, threats, coercion or discrimination because they have engaged in or may engage in filing a complaint, assisting or participating in an investigation, compliance evaluation, hearing, or any other activity, opposing any act or practice made unlawful by, or exercising any other right protected by or related to administration of Section 503 of the Rehabilitation Act, the affirmative action and any other provisions of VEVRAA, or any other Federal, State or local law requiring equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities or protected veterans. Tech Mahindra has developed a written Affirmative Action Program which sets forth the policies, practices and procedures to which the Company is committed in order to ensure that its policy of nondiscrimination and affirmative action for qualified individuals with disabilities and qualified protected veterans is accomplished. This Affirmative Action Program is available for inspection by any employee or applicant on request. Interested individuals should contact Dr. Poornima Prasad at Poornima.Prasad@TechMahindra.com to arrange for inspection.   Advertising Tag LinesTech Mahindra (Americas) Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. Notice to Applications and Employees of Availability of AAP for protected veterans and for individuals with a disability Tech Mahindra (Americas ) Inc. ( “ Tech Mahindra”) is a covered federal contractor subject to the requirements of the Vietnam Era Veterans readjustment assistance Act, as amended ( “VEVRAA”), and Section 503 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended (“Section 503”). As such, Tech Mahindra is bound by the terms of VEVRAA and Section 503, and shall not discriminate against protected veterans and individuals with disabilities, and is committed to take affirmative action to employee and advance in employment protected veterans and individuals with disabilities. Tech Mahindra maintains an Affirmative Action program for the purpose of proactively seeking employment and advancement of qualified protected veterans and individuals with disabilities. As an individual interested in employment with our company, or as one of our company’s valued employees, Tech Mahindra welcomes the opportunity to make its employees and applicants more aware of the company’s obligations and affirmative efforts. Upon request, Tech Mahindra will make accessible to you its Affirmative Action program for protected veterans and individuals with a disability. If you are interested, please contact Dr. Poornima Prasad at Poornima.Prasad@TechMahindra.com and we can schedule a time for you to review the Affirmative Program.  Report","Tech Mahindra Limited Job Application for Automation(UFT) test engineer | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Role: Automation(UFT) test engineer Full time onlyLocation: San Antonio, TX  Please find the below JD for automation(UFT) test engineer  for Onsite USA long term position as below. §  Involve in requirements gathering with the users for defining functional specifications and Use cases §  Technical Point of Contact for onshore and offshore resources§  Estimating of test automation, Approach, script standards document preparation§  Design automation framework , using UFT (VB Script)§  Fully automate by descriptive programming  when developing business functions, to minimize maintenance of object repository§  Design functional events for all standard objects§  Design and develop automation scripts using UFT.§  Design exceptional Error Handling for negative/positive test scenario’s, and Used Recovery Scenario’s for handling dynamic pop-ups§  Run the test automation suite after each release of the application and reporting them to the client in daily and weekly basis§  Use of  ALM/QC scheduler for unattended script execution§  Reporting defects in Quality Center after analysis results    Tech Mahindra (Americas) Inc.’s Equal Opportunity Policy Concerning Employment of Disabled Persons and Protected Veterans As Managing Director and Chief Executive Officer, I am committed to Tech Mahindra (Americas) Inc.’s (“Tech Mahindra”) Affirmative Action and Equal Employment Opportunity policies concerning employment of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans. I have designated Dr. Poornima Prasad, Head HR – Americas & Network Services, as the Tech Mahindra employee who will ensure dissemination and implementation of equal employment opportunity and affirmative action programs at Tech Mahindra. Dr. Prasad will establish and maintain an internal audit and reporting system to manage Tech Mahindra’s equal employment opportunity and affirmative action programs. Tech Mahindra is committed to the goal of equality of opportunity in employment. Tech Mahindra shall not discriminate because of status as an individual with a disability or as a protected veteran and shall take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities and protected veterans at all levels of employment, including the executive level. Tech Mahindra will recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job titles and will ensure that all other personnel actions are administered without regard to disability or status as a protected veteran. The Company will ensure that all employment decisions are based only on valid job requirements. Employees and applicants of Tech Mahindra will not be subject to harassment, intimidation, threats, coercion or discrimination because they have engaged in or may engage in filing a complaint, assisting or participating in an investigation, compliance evaluation, hearing, or any other activity, opposing any act or practice made unlawful by, or exercising any other right protected by or related to administration of Section 503 of the Rehabilitation Act, the affirmative action and any other provisions of VEVRAA, or any other Federal, State or local law requiring equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities or protected veterans. Tech Mahindra has developed a written Affirmative Action Program which sets forth the policies, practices and procedures to which the Company is committed in order to ensure that its policy of nondiscrimination and affirmative action for qualified individuals with disabilities and qualified protected veterans is accomplished. This Affirmative Action Program is available for inspection by any employee or applicant on request. Interested individuals should contact Dr. Poornima Prasad at Poornima.Prasad@TechMahindra.com to arrange for inspection.   Advertising Tag LinesTech Mahindra (Americas) Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. Notice to Applications and Employees of Availability of AAP for protected veterans and for individuals with a disability Tech Mahindra (Americas ) Inc. ( “ Tech Mahindra”) is a covered federal contractor subject to the requirements of the Vietnam Era Veterans readjustment assistance Act, as amended ( “VEVRAA”), and Section 503 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended (“Section 503”). As such, Tech Mahindra is bound by the terms of VEVRAA and Section 503, and shall not discriminate against protected veterans and individuals with disabilities, and is committed to take affirmative action to employee and advance in employment protected veterans and individuals with disabilities. Tech Mahindra maintains an Affirmative Action program for the purpose of proactively seeking employment and advancement of qualified protected veterans and individuals with disabilities. As an individual interested in employment with our company, or as one of our company’s valued employees, Tech Mahindra welcomes the opportunity to make its employees and applicants more aware of the company’s obligations and affirmative efforts. Upon request, Tech Mahindra will make accessible to you its Affirmative Action program for protected veterans and individuals with a disability. If you are interested, please contact Dr. Poornima Prasad at Poornima.Prasad@TechMahindra.com and we can schedule a time for you to review the Affirmative Program. ",Internet Services,http://jobview.monster.com/automation-uft-test-engineer-job-san-antonio-tx-us-172594203.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=6,,,2ef46a62ea3f0b0461de301b8daff3ae
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:03:14:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"NB+C is a leading wireless Site Development firm that provides services to all the major wireless carriers. We are seeking motivated professionals to join our innovative, fast-paced and dynamic team environment. NB+C is totally committed to  bringing the brightest and most determined minds to projects while providing employees with a supportive and collaborative professional environment.We work hard to ensure that our employees are provided with a great benefits package including health coverage, 401K, flex spending, life insurance, short-term and long-term disability, and PTO.Responsibilities:• Manage progress and deadlines for projects, such as: budget tracking, status reporting, project communications, meeting planning and facilitation, contractor management and project issue resolution.• Multitask and perform in a demanding, fast-paced environment.• Report project status both internally and externally • Manage and cooperate with all project departments.• Ensure that sensitive information is kept confidential and caution others when information might be violated • Work with team members to improve their performance• Manage administrative staff and ensure that master files and trackers are updated and the invoicing is processed promptly• Ensure documentation meets compliance with NB+C and client requirements. Qualifications:• At least five years of wireless project management experience• Knowledge of the wireless communications field and an understanding of the goals and programs of project clients• Familiarity with the terminology and building practices used for real estate, wireless telecommunications, engineering, surveying and land planning",Project Manager Job in Littleton,Full Time Employee,"Littleton, CO 80123",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-littleton-co-us-172660291.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=20,,Project/Program Management,99e51167fd93e446c1e9d4af5012af0a
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:03:12:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are a locally owned firm that creates and executes promotional campaigns for a wide range of clients in the local area. We are now accepting applications for Entry Level Account Managers and Event Planners to grow with our business. Be part of an exciting, fun work environment while helping to develop the local market! Primary Duties of the Jr Account Manager Impacts sales results by developing, supporting and executing field marketing and segment activities.Executes Marketing campaigns and Plans Events depending on expertise.Works with appropriate clients to support campaigns.Works with various corporate/field marketing managers to determine appropriate customized programs and strategies for various market segments.Provides coordination and project management to ensure event success.Once the management capacity is reached, may also attend these events as required.Monitors use of existing sales tools.Provides input on requirements for additional tools.Publicizes event and works with Account Development to raise awareness and drive high levels of attendance and participation by targeted audience.Advises on new ideas to generate revenue for various clientele  RequirementsBachelor’s degree preferred not required.  Ability to work cooperatively as part of a team.  Interact with customers to provide top notch service.  Upbeat, energetic, positive personality!! Competitive & Career Driven  Motivated individuals",Jr Account Manager - Entry Level Job in Greenville,Full Time Employee,"Greenville, NC 27834",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/jr-account-manager-entry-level-job-greenville-nc-us-171453803.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,Project/Program Management,8113b3906f27cc210dfa2ffb8466288e
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:03:00:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70262 # Positions  1 State  NC City  Chapel Hill Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  11367 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747851.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=7,,Project/Program Management,8781dc9ee13bf46f9c9d1b4ce8b4a0dc
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:02:59:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"At CoorsTek we change our world by providing industry with break-through solutions for an amazing variety of engineered parts and integrated systems made from ceramics, metals, and plastics. CoorsTek currently has an opportunity available for a talented Quality Assurance Engineer II. This position will be located in Worcester, MA . Position Summary: To establish, plan, support, implement, measure, analyze, adjust and/or maintain processes or activities that ensure the quality system is effective, and that products, processes and services meet internal and external customer requirements and expectations. Essential Functions: Performs professional Quality Engineering assignments of considerable complexity under limited direction supervision ie: conducts statistical analysis in the form of capability studies, DOE's, etc to evaluate processes.Designs, installs and continually evaluates quality assurance and/or control methods and systems.Develops standards, procedures, and work instructions to provide quality guidance and to facilitate trainingPerforms detail-oriented tasks utilizing high language skills and advanced math skillsPerforms training in internal auditing, mechanical inspection and statistical techniques.Develops sampling plans and statistical methods to be utilized by manufacturing and inspection in assessing the quality levels of products and processes to include determination of control points and charting methods.Interfaces with engineering and CMM programmers, to design fixtures and processes to ensure the effectiveness of measurement systems. Conducts internal and external audits and supplier surveys to verify capability and/or compliance. Coordinates and participates in material review activities to determine nonconforming product dispositions and corrective actions. Develops, generates, and analyzes reports and returned products to identify trends and to facilitate corrective action/quality improvements. Provides technical guidance to all personnel to assist in the use of statistical process control and problem solving techniques.Plans, conducts and takes action regarding gauge R&R, product and process capability studies.Performs QE liaison activities as required to support internal/external customer service and satisfactionProvide other quality engineering support as assigned by the Quality Manager.Employs excellent written and oral communication skillsReads and analyzes complex informationIdentifies, defines, and recommends issues for quality controlInterprets technical data in mathematical or diagrammatical formThorough knowledge in mechanical inspection techniques.In-depth knowledge and implementation of statistical techniques, with ability to identify, analyze and define possible solutions for continuous product and process improvement.Good knowledge and understanding of computer programs, applications and databases.Must successfully complete Lean Manufacturing and ISO 9000 Training.Performs PPAP or other customer specific product approval process as requriedPerforms First ARticle inspections and creates reports.Other Responsibilities:Knows and follows all safety requirements; strives to maintain a safe work environment.Assists in any and all areas assigned.Effectively gives and receives feedback; willingly asks questions and seeks direction as needed.Must be able to function within a team environment.Education, Training, and Skill Recommendations/Requirements:Bachelor's degree in a related technical fieldASQ Certified Quality Engineer preferredMinimum of 5 years qualifying experience.Must meet all training requirements as defined by department.Domestic and International Travel requried up to 10% of the time.Note: This job description is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities or qualifications associated with the job. As a full time regular employee, you will be eligible to participate in the Company's benefit programs. These programs include medical, dental, vision, company-paid life insurance; accidental death and dismemberment insurance, company-paid short and long term disability, PTO, and paid holidays. Also included is the Company's 401(k) plan, under which CoorsTek currently matches 100% of the first 6% of the employee's deferral. CoorsTek offers a casual, yet professional working environment. Enjoy working with an exciting company which has been in business over 100 years! CoorsTek is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will be given equal consideration regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran status, or any other category protected by law.. Principals Only – No Agencies Please. Pre-employment drug screen and background check required. As a full time regular employee, you will be eligible to participate in the Company's benefit programs. These programs include medical, dental, vision, company-paid life insurance; accidental death and dismemberment insurance, company-paid short and long term disability, PTO, and paid holidays. Also included is the Company's 401(k) plan, under which CoorsTek currently matches 100% of the first 6% of the employee's deferral. CoorsTek offers a casual, yet professional working environment. Enjoy working with an exciting company which has been in business over 100 years! CoorsTek is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will be given equal consideration regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran status, or any other category protected by law. Principals Only – No Agencies Please. Pre-employment drug screen and background check required. Position Summary: To establish, plan, support, implement, measure, analyze, adjust and/or maintain processes or activities that ensure the quality system is effective, and that products, processes and services meet internal and external customer requirements and expectations. Essential Functions: Performs professional Quality Engineering assignments of considerable complexity under limited direction supervision ie: conducts statistical analysis in the form of capability studies, DOE's, etc to evaluate processes.Designs, installs and continually evaluates quality assurance and/or control methods and systems.Develops standards, procedures, and work instructions to provide quality guidance and to facilitate trainingPerforms detail-oriented tasks utilizing high language skills and advanced math skillsPerforms training in internal auditing, mechanical inspection and statistical techniques.Develops sampling plans and statistical methods to be utilized by manufacturing and inspection in assessing the quality levels of products and processes to include determination of control points and charting methods.Interfaces with engineering and CMM programmers, to design fixtures and processes to ensure the effectiveness of measurement systems. Conducts internal and external audits and supplier surveys to verify capability and/or compliance. Coordinates and participates in material review activities to determine nonconforming product dispositions and corrective actions. Develops, generates, and analyzes reports and returned products to identify trends and to facilitate corrective action/quality improvements. Provides technical guidance to all personnel to assist in the use of statistical process control and problem solving techniques.Plans, conducts and takes action regarding gauge R&R, product and process capability studies.Performs QE liaison activities as required to support internal/external customer service and satisfactionProvide other quality engineering support as assigned by the Quality Manager.Employs excellent written and oral communication skillsReads and analyzes complex informationIdentifies, defines, and recommends issues for quality controlInterprets technical data in mathematical or diagrammatical formThorough knowledge in mechanical inspection techniques.In-depth knowledge and implementation of statistical techniques, with ability to identify, analyze and define possible solutions for continuous product and process improvement.Good knowledge and understanding of computer programs, applications and databases.Must successfully complete Lean Manufacturing and ISO 9000 Training.Performs PPAP or other customer specific product approval process as requriedPerforms First ARticle inspections and creates reports. Other Responsibilities:Knows and follows all safety requirements; strives to maintain a safe work environment.Assists in any and all areas assigned.Effectively gives and receives feedback; willingly asks questions and seeks direction as needed.Must be able to function within a team environment. Education, Training, and Skill Recommendations/Requirements:Bachelor's degree in a related technical field ASQ Certified Quality Engineer preferredMinimum of 5 years qualifying experience.Must meet all training requirements as defined by department.Domestic and International Travel requried up to 10% of the time. Note: This job description is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities or qualifications associated with the job. PI95324313Apply Here",Quality Assurance Engineer II Job in Worcester,Full Time Employee,"Worcester, MA 01606","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-engineer-ii-job-worcester-ma-us-172130044.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=4,,ISO CertificationProduction Quality Assurance,5d527d90020ac824e4ed7914ad96e96f
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:02:39:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"A prominent and growing automotive supplier is seeking a Project Engineer at their facility in Northwest Ohio. This position reports directly to the Engineering Manager and will manage product design/development and launch processes for plastic injection molded processes. Qualified candidates will posses strong engineering and design experience within the automotive industry.Responsibilities for the Project EngineerManage various product launch processes (concept design through production).Act as intermediary between customers and internal engineering teams. Select materials and build cost models based on manufacturing processes.Analyze, select, and work with various vendors and suppliers.Requirements for the Project EngineerBachelor's degree in Engineering required.5+ years of engineering and design experience within automotive industry.Strong familiarity with plastic injection molding (design, performance, tooling, material selection, etc.).Proficiency with CATIA 3D, FEA, and Moldflow preferred.BenefitsOur client offers a highly-competitive portfolio of insurance and retirement benefits.This Job is located in Defiance, OH -> United States",Project Engineer - Automotive/Plastic/Design Job in Defiance,Full Time Employee,"Defiance, OH 43512",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-automotive-plastic-design-job-defiance-oh-us-172740736.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=9,"65,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",,d2403613298714f672804c54293a73f4
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:02:13:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client, a leading chemical company in the field of developing and manufacturing polymers, domiciled in the UK, is seeking a Regulatory Manager for the Americas (USA, Canada and South America).  This role will ensure and maintain product compliance and provide regulatory knowledge, leadership and support to the Americas business, anticipate and be involved in relevant local changes in the regulatory environment, and contribute to a forward looking, business driven strategy for the Global Regulatory Function.The responsibilities of this position include regulatory support to functions within the organization, such as Operations, Purchasing, Technical Services, Sales and R&D to ensure regulatory compliance is maintained; conduct regular regulatory audits on Company owned assets within the Americas to ensure compliance of relevant chemical legislation; respond to regulatory inquiries from customers; create and contribute to the creation and delivery or compliance based solutions and procedures; manage external third party collaborations and regulatory service providers;  and assist in the formation of company policies to ensure products and documentation comply with all current legislation.  A successful candidate will become a leading member of relevant industry associations to help shape and influence regulatory policy at a local level, as well as raise awareness.The ideal candidate will have a degree in a science related subject, preferably Chemistry, with a strong background in polymer Chemistry, or a Masters in Toxicology.  A postgraduate scientific qualification is desirable.  A minimum of 5+ years of significant regulatory/toxicology experience within the chemical industry in the US, or other similar related industry, is required.  Additionally, superior knowledge of and experience with global chemistry regulations, such as GHS and implementation within the Americas, TSCA and proposed reforms, and Regulatory decision making/process implementation is necessary. The position is located in Roebuck, SC.  Travel within the Americas and Europe is required, when necessary.  Relocation assistance is available for qualified candidates.   Salary package is commensurate with experience, and Company offers a competitive benefits package.  Company is an equal opportunity employer. ",Regulatory Manager Job in Greenville,Full Time Employee,"Greenville, SC",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/regulatory-manager-job-greenville-sc-us-172652302.aspx?mescoid=1100056001001&jobPosition=2,,Quality Assurance/Safety,91242a70fa686904cfe9b5a1d510ed85
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:02:11:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Administration for Children's Services (ACS) manages the largest child care system in the country with an approximate budget of $1 billion and is responsible for managing the administration of subsidies for early care and education benefitting more than 100,000 children. Under the supervision of the Associate Commissioner for Program Development, the Executive Director of Program Design has the following duties and responsibilities:Analyze and assess feasibility, implications and cost/benefit of potential child care delivery enhancements and initiativesSupervise staff managers with responsibility for ensuring compliance among contract early childhood programs, with service content requirements, including but not limited to family and community engagement, health, mental health and nutrition, and education and disabilitiesDevelop scenarios and work plans for program design and management, including providing expertise on child development and oversight of curriculum and contentDevelop, coordinate and implement work plan for analyzing and updating community needs assessmentDevelop scenarios and work plans for the implementation and management of program development initiativesCoordinate implementation and planning within Division of Early Care & Education, with other ACS divisions, and with city, state and Federal agencies with jurisdiction over child care service deliveryConvene intra-agency and inter-agency workgroups to design and execute tasks to facilitate child care service delivery management, and other strategic program development and service enhancement initiativesCommunicate with and get input from governmental and community stakeholders regarding child care service delivery",Executive Director of Program Design Job in Manhattan,Full Time Employee,"Manhattan, NY",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-director-of-program-design-job-manhattan-ny-us-172649862.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=12,,Project/Program Management,1022d059f7c3fd1e9b01df4c31c699a5
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:00:47:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"BDO’s Core Purpose is Helping People Thrive Every Day. Our Core Values reflect how we manage our work, our relationships and ourselves. As an employee of the firm, you will live true to our Core Values of people first, being exceptional every day in every way, embracing change, feeling empowered through knowledge and choosing accountability. Our Core Values are the standards by which we conduct ourselves day in and day out, both internally and externally.The Assurance Senior Manager is responsible for developing suggestions to improve client internal controls and accounting procedures as well as advising the client on various economic and regulatory risks in a specific industry field of expertise by identifying financial and non-financial performance measures, formulating and communicating the audit plan, answering complex questions involving GAAP and GAAS and composing technical consultation memos on engagements related to GAAP / GAAS issues. In this role, the Assurance Senior Manager is charged with marketing, networking and business development within an area of expertise while maintaining key client relationships and acting as the primary contact for clients regarding complex questions and information. Additionally, the Assurance Senior Manager is a critical part of the offices / region’s Assurance leadership team and will be involved in the direct supervision, problem resolution and delegation stages of the overall audit.Education:- Bachelors or Master’s degree in Accounting or equivalent required- MBA/Masters in Accountancy is a plusExperience:- Seven (7) to ten (10) years prior work experience required- Prior significant supervisory experience requiredLicense/Certifications:- Licensed CPA or international equivalent requiredSoftware:- Experience in the use of various assurance applications and research tools as is appropriate for this level- Microsoft Office Products, including Windows, Word, Excel, and PowerPointOther Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:- Able to demonstrate strong leadership skills and be a role model to managers and staff- Advanced GAAP and GAAS knowledge- Sound working knowledge of SEC and PCAOB rules- Possess proven excellent verbal and written communication skills- Possess excellent people development and delegation skills, including training/instruction and engagement scheduling and budgeting- Possess executive presence - need to be able to be primary contact for the client, prepare and present presentations to clients and potential clients- Possess excellent client development/relationship-building skills- Possess excellent decision-making skills- Able to substantially take charge of entire simple engagement- Able to resolve complex accounting issues- Able to be responsible for business development and marketing- Has knowledge of and is able to promote the use of all BDO client service specialties/offerings, including BDO International and the BDO Alliance- Able to be responsible for engagement profitability, including billings and collections, and maintaining engagement team focus on productivity and efficiencyMON",Assurance Senior Manager Job in Pittsburgh,Full Time Employee,"Pittsburgh, PA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/assurance-senior-manager-job-pittsburgh-pa-us-172128817.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=7,,Quality Assurance/Safety,9c97283cf90ca088509d43da0b412c19
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:00:47:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description CECO is diversified global provider of leading engineered technologies to the environmental, energy, and fluid handling and filtration industrial segments, targeting specific niche-focused end markets through an attractive asset-light business model, strategically balanced across the world. CECO targets its $5 billion+ of installed base, specifically to expand and grow a higher recurring revenue of aftermarket products and services. CECO’s well respected brands, technologies and solutions have been evolving for well over 50 years to become leading-edge technologies in specific niche global end markets, including natural gas turbine power, refinery & petrochemical engineered cyclones and mid-stream energy pipeline gas transmission. CECO is listed on Nasdaq under the ticker symbol “CECE.” For more information, please visit www.cecoenviro.com.  Adwest Technologies, Inc. provides cost effective thermal and catalytic oxidation solutions for abatement of Volatile Organic Compounds (VOCs), gaseous air toxic fumes and odors from chemical, hydrocarbon, and acid gas process streams. Since 1988, over 1,150 Flameless Operation Adwest RTO Regenerative Thermal Oxidizers have been installed worldwide, providing virtual NOx-free operation with up to 97% VOC primary energy recovery for ultra low oxidizer energy usage and up to 99% VOC removal efficiencies. Adwest can also provide VOC concentrators, acid gas scrubber packages, custom control panels, pre-filters, custom designed exhaust stacks, and turnkey installation for any gaseous VOC application from 1,000 to over 320,000 scfm flow rates.Project Manager – Adwest Position DescriptionPerforms technical project execution and process control. Both operational as well as logistical Responsible for financial controlling of projects, keeping the project within budget, timely invoicing, quoting/processing change orders, review/release of supplier invoices Monitoring and tracking of project status Communication with the customer, supplier and project team members Preparation and monitoring of project schedules in MS Project Development of technical procurement specifications in cooperation with purchasing and engineering Ensure timely customer approval of general arrangement drawings, release for fabrication Review of project specifications and exclusions and ensuring compliance Scheduling and monitoring of inspection release by QC for product fabricated by subcontractors Preparation and monitoring of required project documentation Submittal of project documentation to the customer Review of general arrangement and detailed fabrication drawings Monthly financial reporting for in progress projects Financial review/evaluation upon project close outRequirementsBachelor’s degree in Engineering; preferred 5 – 7 years of project management experience within the manufacturing industry; preferred P&L responsibility for assigned projects; preferred MS Office Suite; required MS Project &  MRP/ERP systems; preferred PMP; preferredCECO Environmental offers a competitive salary and a comprehensive benefits package including life, medical, dental, vision, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, 401k and more.CECO Environmental is an EEO and E-Verify Employer.  We sincerely appreciate your interest and will carefully evaluate your qualifications for employment.  Be assured your opportunity for employment with our company will be based only on your merit without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, mental or physical disability, or any other factor unrelated to job requirements.   ",Project Manager - Adwest Job in Anaheim,"Full Time, Employee","Anaheim, CA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-adwest-job-anaheim-ca-us-169513802.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,,Project/Program Management,3e033edd015cc3b1de64717fe76bf60f
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:00:27:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Large Utility has an immediate need in the Central US for a Facilities Project Manager to manage both commercial facility building upgrades and field generation upgrades and maintenance needs. This is a contract position expected to last 6+ months, possible extension. Per diem is available for qualfied candidates. Apply Now! Responsibilities for the Project ManagerThe onsite construction project manager will provide oversight and support services throughout the course of the project. The work will include, but not be limited to the following:Manage construction progress to insure the highest levels of quality workmanship and adherence to the specifications and drawings.PM will act as an onsite communication liaison, will conduct safety, health, and environmental observations and assure compliance, will facilitate progressive construction scheduling and monitor progress of construction milestones to assure timeliness of workPM will assure logistical coordination between plant operations and Owner's General Contractor, will attend daily start up meeting with owner's plant operations personnel, including review of activity log for daily work, and will provide site orientation and safety training for all owner's general contractor employeesRequirements for the Project ManagerBS degree, PMP preferred 2+ years facility project experience on power generation facilities or commercial heavy industrial faclities2+ years experience managing multiple statewide capital projects and their associated deliverables from initiation through closeout.Knowledge of design and construction of mechanical/electrical/civil/structural systemsFamiliarity with Microsoft ProjectThis Job is located in Jackson, MI -> United States",Project Manager - Facilities /Power Generation/Commercial Job in Jackson,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Jackson, MI 49201",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-facilities-power-generation-commercial-job-jackson-mi-us-172661356.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,30.00 - 60.00 $ /hour,,c005f50f69d084a0c36209aee1fab78e
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:00:23:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Home Community Based Services CoordinatorFull-time Position in CherokeeMid-Step Services, a non-profit orgaization serving the needs of children and adults who have developmental disabilities, is currently hiring for an HCBS Coordinator. This is a full-time position in Cherokee, IA.Primary duties will include:-staffing-developing individual consumer program plans-ensuring property implementation-timely program documentation using EDOC system-general welfare of consumers and the home in which they liveMid-Step offers:-paid days off-employee assistance program-insurance -and morePre-employment drug test required. A 22 minute video must be viewed before completing an application. If interested in an environment with genuine care for both persons with developmental disabilities and staff, please apply between 7:30 a.m. and 4:00 p.m. at:Mid-Step Services4303 Stone AvenueSioux City, IA 51106Phone: 712-274-2252Fax: 712-276-0321Email: hr@midstepservices.com Website: www.midstepservices.com Equal Opportunity Employer - M/F/D/V Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 712-274-2252 Fax 712-276-0321 Address 4303 Stone AvenueSioux City, IA 51106",,http://jobview.monster.com/home-community-based-services-coordinator-job-sioux-city-ia-us-171338217.aspx?mescoid=1100053001001&jobPosition=14,,,e0933f81407b5dfa64b787458223d067
United States of America,US,03/Nov/2015:00:22:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Part-time Event Sales Associate Lawrenceville based events company looking for a sales associate who will be responsible for selling vendor booths and sponsorships for several public events/expos within Gwinnett County and Georgia.. Position reports to the Director of Events. Hourly pay plus commission (no benefits).   What we want you to do. ·         Sell exhibitor space and sponsorships (commissionable)·         Research local and national markets to identify prospects for each event·         Ensure high levels of customer satisfaction through excellent sales service·         Assist with fulfilling sponsor contracts and exhibitor needs·         Involvement in exhibitor registration·         Work events (minimal nights and weekends) What we need from you.·         Sales experience – at least 1 year ·         Excellent communication skills, including writing, proof reading skills, and speaking·         Ability to work on multiple projects / good organizational skills (events will overlap)·         Excellent interpersonal skills both in person and by phone, with high professionalism·         Ability to sell and accomplish projects with little supervision·         Experience sending emails and doing web searches·         Ability to work some nights and weekends (as needed with events or in the selling process)·         Pass drug test and background screening·         High School diploma or equivalent (College degree a plus) What we really would love from you.·         Experience selling vendor/exhibitor booths, sponsorships or events ·         Events experience (preferably one that had vendor booths)·         Experience using social media for sales and promotions·         Microsoft Word and Excel experience What we can give you.Start date:               October 1, 2016Compensation:    up to $15/hour, 25 hours max per week, plus up to 30% commission Location:                Lawrenceville, GA Who should apply. Sales professionals (especially if you’ve sold exhibitor booths, sponsorships, events, telemarketing, advertising, solicited donations for a non-profit or successfully sold anything) who are comfortable selling via phone, email, social media and in person.   Send Resume with Cover Letter to: Events@scompapers.com Report",Monster,"Part Time, Employee","Part-time Event Sales Associate Lawrenceville based events company looking for a sales associate who will be responsible for selling vendor booths and sponsorships for several public events/expos within Gwinnett County and Georgia.. Position reports to the Director of Events. Hourly pay plus commission (no benefits).   What we want you to do. ·         Sell exhibitor space and sponsorships (commissionable)·         Research local and national markets to identify prospects for each event·         Ensure high levels of customer satisfaction through excellent sales service·         Assist with fulfilling sponsor contracts and exhibitor needs·         Involvement in exhibitor registration·         Work events (minimal nights and weekends) What we need from you.·         Sales experience – at least 1 year ·         Excellent communication skills, including writing, proof reading skills, and speaking·         Ability to work on multiple projects / good organizational skills (events will overlap)·         Excellent interpersonal skills both in person and by phone, with high professionalism·         Ability to sell and accomplish projects with little supervision·         Experience sending emails and doing web searches·         Ability to work some nights and weekends (as needed with events or in the selling process)·         Pass drug test and background screening·         High School diploma or equivalent (College degree a plus) What we really would love from you.·         Experience selling vendor/exhibitor booths, sponsorships or events ·         Events experience (preferably one that had vendor booths)·         Experience using social media for sales and promotions·         Microsoft Word and Excel experience What we can give you.Start date:               October 1, 2016Compensation:    up to $15/hour, 25 hours max per week, plus up to 30% commission Location:                Lawrenceville, GA Who should apply. Sales professionals (especially if you’ve sold exhibitor booths, sponsorships, events, telemarketing, advertising, solicited donations for a non-profit or successfully sold anything) who are comfortable selling via phone, email, social media and in person.   Send Resume with Cover Letter to: Events@scompapers.com",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/event-sales-associate-job-lawrenceville-ga-us-171945771.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=3,,,bc80b40c66b5aed126a801e938ea5bbf
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:50:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client is seeking a Senior Project Manager in Atlanta, Georgia (GA).Essential Functions: Develop, define, and roll-out the Release Management Strategy and Release Planning Process Manage the Release Calendar (release packaging and integrated scheduling) Manage Release Communications (track progress and communicate release status) Responsible for collaborating with the Business & IT stakeholders to effectively plan and manage current / future work entry Facilitate prioritization with stakeholders across the organization Facilitate release scheduling sessions with the Business & IT organization Work across organizations to balance needs with project demand vs. resource capacity Work across organizations to identify and understand dependencies Facilitate integrated deployment management Facilitate release management retrospectives (best practices and improvements) Develop, Define, and Roll-Out the Release Strategy and Release Planning process Assist with developing the Release Management organization Facilitate Release Packaging sessions with the Business & IT organization Communicate with stakeholders regarding release packaging and status Maintain release packaging, release integrated scheduling, and work intake priorities Facilitate Business & IT sessions to develop Strategic Roadmaps for Business Cases Manage the Release Execution (development & deployment lifecycle) Provide input to the Release Packaging & Integrated Scheduling activities Track progress and communicate release status Create and maintain release deployment plansREQUIREMENTS: Teambuilding Structured Methodology Planning Motivation It Project Management Interpersonal Developing Customer Service Consulting Communication Coaching Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Senior Project Manager Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30354",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-project-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-178565188.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8ce7a2fb2e8ae91f1166b6387753ab44
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:11:28:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad Lithia Springs is seeking quality forklift operators for temp to hire positions in the Lithia Springs/Austell area. Dexterity and strong hand-eye coordination are key in this role. Candidates need to display attention to safety precautions and common sense as well as the ability to maintain concentration over along period of time. Candidates with a strong sense of balance are preferred. The Forklift Operator is responsible for operating a forklift to stack and relocate material. The candidate is accountable for the safe and efficient operation of the vehicle and may also be required to perform other duties as assigned. Typical additional duties may include but are not limited to checking inventory, executing product counts, weighing and tagging products, using a bar code scanner, using a shrink wrapper, loading/unloading trucks, light cleaning of the warehouse and data entry.Working hours: All shiftsSkills:Minimum 6 months Forklift Operating experienceFlexibility to work in different environmentsStrong attention to detail and accuracyFor immediate consideration please send an updated resume and contact information to Tye Brooks via email at tye.brooks@randstadusa.com Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift Operator Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178460344.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=20,11.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,,1beca6ff671c708f963dd5266ab3057c
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:11:30:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Forklift operators assist monitoring the inventory which will include product information, quantity, labels, location, picking and putting product away. .- The daily tasks will be completed through cycle counts, research analysis for client specific requests, MS Excel and forklift experience with TURET, Reach, Cherry Picker or Stand Up. Personable and upbeat team!!! Opportunity to get LOTS of overtime and advance!Working hours: Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, SaturdaySkills:Skills: * Stand Up, Reach or Cherry Picker experience in a production based environment* MS Excel or warehouse management software experience* Cycle counting or picking experience* Identify discrepancies in physical inventory* Pick or put away product* Assist with completing tasks instructed by managementQualifications:*Consent to background and drug test.*Must have reliable transportation as the site is not located off the bus line.*Must have a valid Driver's License to access the premise.Randstad is the second largest staffing agency in the nation.- We offer the following benefits: Holiday Pay401KMedical BenefitsDental VisionPlease email questions to Erica.Frederick@randstadusa.com Randstad invites you to the Lithia Springs office to meet with our staffing consultants during our Manufacturing & Logistics Career Open House! If you're looking for a Forklift Driver, Pickers/Packer, Assembly, machine operator job, please stop by! We look forward to seeing you!When: Friday, June 3rd 2016Where: 628 Thornton Rd. Lithia Springs, GA 30122 (Next to Kroger) Get to know us. At Randstad, we're always looking for great people. Our customers rely on us to deliver them talented workers for a wide variety of positions. If you're looking for work, or looking to change jobs, come to our office and meet with our team.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift Operator Job in Union City,Full Time Employee,"Union City, GA 30291",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-union-city-ga-us-178465148.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=13,11.75 - 11.75 $ /hour,,19c7b530e8fa2a002b64fafe4c3132a8
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:11:59:48,No,jobs.monster.com,Report this job About the Job This is a test job only. Report,"Randstad Healthcare Job Application for Other Physician - New Candidate | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Scott Kemp Phone 770.937.4679 Address 30324,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/other-physician-new-candidate-job-atlanta-ga-us-178447014.aspx?mescoid=2900470001001&jobPosition=5,,,4e06fd891aed2c0f481a76300806a170
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:23:59:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client is seeking a QA / Mocking / Unit Testing candidate in Juno Beach, FL. The client seeking someone with strong experience in designing and testing application Interface in Java.REQUIREMENTS: Solid experience with JavaScript and OO programming Experience working an Agile TDD environment Knowledge of relational databases/SQL, NoSQL structured data solutions, Data Warehousing and ETL tools, network and file system protocols 12-month contract to hire opportunity Experience using Mocking tools for Unit Testing Previous testing or development experience Experience with design patterns Strong Unit Testing experience Experience with designing and running JUnit tests Report, triage and track defects to closure. Experience with Automated Unit Testing Demonstrated analytical and problem-solving skills Use BDD, TDD and ATDD techniques to automate in-sprint leveraging code-based tools Look for Continuous Improvement. Identify & be the focal for innovative solutions within the QE department Strong communication skills - written and verbal",QA / Mocking / Unit Testing Job in Juno Beach,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Juno Beach, FL 33408",,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-mocking-unit-testing-job-juno-beach-fl-us-169016913.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4604e5c51031b91502358d4249c6e5e2
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:23:23:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryAs a Genius at the Apple Store, you maintain customers' trust in Apple as the skilled technical customer service expert, troubleshooting and repairing products. You use problem-solving and people skills to assure Genius Bar customers of swift resolutions to their technical problems. You also educate your team members about products, while independently keeping your own technical know-how up to date. With your customer service brilliance and empathetic nature, you provide Genius advice and technical support every day.Key QualificationsStrong people skills and a knack for problem solving.Ability to maintain composure and customer focus while troubleshooting and solving technical issues.Ability to adhere to a schedule of customer appointments. DescriptionAs an Apple Genius, you provide insightful advice and friendly, hands-on technical support to Apple customers in need. You quickly diagnose product issues on the spot, explaining situations with patience and empathy. After determining whether repairs can be done or a replacement is needed, you offer tech support solutions to quickly get users up and running again. Even if you're juggling more than one customer, you stay conscious of their time demands as well as your own. You fulfill Apple's service commitment with style, speed, and skill. And you earn the trust of customers and coworkers alike as you offer guidance, knowledge, and even tips and training.Additional RequirementsYou have an aptitude for acquiring skills in technical repairs and an eagerness to learn.You have excellent time management skills and can make decisions quickly.Bilingual ability is a plus.You'll need to be flexible with your schedule. Your work hours will be based on business needs. Apple is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer that is committed to inclusion and diversity. We also take affirmative action to offer employment and advancement opportunities to all applicants, including minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.",Genius - Technical Customer Service,Full Time Employee,"Newport Beach, CA 92660",RetailComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/genius-technical-customer-service-newport-beach-ca-job-newport-beach-ca-us-169020282.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,8d715395a089598d6f5ce01035b7ee2c
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:23:21:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Telecom Engineer - III Job #:  663961Apex Systems is looking for a Telecommunications Engineer in Sacramento, CA! This is a 12 month contract position and the salary range varies, depending on experience.Job Description:Uses solid RF Engineering principles and planning tools to maximize coverage, capacity, and performance of GSM and UMTS radio network.Implementation of new features and network parameter optimization.Routine monitoring and review of radio network Key Performance Indicators (KPI).Work with other engineers and operations to address discovered issues.Participation with federal, state and local jurisdictions to insure regulatory and zoning compliance.Provide Engineering Support to Sales / Customers. Evaluates capacity requirements of radio network and works with other departments to meet growth needs.Required Qualifications:An RF Engineer must use creativity and sound judgment to provide the proper design and optimization of the portion of the network assigned to them.An RF Engineer also has flexibility in managing their workflow on a daily basis. They need to use their discretion on how much time to spend on a task based on the priority set by management.An RF Engineer must have the ability to interface with cross-functional team members to gain the support required to accomplish their assignments.Minimum Required Skills / Competencies:Solid understanding of RF propagation principles, cellular theory, RF engineering tools and antenna theory.Experience with various drive test units.Previous experience with FCC and FAA filings and zoning meetings are preferable.Strong written, verbal and interpersonal skills.Strong computer skills.UNIX, Oracle DB, Excel macros and SQL programming a plus.Moderate MapInfo skillsDriving record is within company complianceSelf-motivated and ability to work under pressure.Education and Experience:5 years as a RF Engineer or related positionBS in Engineering, Engineering Technology or equivalent technical degree; or equivalent work experience required If you are interested in this position, please contact Parker Reese at preese@apexsystemsinc.com         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Telecom Engineer - III Job in Sacramento,Full Time Employee,"Sacramento, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/telecom-engineer-iii-job-sacramento-ca-us-169021856.aspx?mescoid=1500133001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d512db2247498db8f9ac79bdfc084dc8
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:23:02:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a SharePoint .NET Developer for their Purchase office in Purchase, NY.Summary:The SharePoint .NET Developer will be responsible for the technical design, development and support of SharePoint 2013 and configuration and support of third party software. The candidate will have technical ownership and support of enterprise Web applications as part of the ECM Application Development Team.REQUIREMENTS: Experience in .NET Framework (C#) Experience in Web Development utilizing ASP.NET Experience with Microsoft SharePoint 2010/2013 development is required, developing custom Web Parts, Event Receivers, Workflows and Features; hands-on experience is needed with building deployment packages along with supporting enterprise production applications/environments Must have strong analytical and problem solving skills Integration with enterprise systems and overall architectural standards knowledge Personal time management skills and ability to meet individual and team deadlines Should have strong documentation skills and understanding of SDLC best practices Excellent communication presentation and organization skills with ability to communicate effectively across multiple IT team disciplines and with business users",SharePoint Developer Job in Purchase,"Full Time, Employee","Purchase, NY 10577",,http://jobview.monster.com/sharepoint-developer-job-purchase-ny-us-168972345.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),adce0b26366684a5088e61e521e5ed8f
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:22:19:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"CTG has an immediate opportunity for a Transition Manager to support our Manhattan, KS client on 4-month W2 contractuaral assignment. The Network Transition Manager will be responsible for the following: Fundamental Discipline : Network Technical Project Management Network Technical Experience - LAN, WAN, Datacenter Networking, Load Balancing, Firewall, Circuits, Base Telecomm in relation to managing projects to install networking environments/datacenters (inclusive of WAN), or Network Migration activities. Client Experience - Ability to review project plans, issues, risks with clients. Ability to generate presentations to demonstrate project status professionally. Familiarity or previous experience with IBM Tools (RPM, BOND, IRM, PADSMRT) and AT&T Networking Processes and offering would be beneficial. Ability to professionally deal with stressful situations and rapidly changing requirements. Must be available to Travel: Varies - During Project Startup or during critical cut overs it can range from 60-100% . Ability to be flexible : support overtime, nights and weekends. CTG is the most reliable IT services provider, built on 50 years of meeting our commitments to make technology work for clients and deliver real business value. CTG provides industry-specific IT strategy, services, and solutions throughout North America and Western Europe that address the business needs and staffing challenges of clients in high-growth markets, such as technology, healthcare and life sciences, financial services, industrials, and telecommunications. CTG's clients include large technology and energy companies, major health systems, and government entities. CTG's greatest asset is our people, and as such we are committed to providing employees programs and processes to support their performance, hone their skills, and advance in their careers. This commitment is reflected by CTG being named a Best Places to Work Company by Modern Healthcare (since 2013) in North America, and a Best Places to Work Company in the United Kingdom (2013), Belgium (since 2007), and Luxembourg (since 2011). CTG is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and strong advocate of workforce diversity. Minority/Female/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Disability/Veteran. If you have the experience we need and are looking for a new, exciting and positively challenging opportunity, please apply today for immediate consideration! Please include availability and W2 compensation requirements when applying.",Transition Manager - Project Management Job in Manhattan,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Manhattan, KS 66502",All,http://jobview.monster.com/transition-manager-project-management-job-manhattan-ks-us-168977821.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=3,,IT/Software Development,a597b57d28f3471f4012d0b4deab67b5
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:22:10:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More SQl DBA Job #:  671859This Microsoft SQL Database Administrator role is responsible for providing operational database services to the organization.  Responsibilities include owning, tracking, and resolving database related incidents and requests, implementation of new instances and databases, working with application teams in support of new and existing solutions, executing and monitoring database backups and restores, performing performance tuning/query optimization, and supporting day to day operations.   This DBA role requires an individual with a service oriented mentality, who is willing to work within a team as well as able to work independently.  Documentation of work as well as maintenance of existing Standards and Procedures is required.   Basic Qualifications:  Associate's degree and a minimum of 4 years work experience as a  Microsoft SQL Server DBA in an enterprise data center environment OR High School Diploma or GED and a minimum of 6 years work experience as a Microsoft SQL Server DBA in an enterprise data center environment.  Additional Requirements:Microsoft database clustering using active/passive methodologySQL Server replication technologies such as log shipping or mirroringSQL Server 2012 Always on TechnologySQL Server 2008 and higher experienceExpertise in performance monitoring and tuning Strong technical abilities, quick study of new technology via on the job training, the intellect to resolve complex problems logically and methodically, and good judgment to involve and communicate with vendors, senior level technicians, and managementAbility to be on call 24x7x365 in a team rotation Excellent verbal and written communication skillsOther Preferred QualificationsExperience with Idera tool suitesCertifications such as A, MCP, MCSE, ITILExperience with CommValut backupScripting experienceBanking/financial services industry experience  If interested, please contact Josh at jhedrick@apexsystemsinc.com      EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More",SQl DBA Job in Raleigh,Full Time Employee,"Raleigh, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sql-dba-job-raleigh-nc-us-168998489.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),04549b34bf755db3273a8b4a4fb92e48
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:21:53:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is searching for a Senior Messaging Engineer in GTN, MDSummary:This position is responsible for designing, supporting and maintaining the Enterprise Messaging infrastructure. Individuals in this position will have a high level of ownership from the design, installation, implementation and ongoing support of all Messaging based systems and applications. Incumbents must be able to maintain, troubleshoot, optimize and provide recovery for all Messaging server based systems.Duties Include: Support the server messaging infrastructure for an Enterprise Office 365 implementation, as well as SMTP gateways Support the Mobile Messaging infrastructure Support the Lync/Skype for Business infrastructure Recommend/design recoverability strategies for all Messaging related servers, software, applications and data Work with software vendors as needed for resolution of hardware/software platform problems in complex, layered, and client/server-based software Tune and validate both Windows servers and application systems, troubleshooting and resolving problems and resolving outages as neededREQUIREMENTS: 7-10 years of Senior level administration experience in an Enterprise environment supporting Exchange 2007/2010, Office 365, Lync, BES and/or Good Mobile is required Skills Required: Support the server messaging infrastructure for an Enterprise Office 365 implementation, as well as SMTP gateways Support the Mobile Messaging infrastructure Support the Lync/Skype for Business infrastructure Recommend/design recoverability strategies for all Messaging related servers, software, applications and data Work with software vendors as needed for resolution of hardware/software platform problems in complex, layered, client/server-based software Tune and validate both Windows servers and application systems, troubleshooting and resolving problems and resolving outages as needed Desired skill set to include, but not limited to: Administration, management, and troubleshooting skills of O365, Lync 2010/2013, Blackberry Enterprise Server, Good Mobile Messaging, Exchange 2007/2010 Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information",Senior Messaging Engineeer Job in Germantown,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Germantown, MD 20874",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-messaging-engineeer-job-germantown-md-us-169020047.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),530a2a289a9df49350e5e02ff27663fe
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:21:52:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION DESCRIPTION #2: Sr. On-site HPC GPFS Subject Matter Expert (SME)    Work Location : On-site, Oak Ridge, Tennessee, USA Additional Comments:Citizenship: Required.Position is to be performed on-siteWork Hours: 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM (Monday – Friday) The GPFS Subject Matter Expert has all the qualifications and requirements of a Sr. HPC Linux System Administrator and will also have extensive expertise in GPFS.  The individual selected for this position will perform all job duties described under Position Description #1 but will primarily: 0.        Assist with I/O performance analysis and I/O optimization on the CORAL GPFS. 0.        Assist with migrating the data from existing Lustre file systems to GPFS. 0.        Advise users on the best use of GPFS. 0.        Work with support and development teams to identify and resolve system issues and software defects. 0.        Allow  priorities to dictate sequencing of tasks requiring GPFS support at any particular time.  Required skills for Position #2:Minimum 15 years of Linux sys admin experience in an HPC / clustered environment or extensive experience as a GPFS developer and/or Level 3 support staff Extensive experience with GPFS in an HPC / clustered environmentBachelors degree in computer related field.Excellent written and verbal communications as well as customer facing skills.Excellent scripting skills.Ability to work independently and as part of a team. Experience with the following Linux HPC Software Stack: Red Hat Enterprise Linux (RHEL)Parallel Environment (PE)Parallel Computing LSFMellanox Unified Fabric Manager (UFM) Work Location (applicable to both positions): On-site, Oak Ridge, Tennessee, USA  Additional Comments (applicable to both positions):Citizenship: Required.Position is to be performed on-siteWork Hours: 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM (Monday – Friday)  Responsibilities:  Work as a part of a larger team and be responsible for duties as assigned.  No overtime premium shall be paid. This SOW is for professional, technical individual(s) and shall be paid at a straight-time rate only.  NO Travel Anticipated. If required, travel will be reimbursed based on actual costs incurred provided costs are in line with Federal Travel Guidelines.  ",Monster,,"POSITION DESCRIPTION #2: Sr. On-site HPC GPFS Subject Matter Expert (SME)    Work Location : On-site, Oak Ridge, Tennessee, USA Additional Comments:Citizenship: Required.Position is to be performed on-siteWork Hours: 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM (Monday – Friday) The GPFS Subject Matter Expert has all the qualifications and requirements of a Sr. HPC Linux System Administrator and will also have extensive expertise in GPFS.  The individual selected for this position will perform all job duties described under Position Description #1 but will primarily: 0.        Assist with I/O performance analysis and I/O optimization on the CORAL GPFS. 0.        Assist with migrating the data from existing Lustre file systems to GPFS. 0.        Advise users on the best use of GPFS. 0.        Work with support and development teams to identify and resolve system issues and software defects. 0.        Allow  priorities to dictate sequencing of tasks requiring GPFS support at any particular time.  Required skills for Position #2:Minimum 15 years of Linux sys admin experience in an HPC / clustered environment or extensive experience as a GPFS developer and/or Level 3 support staff Extensive experience with GPFS in an HPC / clustered environmentBachelors degree in computer related field.Excellent written and verbal communications as well as customer facing skills.Excellent scripting skills.Ability to work independently and as part of a team. Experience with the following Linux HPC Software Stack: Red Hat Enterprise Linux (RHEL)Parallel Environment (PE)Parallel Computing LSFMellanox Unified Fabric Manager (UFM) Work Location (applicable to both positions): On-site, Oak Ridge, Tennessee, USA  Additional Comments (applicable to both positions):Citizenship: Required.Position is to be performed on-siteWork Hours: 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM (Monday – Friday)  Responsibilities:  Work as a part of a larger team and be responsible for duties as assigned.  No overtime premium shall be paid. This SOW is for professional, technical individual(s) and shall be paid at a straight-time rate only.  NO Travel Anticipated. If required, travel will be reimbursed based on actual costs incurred provided costs are in line with Federal Travel Guidelines.  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/hpc-linux-administrator-sme-job-oak-ridge-tn-us-168923842.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=4,,,66abd96f33eac994ea25de33914c081a
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:21:35:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"PL/SQL Developer   Cognizant Technology Solutions (CTSH) is looking for a PL/SQL Developer Specialist. The individual should have extensive experience in PL/SQL Developer     Job Summary –   ·         Over 5+ years  of Oracle PL/SQL and SQL Development experience ·         Outstanding written and verbal communication skills ·         Strong Interpersonal Skills     Job Responsibilities –   ·         Good exposure to Performance Tuning ·         Understanding of Data Modeling concepts ·         Unix Scripting ·         Oracle Business Intelligence Tools (Nice to have) ·         Reporting Tools (Crystal Reports, Oracle Reports, Discoverer and APEX – Nice to have)   Minimum Qualifications –   ·         Bachelor’s Degree ·         Hands on experience on PL/SQL Development     A Snapshot about Us:   Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 75 development and delivery centers worldwide and approximately 187,400 employees as of June 30, 2014, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on Twitter: Cognizant.     Cognizant is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V. Cognizant is committed to ensuring that all current and prospective associates are afforded equal opportunities and treatment and a work environment free of harassment.   Technical Skills SNo Primary Skill Proficiency Level * Rqrd./Dsrd. 1 Ab Initio Conduct>It NA Required 2 Ab Initio BRE NA Required 3 Ab Initio Administration NA Required 4 Ab Initio ACE NA Required 5 AAS NA Required   * Proficiency Legends Proficiency Level Generic Reference PL1 The associate has basic awareness and comprehension of the skill and is in the process of acquiring this skill through various channels. PL2 The associate possesses working knowledge of the skill, and can actively and independently apply this skill in engagements and projects. PL3 The associate has comprehensive, in-depth and specialized knowledge of the skill. She / he has extensively demonstrated successful application of the skill in engagements or projects. PL4 The associate can function as a subject matter expert for this skill. The associate is capable of analyzing, evaluating and synthesizing solutions using the skill.   About Cognizant Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centers worldwide and approximately 233,000 employees as of March 31, 2016, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on Twitter: USJobsCognizant.",Sr. Oracle PL/SQL Developer Job in Birmingham,Full Time Employee,"Birmingham, AL 35213",All,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-oracle-pl-sql-developer-job-birmingham-al-us-168913239.aspx?mescoid=1500142001001&jobPosition=4,,IT/Software Development,938d4c519bd1aac24a2ba8f003b8f1b0
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:21:35:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Product Manager Job #:  664885Product Manager Job PostingWe are seeking for an experience Product Manager to support the implementation of projects within the Self-Service team.A Product Manager in the Self Service team works on projects that impact the Self Service tools in their configuration and performance. The Product Manager works closely with business partners, peer product management teams, development teams, QA, reporting, analytic, and other functions to meet product goals and improve the customer experience of the Self Service tools.   Responsibilities:Develop, maintain and execute against a product roadmapCreate, and drive data-driven decisions leveraging various inputs from stakeholdersDefine product requirements, user stories with prioritized features and corresponding justification and ensure delivery of high quality features on timePartner closely with analytics and content teams to ensure proper measurement instrumentation, monitoring and reporting or product success post launchCommunicate plans and progress to leadership and partner teamsEvangelize the Self-Service products across the organization, drive integration and ensure desired positive impact is achievedJob requirement:Deep connection to who users are, their needs and pain points.Strong communication skills across all levels of the organizationTechnical savvy to work closely with developers, understanding their technical capabilities and constraintsPassion for best-in-class user experiences.Team player: ability to build strategic relationship across organization and levelsAbility to meet tough deadlines, handle a fast paced environment, and have good judgmentAbility to think outside the box and challenge the status quo   ---------  Education: Bachelor or higher Experience: 3-4 years of product management Industries worked in: e-commerce or equivalent  EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Product Manager Job in San Jose,Full Time Employee,"San Jose, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/product-manager-job-san-jose-ca-us-169030381.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9b1975150310f2503d16dbdfb5c571e9
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:21:35:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Dallas, Texas (TX) that is seeking a Back End Java Developer. Responsibilities: Analyze, design, write program code, test, document, and implement functionally appropriately, technically sound, and well-integrated application systems in accordance with Customer requirements, and organizational methodologies and standards Respond to production problems and implement immediate resolution efforts across technology areas Support the organization's project management policy, practice, and methodology Provide timely and accurate progress information to project status reports Analyze and resolve problems of simple to medium complexity Research and recommend alternative actions for problem resolution Employ productivity aids in all aspects of assignments Analyze and design programs for simple to medium complexity business problems according to user specifications and assist in developing detail program specifications Comply with project management methodology requirements as appropriateREQUIREMENTS: Candidates qualifying for this position will have similar experience along with the skills and abilities to perform the duties mentioned Any relevant education and / or training will be considered a plus",Back End Java Developer Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Dallas, TX 75235",,http://jobview.monster.com/back-end-java-developer-job-dallas-tx-us-168921312.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0b258645996e50ff2463d3e8848ed0b1
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:21:05:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Senior Technical AnalystLocation: Augusta, Maine (must be onsite 100%)START DATE: ASAP LENGTH OF CONTRACT: 3 months The existing application is no longer meeting the business needs of the client. This effort will focus on the need to do a business requirements analysis, a technical health check, documentation review and technical solution proposals. JOB DESCRIPTION: This position will be critical in the technical analysis of an existing financial application and the technical solution for modernizing and/or replacing the application. REQUIREMENTS: SQL (T/PL); AdvancedSSRS; AdvancedSSAS; AdvancedSSIS; Advanced MDX; AdvancedWeb Forms; AdvancedThe Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company will consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religious creed, citizenship, national origin, ancestry, age, sex, sexual orientation, genetic information, physical or mental disability, veteran or marital status, or any other class protected by law. To comply with applicable laws ensuring equal employment opportunities to qualified individuals with a disability, the Company will make reasonable accommodations for the known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified individual with a disability who is an applicant or an employee unless undue hardship to the Company would result.",Sr Technical Analyst - MS ETL Job in Augusta  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Job Title: Senior Technical AnalystLocation: Augusta, Maine (must be onsite 100%)START DATE: ASAP LENGTH OF CONTRACT: 3 months The existing application is no longer meeting the business needs of the client. This effort will focus on the need to do a business requirements analysis, a technical health check, documentation review and technical solution proposals. JOB DESCRIPTION: This position will be critical in the technical analysis of an existing financial application and the technical solution for modernizing and/or replacing the application. REQUIREMENTS: SQL (T/PL); AdvancedSSRS; AdvancedSSAS; AdvancedSSIS; Advanced MDX; AdvancedWeb Forms; AdvancedThe Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company will consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religious creed, citizenship, national origin, ancestry, age, sex, sexual orientation, genetic information, physical or mental disability, veteran or marital status, or any other class protected by law. To comply with applicable laws ensuring equal employment opportunities to qualified individuals with a disability, the Company will make reasonable accommodations for the known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified individual with a disability who is an applicant or an employee unless undue hardship to the Company would result.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-technical-analyst-ms-etl-job-augusta-me-us-168958989.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,70d3f8e575091b8388ed6ae04f842b28
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:21:04:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Job Description:Collaborates with project team members, stakeholders, customers, and sponsors to identify and monitor budget, goals, scope, project plan, issues, risks, and milestones; establishes measures to determine success of projects (e.g., costs, scope, time, intended results).Manages project team activities; analyzes complex business problems to provide appropriate solutions; implements solutions that leverage technology to accomplish stated strategic business objectives.Experience in project managing to critical path on a multi-track project that includes separate teams working to a common goal.Demonstratea action-oriented leadership when faced with a project roadblockExcellent written and oral communication skills and interpersonal skills required to be successfulStrong analytical abilities (e.g., problem solving, mathematical, conceptual and research skills) that translate detail-oriented analyses into recommendations that address big-picture issues.Minimum Requirements:Bachelor's degree with an emphasis in MIS, Information Technology, Computer Science, or 8+ years of related experience; Master's degree is a plus.PMI PMP and ACP certification desirableDemonstrated experience with SAP ASAP MethodologiesDemonstrated understanding of agile software development (SAFe), software process improvement efforts; experience working on IT projects with multi-national team members preferred.Experience as an Agile Coach, Scrum Master will be key.Job ID 54311#LI-POST1Alternate Location: US-Louisiana-MonroeRequisition #: 54311 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Lead Technical Project Manager Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-technical-project-manager-job-monroe-la-us-168951163.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,,cf2dcb51024f8796b358c39a98aaf4bc
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:20:56:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Citrix Engineer Job #:  664788Apex Systems is the 2nd largest IT staffing firm in the U.S. and we are looking for a Citrix Engineer in San Antonio, TX. The qualified candidate will have 4 years of technical hands on experience with data center/infrastructure equipment/applications at an enterprise level. All qualified candidates are eligible for competitive weekly pay, benefits, and a 401K plan!!**If interested in this opportunity please send an updated resume to Amber at ayoung@apexsystemsinc.com!**Title: Citrix Engineer Location: San Antonio, TX Duration: Contract to Hire Pay: Based upon experience Job Summary:Provides technical direction within team and across the department. Assists peers and mentors junior team members through the application and sharing of technical knowledge, guidance and direction. Synthesizes, analyses, identifies root causes, and develops and recommends key work products. Assembles key participants and guides and facilitates teams in the development and implementation of key initiatives. Provides insight to management on issues. Delivers technical solutions for operating and hosting systems. May lead complex evaluation, development, implementation, integration and administration of internal and external business solutions that meet customer needs.Minimum RequirementsBachelor's degree from an accredited university OR equivalent relevant work experience.4 years of technical hands on experience with data center / infrastructure equipment/applications at an enterprise level.2 years of experience with layer 2/3 networking concepts, active directory, DNS, DHCP, web servers (IIS, Apache), performance tuning, and advanced systems trouble shooting skills with converged infrastructure.PreferredExperience with Citrix XenDesktop, XenApp, and NetScaler configuration.Experience with powershell and powercli, or any other scripting/automation language.Advanced technical certifications including knowledge of virtualization, networking, storage, and computer platforms such as MCSE, VCP, CCNA, find Citrix.Strong knowledge of systems administration and/or systems programming skills.Strong working knowledge of windows server operating system, virtualization technologies such as ESX, enterprise storage systems, enterprise blade hardware, and desktop OS internals.Experience with large project rollouts at an enterprise level.Ability to think and operate as a team player: strong interpersonal skills, gets along well with others.Strong analytical & problem solving skills: able to multi-task, can manage and prioritize several projects to meet deadlines.Strong project leadership skills and ability to develop strong working relationships with customer technical personnel.Flexible, able to work nights/weekends.                EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Citrix Engineer Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Citrix Engineer Job #:  664788Apex Systems is the 2nd largest IT staffing firm in the U.S. and we are looking for a Citrix Engineer in San Antonio, TX. The qualified candidate will have 4 years of technical hands on experience with data center/infrastructure equipment/applications at an enterprise level. All qualified candidates are eligible for competitive weekly pay, benefits, and a 401K plan!!**If interested in this opportunity please send an updated resume to Amber at ayoung@apexsystemsinc.com!**Title: Citrix Engineer Location: San Antonio, TX Duration: Contract to Hire Pay: Based upon experience Job Summary:Provides technical direction within team and across the department. Assists peers and mentors junior team members through the application and sharing of technical knowledge, guidance and direction. Synthesizes, analyses, identifies root causes, and develops and recommends key work products. Assembles key participants and guides and facilitates teams in the development and implementation of key initiatives. Provides insight to management on issues. Delivers technical solutions for operating and hosting systems. May lead complex evaluation, development, implementation, integration and administration of internal and external business solutions that meet customer needs.Minimum RequirementsBachelor's degree from an accredited university OR equivalent relevant work experience.4 years of technical hands on experience with data center / infrastructure equipment/applications at an enterprise level.2 years of experience with layer 2/3 networking concepts, active directory, DNS, DHCP, web servers (IIS, Apache), performance tuning, and advanced systems trouble shooting skills with converged infrastructure.PreferredExperience with Citrix XenDesktop, XenApp, and NetScaler configuration.Experience with powershell and powercli, or any other scripting/automation language.Advanced technical certifications including knowledge of virtualization, networking, storage, and computer platforms such as MCSE, VCP, CCNA, find Citrix.Strong knowledge of systems administration and/or systems programming skills.Strong working knowledge of windows server operating system, virtualization technologies such as ESX, enterprise storage systems, enterprise blade hardware, and desktop OS internals.Experience with large project rollouts at an enterprise level.Ability to think and operate as a team player: strong interpersonal skills, gets along well with others.Strong analytical & problem solving skills: able to multi-task, can manage and prioritize several projects to meet deadlines.Strong project leadership skills and ability to develop strong working relationships with customer technical personnel.Flexible, able to work nights/weekends.                EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/citrix-engineer-job-san-antonio-tx-us-168998646.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bb1cf8c55e4851e883650e2bcc5c2c9d
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:20:26:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad is seeking experienced Information Security professionals for several Bank Technical Analyst positions with a Fortune 50 company headquartered in Central Illinois. The positions will be on the Bank's Information Security Governance and Reporting team and requires a mix of Information Security understanding with Governance & Reporting, relationship building, project management and a high level of written communication skill.Responsibilities:* Conducts information security program, policy and oversight reviews * Coordinates security related activities* Develops and provides training on various security topics * Demonstrates depth or breadth of knowledge regarding Bank Information Security structure, IT processes and best practices to complete assignments and influence the direction of program governance * Exercises effective communication, initiative and judgment to complete moderately complex Information Security efforts, as well as providing recommendations to others* Maintains solid relationship and strategic partnering skills with business partners, team members, and external associates* Applies expertise and promotes use of IT tools and processes for department, or project workWorking hours: 8:00am - 4:15pmSkills:Qualifications:* 5+ years of Information Security experience with specific experience working on Information Security Governance and Reporting* Excellent relationship building, communication and teamwork skills * Solid analytical skills, attention to detail and ability to work across operational and business areas* Ability to multi-task, effectively organize workload, adapt to changing priorities, and handle a fluctuating workload while providing a high level of service* Willingness to work independently, assume additional responsibilities and effectively manage efforts within changing development processes* Positive attitude with excellent written and verbal communication skillsRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",BANK TECHNICAL ANALYST Job in Bloomington,Full Time Employee,"Bloomington, IL 61704",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/bank-technical-analyst-job-bloomington-il-us-168918751.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=10,"90,000.00 - 107,000.00 $ /year",,8666bc7f57f892a7e7e8a20a5508a088
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:20:25:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"This role will play a key part in helping the BCUS Desktop Operations team manage and maintain the BCUS desktop environment.Responsibilities to include:High priority Incident diagnosisTroubleshoot hardware and software issues for WindowsInstall software using System Center Configuration Manager (SCCM) / Manual installationModify Active Directory user accountsTroubleshoot SCCM agent issuesTroubleshoot WMI issues on Windows XP, Windows 7No direct reports in this positionKey relationships with MS Server, MS Engineering and Networking teams as well as internal desktop usersMust Have Skills:5+ years’ experience as an MS Automation and SCCM Engineer to include:Experience troubleshooting Windows hardware and software issuesExperience installing software using System Center Configuration Manager (SCCM) / Manual installationKnowledge and experience using Active DirectoryExperience troubleshooting SCCM agent issuesExperience troubleshooting WMI issues on Windows XP, Windows 7Professional Skills:Strong verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work with only light to moderate supervision is requiredEmtec is an Equal Opportunity Employer US citizens and those authorized to work in the US are encouraged to apply",MS Automation and SCCM Engineer Job in Wilmington,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Wilmington, DE 19805",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ms-automation-sccm-engineer-job-wilmington-de-us-168957219.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,fab395a191e153f8df500d135c74821f
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:20:18:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More SAN Analyst Job #:  663604CANDIDATE TECHNICAL BACKGROUND: -- Storage Area Network (SAN) or related experience. -- Hands-on skills with IBM storage arrays and respective storage management systems. (Required) -- Hands-on skills AND experience with Cisco fabric switches. (Required) -- Experience in enterprise-class data centers is preferred. (Highly Desired)DAILY JOB RESPONSIBILITIES: -- Operational responsibilities for storage area network (SAN) storage arrays and switch fabric -- Provide technical leadership to team members -- Assist with capacity management -- Review performance metrics and make recommendations for improvement -- Perform maintenance activitiesSYSTEM(S) THE CONTRACTOR WILL INTERACT WITH/BE RESPONSIBLE FOR: Storage arrays and storage management systems from EMC, Hitachi, and IBM. SAN fabric switches from Cisco with some Brocade.PRIMARY WORKING RELATIONSHIP(S) INSIDE AND OUTSIDE THE ORGANIZATION: Some customer interaction required (high-profile contracts/customers); some senior management (VP level) interaction required.WORKING HOURS/CONDITIONS: Regular M-F work week; typical 45 hour weeks; occasional weekend work; rotating on-call responsibilitiesTEAM SIZE: SAN team is currently 3 team members, plus team lead and manager; Dept also has additional staffing for VMware and Windows Technologies Total dept size is 12.JOB DESCRIPTION: Support run operations of SAN technologies. Troubleshoot break/fix issues and respond to service requests on these technologies. Perform analysis related to noted technologies as it relates to processes and procedures. Participate in Disaster recovery. Configure and maintain SAN systems with advanced troubleshooting experience and skills. Monitor SAN performance. Monitor use of shared systems for capacity and utilization. Train less experienced personnel in monitoring and maintaining SAN systems. Troubleshoot advanced problems and streamline problem resolution procedures. 25% Responsible for storage area network (SAN) planning, architecture design and engineering.Determines feasibility from technical and economic perspectives. Evaluates equipment specifications and process requirements to conceive a practical design Compiles and analyzes operational data and directs tests to establish standard for new designs or modifications to existing equipment, systems, or processes. 25% Plans and evaluates complex SAN systems and makes recommendations for resources required to develop, maintain and/or expand service levels. Provides consultative support to facilitate design and to resolve design problems. May also monitor SAN performance to determine whether adjustments need to be made, and to determine where changes will need to be made in the future. 20% Administers use, capacity and performance of SAN systems. Focuses on multiple aspects of SAN operations across multiple platforms. Works with end users and vendors to resolve server issues. Upgrades and configures SAN devices from multiple vendors. 20% Maintains effective relationships with customers to ensure appropriate levels of support. Schedules, plans, and performs system health checks across environments20% Confers with users to resolve problems affecting server performance. Validates and adjusts server configuration as needed. Generates SAN utilization/trending/error reports as requested. Observes and controls the status and performance of all components of SAN/system facilities. 20% Maintains control of SAN devices. Control access to, and authorization level of devices. Maintains effective security/backup and disaster recovery processes and systems. Performs data backups and disaster recovery operations as needed. 5% Address vulnerabilities within audit-mandated time frames. Ensure server compliance with audit requirements. Participates in continuous review and remediation to ensure that processes meet changing business unit conditions. 10% Creates and maintains process and procedure documentation. Provides feedback on commonly encountered problems and misunderstandings to enhance user documentation and/or training programs etc. Works with others to establish and improve processes and procedures. 5% Updates knowledge and skills to keep up with rapid advancements in server administration technology         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",SAN Analyst Job in Richland,Full Time Employee,"Richland, SC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/san-analyst-job-richland-sc-us-168999114.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7d691e4149f855c6de107eb9b6f047e5
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:19:45:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Role: SmartSource is in immediate need for 20 Project Coordinators for a 6-12+ month opportunity located in the following locations by order of preference Chicago IL Addison IL, Mt Prospect IL Tampa FL Plano TX Tempe AZ The estimated start date ranges between June 11th and June 25th. Any location will work but ideally the preference by the order above are listed above. The essential jobs functions are as follows: Assist Project Manager(s) with the adherence and documentation of process and procedures. Act as liaison and/or interface to different business units. Assist Project Manager(s) with billing. Act as client interface as needed. Create and organize weekly resource install packets. Create and update Meeting Minutes and Issues Log; as needed. Maintain project files and Workbook. Review and monitor project schedules. Update and maintain Metric/SLA report. Must have the ability to multi-task and prioritize work. Prepare daily, weekly, and monthly reports from Excel for client and Insight. Act as liaison and/or interface to different business units. Other duties as assigned. SCHEDULE: primarily office hours, but field work on the deployment is overnight (when planes aren't flying) so some off-hours availability for calls may be needed. In addition, we are supporting by region, so their hours will have to be flexible to accommodate different time zones. We are setting this up to support a BYOD environment. We need to know which candidates have a laptop that they can use for the purpose of this assignment. We will enable a virtual desktop to connect to Insight through Citrix for the users. These roles are not as much technical roles, but more-so white glove, high touch customer service roles for user support and experience. Job description is attached. WORK PERFORMED This individual will the main point of contact for assigned stations, in addition this individual will be responsible for the initial kickoff meeting, handling any individual station concerns as to the progress of the project, fielding out of scope requests from the assigned stations and facilitating and tracking these requests back into support services for resolution and closure. Qualifications: Must pass a drug and criminal background check before starting ·Education and/or Experience: High school diploma or general education degree (GED) combined with at least 1 year of proven project coordination activities; or Bachelor's degree (B. A.) from a four-year college or university; or one to two years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Must have the ability to multitask and manage coordinate complex client facing engagements concurrently while maintaining client service levels and timelines. Good interpersonal skills with the ability to resolve issues and resource contentions, while working with large groups across multiple locations. Must possess and demonstrate excellent communication skills, both oral and written. Must be proficient in MS Excel formula creation and use to handle a major scheduling project financial reporting and candidate tracking. Must be proficient in the use of Microsoft Office tools, including Excel, Powerpoint and Project. Ability to read, analyze, and interpret the most complex documents required. Ability to respond effectively to the most sensitive inquiries or complaints a must. Must have excellent communication and customer service skills.Years of Experience Required:",Project Coordinators Job in Tampa,"Full Time, Employee","Tampa, FL 33601",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/project-coordinators-job-tampa-fl-us-168928397.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,22.00+ /hour,IT/Software Development,418f2b0084a9c1fbcde9ae89b678cb8d
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:19:39:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More IT - Project Manager Job #:  671001Project Manager - United Health GroupIf interested - Please email resumes to ejohannsen@apexsystemsinc.com  Description: What Project/Projects will the candidate be working on while on assignment? Network Refresh, Data Center Upgrades,Is this person a sole contributor or part of a team? Part of a TeamIf so, please describe the team? (Name of team, size of team, etc.) 2-12What are the top 5-10 responsibilities for this position? Daily Scrum Meeting, Update entries in CA Rally, host webex calls, work with multiple teams as a Project managerWhat software tools/skills are needed to perform these daily responsibilities? Excel, CA Rally, Scrum, Word, SharePoint, MS Office,        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More",IT - Project Manager Job in Plymouth,Full Time Employee,"Plymouth, MN",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/it-project-manager-job-plymouth-mn-us-168932942.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),899969296282e8dd34b72eaa507f8177
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:19:23:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Data Analyst II Job #:  672687Engagement Type: NoShort Description: Data Analyst II C2 Clearance: Candidate(s) submitted must be able to obtain a C2 clearance. Please make sure candidate(s) understand how in-depth the C2 process will be prior to submission so they understand the expectations.CANDIDATE TECHNICAL BACKGROUND: -- Research and Analysis Experience (Required, 2 years) -- Experience with Root Cause Analysis Facilitation Note: Root Cause Analysis Facilitation experience is KEY for this position. Candidate needs to be able to understand technical terminology, have strong analytical skills, and be able to actively ask intelligent questions in order to get to the root cause of 'why' an issue occurred, etc.Strong analytical thinking is a MUST for this role. -- Data Analysis Experience -- Experience communicating with Upper Management -- Experience with Microsoft Access -- Experience with Microsoft Excel Note:Candidate MUST be very proficient with Excel. Candidate(s) need to have experience manipulating data, experience with pivot tables, SUMIFs, etc) -- Experience with Microsoft Word -- Experience with Microsoft PowerPoint -- Experience with Process Improvement Techniques (Nice To Have) -- Experience with Information Technology Terminology -- Experience with Standard Hardware and Application familiarity -- Excellent Written Communication -- Strong Statistical Background -- Knowledge of ITIL (Nice To Have) -- Microsoft Visio (Nice To Have) -- Experience with SQL or DB2 (Nice To Have)DAILY JOB RESPONSIBILITIES: -- Will serve on the Problem Management team apart of the strategic ITIL initiative. -- Daily data analysis and communication with System Managers on potential problems their systems may be experiencing. -- Identify problems with BlueCross BlueShield Applications or Hardware and facilitate the problem-resolution with system owners to reduce or eliminate the problems. -- Coordinate and join meeting-to-gather analytical data for root-cause and problem resolution and then compile into a cohesive document. -- Update access database and create and manipulate reports in access.SYSTEM(S) THE CONTRACTOR WILL INTERACT WITH/BE RESPONSIBLE FOR: Access Database, Excel Reports,INFO PRIMARY WORKING RELATIONSHIP(S) INSIDE AND OUTSIDE THE ORGANIZATION: Managers and Senior Management. Candidates much have strong verbal communication and presentation skills.WORKING HOURS/CONDITIONS: -- 8:00 AM EST - 5:00 PM EST / Cubicle.-- MUST Able to work MANDATORY overtime, as needed. Please note though, that any overtime worked must be approved by the manager.TEAM SIZE: 4JOB DESCRIPTION: 40% -- Reviews, extracts and analyzes data to be used in formulation of procedures, processes and other requirements. Provides reports of relevant activity to be used to identify problematic areas and to provide basis for modification and/or elimination of operations issues.30% Coordinates and joins meetings to gather analytical data for root-cause analysis and problem resolution and then compile into a cohesive documents and update access database with data.20% -- Assists with development of complex analysis and sophisticated data compilation, verification, and interpretations to guide divisional efforts. Performs focused analyses as needed. Creates data search programs to identify pertinent data needed to provide supporting documentation for system or operational enhancements/changes.10% -- Documents reporting procedures so other staff can run ad hoc reports independently. Designs, codes, and maintains complex database programs for the extraction and analysis of data to support financial and operational decisions. Performs other duties as assigned         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Data Analyst II Job in Richland,Full Time Employee,"Richland, SC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/data-analyst-ii-job-richland-sc-us-168998771.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),08ae44d10a34366c0ff9133de7283948
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:19:21:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Software Architect - Relocation to St. Louis provided! Job in Oklahoma City 73101, Oklahoma US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Software Architect Apply Oklahoma City, OK Full-Time $90,000 - $130,000 Job Details If you are a .NET Software Architect with experience, please read on!Title: Software ArchitectSalary Range: $90K - $130KLocation: Relocation to St. Louis provided!We are a top tier consulting firm with a 30 year proven track record of success and over 1,000 employees in 7 cities nationwide. You will be developing solutions for unpredictable and varied problems for multiple clients across different industries. We want you to be well-rounded in a broad range of languages with the ability to adapt to new clients and learn as you go.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Work with a variety of clients on a wide range of projects- Zero to extreme minimal turnover - our consultants stick around for the long haul- Interesting/challenging workWhat You Will Be Doing- Design software solutions to meet client’s various business and technical needs- Manage a team of developers and analysts throughout the entire project lifecycle- Analyze application specifications and technology approach to ensure business requirements are met and are scalable for future product releases- Investigate future oriented products and take ownership of driving resolution and making proposals that may include reusable components- Work with Business Analysts and Management to recommend future application solutions- Produce conceptual design documents and detailed specifications for large-scale and complex projects to reinforce our technical product and architectural standards- Collaborate with Business Analyst team members to diagnose and resolve complex defects identified throughout testing phasesWhat You Need for this PositionCollege experience and knowledge of:- .NET- VB.NET or C#- WCF- WinForms- Oracle, DB2, or SQL Server- RUP- Agile- NHibernate or Entity- Spring.NET or StructureMap- SharePoint- JavaScript- Ajax- CVS- Ant or MavenNice to haves:- SilverlightWhat's In It for You- Relocation to Saint Louis, MO- Extremely comprehensive benefits package- Competitive salary commensurate of experienceSo, if you are a .NET Software Architect with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Emma Goulden is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: EG1-1296253 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Emma.Goulden@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: EG1-1296253 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Emma Goulden | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",Software Architect,,"Software Architect - Relocation to St. Louis provided! Job in Oklahoma City 73101, Oklahoma US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Software Architect Apply Oklahoma City, OK Full-Time $90,000 - $130,000 Job Details If you are a .NET Software Architect with experience, please read on!Title: Software ArchitectSalary Range: $90K - $130KLocation: Relocation to St. Louis provided!We are a top tier consulting firm with a 30 year proven track record of success and over 1,000 employees in 7 cities nationwide. You will be developing solutions for unpredictable and varied problems for multiple clients across different industries. We want you to be well-rounded in a broad range of languages with the ability to adapt to new clients and learn as you go.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Work with a variety of clients on a wide range of projects- Zero to extreme minimal turnover - our consultants stick around for the long haul- Interesting/challenging workWhat You Will Be Doing- Design software solutions to meet client’s various business and technical needs- Manage a team of developers and analysts throughout the entire project lifecycle- Analyze application specifications and technology approach to ensure business requirements are met and are scalable for future product releases- Investigate future oriented products and take ownership of driving resolution and making proposals that may include reusable components- Work with Business Analysts and Management to recommend future application solutions- Produce conceptual design documents and detailed specifications for large-scale and complex projects to reinforce our technical product and architectural standards- Collaborate with Business Analyst team members to diagnose and resolve complex defects identified throughout testing phasesWhat You Need for this PositionCollege experience and knowledge of:- .NET- VB.NET or C#- WCF- WinForms- Oracle, DB2, or SQL Server- RUP- Agile- NHibernate or Entity- Spring.NET or StructureMap- SharePoint- JavaScript- Ajax- CVS- Ant or MavenNice to haves:- SilverlightWhat's In It for You- Relocation to Saint Louis, MO- Extremely comprehensive benefits package- Competitive salary commensurate of experienceSo, if you are a .NET Software Architect with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Emma Goulden is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: EG1-1296253 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Emma.Goulden@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: EG1-1296253 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Emma Goulden | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/software-architect-relocation-to-st-louis-provided!-job-oklahoma-city-ok-us-168993132.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=10,,,06efe0315f9f04279dea34c56f801015
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:53:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Good experience with System/Integration and End-to-End testing, See below for more details.Key Responsibilities:Performs principal consultant duties on the Workday product suite, specializing and leading integration work for a particular functional area such as HCM, Benefits, Compensation, Payroll, Talent, or Absence Management. Provides estimates on effort, defining requirements, designing and developing the solution using the Workday Integration Tool Kit - Core Connectors, EIBs, Document Transforms, and Workday Studio. Provides guidance and training to client BAs and Developers on Workday Integration tools. Shares knowledge and information through regular communications and facilitation. Ability to work at his/her own direction and balance competing priorities and customer needs. Completes his or her own assignments on time and with quality and suggests opportunities for quality and process improvements. Debugs and triages integration issues and defects. Implements and tests fixes where necessary. Manages interface schedules to client SLAs. Defines client interface calendar and inventory, monitors integrations to completion, establishes and supports file transmission automation and supporting documentation. Supports the team through test execution, issue triage and knowledge transfer activities. Clearly and succinctly documents communications to customers using issue management system. Replicates and verifies customer problems to identify potential solutions. Collaborates with team members to research, identify and validate issue resolutions. Effectively prioritizes customer issues as required. Supports client and client teams in creating complex reports and resolving issues with existing reports. Maintains integration related requirements and technical documentation. Understands business requirements, configures the solution, develops prototype systems and assists with testing. Understands the importance of testing, and executes it thoroughly. Ability to work effectively with business and technology management and staff.Excellent analytical, problem solving, and multi-tasking skills. Ability to work independently and perform against tight deadlines and multi-task effectively. Strong self-motivation balanced with a desire to achieve team goals. Working knowledge of object-oriented and relational model concepts. Provides “outside the box” thinking and creative solutions for uncommon issues and new or soon-to-be-released Workday enhancements. Experience with web service integrations (SOAP, WSDL, XML). Working knowledge of XSLT. Working knowledge of XSLT editors, such as Oxygen. Working knowledge of PM tools such as Smartsheets / MS Project and MS Excel. Experience with iterative or agile software development methodologies.",Workday Integration Job in Sunnyvale,Full Time,"Sunnyvale, CA 94089",,http://jobview.monster.com/workday-integration-job-sunnyvale-ca-us-168928314.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c3169c957ed4493eefdd3d95cbd86b17
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:53:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Oracle DBADuration: Long TermLocation: Middletown, NJRequired Skills:·     3+ years of experience with Oracle database administration ·         Experience with the application of database backup/recovery architectures and procedures ·         Ability to troubleshoot environment issues ·         Strong experience with Unix shell commands ·         Motivated technical troubleshooter - independently digging into technical issues with strong analytical and problem-solving skills ·         Experience with RMAN backup and recovery as well as export/import ·         Experience with DB utilities such as exp, imp, sql loader, expdp, impdp, etc. ·         Exposure to database monitoring and tuning tools·         Team player with good communication and documentation skills ·         Excellent Communication Skills ",Monster,,"Position: Oracle DBADuration: Long TermLocation: Middletown, NJRequired Skills:·     3+ years of experience with Oracle database administration ·         Experience with the application of database backup/recovery architectures and procedures ·         Ability to troubleshoot environment issues ·         Strong experience with Unix shell commands ·         Motivated technical troubleshooter - independently digging into technical issues with strong analytical and problem-solving skills ·         Experience with RMAN backup and recovery as well as export/import ·         Experience with DB utilities such as exp, imp, sql loader, expdp, impdp, etc. ·         Exposure to database monitoring and tuning tools·         Team player with good communication and documentation skills ·         Excellent Communication Skills ",,http://jobview.monster.com/oracle-dba-job-middletown-nj-us-168969114.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=10,,,d67a9208ab4161dfcd2f157b55cab496
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:53:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania (PA) that is seeking a Scrum Master Project Manager.Responsibilities: Leads dedicated teams to deliver business functionality through development and quality assurance execution provided by subject matter experts on their teams Works with Product Managers to ensure timely delivery of prioritized requests Act as Scrum master for a dedicated scrum teams with a focus on guiding the teams towards improving the way they work Facilitate sprint planning, retrospective and sprint demos Assist the product owner with keeping the backlog groomed Maintain relevant metrics that help the team see how they are doing Coach and mentor other scrum masters in our product team; ensure that their ways of working are consistent across the teams Perform Project Management like responsibilities: produce status reports, facilitate meetings, manage dependencies between teams, and manage riskREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree - B.S. Computer Science, Engineering or related field Master's degree a plus 8 - 10 years of experience PMP certification (Project Management Institute, Project Management Professional) Knowledge and experience with the following is a plus: Guidewire, Amazon Web Services, Rally and Daptiv Understand basic fundamentals of iterative development Understand basic fundamentals of software development processes and procedures Understand the value of commitments to delivery made by a development team Understand incremental delivery and the value of metrics Understand backlog tracking, burndown metrics, velocity, and task definition Familiarity with common Agile practices, service-oriented environments, and better development practices Strong knowledge of Project Management fundamentals as defined by the Project Management Institute in the Project Management Body of Knowledge",Scrum Master Project Manager Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Philadelphia, PA 19103",,http://jobview.monster.com/scrum-master-project-manager-job-philadelphia-pa-us-168916947.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=20,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b9bc447647813cfa2822734ea0cdfe29
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:37:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Information Systems Security Officer (ISSO) will support the EOUSA (Executive Office for United States Attorneys) Telecommunications and Technology Development Staff (TTD) in ensuring the implementation of systems-level security controls and to maintain and to write system documentation. The responsibilities of the ISSO will be as follows: • Assist in the development and maintenance of system security plans and contingency plans for all systems under their responsibility. • Assist in the determination of an appropriate level of security commensurate with the impact level • Conduct risk assessments to periodically re-evaluate sensitivity of the system, risks, and mitigation strategies. • Participate in self-assessment of system safeguards and program elements and in certification and accreditation of the system; The ideal candidate will also have a clear understanding of Data Center technologies and operations with the ability to supervise the current operations, transition operations, and ultimately the final completion of equipment & services transfer in support of the organization’s Data Center Transformation Initiative (DCTI). The bulleted listed below are elements of an individual whom may successfully manage a Data Center move: • Project management - the transition manager must have some level of project / data center team management to address the base requirements along with the timeline. PMP is a nice to have, but not required. The task is more technical than straight management (Evaluate, Plan, direct, and manage the transition activities)• Data Center Management - small to large experience commemorates in the ability to address clear lines of demarcation. Power, space and cooling; addressing the way forward of concurrent operations and the ability to upgrade, reduce footprints and ultimately reduce cost in the transfer is ideal. The individual who can work through the base elements while addressing technology upgrades for increased efficiencies and utilization.• Diverse understanding of technology capabilities. Aspects would include systems administration of multiple platforms (Windows, Linux, Data Base Systems, Hypervisors (VMware, Citrix, Hyper-V)), systems development - (development, test, production - DevOps) - similarity to the requirements of discovery of current systems and all the hidden operations/services, ability to construct hot/warm/cold transition with test and ultimately production certification of transitioned equipment and services Must be able to obtain Public Trust",Information Systems Security Officer (Government) Job in Washington,,"Washington, DC",,http://jobview.monster.com/information-systems-security-officer-government-job-washington-dc-us-168905636.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=7,,,6067061da2b45fc176d92d31196cd4a8
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:31:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Netelligent is currently looking for a motivated Part Time Service Desk Technician ready to take his/her experience to a dynamic and challenging organization.  Netelligent is thriving and we are on a quest for the best talent!  Are you longing for an opportunity where your potential is boundless?  Come join one of the top companies to work for in St. Louis and help our mission to elevate business above technology. Our people are the best in their field! We are the wellspring for your incredible talent and we want you to excel. Netelligent has attracted and retained some of the industry’s most talented people!  Why?  We offer extremely competitive compensation, flexible work schedules and a DYNAMIC environment. So, if you are looking for a career changing opportunity, we want to meet you!  Do you have the Right Skills and Experience for Our Team?  The Part-Time Service Desk Technicianacts as a liaison between our company and its current customers in the Operations Center.  The Service Desk Technician’s main responsibility, as the customers’ first point of contact, is to accurately triage all incoming service request via telephone, email and ConnectWise.   What Skills Do you Need to Thrive at Netelligent? ·      2 years direct Customer Service experience·      Basic understanding of the following core technologies: Servers, Networking, Voice and Security·      Proficient in Microsoft Office products including, but not limited to Word, Excel, and Outlook·      The ability to consistently achieve high levels of customer satisfaction. ·      Ability to work in a high-pressure, 24x7, dynamic environment and adjust to priority changes is required.·      Commitment to quality and the motivation and ability to work well in a team environment.·      Excellent verbal, written and analytical skills ·      Excellent phone and written communication skills   ·      Accurately type minimum of 50 wpm.·      Ability to multi-task while following established guidelines, policies and procedures.·      Quickly adjust to priority changes or work assignments without sacrificing quality.·      Demonstrate a sustained commitment to quality, professionalism, and integrity.·      Support rotational duties and be willing to work nights and weekend.·      The ability to keep technical, communications, and business skills current with an emphasis on understanding emerging technologies and their impact on Netelligent customers and their business.                          What Will Your Responsibilities Be? In the Service Desk Technician role, you will:  ·      Act as first line of contact for all customers·      Answer the dedicated phone line, accurately document issues, and create tickets based on customer requests. ·      Interface directly with customer(s) to identify their needs, clarify information and route calls accordingly to the appropriate Technical Support Engineer.·      Monitor inbox and ticket queue and respond to customer requests, phone calls, emails, ConnectWise alerts and other scheduled activities within the SLA requirements. ·      Manage large amounts of inbound emails and calls in a timely manner.·      Create and update trouble tickets using corporate ticketing system(s).·      Maintain accurate case documentation.·      Open carrier tickets on an as needed basis for customers.·      Maintains database by updating customer information consistently.·      Performs other duties as assigned and required.  Duties and responsibilities may change from time to time without notice and include but are not limited to the duties described above.  How Do We Back Our Strong Reputation? ·         Netelligent has been named one of the 50 Best Places to Work in St. Louis by the St. Louis Post-Dispatch, and ranked as one of the 25 Fastest Growing Privately-Owned Companies in St. Louis by the St. Louis Business Journal. If you thrive in an environment of growth and individual impact, Netelligent is the place for you! ·         Founded in 2003, Netelligent offers a full portfolio of professional, managed and cloud services. Netelligent’s vision is to let our customers focus on their core business by outsourcing IT services like voice, video, virtualization, and storage to us. We take a neutral approach in helping to determine what model of IT consumption best benefits each client organization (on premise, managed, or cloud). Our unparalleled approach to customer service was recently recognized with SBM Magazine’s 2014 Best Customer Service Award. ·         Additional recent awards and recognition include Inc. 5000 Fastest Growing Private Companies list in 2012, 2013 and 2014; CRN Technology Elite 250 list for 2011, 2012, 2013 and 2014; CRN’s Solution Provider 500 list for 2012, 2013 and 2014; CRN and the Channel Company’s CRN MSP 500 list for 2014; and recognition at the 2014 Channel Partners 360 Awards Program. President and CEO Aaron Stone was recently named one of the Top 100 St. Louisans to “Know How to Succeed in Business.” Our organization has been built on superior technical prowess, excellent processes, and our commitment to do what we say we will do. ·         Netelligent is a Cisco Gold Partner, Cisco Master Unified Communications Partner, Master Managed Services Certified Partner, EMC Premier Partner, NetApp Alliance Partner, Riverbed Platinum, VMware Gold Partner and Microsoft Silver Partner. We currently have locations in St. Louis, MO, Chesterfield, MO and Denver/Aurora, CO. If you are looking for a company that embraces creativity, risk taking and cross-functional teaming, please email me your resume at jmcmichael@netelligent.comI look forward to speaking with you! ",Service Technician Job in Chesterfield,Part Time Employee,"Chesterfield, MO 63017",,http://jobview.monster.com/service-technician-job-chesterfield-mo-us-169013878.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,ed6d428791cf32b2f85b13e2b900a5ec
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:31:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking an individual who can create automation frameworks from scratch. This client is seeking a SDET - Quality Assurance in Juno Beach, FL. Essential Functions: Writing, maintaining & managing test infrastructure for testing security, performance/scale, usability of software products Develop testing programs that tests areas such as public API, software scenarios, or usability of the software product Provide System Level Architecture Guidance on real world scenarios related to the Building Automation Systems Vertical Writes or assists in the development of test plans and test procedure Look for Continuous Improvement . Identify & be the focal for innovative solutions within the QE department Assists in the automation of relevant test procedures Design and develop tests suites to validate new product features Designs test automation infrastructure for large projects and directs team members in implementing the design Have experience developing UI automation Develop, enhance and optimize the automation test suites Analyze and Troubleshoot automated regression tests results Programming Java in a Test Driven Development Working on our team of Test Engineers as we are rolling out our custom built Automation Testing Framework -- Participate and work with a very sharp team Working on an on-going test automation project. Suggesting and implementing improvements to the automation framework Analyze, design and support the development of tools to make the testing effort more efficient Help identify test case gaps and create the appropriate automated or manual test scripts Programming Java in a Test Driven DevelopmentREQUIREMENTS: Working knowledge of test methodologies, processes and tools Knowledge of relational databases/SQL, NoSQL structured data solutions, Data Warehousing and ETL tools, network and file system protocols Programming experience with Ruby/Python a plus (in addition to any of the required OO languages) Deliver the product on time with high quality You are a true team player. You believe that you can achieve more on a team - that the whole is greater than the sum of its parts. You rely on others' candid feedback for continuous improvement 12-month contract to hire opportunity Required Skills: Programming Java and JavaScript in a Test Driven Development Working on an on-going test automation project. Suggesting and implementing improvements to the automation framework Analyze, design and support the development of tools to make the testing effort more efficient Help identify test case gaps and create the appropriate automated or manual test scripts Experience using Automation - UI and Web Application Automation Frameworks",SDET - Quality Assurance Job in Juno Beach,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Juno Beach, FL 33408",,http://jobview.monster.com/sdet-quality-assurance-job-juno-beach-fl-us-169016881.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),97ef23d9452cd56159d73b8a0e7919b2
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:30:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Zachry Construction Corporation is seeking an experienced PS (Project Systems) Lead with working knowledge in MM (Materials Management) & SD (Sales and Distribution) to help with Post Go Live Support, implementation of new change requests, end user training and to be part of a support team that will configure and rollout new projects in SAP along with the tasks associated with it.This job description is intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by people assigned to this job description. The job description is not intended to be an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties and skills required for this position.Required SkillsQualified candidates must have experience leading a PS implementation, preferably for a construction company, along with working knowledge of MM & SD. Configuration knowledge of MM and SD is preferred. ETM experience is a plus but not required. Candidate should have ability to support production issues; ability to configure & setup projects, WBS’s, networks, milestones, standard structures, cost planning, user status profiles, budgets, forecasts, schedules; plants, storage locations, purchasing organization structures; basic SD billing conditions; different contract types, and Resource Related Billing (RRB) etc.Qualified candidates must have excellent communication skills to communicate effectively with business, end users and development team; strong attention to detail, strong organizational, problem solving and reasoning skills. Must be proficient with Microsoft Windows and in MS applications (Excel, Word, PowerPoint).Required ExperienceQualified candidates must have at least 5 years' experience as a lead in PS modules; working knowledge of MM & SD; ETM experience is a plus but not required; experience with end to end implementation including requirement gathering, configuration, communicating business requirements to developers, data migration, testing, training, creating user manuals, etc.; a bachelor's degree in accounting or finance related degree preferred but not required.All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other legally protected status.",SAP Analyst - Project Systems Lead Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78248",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/sap-analyst-project-systems-lead-job-san-antonio-tx-us-168921790.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,7b28c7d6552180a8e8e931bd11c20689
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:29:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have an immediate need for .Net Lead/Technical Engineer for our direct client.Job Title: .Net Lead/Technical Engineer Salary: $110k/yearLocation: Detroit, MIInterview: Phone & F2F (Need locals)                                  NOTE: Should be atleast 8/10 rating on his comm skills.Job Summary: Work individually and on a team to participate in all aspects of software engineering including technical design, development, testing and support. Responsible for providing hands-on support and managing the team which provides support for existing digital applications. This includes trouble-shooting, user support, operational activities, bug fixes and small enhancements. Also responsibility for larger efforts focused on improving internal maintainability.   Key Responsibilities:Design, development, and support of technical projects through to completion according to project standards and user satisfaction. Responsible for the delivery of small to large projects. Takes responsibility for the technical quality of medium sized projects with one or more additional resources through to completion. Projects may support multiple departments and client owned companies.Lead research efforts and proof-of-concepts of new technologies. Present findings and recommendations to senior technologists in the organization.Develop and ensure team develops excellent quality code with a focus on stability, scalability, security, and maintainability.Contribute to software architecture designs. Participate in the planning and design of future software and technical architectures. Make design recommendations for the architecture for specific projects.Provide supervisory oversight to client engineers as well as external resources located locally or off-shore.  Conduct formal design and code reviews for others’ work.Coordinate with QA in the development of integration test plans, test conditions, and expected test results.Work individually and with a project team to resolve system issues and respond to suggestions for improvements.Provide support individually for production applications including on-call after hours support on a rotational basis. Ensure team is providing outstanding support and continuously develops and maintain support documentation.  Develop estimates for completion of programming projects and in developing formal project plans for individual and team projects. Work with junior developers on developing estimation skills.Participates in technical aspects of system evaluation and vendor selection processes.Perform technical functions in the software development process such as performing builds and releases.Act as a subject matter expert in one or more areas of technology. Keep up to date with latest technology trends and developments. Identify technologies which should be considered for use by Client.Manage the ongoing demand of support, maintenance and small enhancements. Set priorities and manage the efforts of the team to ensure customer needs are being met.Minimum Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field10+ years professional experience in and demonstrated expertise in multiple technologies such as:Microsoft .Net (C# or VB)HTML5 / JavaScript / CSSOpen-source Javascript librariesContent management systems such as DNN, Joomla or DrupalEnterprise Service Bus (ESB) technologies5+ years experience developing software in a formal Software Development Life Cycle. 3+ years experience using modern software architecture concepts such as MVC, SOA, SOAP, REST, and cloud/cloud hybrid models. Strong experience with Object Oriented (OO) techniques, including an understanding of common OO and web application design patterns Experience administrating formal software management and source control tools such as Team Foundation Server, Aldon, SVN, or Git and using continuous integration. Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.  Ability to find creative solutions to solve problems while staying within practice guidelines. Self-motivated, curious, creative and passionate about technology. Strong written and verbal communication skills.Experience developing formal estimations for project completion.Experience playing a leadership role on a software development project.Able to manage multiple tasks simultaneously in a fast paced environmentPreferred Skills, Knowledge and Abilities:Experience with Agile software development methodologies such as Scrum or Kanban. Masters degree in Computer Science or related field. Formal certifications such as Microsoft Certified Professional certifications or MCSE.--Regards, Srikanth NambaruSr.Delivery ManagerOpenLogix Corp, an IBM Premier Business Partner(w (678) 648-6201 | Fax: (866) 418-24918W:  http://www.open-logix.com  | 8snambaru@open-logix.comLinkedIn:  http://www.linkedin .com/in/srikanthnambaru | Twitter: https://twitter.com/kanth1984",Openlogix Corporation Job Application for .Net Lead/Technical Engineer | Monster.com requirejs.config({ baseUrl: 'http://jobview.monster.com/v/Assets/release/js' }); var DYNAMIC_S_ACCOUNT = 'newjobsProdSeekerUS'; var DYNAMIC_S_CURRENCYCODE = 'USD'; requirejs.config({ paths: { //'amc': '//media.monster.com/js/sc/sitecatalystLL' 'amc': '//media.monster.com/mm/rainbow/coda/ubd/js/siteCatalystLL' } }); require(['at'],,"We have an immediate need for .Net Lead/Technical Engineer for our direct client.Job Title: .Net Lead/Technical Engineer Salary: $110k/yearLocation: Detroit, MIInterview: Phone & F2F (Need locals)                                  NOTE: Should be atleast 8/10 rating on his comm skills.Job Summary: Work individually and on a team to participate in all aspects of software engineering including technical design, development, testing and support. Responsible for providing hands-on support and managing the team which provides support for existing digital applications. This includes trouble-shooting, user support, operational activities, bug fixes and small enhancements. Also responsibility for larger efforts focused on improving internal maintainability.   Key Responsibilities:Design, development, and support of technical projects through to completion according to project standards and user satisfaction. Responsible for the delivery of small to large projects. Takes responsibility for the technical quality of medium sized projects with one or more additional resources through to completion. Projects may support multiple departments and client owned companies.Lead research efforts and proof-of-concepts of new technologies. Present findings and recommendations to senior technologists in the organization.Develop and ensure team develops excellent quality code with a focus on stability, scalability, security, and maintainability.Contribute to software architecture designs. Participate in the planning and design of future software and technical architectures. Make design recommendations for the architecture for specific projects.Provide supervisory oversight to client engineers as well as external resources located locally or off-shore.  Conduct formal design and code reviews for others’ work.Coordinate with QA in the development of integration test plans, test conditions, and expected test results.Work individually and with a project team to resolve system issues and respond to suggestions for improvements.Provide support individually for production applications including on-call after hours support on a rotational basis. Ensure team is providing outstanding support and continuously develops and maintain support documentation.  Develop estimates for completion of programming projects and in developing formal project plans for individual and team projects. Work with junior developers on developing estimation skills.Participates in technical aspects of system evaluation and vendor selection processes.Perform technical functions in the software development process such as performing builds and releases.Act as a subject matter expert in one or more areas of technology. Keep up to date with latest technology trends and developments. Identify technologies which should be considered for use by Client.Manage the ongoing demand of support, maintenance and small enhancements. Set priorities and manage the efforts of the team to ensure customer needs are being met.Minimum Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field10+ years professional experience in and demonstrated expertise in multiple technologies such as:Microsoft .Net (C# or VB)HTML5 / JavaScript / CSSOpen-source Javascript librariesContent management systems such as DNN, Joomla or DrupalEnterprise Service Bus (ESB) technologies5+ years experience developing software in a formal Software Development Life Cycle. 3+ years experience using modern software architecture concepts such as MVC, SOA, SOAP, REST, and cloud/cloud hybrid models. Strong experience with Object Oriented (OO) techniques, including an understanding of common OO and web application design patterns Experience administrating formal software management and source control tools such as Team Foundation Server, Aldon, SVN, or Git and using continuous integration. Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.  Ability to find creative solutions to solve problems while staying within practice guidelines. Self-motivated, curious, creative and passionate about technology. Strong written and verbal communication skills.Experience developing formal estimations for project completion.Experience playing a leadership role on a software development project.Able to manage multiple tasks simultaneously in a fast paced environmentPreferred Skills, Knowledge and Abilities:Experience with Agile software development methodologies such as Scrum or Kanban. Masters degree in Computer Science or related field. Formal certifications such as Microsoft Certified Professional certifications or MCSE.--Regards, Srikanth NambaruSr.Delivery ManagerOpenLogix Corp, an IBM Premier Business Partner(w (678) 648-6201 | Fax: (866) 418-24918W:  http://www.open-logix.com  | 8snambaru@open-logix.comLinkedIn:  http://www.linkedin .com/in/srikanthnambaru | Twitter: https://twitter.com/kanth1984",,http://jobview.monster.com/net-lead-technical-engineer-job-detroit-mi-us-146506680.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=6,,,f8bff78927072113eca71ff4307b031c
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:29:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Call Center SW Support in McHenry, Illinois (IL).Responsibilities: Provides product and technical support to customers, (librarians, media specialists, IT professionals, etc.) answering technical and functional questions about the client's products and services via the telephone Seeks to maintain strong, positive relationships with their customers as a representative of the company Resolves customer questions and issues over the telephone in the areas of system configuration/setup, product functionality and general usage First call resolution preferred Escalates issues as appropriate to other support areas Seeks to maintain strong, positive relationships between the company and customers during each interaction, and supports company interests and goals Meets or exceeds all individual and team production and quality measurements Follows departmental/company processes and guidelinesREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in a Computer Technology field preferred 2 or more years of business-to-consumer technical support experience, call center preferred Strong interpersonal communication skills and telephone etiquette Strong business/technical oral and written skills Must work well independently and in a team environment, under moderate supervision Ability to multi-task; communicating with customer and troubleshooting issues while creating a detailed ticket Possesses or demonstrates the ability to acquire a thorough knowledge of the client's products and servicesPreferred: Working knowledge of Oracle General knowledge of products Experience with hardware; specifically barcode scanners Familiarity with firewall and network configuration Proficient with entire Microsoft Office suite A+ certification",Call Center SW Support Job in Mchenry,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Mchenry, IL 60050",,http://jobview.monster.com/call-center-sw-support-job-mchenry-il-us-168932054.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2419ec4d09c69e704477db460ecdd680
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:18:25:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Linux Systems Administrator Job #:  661890Apex Systems is looking for a qualified candidate with Linux and network engineering and system administration experience. The ideal candidate will have 1-5 years of experience and this is a hybrid position be able to maintain Linux Server, networking, and security aspect of the Linux Server for the project The Linux Systems Administrator will be a member of development Business Intelligence (BI) team for a Global BI Reporting solution, with a Federal agency located in Rosslyn, VA.This role requires a degree of independent to monitor and apply pro-active Server level alerts and maintenance, self-motivation and the ability to drive and own tasks are preferred. Top candidates for this position will work well in a collaborative environment, and maintain the Linux Server components; software, patch set and security setting in-line with industry best practices and the established NIST or other security guidelines.  All applicants selected for hire must possess US citizenship and be eligible for a SECRET security clearance, per client requirements. An interim Secret clearance is required to begin working onsite with our client, and a Secret clearance must be maintained throughout the project duration.Principal Duties and Responsibilities may include:3 or more years of experience with Linux in system administration and security hardening of ServerLinux Monitoring toolsVery strong Problem Solving skills, with proven ability to analyze and determine root cause and resolution for complex problemsLinux system management, setup, configuration, hardening, backup and recoveryExperience in SAN technologies (NetApp)Experience reading, writing, or modifying Shell, Perl, PythonTroubleshoot and fix hardware and software problem as they occurThis is a high-availability environment and will require after-hours and occasional weekend work to implement patches and/or performance system maintenanceWillingness to learn new technologies and bring new ideas to the group Knowledge, Skills and Behavior:Ability to work in a team environmentAbility to make critical decisions affecting system availability and security postureExcellent written and verbal communication skillsAbility to learn quickly and work independentlyCommitment to continual improvement of the technical aspects of the system and operational automationKnowledge of In-Memory Computing, SAP HANA is a plusKnowledge of Cisco UCS unified  Monitor is desiredA 4-year degree in a relevant field (i.e.: Computer Science, IT, systems, etc.) If interested please contact Lauren Bedell at lbedell@apexsystemsinc.com       EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More",Linux Systems Administrator Job in Arlington,Full Time Employee,"Arlington, VA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/linux-systems-administrator-job-arlington-va-us-169021809.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),eb1256e5843d2165360b325706b3faaf
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:23:24:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Serves as a liaison between the referring/attending physicians, discharge planners, case managers, or referring hospital, home health agencies as well as nursing homes. Performs pre-admission assessments, providing medical director with the assistance to ensure that patients meet admission criteria. Updates patient assessments and provides recommendations to meet inpatient requirements. Works to promote the CHRISTUS philosophy and marketing in our service area through direct patient and family interaction.Job Requirements Associate Degree in Nursing Registered Nurse, Prefer CRRN (not required) Comply with standards as set forth by the Joint Commission Accreditation of Hospital Organizations (TJC), state and federal agencies, and hospital requirements, including annual TB skin test and in-service. Ability to communicate effectively, both verbally and in writing. Ability to coordinate duties of RN, Nurse Liaisons and the ability to fill in where necessary. Good assessment skills Knowledge of Medicare guidelines Excellent intrapersonal and problem solving skills",Registered Nurse - Clinical Liaison,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Clinical-Liaison-Inpatient-Rehab-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166644126.aspx?mescoid=2900502001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,517136e9504be8da996b47a33fe7a209
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:23:22:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"**NO third party candidates will be accepted!**BI Developer / Architect DETAILSLocation: Irving, TX Position Type: ContractHourly: BOE! Residency Requirements: US Citizens and those authorized to work in the US are encouraged to apply.  No sponsorship is being offered at this time.ABOUT THE POSITIONGTN Technical Staffing is currently seeking a BI Developer / Architect for a Contract opening in Irving, TX. Our client is current building out an EDW and is looking to add a key Architect-level contractor to their team. We’re looking for an individual who understands OLAP/OLTP data architectures and has experience integrating database solutions with source control. This is more than just a “worker-bee” role – you will also work with key stakeholders providing guidance and creating/presenting documentation for the project.Currently, our client is taking a Kimball model approach to build a faster, more business-centric EDW to increase efficiency with the Agile approach of the Dev teams. They would like to start taking more of a “data mart-ish” approach and add reporting techniques into the ODS (operational data store) currently in production. Their ETL framework (SSIS) has already been established, and they currently have a data modeling tool already in use. This is a very MS-centric environment, but they do have 3rd party tools for performance enhancements.  This role will call for cube development; we need somebody who can create cubes from scratch and not just rely on a cube wizard.This role calls for somebody understands data as a whole and is able to communicate technical concepts to business teams. Documentation is also key – there is very little documentation in place and there is a need to expand onto those to get more features/data models documented. TECHNICAL REQUIREMENTS7+ years of experience in the following skill sets…Enterprise Data Warehouse (Big Data) Architecture EDW Design / Architect / Develop / Administration / IntegrationDeep understanding of Ralph Kimball’s approach to data warehousingData Models – Physical Data ModelingDocumentation, Documentation, Documentation Business Intelligence / Data Warehouse Project ManagementReal-Time Data Integration / Analysis / Design / ImplementationOLTP – Online Transaction Processing / Real-Time Data IntegrationOLAP – Online Analytical Processing / Real-Time Data IntegrationSQL Server 2005 / 2008 R2 / 2012 – BI (Business Intelligence) Development / ArchitectureT-SQL Development (Advanced) / Stored ProceduresQuery Optimization / Performance Tuning / Storage AllocationSSAS 2005 / 2008 R2 / 2012 – Analysis ServicesEnterprise OLAP Cube Design / Development from ScratchHANDS-ON MDX Querying from Scratch SSRS 2005 / 2008 R2 / 2012 – Reporting ServicesAdding Reporting Techniques to ODSDesign / Development Reports / Reporting Portals SSIS 2005 / 2008 R2 / 2012 – Integrated Services Troubleshooting / Monitor Performance Bottlenecks Review / Reengineer Packages for Maximum Efficiency / Consistency Scalable / Reusable ETL Components Complex Business Logic Disaster Recovery Development / TestingExcellent English – Written / Verbal PREFERREDConsulting Experience ",BI / ETL Developer Job in Irving,Full Time,"Irving, TX 75063",,http://jobview.monster.com/BI-ETL-Developer-Job-Irving-TX-US-166701535.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=1,BOE,,41f022b217deabbe97df6ef859563581
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:22:43:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under the General Direction of the Practice Administrator and the General Supervision of the Practice Manager, the Medical Assistant will perform medical assisting duties within the legal (including federal and state statutes, regulations, opinions, and rulings) and ethical boundaries.  The Medical Assistant may be responsible for, but is not limited to, taking and recording patient vitals, draw blood or other samples, assist physician during examination and treatment of patient, maintaining and documenting of patient chart with current information on patient's condition, care provided, and follow-up prescribed by the physician/provider.  Coordinates processing and care provided to patients examined by the Physician in performing or arranging for any lab or other diagnostic/clinical tests or treatments needed during examination.  Functions as a healthcare advocate and performs routine administrative processes for scheduling and coordinating hospital admissions or procedures, specialty and procedural referrals, and in-office procedure activities to support clinic operations.  Assists with other administrative duties such as answer phones, make appointments, obtain insurance authorizations, collect patient co-pays and deductible, submit charges with accurate Billing & Coding and other duties as assigned by the Physician and/or the Practice Administrator.   POSITION QUALIFICATIONS: 1.      High school Graduate / GED 2.      Graduate of a medical assistant program 3.      One year previous Physician Office experience preferred. 4.      Current CPR 5.      Must have working knowledge of medical terminology. 6.      Requires excellent communication skills to relate to physicians, patients, outside organizations/people, and other office staff.  7.      Knowledge of medical supplies, ordering procedures, inventory and clerical skills is helpful. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Additional Information:",Medical Assistant - PGL - Urology Job in West Monroe,Full Time Employee,"West Monroe, LA 71291",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Assistant-PGL-Urology-Job-West-Monroe-LA-US-166172125.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,92a7c144f053e6b401dd6601e56a11c3
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:22:05:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"* Responsible for effective management of patient care delivery: * Completes and documents assessment within period established by policy/procedure. * Completes and documents reassessment of patient needs according to department standard. * Initiates, updates and communicates an appropriate multi-disciplinary plan of care based in identified problems and/or patient needs * Collaborate with patient/family/physician and other disciplines to coordinate the plan of care * Evaluates patient response to care, revises plan of care as necessary and documents appropriately * Administers and documents medications/treatments safely following Medication Administration Policy and Procedure * Recognizes change or urgent situations in patient condition and intervenes appropriately. * Provides patient and/or family with information relative to treatment plan, diagnostic/surgical procedures, disease process, and care after discharge. Initiates collaboration and documents appropriate teaching, considering age, cultural and religious beliefs, and barriers to learning. Evaluates effectiveness of teaching and provides appropriate follow-up. * Provides leadership and direction in accordance with departmental goals and objectives. Delegates duties based on position and level of competence and the complexity of patient's needs. * Performs Point of Care Testing within scope of licensure; accurately performs testing according to the approved procedure and limits testing to only those tests for which competency has been assessed and operator is deemed qualified by designated trainer. * Healthstream (HLC) modules completed by assigned date. * Complete Associate Self-evaluation and give to Supervisor by assigned date. * Attend 2 of the Associate Round Tables per fiscal year. * Maintain licensure or certification without lapse, if required for the position. * Maintain BCLS/ACLS certification, if required for the position. A.Education/SkillsGraduate from an Accredited School of Nursing B.ExperienceMinimum of 1 year experience. New grads are not eligible to apply for this position. C.Licenses, Registrations, or CertificationsCurrent registration with the Louisiana State Board of Registered Nurse Examiners. BLS provider, ACLS provider as required by departmental policy.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse - Centralized Staffing Job in Shreveport,"Full Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA 71105",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Centralized-Staffing-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166091004.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,c459a7a6a32ab6aa193386b9f47cf23b
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:22:04:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is a large healthcare provider located in Renton, WA. They are looking for a Software Design Engineer in Test for a 6 month contingent position to be located in Renton, WA through Volt Workforce Solutions. We are among the largest IT staffing companies in the US for contingent/temporary and direct hire placements and support most of the top rated IT companies in the Pacific Northwest. Responsibilities: Work on the client website. You'll update, maintain and add new test functionality to the existing framework (grow the test suite). This is 100% UI work. 90% of the time you'll be responsible for automation testing and 10% is manual testing. You will run and record daily test scripts and BVTs. Create documentation. The ideal candidate has around 3-5 years of web testing experience, healthcare (is a plus). C# and Selenium experience. SauceLabs is a plus. Visual Studio and TFS experience. BA/BS degree in Computer Science or related technical discipline is required. Our Recruiter will initiate a phone call to you and give you immediate consideration should your resume meet the job requirements. Please rest assured that if your resume matches what is reflected in this job posting, you should receive a phone call from a Volt Recruiter to discuss this position with you. Volt has a talented and optimistic staffing team focused on the quality of your career. Volt has over 60 years of staffing experience. We work with many of the Fortune 500 and 1000 companies to provide workforce solutions. We offer many direct hire full-time positions as well as many contingent/temporary positions. We offer our Workers competitive pay and benefits, as well as educational programs and re-deployment assistance. To learn more about Volt, please visit: http://www.volt.com and to see more of our job postings, please visit: http://jobs.volt.com Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",SDET Job in Renton,Full Time Employee,"Renton, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/SDET-Job-Renton-WA-US-166688499.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=13,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,f499fcff422f5069362fa98183f73c3e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:22:04:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Network Specialist IV in San Antonio, TX.Primary Duties/Responsibilities: Network design and implementation Optimization of data equipment and network service Provisioning, configuration, installation, and optimization of data networks and devices Performing scheduled testing and updates Leadership & mentorship of junior engineers Provisioning, configuration, installation, and optimization of data networks and associated devices; including Core Switches, Routers, LAN switches, application load balancers Performing scheduled testing and updates as assigned to validate redundancy to provide network connectivity in accordance with company requirements Adheres to architected technology roadmaps in designs and implementations Implement formal disaster recovery procedures for the network as required for allocations Providing Level 4 network technical and engineering support to the IT Infrastructure Operations Team Participates in on-call rotation Act as technical Subject Matter Expert (SME) for cross-functional IT Teams, providing assistance and troubleshooting network related application issues Ensuring compliance of policies and procedures for the network Establishing monitoring criteria of the Local Area Network/Wireless Area Network (LAN/WAN) infrastructure Participates in projects to include SOW phase to post implementation sign off Participate in research and recommendations of new technologies related to data network Produces reports for any adhoc requests and/or anomalies as they occur on the network for upper management Management of F5 application load balancersREQUIREMENTS: Four-year university degree or college diploma or equivalent in the field of computer sciences or 15 years of equivalent work experience Minimum of 10 years of experience in a large scale global network environment with a BA or equivalent or 8 years with MA or equivalent delivering highly available network infrastructure design and operational excellence Experience with Microsoft Office applications including Current Cisco CCNP Certification Experience in design and implementation of network systems using Cisco equipment Experience configuring and installing core switches, routers and data switches in a LAN/WAN environment Conveys strong understanding of routing, with the emphasis on internal and external routing protocols such as; BGP and EIGRP Minimum 2 years of experience working within a Cisco VOIP networking environment, with strong emphasis on Cisco Call Manager Express (CME) Minimum 2 years of hand on experience working with Cisco Wireless LAN hardware and software, with emphasis on the use of Wireless LAN Controllers (WLCs) Experience configuring and installing Virtual Private Network (VPNs), Internet connectivity, firewalls, and Domain Name Systems (DNS) Skilled in the configuring and managing of F5 application load balancers Demonstrated communication and presentation skills Ability to work efficiently in a fast paced team environment Self motivated Excellent technical writing skills Demonstrated analytical and problem solving skills Ability to maintain confidentiality and exercise discretion in business relationshipsPreferred Qualifications: Additional Cisco and/or data networking certifications",Network Specialist IV Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78249",,http://jobview.monster.com/Network-Specialist-IV-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166719491.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=10,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),61d0a7cd4de222dc30dcff4edb8d994a
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:22:03:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part Time Clinical Lab AccessionerData Entry / Specimen ProcessorLooking for an entry level job in the medical field?Medical Diagnostic Laboratories, L.L.C. (MDL) is a CLIA certified clinical laboratory with multiple state licensing that specializes in state of the art, automated DNA based molecular analysis of a variety of chronic and infectious illnesses with viral, microbial, or environmental etiology. MDL specializes and performs Polymerase Chain Reaction (PCR) with a larger menu of testing available in the field of infectious disease. Our Research and Development department at MDL is comprised of experts in the fields of Molecular Biology, Molecular Virology, Microbiology, Molecular Oncology and Gynecology. Our main theme of research is in the field of Infectious Arthritis, Tick-borne Diseases, Mycology, and Chronic Fatigue Syndrome (CFS). MDL is looking for a team-oriented, responsible individual with a can-do attitude for data entry/specimen processing in our laboratory facility in Hamilton, NJ to fill a Part Time position as a Laboratory Accessioner.The schedule for this position will be 1st shift hours and will include Saturdays - some flexibility with hours.Responsibilities:- Unpack specimen deliveries- Correctly identify all necessary information on a test requisition form - Match information on the test requisition with information on the collection vial for accuracy - Identify correct documentation and procedures for missing or discrepant information - Demonstrate proper use of proprietary software - Properly collate all paperwork received with specimen including requisition, checks, credit card forms, insurance card copies and prescriptions - Demonstrate proper use of MDL test codes and panels - Properly accession multiple types of specimen including blood, urine, swabs, CSF, synovial fluid, ticks, biopsies etc. - Properly print labels and number the requisitions with the corresponding specimens - File all paperwork in order and distribute to the appropriate QC binsRequirements: Requirements:- HS Diploma or GED- Team oriented- Positive attitude- ReliableWe offer:- Competitive Salary- Limited Medical Benefit- Short Term Disability- Voluntary Policies (Accident, Hospital Indemnity, Critical Illness & Supplemental STD)- Legal Plan & Identity Theft Protection- 401(k) Plan - Credit UnionVisit us at http://www.mdlab.com .Medical Diagnostic Laboratories, LLC is an equal opportunity employer.Apply Now! $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Part Time Lab Accessioner (Data Entry,,"Hamilton , NJ 08690",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Part-Time-Lab-Accessioner-Data-Entry-Specimen-Processing-Job-Hamilton-NJ-US-166163626.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=4,,Biotech/R&D/Science,8aaaaa97d67f07a7e0bce6bfec3798ad
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:56:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"DevOps EngineerTRC is looking for a Dev Ops Engineer for a client located in St. Louis, MO. This is a permanent full time role.• Contribute to execution of operational strategy, governance, standardization and best practices through applied research that aligns with the firm IT strategy vision and realization; including project and budget planning • Manage the operational oversight of Cloud Computing solution infrastructure such as hypervisors, provisioning, orchestration, automation, monitoring, security, storage, integration, cloudburst, reporting, billing and metering • Implement technical solutions and develop the vision around design and management of the support model; establish procedures, documentation and metrics to support ongoing operations • Develop and lead an operations team; directly supervise and manage ongoing performance of 3-7 direct hire employees, consultants, operational level agreements with peer teams and managed service vendors • Collaborate with Architecture, Engineering and Project Teams for new initiatives and emerging standards such as DevOps tools and principles; educate others about operational strategies and defined best practices • Direct interaction with operations teams to shift existing large-scale workloads to cloud computing Qualifications: • Minimum seven years of progressive experience in an IT environment with experience in delivering and managing technology solutions across multiple enterprise architecture domains including technology, application, information assets and infrastructure • Five+ years management experience; in depth understanding of technology solutions from infrastructure, service management, in an Enterprise Level Data Center environment (more than 5000 Production Servers) with experience managing the build or support of private and public cloud technology • Bachelor's degree from an accredited college/university or equivalent work experience • Experience leading a team and being directly responsible for the performance management of technology professionals including service line managers, engineering and operations staff • Hands-on technical work experience supporting technologies including, servers, storage, hypervisors, with demonstrated understanding of common utilization models, such as Software-as-a-Service (SaaS), Platform-as-a-Service (PaaS), and Infrastructure-as-a-Service (IaaS) as well as of cloud orchestration frameworks • Experience with two or more vendors in any of the following areas including; Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft Azure, Google Cloud Platform, CSC (ServiceMesh) Agility Platform, VMware VSphere, Puppet, Open-Source technologies, Linux, Windows, Java/J2EE architecture",DevOps Engineer Job in Saint Louis,Full Time,"Saint Louis, MO 63101",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/DevOps-Engineer-Job-Saint-Louis-MO-US-166752418.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=14,"100,000.00 - 135,000.00 $ /yearPTO, 401K",Experienced (Non-Manager),ec1d84e54420c8b6ec3f530cf3a64596
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:56:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Job:The Support Engineer is a high exposure support position in which Engineers assist our enterprise customers to resolve technical issues with our proprietary software.  Our focus is on teamwork, collaboration, and continuous independent or team learning in an open, fun, and encouraging environment. As a Support Engineer, you will have the opportunity to develop your technical and leadership skills for a successful career at AvePoint.  The ideal candidate should have a technical background, excellent written/verbal communication skills, an eagerness to learn more about enterprise level software and ability to work in a fast-paced, high energy environment. The Support Engineer position is divided into two central responsibilities:Product support - Become an expert in our extensive product suite and learn by working hands on with Microsoft technologies (SQL Server, IIS, Windows Server, SharePoint, Office 365) supporting our customers and providing solutions for highly complex technical issues. Through ongoing training you will specialize and become a resource for our worldwide team.Customer Service – Leverage your knowledge of our software to help deliver effective resolutions and answers to customer’s issues and inquiries. Be the liaison between AvePoint and our clients to ensure we are prompt and professional with all engagements; whether by phone or email. Help customers see their projects through to fruition by assisting them with overcoming obstacles related to our products.Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:Initial point of contact with our customers via phone, email, and remote sessionsAnalyze complex issues by reviewing product specific logs and leveraging root cause analysisInterdepartmental collaboration to help ensure prompt delivery of customer requestsOpportunity to continue learning in a controlled environmentActively create public facing Knowledge Base articles based on found issues QualificationsBA/BS Degree in an IT related degree (Computer Science majors are preferred but not required)1 to 5 years of technical support or help desk experience preferredExcellent communications and customer service skillsAbility to work independently and within a highly collaborative team environmentCuriosity and drive to remain up-to-date with the latest technologiesStrong interest or experience with Microsoft stack of technology (Windows Server, SQL Server, IIS, etcThe CompanyAvePoint is the established leader in enabling enterprise collaboration across platforms and devices. Focusing on helping enterprises in their digitization journey to enable their information workers to collaborate with confidence, AvePoint is first to market with a unique solution that centralizes access and control of information assets residing in disparate collaboration and document management systems on-premises and in the cloud. AvePoint solutions and services aim to bring together business, IT, as well as compliance and risk officers to serve key business objectives such as big data, cloud integration, compliance, enterprise content management, and mobile data access monitoring.Founded in 2001 and based out of Jersey City, NJ, AvePoint serves over 15,000 organizations and 3 million Office 365 users in five continents across all industry sectors, with focused practices in the energy and utilities; financial services; healthcare and pharmaceuticals; and public sector industries. AvePoint is a Microsoft Global ISV Partner, a US Government GSA provider via strategic partnerships, a Gold Certified Collaboration and Content Partner, and a Gold Certified Cloud Platform Partner, as well as winner of 2015 Microsoft Partner of the Year Award in Collaboration and Content Partner of the Year. AvePoint is privately held and backed by Goldman Sachs.  ",Support Engineer Job in Jersey City,Full Time,"Jersey City, NJ 07310",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Support-Engineer-Job-Jersey-City-NJ-US-166116318.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=9,Base Salary + Bonuses,Entry Level,cbcd4ad7f4dba9d7f6d6fa325a7158e2
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:56:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: BI Developer - Datamarts, ETL, SSAS, SSIS (Telecommute)Job type: Direct HireLocation: Vancouver, WAAdditional notes: 1) One Day / Week onsite and four days remote possible (but needs to be in close proximity to Vancouver / Portland area).2) No Visa sponsorship for this role.Salary range: Up to $90,000/yr + benefitsTo be qualified you know how to develop and maintain datamarts, ETL processes, and analysis models that supply the information needed to drive better operations, analyze success of advertising and promotions, analyze success and profitability of products and better understand customer preferences and behaviorsDuties and Responsibilities:Meet with Stakeholders to understand current and possible future reporting needs.Gain knowledge and understanding of the business and what its key performance indicators are in order to provide better intelligence in reporting.Designing and developing datamarts and their associated ETL processes.Responsible for data quality in datamarts.Work with Systems Administrator to keep our database and reporting service environments up-to-date and well-maintained.Required Qualifications:Education: Requires Bachelor''s degree in Information Management, Information Science, or equivalent in experience.Experience:5 years previous experience in database development.3-5 years of SQL development writing complex queries and stored procedures.Position Level Specific Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:Strong knowledge of SQL with ability to write and tune complex queries.Strong knowledge of SSIS design and development best practices.Knowledge of relational database design and data warehouse design concepts (dimensions/facts)Experience with SSAS.Ability to work with business users to understand requirements.Ability to design and create stored procedures, triggers, views and indexes.Experience in database administration including performance tuning, environment availability, and capacity planning.Effective communication skills, task management skills and ability to discuss tactical/strategic issues with management.Ability to maintain positive relationships with vendors, franchisees and staff.Superior interpersonal skills.",BI Developer - Datamarts,Full Time,Vancouver 98662,Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/BI-Developer-Datamarts-ETL-SSAS-SSIS-Telecommute-Job-Vancouver-166738935.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,48.00 - 55.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),773773365499630937dedd917ce2c7a9
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:53:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Warren  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Warren 71671,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-WARREN-166721930.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=16,,General/Other: Medical/Health,afa0f7d5797fb451c40a1b3b8446ed1d
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:52:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"CHRISTUS VNA of San Antonio is looking for a Licensed Physical Therapist Assistant (LPTA) in our Home Health department. LPTA's provide physical therapy services in accordance with care plan established by the physical therapist to patients in their homes.This is a PRN paid per visit position.Two (2) years experience preferably one of the two years in a home care setting. Associate's degree or certificate from accredited school. Licensed as a Physical Therapy Assistant, CPR, state driver's license, automobile insurance.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",LPTA PRN (Adult Home Health) Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78228",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/LPTA-PRN-Adult-Home-Health-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166626863.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,714ce94599c0d36256305f8642d818cb
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:52:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Communication is the heartbeat of any Army National Guard unit. By joining the Army National Guard as a Signal Support Systems Specialist, you will keep the information flowing by making sure all communications equipment is in top working order. And while you maintain signal support devices and terminals in the Army National Guard, you will be building skills that will help you in your civilian career. Signal Support Systems Specialists are responsible for integrating signal systems and networks; performing signal support functions and unit-level maintenance on authorized signal equipment; and installing, operating, and maintaining radio and data distribution systems. In this role, you will train and provide technical assistance to users of signal equipment and learn to operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on vehicles and power generators. And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers; maintain and install signal support systems and terminal devices; provide technical assistance and training for automation and communications equipment; prepare maintenance and supply requests for unit-level signal support; and operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on assigned vehicles. Plus, the skills you learn will prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in communications equipment, radio, and teletype repair. These skills are also in demand by the federal government. Civilian positions may require additional study in electronics, where you will have the opportunity to qualify for certification as an Associate Certified Electronics Technician. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 17 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training. This is where you will learn mechanical, electronic, and electrical principles; line installation; wiring techniques; preventative maintenance procedures; and communication security policies and procedures. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Signal Support Systems Specialist Job in Utica  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Utica 13501,,http://jobview.monster.com/Signal-Support-Systems-Specialist-Job-UTICA-166735002.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=5,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,79ebb132b811b975286ea54502e788a6
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:52:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time Friday, Saturday, Sunday 9:30am-6:30pmBrookdale Queen Anne 805 4th Ave N Seattle, WA 98109 Job #:057977Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Provide nursing services to residents, while promoting the highest level of well-being, as directed by management* Administer medication and treatments according to health care providers' orders and state regulations* Assist resident care coordinator in creating individualized service plans based on resident needs* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Monitor resident responses to treatment plans and identify adverse medication interactions, alerting the resident care coordinator of any issues* Update resident records with information regarding nursing care, treatment plans and observationsRequired skills and qualifications:* Current Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) in the state of practice * One year of nursing experience, preferably in an assisted living environment* Proficiency with computers and Microsoft Office programs * Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior population  If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Wellness Nurse - LPN Job in Seattle,Part Time Employee,"Seattle, WA 98109",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Wellness-Nurse-LPN-Job-Seattle-WA-US-166748429.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,37dfdd3669a2d9c378074697a11600cb
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:51:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential Duties And Responsibilities:·         To fulfill the organization’s need to deliver nursing/personal care services to PACE participants consistent with physician’s orders, and interdisciplinary assessments and individualized plans of care. ·         Patient care is provided in compliance with PACE Model·         Provide support and education to caregivers of participants.  Provides direct supervision to the day center personal care assistants (PCA).Provides nursing care to participants utilizing the assessment, planning implementation and evaluation phases of nursing process in accordance with physician orders and the participant’s plan of care.Communicates effectively with physicians, staff members, and other agencies as needed to coordinate optimal care and use of resources for the participants/caregivers.Documents participant care delivered as planned and any variation, with appropriate rationale; makes and records observations related to impending or associated problems.Receive and document orders from physicians.Meet with interdisciplinary team as needed to review problems or unique issues from caseloads, share professional support and exchange feedback aimed toward developing and/or revising the patient/caregiver plan of care.Participates in the coordination of a 24 hour care delivery.Administer medications as ordered by the physician or nurse practitioner within nursing scope of practice.Document medication administration and disposal as appropriate.  Update medication record as needed.Assist participants with or delegate to unlicensed personnel activities of daily living such as personal care needs, nutritional needs and nursing needs under the supervision of the Health Care and Infection Control Director.Maintain PACE @ Home facilities to ensure a clean, safe environment for participants to reside. Participates in agency and community programs as requested to promote growth and understanding of PACE care.·     Only act within the scope of his or her authority to practice.·      Accepts other assignments as appropriate.Education:Must be a graduate of an accredited school of nursing and possess a current RN license.  Must maintain CPR and First Aid Certification. Experience:Must have practiced nursing in the last three years.   Position requires eighteen months RN experience with at least twelve of those months in geriatric practice area.  Must present credentials which demonstrate ability to meet performance criteria for the position and possess knowledge and skills necessary to treat geriatrics patients.Physical Requirements:Must be able to perform basic life operation skills of walking, sitting, standing, bending, reaching, twisting, talking and hearing.Requires crouching/squatting, kneeling.  Hand/finger dexterity and writing.·         Must be able to perform sedentary work; and to lift/move objects up to 50 pounds and be able to support, move, lift, transfer or reposition patients.·         Must possess the visual acuity to operate a computer terminal and to read and write.",Day Center Supervisor Job in Newton,Full Time,"Newton, NC 28658",,http://jobview.monster.com/Day-Center-Supervisor-Job-Newton-NC-US-166716825.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,,d64caf21239bccfd983c3a439e8c519e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:51:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"WANTED RN/LPN DAY SHIFT CNA'S NIGHT SHIFT UNIFORMS PROVIDED APPLY IN PERSON Camelot NURSING & Rehab CENTER 705 GRAND CANYON DR, FARMINGTON Camelot Nursing & Rehab is an EOE. We do not discriminate on the basis of race/color/national origin/age or disability",RN/LPN AND CNA Job in Farmington,Full Time,"Farmington, MO 63640",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/RN-LPN-CNA-Job-FARMINGTON-MO-US-166647198.aspx?ch=dailyjournal&mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f9162386fa93e0bbf439b096e8eb4089
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:51:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"VOLT’s client is looking for a Sr. Systems Engineer to ensure optimum performance of infrastructure and enterprise wide technology through the creation, advancement, and support of the technology, ensuring compatibility of design/components. This may include the operation of capacity software tools, and other software and hardware monitoring tools/technologies.Essential Functions: Responsible for long – term planning for enterprise wide technology aligned with organizational/GTS goals. Install, and maintain infrastructure throughout organization. Provide support for projects in relation to enterprise system requirements and testing as needed. Contribute technical expertise to the planning of system architecture. Develop/maintain policies and procedures surrounding enterprise – wide technology. Lead operations for system performance, complex problem determination, and resolution for systems at the different enterprise levels. Develop guidelines for system implementation in regards to retaining system security. Monitor system performance; perform complex problem determination, and resolution for systems at the different enterprise levels. Direct impact analysis regarding enterprise – wide technology. May perform capacity planning, including long-term plans, tracking, analysis and the impact and necessary modification of enterprise software and hardware. Technical expert for support of system integration, software and hardware at enterprise level for optimum performance. Remain current on new technologies; introduce applicable technology in alignment with client’s goals and for creative solutions. Drive constructive change and provide leadership. This is an estimated 12+ month Contingent/Temporary position in Rancho Cordova, CA and offered through Volt Technical Resources located in Spokane, WA. We are among the largest IT staffing companies in the US for contract/temporary and direct hire placements and support many of the top rated IT companies in the Pacific Northwest. To help Volt stay in touch with you and other great candidates in the Eastern Washington area we have created a specialized portal for you at http://www.volt.com/VoltEasternWA/   You can also follow us on Twitter at: http://www.twitter.com/VoltEasternWA . Start here to see much more: http://volt.com/social . Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or related field or equivalent experience. Minimum 8 years of related experience. Technical expert and leader for necessary input to project work. Knowledge of application architecture, operating systems, etc.; ability to perform job independently. Prefer capacity monitoring experience. Technical planning experience necessary. Ability to report on technical information, while tailoring to the audience. Excellent analytical and problem - solving skills for even most complex technical problems. Excellent organization and time management skills. Influence organizational best practices to better suit organization needs. Identify and mitigate risks; contribute to risk management plan. Excellent written and verbal communication skills to employees of all levels. Demonstrated ability to direct others to optimal outcomes. Ability to regularly exercise discretion and independent judgment in the performance of his/her job duties. Please note the following: This is a W2 position. Direct inquiries only. No 3rd party submittals please. This position is not available for Corp-to-Corp. This position is not available for Associate Vendors. How to Apply: Click on the Apply button to apply for this job. Our Recruiter will initiate a phone call to you and give you immediate consideration should your resume meet the job requirements.  Please rest assured that if your resume matches what is reflected in this job posting, you should receive a phone call from a Volt Recruiter to discuss this position with you. Volt has a talented and optimistic staffing team focused on the quality of your career. Volt has over 60 years of staffing experience.  We work with many of the Fortune 500 and 1000 companies to provide workforce solutions.  We offer many direct hire full-time positions as well as many contingent/temporary positions.  We offer our Workers competitive pay and benefits, as well as educational programs and re-deployment assistance. Volt is a publicly owned Corporation with shares trading on the over-the-counter market: http://www.otcmarkets.com under the trading symbol ""VISI"".  To learn more about Volt, please visit: http://www.volt.com and to see more of our job postings, please visit: http://jobs.volt.com Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Sr. Systems Engineer Job in Rancho Cordova,Full Time Employee,"Rancho Cordova, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Systems-Engineer-Job-Rancho-Cordova-CA-US-166688375.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=20,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,cdc223f348b3b18449602ce0fec3a58e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:51:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Data Scientist - Python, R, Julia Job in San Francisco 94108, California US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Senior Data Scientist Apply San Francisco, CA Full-Time $120,000 - $175,000 Job Details If you are a Senior Data Scientist with experience at a product-driven technology company, please read on!Job Title: Senior Data ScientistLocation: San Francisco, CAThe Salary: $120k- 175kThe Company: We have created web and mobile tools to help users in areas such as cognitive training, sleep, and mindfulness. These tools include games for improving memory, attention, flexibility, speed of processing, and problem solving. We are the leading brain training program with more than 50 million users. Come join our team of brainiacs and help build cognitive features for members all over the world!!Top Reasons to Work with Us- Weekly all-hands lunches for anyone to present their work- High percentage of promotion from within -Regular team bonding events- Always creating new products for our more than 70 million usersWhat You Will Be Doing- Work with product managers and designers to develop new product features based on insights that you find in our database of more than 3 billion gameplays- Create insights for our users connecting their game performance with cognitive performances in real world measures - Build models to personalize and segment out training, customer experience, and product marketing efforts- Build analytical tools to get a deep understanding of our users, how they answer key our product and games, and business questions- Collaborate with Engineering teams to create prototypes and production-grade modelsWhat You Need for this PositionRequirements:Bachelors in Computer Science or EquivalentPreferred Master or PhD in Computer Science, Data Science, Human Cognition, Neuroscience, or Behavioral ScienceMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Python or R orJulia- Linear Modeling- Hierarchical Bayes- Ensemble Models- random forest, gradient boosting- Survival Modes- SparkPluses:-Background in human cognition, neuroscience, or other behavioral sciences- Experience building and deploying production-grade statistical and machine learning models- Longitudinal dataWhat's In It for You- Competitive Salary- Great work environment- Immediate hireSo, if you are a Senior Data Scientist with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Amanda Wilson is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: AW2-1275226 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Amanda.Wilson@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: AW2-1275226 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Amanda Wilson | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",Senior Data Scientist,,"Senior Data Scientist - Python, R, Julia Job in San Francisco 94108, California US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Senior Data Scientist Apply San Francisco, CA Full-Time $120,000 - $175,000 Job Details If you are a Senior Data Scientist with experience at a product-driven technology company, please read on!Job Title: Senior Data ScientistLocation: San Francisco, CAThe Salary: $120k- 175kThe Company: We have created web and mobile tools to help users in areas such as cognitive training, sleep, and mindfulness. These tools include games for improving memory, attention, flexibility, speed of processing, and problem solving. We are the leading brain training program with more than 50 million users. Come join our team of brainiacs and help build cognitive features for members all over the world!!Top Reasons to Work with Us- Weekly all-hands lunches for anyone to present their work- High percentage of promotion from within -Regular team bonding events- Always creating new products for our more than 70 million usersWhat You Will Be Doing- Work with product managers and designers to develop new product features based on insights that you find in our database of more than 3 billion gameplays- Create insights for our users connecting their game performance with cognitive performances in real world measures - Build models to personalize and segment out training, customer experience, and product marketing efforts- Build analytical tools to get a deep understanding of our users, how they answer key our product and games, and business questions- Collaborate with Engineering teams to create prototypes and production-grade modelsWhat You Need for this PositionRequirements:Bachelors in Computer Science or EquivalentPreferred Master or PhD in Computer Science, Data Science, Human Cognition, Neuroscience, or Behavioral ScienceMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Python or R orJulia- Linear Modeling- Hierarchical Bayes- Ensemble Models- random forest, gradient boosting- Survival Modes- SparkPluses:-Background in human cognition, neuroscience, or other behavioral sciences- Experience building and deploying production-grade statistical and machine learning models- Longitudinal dataWhat's In It for You- Competitive Salary- Great work environment- Immediate hireSo, if you are a Senior Data Scientist with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Amanda Wilson is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: AW2-1275226 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Amanda.Wilson@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: AW2-1275226 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Amanda Wilson | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Data-Scientist-Python-R-Julia-Job-San-Francisco-CA-US-166702356.aspx?mescoid=1500152001001&jobPosition=9,,,1d628e2e85753239e989c38a3bb44ea0
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:49:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: TinkerAir Force BasePosition: Health Promotion EducatorGCI is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, disability, or national origin. GCI gives preferential treatment to veterans.Global Consulting International seeks candidates for a full time position providing Health Promotion Educator services to the men and women of the United States Air Force and their families at Tinker AFB in Oklahoma.HEALTH PROMOTION EDUCATOR Summary: Strengthens human performance and total force readiness by providing health behavior awareness, education and intervention programs while promoting an environment that facilitates healthy behaviors targeted at Air Force Medical Service (AFMS) beneficiaries. Responsible for planning, coordinating, implementing and evaluating all Health Promotion (HP) prevention programs and services IAW Air Force instructions, guidelines, and population needs. Administers assessments, counseling, comprehensive prevention programs, and various other health behavior activities that meet AF HP physical activity, tobacco prevention and cessation, healthy weight, nutrition and community partnership goals and the needs of the AF community. The organizational location of this position is the installation Medical Treatment Facility (MTF). Coordinates with HP staff to deliver programs in a variety of community settings to include individual unit worksites, community facilities, and the MTF. 1 Qualifications: 1.1 A bachelor's or master's degree from an accredited institution in Health Education, Community Health Education or Public Health. 1.2 Eligible for Certification in Health Education from the National Commission for Health Education Credentialing (NCHEC). NCHEC certification preferred. 1.3 Possesses a minimum of three years’ experience in health promotion planning and programming, preferably in a worksite setting. 1.4 Maintains continuing education requirements for CHES certification currency. 1.5 Should be a role model in weight, fitness and other healthy lifestyle behaviors 2 TYPE OF WORK. The duties include but are not limited to the following: 2.1 Implements/executes health promotion, fitness and nutrition policy and program requirements IAW instructions and guidance established locally or by AF/SG. 2.2 Assists in the development of ongoing action plans aligned with goals and objectives of the PHWG, IDS, and appropriate leadership. Reviews the action plan at least annually to evaluate program effectiveness.2.3 Helps plan, coordinate, market and conduct evidence-based programs and services aimed at health improvement and mission performance related to HP goal areas. 2.4 Accesses available population database support and collaborates with population health planners (e.g. Health Care Integrator) to effectively assess population needs and target installation HPO for individuals and groups. 2.5 Provides health education expertise, consultancy, and advocacy to support a comprehensive Air Force Fitness Program and other unit-based health promotion initiatives 2.6 Maintains data quality management in program execution. 2.7 Collaborates with installation health professionals and organizational leaders to identify and employ resources as appropriate to execute comprehensive prevention programs. 2.8 Communicates and coordinates health promotion programs among local leadership and target customers/beneficiaries. 2.9 Provides input when annual budgets are established. 2.10 Teaches individuals and groups on a variety of health-related topics employing age-specific and behavioral learning theory (e.g. adult learning theory, motivational interviewing). 2.11 Delivers HP briefings, educational sessions, and seminars/workshops as required. 2.12 Provides expertise to develop, deliver and evaluate training programs for professional staff and colleagues on HP-related topics. 2.13 Operates the most current computer software and multi-media to develop and execute training and educational programs. 2.14 Implements appropriate social marketing tools to meet program goals and objectives. 2.15 Participates in teleconferences, updates, working groups, review panels, symposiums, etc. related to health promotion programming or operations. 2.16 Maintains positive relationships with both internal and external AFMS customers. 2.17 Ensures compliance with Air Force Inspection Agency and the Joint Commission, and Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care. 2.18 Will be required to travel, at Government expense, to attend directed training and/or conferences.",Health Promotion Educator - Tinker AFB Job in T A F B,Full Time,"T A F B, OK 73145",,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Promotion-Educator-Tinker-AFB-Job-T-A-F-B-OK-US-166671868.aspx?mescoid=2100319001001&jobPosition=15,,,a9bcf9a114831d8ff9ff1adedc6ca200
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:21:49:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description:The Application Analyst is responsible for leading in all facets of the systems development lifecycle for application enhancements and existing production systems of various sizes and complexities.  The Application Analyst performs many of these tasks independently and communicates with the appropriate teams to ensure that assignments are delivered with the highest of quality and in accordance to standards.  The Application Analyst may complete coding assignments when necessary to meet the needs of the business. Role model and demonstrate the company’s core values of respect, honesty, integrity, diversity, inclusion and safety of others.   Essential Job Functions:·        Partner with appropriate teams to deliver software solutions according to SDLC best practices.·        Partner with the appropriate teams to expedite issue resolution and manage to SLAs.·        Lead and participate in the design and implementation of large and/or architecturally significant applications.·        Champion company standards and best practices.  Work to continuously improve software delivery processes and practices.·        Build partnerships across the application, business and infrastructure teams.·        Support and maintain applications utilizing required tools and technologies.  Provide support for applications, including involvement with the appropriate teams.  Provide off-hours support (24 x 7) as required.·        Establish priorities for enhancements/modifications of application.·        Develop programming specifications.  May design, code and unit test application code using SDLC best practices for application services functions.·        Complete estimates and work plans independently as appropriate for design, development, implementation and rollout tasks.·        Assist other personnel on assignments including mentoring or providing on-the-job training to more junior associates.  Mentor team members in software development principles, patterns, processes and practices.·        May mentor or coach the day-to-day work activities of other junior team members.·        Must be able to perform the essential functions of this position with or without reasonable accommodation. Requirements:·        7 or more years’ experience in system analysis, design or programming and the associated development methodologies.·        4 or more years of direct experience delivering solutions using DB2 IBM Content Manager.·        Some experience developing document workflow using DB2 IBM Content Manager.·        2 or more years direct experience in Java/JEE development·        Understanding of  IBM WebSphere Application Server ·        Proven communication and presentation skills to effectively communicate information to customers and to all levels within the organization.·        Ability to interact well in a team environment.·        Experience with project planning. Desired Previous Job Experience:·        IS related associate degree, or a bachelor’s degree, or comparable work experience in an Information Systems position or related business position.·        Experience with Genus Media Upshot a PLUS·        Proven problem solving experience with production enterprise systems Prior experience with project planning with large size or large level complexity projects.Ascendum provides: ·         Health and Dental benefits to all consultants. ·         401(k) Retirement plan with employer contribution. ·         Paid vacation and sick days.We welcome inquiries from applicants only (We will not accept third parties or agencies for this opportunity). Candidates must be authorized to work permanently in the United States. Due to the volume of resumes that we receive, only those candidates selected for review will be contacted. Ascendum is an equal opportunity employer.",Application Analyst (Java) Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Cincinnati, OH 45242",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Application-Analyst-Java-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-166718665.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=18,"75,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",IT/Software Development,9d0498e406d49f7a3c83872fa43d030f
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:20:56:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Mobile Application Software Developer in Olathe, KS. Essential Functions and Duties: Program, test and support mobile applications for iOS and Android Coordinate with server-side engineers to design efficient, flexible RESTful APIs Conduct research, make recommendations, and learn how to utilize new technologies Respond quickly to application errors Maintain an increasing level of proficiency in software and other technologies supported by the IT Dept. Participate in company technology projects as neededREQUIREMENTS:Ideal candidate will possess skills in at least 5 of these technologies: Experience with X-Code and Android Studio Experience creating UIs for Android and/or iOS mobile platforms Java, JavaScript, CSS, HTML5, Swift or a functional programming language Experience with integrating mobile apps with enterprise data using RESTful APIsAbilities: Ability to take a project from scoping requirements through actual launch of the project Aptitude for innovative and analytical thinking and problem solving Willingness to take initiative in quickly learning new technologies and skills Ability to work in a fast-paced, dynamic team environment Ability to work collaboratively with both technical and functional/end users Aptitude for research and quick learning of new technologiesEducation/Experience: Four-year degree in Computer Science or related discipline Two to five years of experience developing web or mobile applications Experience with Agile development with quick turnarounds",Mobile Application Software Developer Job in Olathe,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Olathe, KS 66061",,http://jobview.monster.com/Mobile-Application-Software-Developer-Job-Olathe-KS-US-166660249.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0dc76b252245a3d1b67fc494af11abc1
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:20:56:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Build Laptop / desktop computers, peripherals and configure network connections  Install, Configure and test the Operating Systems and its functionality,  Experience on install, configure and troubleshoot Desktop / laptop hardware  Install and configure Standard and business applications, Microsoft Outlook, Web Browsers etc.,  Experience on Basic Windows Active Directory troubleshooting, Network related troubleshooting  Should have an experience on Install, configure, update and troubleshoot Printers, scanners, Fax, copier etc.,  Extend computer support for systems software  Support and troubleshoot RSA/VPN remote connections.  Experience on Windows Users profile management  Experience on Windows System reimage  Experience on Desktop Backup / restore  Experience Access Management: Grant / remove Windows user / group access based on the user request  Experience on Ticketing tool  When the restoration is beyond the scope of the computers, laptops, printers and any other authorized peripheral equipment the Desktop Support Administrator will escalate the issue/problem to proper Tier 3 support team member  Knowledge on ITIL Processes  Develop trends by monitoring and analyzing incoming calls, problems and support requests.  Interact with users on desktop problems and their resolution.  Experience on Create Standard Operating Procedures, user guide and process documents.  Adhere to policies as per corporate manuals and directives.  Train end users on usage of computer hardware and software. Technical Skills SNo Primary Skill Proficiency Level * Rqrd./Dsrd. 1 CICS Administration PL2 Required     * Proficiency Legends     Proficiency Level Generic Reference PL1 The associate has basic awareness and comprehension of the skill and is in the process of acquiring this skill through various channels. PL2 The associate possesses working knowledge of the skill, and can actively and independently apply this skill in engagements and projects. PL3 The associate has comprehensive, in-depth and specialized knowledge of the skill. She / he has extensively demonstrated successful application of the skill in engagements or projects. PL4 The associate can function as a subject matter expert for this skill. The associate is capable of analyzing, evaluating and synthesizing solutions using the skill.       Organization Marketing Statement Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centers worldwide and approximately 218,000 employees as of June 30, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on Twitter: Cognizant.       Additional Information:",DESKSIDE SUPPORT Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10010",All,http://jobview.monster.com/DESKSIDE-SUPPORT-Job-New-York-NY-US-166617355.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,60a10b2dddad0a4cb24205acb9347b8e
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:20:24:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Communication is the heartbeat of any Army National Guard unit. By joining the Army National Guard as a Signal Support Systems Specialist, you will keep the information flowing by making sure all communications equipment is in top working order. And while you maintain signal support devices and terminals in the Army National Guard, you will be building skills that will help you in your civilian career. Signal Support Systems Specialists are responsible for integrating signal systems and networks; performing signal support functions and unit-level maintenance on authorized signal equipment; and installing, operating, and maintaining radio and data distribution systems. In this role, you will train and provide technical assistance to users of signal equipment and learn to operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on vehicles and power generators. And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers; maintain and install signal support systems and terminal devices; provide technical assistance and training for automation and communications equipment; prepare maintenance and supply requests for unit-level signal support; and operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on assigned vehicles. Plus, the skills you learn will prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in communications equipment, radio, and teletype repair. These skills are also in demand by the federal government. Civilian positions may require additional study in electronics, where you will have the opportunity to qualify for certification as an Associate Certified Electronics Technician. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 17 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training. This is where you will learn mechanical, electronic, and electrical principles; line installation; wiring techniques; preventative maintenance procedures; and communication security policies and procedures. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Signal Support Systems Specialist Job in Mather  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Mather 95655,,http://jobview.monster.com/Signal-Support-Systems-Specialist-Job-MATHER-166722550.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=2,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,62965d9bff99408e4112bed1882276fe
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:20:22:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company InformationAtos is a leader in digital services with 2014 pro forma annual revenue of circa € 11 billion and 93,000 employees in 72 countries. Serving a global client base, the Group provides Consulting & Systems Integration services, Managed Services & BPO, Cloud operations, Big Data & Cyber-security solutions, as well as transactional services through Worldline, the European leader in the payments and transactional services industry. With its deep technology expertise and industry knowledge, Atos works with clients across different business sectors: Defense, Financial Services, Health, Manufacturing, Media, Utilities, Public sector, Retail, Telecommunications, and Transportation.Atos is the Worldwide Information Technology Partner for the Olympic & Paralympic Games and is listed on the Euronext Paris market. Atos operates under the brands Atos, Atos Consulting, Atos Worldgrid, Bull, Canopy, and Worldline. Our ability to deliver Operational Excellence means that we are always ready and able to help our clients address whatever challenges they face, wherever they are in the world. We also place great emphasis on understanding and meeting the needs and priorities of our clients, including their sustainability objectives.Atos values the individual and strives to deliver an appropriate work-life balance because a motivated and happy person can add untold value to our clients and colleagues around the world. For more information, please see the Atos corporate web site: www.atos.net.Atos is an EEO employer, providing employment opportunity regardless of race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin veteran status, disability or other factors protected by law.Job DescriptionThis position is to provide support to our customers that have experienced issues with their PCs that are unable to be resolved via Remote Support. Customers and on-site support staff are directed to send their PCs into our Technology Center Depot to resolve issues.Business objective or service provided by this function: The Depot / Technical services team is extremely cross functional. They are responsible for all activities associated with the PC (hardware) activities within the Asset Technology Center team. The activities include, imaging, data scrubs, data recovery, data encryption, data de-encryption, warranty repair, warranty service claims, machine rebuilds, machine refurbishment, customer data transfer support, and data backup support. In conjunction PC life cycle, support all repair (Incident) tickets that the Remote Desktop Team cannot correct over the phone. This includes data recovery / backup / de-encryption, installation of new imaged hard drive, image set-up and data transfer. The SLA agreement for this activity is 48 hours from receipt of unit in the Depot, the unit must be shipped back to the user.Primary duties and responsibilities include, but are not limited to:- Install Standard image on machines and test.- Troubleshoot equipment failures and perform warranty and non-warranty repairs- Data de-encryption / encryption using provided tools and process- Data recovery- Converse with clients as required to determine details of equipment problems- Follow proven practices to install/repair/replace/test equipment- Responsible for answering questions posed by the end users- Maintain appropriate documentation of service calls from open to close- Support Asset management CMDB verification during provided service- Obtain Dell, Lenovo and HP Hardware certifications. Training provided through OEM if not currently certified.- Support Technology Refresh program by imaging machines and prepare for deployment.- Familiar with BMC Remedy Ticketing and Service Now systems preferred.- PC Hardware and Software skills required.- Proficient with MS Office applications & Excel.- Physically able to assist with imaging new hardware and performing data scrubs on used hardware.- Good organizational skills to maintain a clean configuration work area. Job Requirements- Computer Skills- Microsoft Office with Emphasis on Outlook, Excel and Word.- Experience with all aspects of PC hardware repairs, troubleshooting and replacing parts.- Support Asset management CMDB verification during provided service- Dell, Lenovo and HP Hardware certifications.- PC Hardware and Software skills required.- Strong Organizational skills - ability to multi-task with attention to detail.- Team player- ability to interact and work well with others on the team.- Professional Etiquette- Ability to conduct self professionally with vendors and clients.- Ability to ship and receive equipment, track shipments incoming and out going. Update ITSM Asset Tracking system.",Computer System Technician Job in Webster,Full Time,"Webster, NY",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Computer-System-Technician-Job-Webster-NY-US-166657699.aspx?mescoid=1700221001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e1f8ea1d7d107c1ae5e6a38b49a67cc5
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:27:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:-Client is seeking a Data Migration/Implementation Director.Responsibilities: -Based on business growth, our client requires additional support to manage the ramp up of a large managed service project centered on a high transaction central database system and gateways for the industry and operators.-It involves managing a complex project that is under pre- award development, matching customer needs as outlined in a RFP, with client resources to achieve project functional, quality and timeline objectives.-The system under development will replace an existing, fully operational system. -The role of Data Migration/Implementation Manager focuses on designing and implementing and plan to migrate data and interfacing gateways from the incumbent system to the iconectiv service. -The job will require strong background and experience in data migration, Data Center and project management disciplines -Design and implement a detailed go-live (deployment) plan that includes testing and acceptance, data migration, operations readiness testing, industry coordination, status and reporting, issue and jeopardy management, contingency rollback planning etc.-Manage the lead up and execution of nation-wide cutover event including multiple service partners and integration points: Governance and control, jeopardy assessment and management, C-level communications and status.-Heavy interaction with technical staff of Industry players, including incumbent service provider.-Management and coordination of internal teams, all in the service of a tight Q-gate process (go/no go) and a smooth and successful cutover event.-Develop, test and implement Data Migration plan to migrate data from Incumbent service Provider.-Interface with Development team and System's engineering team to finalize the technical DM solution (high level plan, process and tools already exists)-Manage small team of technicians to test and execute DM plan during industry test and Go-Live activities.Qualifications: -Strong leadership and teaming skills-Good familiarity with IT technology and processes-Good experience with system deployment, system integration and cutover projects-Good Planning and Project management-Good communication and presentation skills-Understand risk mitigation and contingency planning -Strong bent for quality processes and results-Strong Customer and negotiation skills-Familiarity with Local Number Portability industry and processes is a plus-Ability to interface and lead industry activities-Relevant Data Migration experience and current DM tools and processes a must-MS Project-Microsoft Office Suite-Rational suite-Ability to work in dynamic environment",Data Migration/Implementation Director Job in Piscataway,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Piscataway, NJ",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Data-Migration-Implementation-Director-Job-Piscataway-NJ-US-166613688.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,b6e4811cc73a6881f49ab6094dee89d4
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:26:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you ready to become a part of some amazing nursing teams?  If yes, then come join our fun, lively team of nurses at The Gardens on University AND YOU WILL BE ELIGIBLE FOR OUR EXCEPTIONAL SIGN ON BONUSES.  Our center offers a family atmosphere as well as a full continuum of services and care focused around each individual in today’s ever-changing health care environment. We are currently hiring for an RN Resident Care Manager who can be a true leader and guide our nursing team to success! APPLY TODAY and you can be working at on our 5 star, award winning center soon! http://www.gardensonuniversityskillednursing.com In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for FT Licensed Nurses and all non-union positionsPAY BY EXPERIENCEMedical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/monthOver 1 week vacation (eligible after only 90 days) PLUS 1 week of sick timeEducational Assistance up to $2,500/yr401 (k) Retirement Program, ST and LT Disability as well as FREE Life InsuranceNew attendance program where you can earn up to 4 ADDITIONAL DAYS OFFAt our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.At our center, you will be able to grow your career. At our center, we provide support and resources. At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans.POSITION SUMMARY: Under the supervision of the DON the Unit Manager assumes responsibility and accountability for assigned core programs.  Leadership is provided to all nursing staff through daily oversight of nursing care on the assigned unit(s).  Unit Managers adhere to the standards of care, manage the environment to maintain resident/patient safety, and supervise the resident/patient care activities performed by RNs, LPNs and Nursing Assistants.  May act on behalf of the DON in her/his absence.  Follows all Center policies and procedures and performs duties as defined by the State Nurse Practice Act.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: Oversees all nursing staff of an assigned unit.   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.    Supervisory Responsibilities•             Makes daily work assignments.•             *Directs the work of employees.•             Schedules lunch and rest breaks•             Authorizes early departure from work.•             Authorizes overtime.•             Reassigns employees from one area to another area as facility needs dictate.•             Prepares written evaluations of assigned employees.•             Enforces facility policies with authority to issue Disciplinary Action Reports as needed.•             Authority to suspend employees for rules violation.•             Initials time records to authorize variances.•             Interviews applicants that will be assigned to his/her area of responsibility.•             Receives and handles employee complaints.•             *Participates in training programs and assists in orientation of new staff.•             Review all daily physician Orders  check follow through•             Attends standup and reviews 24-hour report•             On call as scheduled•             Assist with resolution of resident/family concerns 2.            Responsible for over seeing assigned Center core programs3.            *Complies with laws and regulations applicable to position and act in accordance with Center Health Services, Inc.’s Corporate Compliance Program.4.            Treats all residents, visitors, and staff with courtesy.5.            *Attends and participates in in-service training, performance improvement (“PI”) committees and other meetings as scheduled and directed.6.            Follows facility dress and hygiene policies.7.            Safety•             Knows and follows facility rules.•             *Demonstrates proper use of equipment.  Reports equipment needs or repairs.•             Follows facility-smoking policies.•             Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents, staff or visitors to the appropriate facility personnel.•             Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment to Supervisor.•             *Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents, as assigned in Facility Disaster Plan.•             Uses required protective equipment.•             Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.8.            Resident Rights•             Knows Resident Rights.  Helps the residents/patients exercise and/or protect their rights.•             Reports resident/patient complaints to management.•             Maintains confidentiality of resident/patient information. Other Duties: •             Participates in evening manager program as assigned•             Support and assist with Mentor and Greeting programs•             *Participates in all-hands dining.•             *Performs other duties as directed by facility management.•             *Participates in marketing events.•             *Works overtime, holiday and weekend hours as scheduled. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Possesses a current license to practice in the State as an RN. Experience: At least one year of prior supervisory experience preferred.  Prior experience working in a long-term care facility required. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Ability to relate positively, effectively and appropriately with residents, families, community members, volunteers and other facility staff.  Possess special interest in, and a positive attitude about, working with long-term care residents and the elderly. Ability to read, write, speak and understand English. Meets all health requirements, as required by law. Knowledge of long term rules and regulations.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word, MS Access, MS Excel, E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer.  ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, pushing, pulling and twisting.  The tasks on this position description marked with an asterisk (*) are those that regularly require these physical activities.  All employees of nursing homes may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents.  Lifting and/or transferring some residents will require use of a lifting device and /or assistance of other staff.",RN Resident Care Manager $,Full Time,"Spokane, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Resident-Care-Manager-20-000-Sign-On-The-Gardens-Job-Spokane-WA-US-166716443.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=4,,,59c23842cb58e97fb482a3e417f008e1
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:25:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. As a Home Health Medical Social Worker, you will:Instruct, treat, observe and evaluate patients exhibiting significant social and emotional problems affecting their health status.Participate in the development and periodic re-evaluation of the physician’s Plan of Treatment.Instruct and counsel patients and families in treating and coping with social and emotional response connected with the illness.Regularly assess the patient and family psychosocial needs.Regularly assess the pre-bereavement/anticipatory grief needs.Implement the Plan of Care provisions to meet their needs, which include: social service goals for alleviating problems, supportive counseling, problem solving, community referrals, etcRequired SkillsQualifications:Master’s Degree from a school of social work accredited by the Council on Social Work EducationMinimum of one year social work experience in a healthcare setting or social services agencyCurrent Social Worker licenseHome Health experience a plusKnowledge of and ability to obtain community resources (information and referral, state/federal financial programs and eligibility requirements, etc.).Strong organizational and communication skillsRequired Experience Keywords:  Case management, case manager, case worker, clinical social work, clinical social worker, community outreach, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, human services, LMSW, LSW, L.M.S.W., L.S.W., medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, PRN, PDM, social work, social worker, MSW, M.S.W., medical social work, medical social worker, master social work, master social worker, master’s social work, master’s social worker, mastered social work, mastered social worker, hospice, palliative care, social services, hospice social work, hospice social worker, palliative care social work, palliative care social worker, end of life support, end of life care, certified hospice and palliative social worker, CHP-SW, CHP SW NASW, National Association of Social Workers, home health social work, home health social worker, SW job, SW jobs, MSW job, MSW jobs, clinical social work job, clinical social work jobs, clinical social worker job, clinical social worker jobs, LMSW job, LMSW jobs, LSW job, LSW jobs, L.M.S.W. job, L.M.S.W. jobs, L.S.W. job, L.S.W. jobs~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. Job LocationFlorence, South Carolina, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Home Health Medical Social Worker Job in Florence,,"Florence, SC",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Home-Health-Medical-Social-Worker-Job-Florence-SC-US-166746346.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=7,,,013fecb4e6280c3a894534c308b0c5a0
United States of America,US,02/Nov/2015:18:25:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Water Treatment Specialist in the Army National Guard, you will make sure your fellow Soldiers have clean water and live and work in sanitary conditions.Water Treatment Specialists are part of the Army National Guard's environmental health and safety team, using their acquired knowledge and skills to fulfill several vital needs. These skills include site reconnaissance and preparation for water treatment activity, as well as setup of equipment and facilities; operation and maintenance of water treatment equipment; management of potable water supplies; monitoring the storage, transport, and disposal of waste; water quality analysis and testing; and the inspection of facilities and food supplies for the presence of disease, germs, and other environmentally hazardous conditions.These are skills that are in demand by local, state, and federal government agencies for food and drug inspectors, public health inspectors, health and safety inspectors, and industrial hygienists. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Water Treatment Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! As an Army National Guard Water Treatment Specialist, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After nine weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 10 weeks of Advanced Individual Training that will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn how to identify health hazards and how to inspect food products, food service operations, wastewater, and waste disposal facilities. You may even qualify for a certified apprenticeship in this occupation. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Water Treatment Specialist Job in Dubuque  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Dubuque 52002,,http://jobview.monster.com/Water-Treatment-Specialist-Job-DUBUQUE-166725328.aspx?mescoid=5100986001001&jobPosition=5,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,83399237ebb2e10ab560be4ff1eac855
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:10:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"I believe that better care begins at home.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladder for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Registered Nurse, you will: Provide admission, case management, and follow-up skilled nursing visits for home health patients.Administer on-going care and case management for each patient, provide necessary follow-up as directed by the Clinical Manager.Confer with physician in developing the initial plan of treatment based on physician's orders and initial patient assessment.  Provide hands-on care, management and evaluation of the care plan and teaching of the patient in accordance with physician orders, under Clinical Manager's supervision.  Revise plan in consultation with physician based on ongoing assessments and as required by policy/regulation.Coordinate appropriate care, encompassing various healthcare personnel (such as Physical Therapists, Occupational Therapists, Home Health Aides and external providers).Report patient care/condition/progress to patient's physician and Clinical Manager on a continuous basis. Implement patient care plan in conjunction with patient and family to assist them in achieving optimal resolution of needs/problems. Coordinate/oversee/supervise the work of Home Health Aides, Certified Home Health Aides and Personal Care Workers and provides written personal care instructions/care plan that reflect current plan of care.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Discharge patients after consultation with the physician and Clinical Manager, preparing and completing needed clinical documentation.Prepare appropriate medical documentation on all patients, including any case conferences, patient contacts, medication order changes, re-certifications, progress updates, and care plan changes.  Prepare visit/shift reports, updates/summarizes patient records, and confers with other health care disciplines in providing optimum patient care.QualificationsDiploma, Associate or Bachelor Degree in NursingMinimum of one year nursing experience preferredStrong med surg, ICU, ER, acute experienceHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Keywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse ~MON~All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVA",Full Time Home Health Registered Nurse Job in Thomasville,Full Time Employee,"Thomasville, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/full-time-home-health-registered-nurse-job-thomasville-ga-us-178324899.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,71e582ce29c080ef7e324cb28cecfe4a
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:27:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently looking for quality Machine OperatorsThe type of machine doesn't matterMust be able to stand for 8 hours a dayMust be able to work 7 days a week as neededMust be open if alternate shiftsMust be willing to work in the Assembly Dept alsoWorking hours: all shiftsSkills:Must have steel-toed bootsMust have a High School DiplomaMust be able to work in Food GradeRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Machine Operator Job in Fairburn,Full Time Employee,"Fairburn, GA 30213",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/machine-operator-job-fairburn-ga-us-178468156.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=12,10.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,,50ebc2fbb18aef7e8a5920187d7a5980
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:30:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad at Cobb is currently hiring a Project Manager with a creative mind for a client in the local Smyrna area. Come join a company which is People Focused, respecting and listening to both internal employees and external customers. The company is seeking like- minded individuals who work well together within team based environments and who will do whatever it takes to resolve customer needs. You will be responsible for improving performance, productivity, efficiency and profitability through the implementation of effective methods and strategies. The Position will also require to be an interface to the Logistic team and daily Staging projects. 70% of work time is in-house, 30% property previews and/or meeting with strategic clients. It also requires the review of all our Design implementations to ensure it aligns with our overall Branding.Responsibilities include but not limited to:- Leading and coaching a team of Designers- Ensuring product process is executed in a timely and consistent manner- Ensuring the Logistics Team have a seamless end-to-end process- Ensuring customer satisfaction- Compose daily reports, and be present for daily calls- Add creativity to a project, but will not design the project- Understands the monetary goals of the company, and will create processes to optimize revenueWorking hours: 8:00 AM - 5:00 PMSkills:Skills and Qualifications include:- Professional college degree in Interior Design, AND a professional license in Interior Design OR demonstrate 10 years of post-college experience in design and furniture project management.- 7-10 years of experience managing design and merchandising projects- Demonstrated ability to manage multiple projects in a fast moving business- Demonstrated ability to deal effectively with team and clients to resolve open issues providing excellent customer service and client satisfaction- Ability to develop read/interpret design and construction drawings, furniture installation plans- Must be organized, timely and customer service oriented- Excellent oral and written communication and customer service skills.- Adequate knowledge of organizational effectiveness and operations management- Working knowledge of budgets, forecasting and metrics- Good IT skills (Dropbox, MS Office, Floor planning tools etc.)- Excellent Leadership skillsRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Project Manager with Design Background Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30082",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-with-design-background-job-smyrna-ga-us-178459820.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,"57,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",,0dfd640cd425bf1b7185f500aa7f8ff8
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:42:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Test Lab Manager is needed for a leading consumer goods manufacturer. The Test Lab Manager is responsible for managing and leading a team of lab technicians conducting testing on new goods and products. Daily responsibilities include managing tests and requirements, developing test methods, and reporting data and analysis. Qualified candidates must have 2+ years’ of experience managing a test lab, preferably for consumer goods, and a BS degree, ideally in engineering. This is a direct hire position is located in the northern Metro Atlanta (Buford) area. Candidates will be required to travel to Sandy Springs until January. Relocation assistance may e considered for qualified regional candidates. Responsibilities for the Lab ManagerManage a teams of full time test technicians; oversee scheduling of projects and test requests to assure on-time delivery of test reportsPerform product testing for internal evaluation as well as for customer and consumer testingDevelop, maintain and update test methods, procedures, and equipment Conduct data analysis, archiving, and reportingAssist technical and financial evaluation of competitive productsRequirements for the Lab ManagerBS degree, preferably in engineering 2+ years’ of experience managing a test lab, preferably for consumer goodPrior management or supervisory experience Textile experience is coveted <Benefits for the Lab ManagerComprehensive benefits 401 KCareer growth opportunities This Job is located in Atlanta, GA -> United States",Lab Manager - Textile/Lab Supervisor/Test Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30328",,http://jobview.monster.com/lab-manager-textile-lab-supervisor-test-job-atlanta-ga-us-178559254.aspx?mescoid=1100048001001&jobPosition=19,"80,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",,39f58e3e107147a8d53a40fd614abe83
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:43:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job 3127, PRODUCT DEVELOPMENT  ENGINEER, RUBBER PROFILE AND PLASTIC PROFILE:  GA location, near Atlanta. The Atlanta region has many pluses, from sport teams to great restaurants and night spots, to solid schools  (public and private) and numerous places to take day trips and visit.  It has a reputation of being family oriented, and it is deservedly so.  Our customer offers not only an exciting place to live, but plenty of opportunity to advance in your career.   If working for a solid international company  in a high visibility position  is at the top of your list, this just might be your ideal opportunity.  ·         You will be responsible for interfacing with customers, engineers, new product designers, product launch management and plant support.·         You will develop and optimize high value, cost effective new part of system designs based on customer requirements.·         As you partner with senior management you will assist in steering the strategic direction of the company to new heights.·         Duties will include creating original product design and reviewing design for manufacturability; working with customers to resolve product application issues and directing tool design and fabrication.  You will also monitor, measure and report on key performance indicators (KPI’s) for the department. You will launch capex projects and coordinate applicable product testing.   Requirements include a·         BS in Engineering, ·         Rubber profile extrusion and custom manufacturing ·         Working knowledge of Solidworks 3D CAD·         Plastic profile extrusion of TPV, TPE and PVC is preferred·         5 years relevant experience including product design and development is preferred. Our customer offers a solid benefits package, opportunity for professional growth, relocation assistance and a salary in the $90 - $110K range.  The ability to work in the U.S. without sponsorship is required. ProTech 2, Inc. specializes in the recruitment of technical, engineering, manufacturing and management personnel for the plastics industry (medical, consumer goods, packaging, automotive, building products, and more).  We have nation-wide clients who seek top plastic professionals with experience in thermoforming, injection molding, blow molding, blown film, or extrusion processes.  We sincerely appreciate your giving us the opportunity of working with you on your career search.  Please visit our website, www.plasticsgal.com, to view all of our current openings.       Report",ProTech,"Full Time, Employee","Contact name Lori Greene Phone 703-347-6872 Fax 877-903-8427 Address PO Box 7173Alexandria, VA 22307",,http://jobview.monster.com/product-development-engineer-rubber-profile-plastic-profile-job-atlanta-ga-us-150973493.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=5,,,6bb8db510a4b0aefe5b69272a01e9049
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:48:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionGot a knack for keeping cars and trucks on the road? Then join the Army National Guard as a Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic and help keep freedom moving forward.As a Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic, you will have the opportunity to supervise and perform unit maintenance and recovery operations on gasoline - and diesel - fueled light-wheeled vehicles. In short, if it's on wheels, you'll work on it. And after your paid training, you'll be qualified to maintain and repair any number of vehicle systems and components, preparing you to step right into a civilian vehicle maintenance career.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 10 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Light-Wheel Vehicle Mechanic Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30336",,http://jobview.monster.com/91b-light-wheel-vehicle-mechanic-job-atlanta-ga-us-178125547.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,32107acd98f200b69fb11cc68e774f14
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:48:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you flexible to work 7am - 7pm or 7pm - 7am 3 days on, 3 days off including weekends?Randstad has a need for a fast paced machine operator in a climate controlled plastics company in Marietta. You will be loading machine so the machine can assemble parts.Must be flexible to work day shift or over night3 days on, 3 days off ongoing, including weekendPay: $10 - $12 per hourThis position is NOT located on the bus line, you must have other means of transportationOpportunities for overtime!!Working hours: 7am - 7pm, 3days on, 3days off ongoing including weekendsSkills:6 months machine operator experience in the last 2 yearsPlastics background preferredPrevious experience working a 12 hour shiftAble to work all days or nights including weekendsRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Machine Operator Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30062",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/machine-operator-job-marietta-ga-us-178573905.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=13,10.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,,308ab876b2f5b69773bdb31302733cd3
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:48:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"SummaryPlans, coordinates and manages the nursing department. Responsible for the overall direction, coordination and evaluation of nursing care and services provided to the residents. Ensures quality care that is consistent with company and regulatory standards. May be designated to assume responsibilities of daily operations of the facility in the Administrator's absence.Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesEnsures nursing staff is providing quality and appropriate resident / patient care that meets or exceeds company and regulatory standards.Assists in the preparation of annual budget for facility. Monitors monthly performance of nursing services in relation to budget and intervenes as needed.Schedules and performs resident / patient rounds to monitor and evaluate the quality and appropriateness of nursing care.Maintains administrative authority, responsibility and accountability for the proper charting and documentation of care and of medications and treatments.Recruits, hires, provides orientation/training, and retains a sufficient number of qualified staff to carry out nursing programs and services. Ensures employee performance meets or exceeds expectations and periodic performance appraisals are conducted on a timely basis.Develops and implements the written staffing plan and nursing schedule that reflects the needs of the resident and resident population.Ensures all required records are maintained and submitted, as appropriate, in an accurate and timely manner.Evaluates current and potential residents and patients to ensure facility can provide appropriate level of care.Evaluates market studies and develops clinical programs to meet the needs of the community.Maintains regular and ongoing communication with facility Medical Director ensuring programs and care services meet the needs of patients / residents.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Manages clinical aspects of state or federal government survey processes.Performs other duties as assigned.Performs other duties as assigned.Supervisory ResponsibilitiesSupervises nursing staff and others for whom they are administratively or professionally responsible. QualificationsGraduate of an accredited school of Nursing.Valid State licensure as an RN.One to three (1-3) years of management or supervisory experience in long-term care, acute care, restorative or geriatric nursing preferred.Proficient in the use of personal computer.Physical Demands & EnvironmentMay be required to respond to critical issues on a 24/7 basis. Employee is frequently required to stand, walk, use hands or fingers, reach with hands and arms, feel, talk and hear. Employee is occasionally exposed to blood or other body fluids, fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. In compliance with applicable law, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions for the position. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Director of Nursing,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-nursing-rn-job-atlanta-ga-us-177654373.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=9,,,c0536d3e98eef5c5027f2fc499685577
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:10:49:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client in Norcross, GA is seeking full time contractors for both Contract and Contract to Hire positions. Please review the requirements and responsibilities below and apply, if qualified.Responsibilities:Answering incoming calls from customersUpdating account informationResolving customers inquiriesCompleting paperworkOutbound calls to update customers on status Requirements:Accurate Data Entry skills (Over 8,000 KSPH and 40 WPM, you will be tested)At least 1 year in an inbound or outbound Customer Service environmentExcellent written and verbal skillsIntermediate experience with Excel and other Microsoft computer softwareProfessional appearance and positive work ethic #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Data Entry/Customer Service Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-customer-service-job-norcross-ga-us-178595441.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),23226d3f85f52bdce24b7c038c5fa9b2
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:15:56:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"PC and Mac Field TechniciansOur nationwide company is currently looking for field technicians to service our residential and small business customers.This is a 1099 independent contractor position- tech is responsible for tools, having their own vehicle, gas, and other expenses.  Techs are compensated for time on-site and parts purchased for customers.Software/Technical Skills: • 3 years minimum full-time experience providing tech support • Office suite; Word, Excel, & Outlook, etc • Configuring email accounts using Outlook and Outlook Express • In depth knowledge and usage of Windows operating systems • PC imaging and configuration• TCP/IP • Routers, WAPs, Wireless, and other networking devices • Spyware / adware removal tools as well as antivirus programs• Savvy with search engine techniques • Tech must be comfortable with all facets of PC and laptop hardware setup and maintenance; including installation and configuration of hard drives, NIC's, printers, and other PC accessories.  • Experience with Mac is preferred, but not requiredDuties: • Technician will apply skills described above in resolving clients’ issues • Troubleshoot software                -Reinstallation of OS                -Removal of viruses/malware- Software upgrades and installation• Troubleshoot hardware• Troubleshoot network issues• PC Imaging and configuration• Troubleshoot and set up peripherals• Helping end users understand software• Call client’s vendors for warranty and troubleshooting issues Compensation:$30 to $35/hr for time spent at client sites; 1 hour minimum for each job, and commission ",PC and Mac Field Technicians Job in Keswick,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Keswick, CA 96001",Computer HardwareComputer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/pc-mac-field-technicians-job-keswick-ca-us-168920682.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=5,30.00 - 35.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,3025426dd87635789cd964ada5c6ac8b
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:15:21:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Sr. SOA Developer (IBM/Java) Job #:  664967Apex Systems is now hiring 2 Sr. SOA Developers to work on a W2 contract basis (cannot provide any sponsorship) for one of our clients in Kansas City, MO. If you are interested in applying, please send a resume/contact information to jshull@apexsystemsinc.com Thanks! Sr. SOA Developer Work with minimal assistance to scope, design, develop, troubleshoot, maintain, configure, and analyze technical and non-technical solutions required to satisfy enterprise needs. Will perform development tasks which will involve extraction and transfer of messages, performing all associated transformations, validations, cleansing, and preparation of messages for transport between system(s). Will work on elements of large, complex installations. Will develop and implement process improvements, be a resource and advocate for the Enterprise SOA Imitative and will work closely with the system administrators and engineers to perform space planning, monitoring, security, performance tuning, archiving, and upgrade support. Will work closely with SOA Governance to maintain and continually improve the operations, maintenance, and documentation of the systems. MINIMUM: •Ability to communicate and represent SOA Recommendations and Standards to ETS peer groups and Change Control process. •Ability to lead a team of developers to deliver to defined goals and deadlines. •Ability to lead an Agile development process. •Experience with “loosely-coupled” SOA architecture components including Enterprise Service Bus, Service Registry & Service Repository based architectures. •Knowledge of Web Services/API architectures and their implementations. •Knowledge of relational database technologies. •Possesses both technical and non-technical problem solving and troubleshooting skills with the ability to conceptualize, plan, develop and deliver a variety of creative solutions. •Ability to identify, develop and document business requirements, technical requirements and functional design. •Understands and follows formal project methodologies and change control processes. •Possesses strong time management, prioritization, and interpersonal skills. •Must be an effective communicator with strong verbal and non-verbal communication skills. •Ability to document and explain complex technical concepts. PREFERRED AREA - SOA: MINIMUM: •Experience as a SCRUM master in an Agile development process. •Knowledge of Service Orientated Architecture concepts, design, and patterns. •Experience with Java, .Net or other service orientated languages. •Demonstrates the knowledge and experience in Service Development •Demonstrates knowledge of object orientated programming. •Experience with XML, Schema, HTML, REST, XSLT/XPATH, and related mark-up languages. •Real world experience with messaging (JMS, MQ, Active MQ,) •Experience in version control, CVS, SVN, VSS, TFS, MKS, etc. SPECIALTY AREA - SOA:: •Knowledge and experience in orchestrations using IBM’s Websphere Enterprise Service Bus (WESB). •Knowledge and experience in orchestrations using IBM’s Integration Bus (IIB). •Knowledge and experience in orchestrations using IBM’s DataPower Appliance. •Knowledge of IBMs WTX, WSRR, ODM, BAM, and MQ technologies. EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Sr. SOA Developer (IBM/Java) Job in Kansas City,Full Time Employee,"Kansas City, MO",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-soa-developer-ibm-java-job-kansas-city-mo-us-169030254.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7b80c23194e4cc8d4e8ba0a77e9dd11e
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:15:21:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Juniper/CISCO Support Job #:  672302We currently have an urgent need for 5 Network Engineers at three different levels. We are in need of a Juniper Network Engineer, 2 Cisco Network Engineers, as well as 2 network engineers with WAN and firewall experience. The job description is below. If you are interested in being submitted for one of the three roles, please reach out to Anna Morrow. Phone: 804-545-7750Email: amorrow@apexsystemsinc.com  Job Title: Network Engineer Rate: Based on Previous Experience Location: Remote but must be willing to travel to the client sites Contract Length: Possible 2 year contract Job Description:These resources will supplement the client and the customer’s existing technical staff to ensure the successful design, planning, upgrades, testing, and deployment of the client’s customer’s Data Center and WAN infrastructure. These are highly technical positions and will require the candidates to be self-starters and capable of working independently and at the direction of both the client and the customer. Minimum Qualifications: 5 years working in a Service Provider or Large Enterprise environmentCan be in a Network Operations functionShould be considered a “Lead” resourcePrefer resource to be from an engineering organizationMust be able to take a given design and plans and deploy with minimal supervisionMust have excellent written and oral skills to covey technical information in a concise mannerMust have ability to troubleshoot technical issues on multi-vendor platformsMust have ability to help the customer enter hardware into the  network Management System (CA Spectrum) Protocol/Hardware/Software Support and DeploymentHardware Support and DeploymentCisco (Nexus and UWE hardware primarily)Juniper M/T (maybe SRX) series devicesDell networking hardwareCitrix / F5 Load Balancer (changes as required by project only)Cisco ASA / Juniper SRX (virtual appliances)Protocol Support and Deployment OSPF/IS-ISBGP/mBGPVRF / VRF-liteEIGRP (not sure of the extent on this one yet)MPLSSpanning-TreeQoS Software Support for monitoring and support only,CA Spectrum (Customer NMS software) – Not absolutely necessary, but a “like to have”Solarwinds Orion (NPM/APM)Comfortable with Visio (making/altering/reading diagrams)Juniper Management softwareInfloblox (for documentation and tools updates only) Certifications (verifiable)Cisco CCNP (ACI / UWE experience useful)Juniper JNCIP  – M/T or ENT (MPLS / P / PE concepts required)            EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More",Juniper/CISCO Support Job in Brackettville,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Juniper/CISCO Support Job #:  672302We currently have an urgent need for 5 Network Engineers at three different levels. We are in need of a Juniper Network Engineer, 2 Cisco Network Engineers, as well as 2 network engineers with WAN and firewall experience. The job description is below. If you are interested in being submitted for one of the three roles, please reach out to Anna Morrow. Phone: 804-545-7750Email: amorrow@apexsystemsinc.com  Job Title: Network Engineer Rate: Based on Previous Experience Location: Remote but must be willing to travel to the client sites Contract Length: Possible 2 year contract Job Description:These resources will supplement the client and the customer’s existing technical staff to ensure the successful design, planning, upgrades, testing, and deployment of the client’s customer’s Data Center and WAN infrastructure. These are highly technical positions and will require the candidates to be self-starters and capable of working independently and at the direction of both the client and the customer. Minimum Qualifications: 5 years working in a Service Provider or Large Enterprise environmentCan be in a Network Operations functionShould be considered a “Lead” resourcePrefer resource to be from an engineering organizationMust be able to take a given design and plans and deploy with minimal supervisionMust have excellent written and oral skills to covey technical information in a concise mannerMust have ability to troubleshoot technical issues on multi-vendor platformsMust have ability to help the customer enter hardware into the  network Management System (CA Spectrum) Protocol/Hardware/Software Support and DeploymentHardware Support and DeploymentCisco (Nexus and UWE hardware primarily)Juniper M/T (maybe SRX) series devicesDell networking hardwareCitrix / F5 Load Balancer (changes as required by project only)Cisco ASA / Juniper SRX (virtual appliances)Protocol Support and Deployment OSPF/IS-ISBGP/mBGPVRF / VRF-liteEIGRP (not sure of the extent on this one yet)MPLSSpanning-TreeQoS Software Support for monitoring and support only,CA Spectrum (Customer NMS software) – Not absolutely necessary, but a “like to have”Solarwinds Orion (NPM/APM)Comfortable with Visio (making/altering/reading diagrams)Juniper Management softwareInfloblox (for documentation and tools updates only) Certifications (verifiable)Cisco CCNP (ACI / UWE experience useful)Juniper JNCIP  – M/T or ENT (MPLS / P / PE concepts required)            EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/juniper-cisco-support-job-brackettville-tx-us-168932783.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),25d8da07a88c64513bdab88413301664
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:14:35:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Unified Communications Voice Analyst. Contract to HireThis job will have the following responsibilities:The Unified Communications Voice Analyst will be part of the Global Telecommunications team. This will be a customer focused position that will drive collaboration and solutions between IT departments and business units. The right candidate will have a passion for supporting contact center environments and developing solutions to improve or address business needs with a focus on minimizing downtime and delivering technology excellence to our customers. This hands on technical position will be responsible for supporting various VoIP and contact center technologies within IT Infrastructure, with an immediate focus on Cisco Call Manager, Cisco UCCE and Calabrio. Requires excellent customer service, presentation and communication skills.•Meet and work with various business unit leaders across the enterprise to address unified communications and call center needs. Design solutions based on the overall objectives •Drive user adoption and maximum use of available system features across multiple technology platforms •Collaborate with the global telecommunications, network and infrastructure teams on projects, system upgrades and implementations. •Complete day to day Telecom and contact center requests, such as: moves/adds/changes/call flow designs/repairs/troubleshooting and project related tasks •Will be required to support various telecommunication technologies from Cisco, Avaya, Interactive Intelligence, Microsoft Skype for Business, Xmedius, Calabrio, Sonus and Intrado •Identify single points of failure and work on solutions to mitigate risks. Look for opportunities to provide technology efficiencies and operational improvements. Develop business continuity and testing plans for contact center technologies •Develop technical documentation consisting of diagrams, step by step procedures, system configurations, call flows and other pertinent information required for the voice environment  Work with Telecommunications carriers and managed service vendors on trouble tickets, activations and terminations.  Stay abreast of the latest advancements for contact centers. Create plans to evaluate new technologies before releasing into the production environment Responsibilities Include: Qualifications & Requirements:  Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university, preferably in a technical field (engineering or science)  5+ years of experience supporting mid to large scale enterprise-wide contact center platforms. MUST have experience with administration and support of Cisco Call Manager and Cisco Unified Contact Center  Requires hands on technical experience with Cisco UCCE/CUCM/CCVP/CVP Studio/VXML/Unity/EIM/CICM/Proxy Server & Calabrio. SQL database management required. Must have knowledge of H.323 and SIP protocols  Voice and Network Certifications preferred: CCNA Voice/ Cisco CVP  Must understand Cisco server architecture and have experience with routing and switching  Experience administering and supporting additional Contact center technologies a plus, such as: EIM-Email integration, CTI, IVRs, Auto attendants, CRMs, predictive dialers and CAD or Finesse  Must be familiar with configuring Cisco gateways, dial peers and working with carriers on the provisioning of PRI and SIP Trunks. Must have experience with SBC technologies, such as Cisco CUBE  Experience with other contact center technologies such as Interactive Intelligence and Avaya, a plus. Position will be required to support multiple vendor technologies   Experience with DNS/DHCP/VLANs/E911/QOS/COS and TCP/IP  Experience developing training materials and training end users  Able to keep pace in a technically complex environment  Must be proficient with Visio, Powerpoint and Sharepoint  Excellent analytical and problem solving skills  Required to be part of the on-call rotation and must be able to travel 5-10%  Performs other duties as needed",Unified Communications Voice Analyst Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/unified-communications-voice-analyst-job-philadelphia-pa-us-169020790.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,02f4e9fab33defdcbc5c3826843859c9
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:14:35:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"IT ProfessionalSAP BO Administrator - Build, install, configure, administer, maintain & support various computer system admin & operational processes. Plan, install & upgrade SAP BO servers with new version of BO software & maintain patch levels on all environments. Utilize the following techs.: SAP BI, Business Objects, Oracle, SQL Server, Query Builder, Universe Design Tool, Windows Server 2008/2012. Job locations in Tampa, FL & various unanticipated client sites nationally requiring relocation & travel to these sites involving short & long term assignments. To apply, specify job title & MAIL resume to:App Soft Solutions, Inc. 11460 N 53rd St., Tampa, FL 33617. Attn: HR0612 Reference Code:312674",SAP BO Administrator Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,33617,Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sap-bo-administrator-job-tampa-fl-us-168529232.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5a69ff68a4a6846cf80950c1a8bef1c1
United States of America,US,01/Nov/2015:14:34:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Job Overview:The IT Operations Technician II role is a leadership role that is responsible for the provisioning of application access for internal CenturyLink employees.  It involves the use of multiple toolsets, technologies, and knowledge of application access provisioning work flows.   Job Responsibilities:Manage complex work assignments requiring the cross functional partnership with other organizationsLead troubleshooting efforts related to Mainframe and Unix user accountsProvide technical direction to the Tech I team memberesLead by examplePartner with internal clients to support their business needs related to access managementRecommend provisioning flow process improvementsFrequent written and verbal status update communications to managers and clientsManage and prioritize business critical access requests with a high sense of urgencyManagement and Client escalationsMeet or exceed all departmental Service Level matrixPresent a positive disposition and maintain constructive interpersonal relationships under high stress Job Requirements:Advanced Mainframe/RACF and UNIX skills required to manage accessExcellent leadership skillsAdvanced analytical skill with the ability to develop and enhance departmental access provisioning process flows and operating procedures Preferred Qualifications:Advanced understanding and experience with system access tools and processes is desired (for example: Mainframe/RACF and UNIX)Demonstrated ability to quickly learn, lead, and train new processes related to access provisioning tool setsAbility to contribute to tools road mapping and improve Mainframe access provisioning and other key areas. Job ID 63513Alternate Location: US-Louisiana-MonroeRequisition #: 63513 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",IT Operations Technician Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-operations-technician-job-monroe-la-us-168950753.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=3,,,7fe4be625b8f3069df6a78d5efe2cb63
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:00:21:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Manufacturing – Change Career to - Truck Driver – Entry Level,Full Time,"Overland Park, KS",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-%E2%80%93-Change-Career-to-Truck-Driver-%E2%80%93-Entry-Level-No-Experience-Full-Time-w-Training-Job-Overland-Park-KS-US-165910291.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=1,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,074042d80882c565d734edb9b625ed27
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:00:22:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ascent, LLC is a leading provider of comprehensive solutions for the planning, design, engineering, development, and operation of data centers and other mission critical facilities. Headquartered in Saint Louis, MO, Ascent specializes in powerful, efficient, and technologically advanced mission critical facilities and offers clients a broad range of delivery models spanning shell & core, build-to-suit, turnkey, and outsourced critical systems operations. Founded in 1998, Ascent provides a full spectrum of fast track services that include project programming, design management, facility assessment, development and construction management, commissioning, and ongoing maintenance operations. Today, Ascent focuses on providing clients with innovative solutions and services yielding the highest levels of operational autonomy, efficiency, and control. Ascents clients include some of the most demanding mission critical organizations spanning multiple industries, Fortune 500 firms, and service providers.  Our business is growing fast and we are currently seeking a talented Critical Systems Technician for the operation of a data center facility. Ascent, LLC was named one of St. Louis' Top 50 Places to Work in 2012 and 2013! TITLE:  Critical Systems Technician LOCATION:  Chicago, IL RESPONSIBILITIES: •    Provide on-site field coordination supervision and project management support for the operation of a data center.•    Management of mission critical equipment used to operate and maintain a data center.•    Management of systems and physical environment integration (life safety, mechanical, plumbing, and power related activities and issues).•    Report discrepancies and trends to the operations team and clients.•    Manage preventative and emergency maintenance schedules and procedures for building systems; identify back-up and replacement inventory needs for critical systems.•    Oversee all maintenance schedules and providers.•    Provide on-call support (24x7).  •    Assist in updates of standard practices consistent for data center operations and equipment.•    Oversee and coordinate sub-contractors to assure proper installation of equipment and delivery of maintenance services.•    Troubleshoot emergencies, equipment problems, and technical issues, organize and oversee resolutions.•    Provide ongoing technical support, management and oversight of vendors as necessary.•    Completes daily inspections. •    Complete inspections and maintenance. Scheduled maintenance may include, but is not limited to, monthly, bi-monthly, quarterly, semi-annually, and annual equipment maintenance.  •    Self-perform numerous Electrical/HVAC preventative maintenance activities including but not limited to:•    Filter changes•    Generator operating tests•    UPS/ATS/STS transfer tests and operation•    Provide field technical support related to redundancy, reliability and maintainability for the data center:•    Current needs•    Long-term objectives and strategic planning•    Primary focus shall be on uptime (99.9999%) and cost saving opportunities•    Supported by Ascent Corporate Engineering group•    Development and implementation of Ascent’s Change Control Program•    Method of Procedure (MOP), Standard Operating Procedure (SOP), and Emergency Recovery Procedure (ERP) development•    Administrator for onsite Critical Facility Work Rules•    Vendor onboarding and familiarization•    Safety inspections and adherence to Ascent safety policies.•    Administrative policies/procedures•    Scope of Work standards•    Spare parts management•    Reporting development•    Life Cycle Replacement Strategy   QUALIFICATIONS: •    2+ years of experience in a critical facilities or related environment•    HS Diploma or GED required•    Technical, vocational or on-the-job training in the following areas:  Electrical, HVAC, mechanical, process controls•    Maintenance experience in 24x7 and/or critical support environment•    Possess Electrical/HVAC certifications (preferred)•    Candidate must be technically proficient in planning and scheduling, and exhibit excellent organizational skills.•    Candidate must possess strong communication skills, the ability to lead coordination meetings and actively facilitate progress in order to achieve scheduled goals.•    Candidate must have people skills, good judgment, and flexibility•    Qualified candidate will be able to work cooperatively with internal administration groups, and effectively contend with customers and contractors to reach mutually acceptable terms and conditions.•    Professional appearance, good communication and organizational skills are required•    Proficiency with basic operations of a computer; knowledge of MS Excel, MS Word, MS Project and Auto Cad is a plus•    Possess competent knowledge of use and care of tools and equipment used in facilities and/or grounds maintenance.•    Possess competent knowledge of building codes and safety regulations   This position reports to the Critical Facilities Manager  All interested candidates should visit www.ascent-corp.com and select the careers tab to apply for the position, or submit resume to humanresources@ascentcorp.com. Please include salary requirements with each application or resume submission.   Ascent, LLC offers a full benefits package including medical, dental, vision, STD/LTD, life insurance, 401(k), PTO, paid holidays, casual work environment and more.  Ascent, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer ",Critical Systems Technician Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Critical-Systems-Technician-Job-Chicago-IL-US-162554194.aspx?mescoid=1700221001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f4c41359618b891acca4eff134b48107
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:01:02:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Position Summary: In this entry-level vehicle maintenance position you would meet and greet incoming customer truck drivers at our fuel island. The duties may consist of vehicle inspections, fueling and washing of vehicles, vehicle detailing, pick-up and delivery of vehicles and parts, tire changes, daily rental check in/out, parts pricing and stocking and facility maintenance. Candidate must be able to work in various weather elements outdoors. This is a great opportunity for someone who may be looking to learn the fundamentals of preventative maintenance on diesel vehicles and grow in a diesel career or similar fields related to vehicle maintenance. Major Responsibilities: - Activate fuel pumps and fill fuel tanks of vehicles with gasoline or diesel fuel to specified levels - Check air pressure in tires, check motor oil, transmission, radiator, and other fluids - Adjust air, oil, water, or other fluids, as required - Clean windshields, and wash vehicles - Prepare daily reports of fuel, oil, and accessory sales - Order stock, price and shelve incoming goods - Occasionally perform minor repairs such as, install mounted tires, replace or rotate tires and complete preventative maintenance repairs. - Other projects and tasks as assigned by supervisor Benefits: Penske values the well-being of our employees and their families. That's why we offer competitive wages and a wide range of benefits, including medical and dental insurance, prescription drug card, 401K and pension plans, flexible dependent care and medical spending accounts, spouse and child life insurance, employee referral bonus, and discounts with Penske partners Qualifications - High School Diploma or equivalent required - A valid driver's license is required - Tech or Vocational certification preferred - Must be able to work in a fast past, high energy environment - Effective communication both written and verbal is key to success, bilingual Spanish is a plus. - Basic computer skills preferred for data entry into maintenance systems. - Willingness to travel within district (close geographical area), work the required schedule, work at the specific location required, complete Penske employment application, submit to a reference verification (to include past employment and education) are required. Physical Requirements: - The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an associate to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. -The associate must regularly lift and /or move up to 25/lbs12kg, frequently lift and/or move up to 50lbs/ 23kg and occasionally lift and/or move up to 100lbs/45kg. -Specific vision abilities required by this job include Close vision, Distance vision, Peripheral vision, Depth perception and Ability to adjust focus. -While performing the duties of this Job, the associate is regularly required to stand; walk; sit and talk or hear. The associate is frequently required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. Penske is an Equal Opportunity Employer, including individuals with disabilities and protected veterans. Penske Truck Leasing Co., L.P., headquartered in Reading, Pennsylvania, is a partnership of Penske Corporation, Penske Automotive Group, General Electric Capital Corporation and Mitsui & Co., Ltd. A leading global transportation services provider, Penske operates more than 216,000 vehicles and serves customers from more than 1,000 locations in North America, South America, Europe, Australia, and Asia. Product lines include full-service truck leasing, contract maintenance, commercial and consumer truck rentals, used truck sales, transportation and warehousing management and supply chain management solutions. Visit http://www.GoPenske.com to learn more.",Customer Service Representative (Fueler/Washer/Detailer) Job in Pewaukee,,"Pewaukee, WI 53072","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/Customer-Service-Representative-Fueler-Washer-Detailer-Job-Pewaukee-WI-US-165859803.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,2a751dcc5f03f21815f82ece58d64ff9
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:01:54:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:   Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner. Maintains all assigned ancillary areas, department areas, and corridors with the correct preventative maintenance procedures as outlined in department policy as requested. Assists in enhancing productivity and efficient operations of the department. Promotes effective interpersonal and interdisciplinary relationships, maintaining professional conduct at all times. Demonstrates commitment to professional growth and competence by adherence to component and departmental annual training commitments. Inspects and utilizes judgment in determining which cleaning techniques outlined in orientation guidelines to follow. Demonstrated efficient and safe use of housekeeping equipment and solutions as observed by supervisor. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash and bio-hazardous materials. Thoroughly mops and vacuums floors in accordance with established guidelines. Keeps cart properly stocked with equipment and cleaning supplies; ensures all chemicals are properly labeled, and all equipment is in good working condition. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Cleans rooms, hallways, lobbies, lounges, rest rooms, corridors, elevators, stairways, and other areas. Performs all other related duties.   Qualifications Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff. Ability to respond effectively to changing demands. Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-04-04",Custodian Service Worker - Upper Darby SD Job in Drexel Hill,"Part Time, Employee","Drexel Hill, PA 19026",,http://jobview.monster.com/Custodian-Service-Worker-Upper-Darby-SD-Job-Drexel-Hill-PA-US-165308850.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=15,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,0d88a9bc6e564031d4bc31c53d085cef
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:01:54:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Low Voltage Installer Voice Data Cable Technician (Ft. Wayne)Compensation: Based on skill level, applicable certifications, experience and professionalismEmployment type: full-timeWe are seeking a Low Voltage Installer / Voice / Data Cable Technician.Seeking installers and technicians experienced with low voltage wiring and cabling systems, CCTV, CAT5e, CAT6, CAT6a and fiber-optic structured cabling, Information Communications Technology (ICT), networking & telecommunications, working in office, commercial, industrial, and warehouse spaces.To qualify for this opening, we are looking for a mixture of good mechanical skills, experience with the use of construction job site tools and equipment, IT / Telephony knowledge, construction trade experience, excellent communication skills, and great customer service skills. Formal electronics training, formal voice data wire/cable installation training and any BICSI training and / or similar experience is valued.Responsibilities will include installing low voltage wiring CAT5e/CAT6/CAT6a/Coax/Fiber cable in commercial business offices, healthcare, manufacturing, industrial, and warehouse facilities. Installation work includes cable routing, terminating jacks/patch panels, pathway support structures (such as cable tray, racks and j-hooks), installation of AP's/IP cameras and completing MAC/services calls.Employment Type - Full-TimeLocation - Fort Wayne, INJob Type - Installation - Maint - Repair, Skilled Labor - Trades, Telecommunications, Low VoltageEducation -- HS Diploma or equivalentExperience -- 3 to 5 years minimum exp desiredManages Others - NoIndustry - Electrician, Networking, TelecommunicationsTravel -- There will be some travel associated with this positionQualified applicants must have:· Ability to lift over 75 pounds independently· Ability to work without direct supervision· Good communication skills· Ambitious, self-motivated, and the ability to learn quickly· Ability to use a Computer and mainstream software applications.· Valid Driver's License· Excellent communication skills in all forms· The ability to provide superior customer service· Have a professional lookTo submit application and resume for this position visit:www.wired-comm.com/jobs/ ;Click Image to View Ad var _gaq = _gaq || []; _gaq.push(['_setAccount', 'UA-2171768-4']); _gaq.push(['_trackPageview']); (function() { var ga = document.createElement('script'); ga.type = 'text/javascript'; ga.async = true; ga.src = ('https:' == document.location.protocol ? 'https://ssl' : 'http://www') + '.google-analytics.com/ga.js'; var s = document.getElementsByTagName('script')[0]; s.parentNode.insertBefore(ga, s); })(); This listing brought to you by Fort Wayne Newspapers and www.jobs.fortwayne.com.",Low Voltage Installer Voice Data Cable Technician Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,46802,All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Low-Voltage-Installer-Voice-Data-Cable-Technician-Job-US-165043969.aspx?ch=fortwayne&mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=13,,,6f31ab6789c45b61d0206b78bef171ce
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:01:54:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryFor over 60 years, our goal at Bernstein Management Corporation has been to provide excellent service to our community of stakeholders while maintaining the family-oriented atmosphere that has been a hallmark of our culture. We reward hard work and innovative thinking through a generous total rewards package, including competitive pay, comprehensive health benefits, 401(k), paid time off, volunteer leave, tuition and gym reimbursement, company gatherings and more! When meeting candidates, we look for someone who shares our commitment to customer service and supports our standards of respect, fairness and honesty. Bernstein Management Corporation (“BMC”) has a great opportunity for a motivated and well-rounded Maintenance Technician to work for a growing organization that values its employees. The Residential Maintenance Technician performs general maintenance relating to plumbing, carpentry, electrical, HVAC units and preventative maintenance.  Primary Responsibilities*Properly use tools ranging from common hand and power tools, such as hammers, hoists, saws, drills, and wrenches, to precision measuring instruments and electrical and electronic testing devicesPerform routine preventive maintenance to ensure that building systems operate efficiently and that the physical condition of the building does not deteriorateInspect, operate, or test machinery or equipment to diagnose machine malfunctionsAssemble, install, or repair wiring, electrical or electronic components, pipe systems, plumbing, machinery, or equipmentRepair or replace defective equipment parts, using hand tools and power tools, and reassemble equipmentRepair building fixtures including lights, locks, windows, doors, screens, walls, floors, gutters and drainsPaint or repair roofs, windows, doors, floors, woodwork, plaster, drywall, or other parts of building structuresOperate and perform routine maintenance and repairs on HVAC equipment and related systemsPerform general cleaning function as required by the Maintenance Supervisor.  Promptly report to Maintenance Supervisor any conditions requiring maintenance or cleaning observed Set up and operate machine tools to repair or fabricate machine parts, jigs, fixtures, or tools Fabricate or repair counters, benches, partitions, or other wooden structures, such as sheds or outbuildingsInstall equipment to improve the energy or operational efficiency of residential or commercial buildingsPerform routine maintenance on boilers, such as replacing burners or hoses, installing replacement parts, or reinforcing structural weaknesses to ensure optimal boiler efficiency Maintain curb appeal and provide grounds keeping services, such as landscaping and snow removalRefurbish vacancies within the time limit prescribed by the Maintenance Supervisor, minimizing turnaround time on vacant unitsHandle resident service requests within the timetable prescribed by the Resident Manager Implement the company's Preventive Maintenance Program Coordinate sub-contractors work that may be required. Then inspect the completed subcontractors workMaintain shops, storage areas, etc. in a neat and organized mannerInspect building daily for light bulb replacement, life and safety issues and any hazardsPick up supplies and run work-related errands (e.g., trips to the main office, bank, supply house) for the ManagerExcellent attendance and certain physical demands (e.g. lifting up to 50 lbs. regularly) are required to perform the essential functions of this position* Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the job, as described above.Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities·        Reliable·        Strong problem-solving skills·        Strong time management and organizational skills·        Ability to accept responsibility and accountability for his/her actions·        Ability to perform work accurately and thoroughly·        Ability to pay attention to the minute details of a project or task·        Ability to identify and correct conditions that affect safety·        Ability to work in a fast-paced, multi-entity environment·        Ability to multi-task and follow through·        Ability to work under pressure·        Ability to communicate effectively with others·        Ability to actively listen to, convey, and understand the comments and questions of others·        Ability to work effectively as a team contributor on applicable assignments·        Ability to respond to others’ needs in a timely and courteous mannerRequired Education and ExperienceHigh School DiplomaTwo to four years previous experience PreferencesAssociate’s Degree (two year college or technical school)CFC License CAMTBernstein is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce.  We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, making decisions without discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, genetic information or any other protected class, in accordance with applicable law.",Residential Maintenance Technician Job in Washington,Full Time,"Washington, DC 20015",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Residential-Maintenance-Technician-Job-Washington-DC-US-163831304.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b5bc13b9e0bfb43cf4c4041367239d1b
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:01:54:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"CTG has a consulting opportunity for a Build Analyst located in Salt Lake City, Utah   Duration: 1 year +   This position requires expertise in IT construction in a Health Care environment (both new build-out and remodel), with a thorough understanding of the IT infrastructure needs.       This individual will  be responsible for the development and testing of software programs, commissioning, and troubleshooting to ensure proper operations of the building control system. Will provide detailed information on design and operations to contractors. Will provide all required project management including but not limited to schedule planning, contractor coordination and quality control, estimate cost control and reporting. Will do onsite field installation, service, diagnostics, and repairs on complete software, and hardware including associated mechanical devices. Knowledge of current trends, best practices and products in automation systems is required.         CTG is the most reliable IT services provider, built on 50 years of meeting our commitments to make technology work for clients and deliver real business value. CTG provides industry-specific IT strategy, services, and solutions throughout North America and Western Europe that address the business needs and staffing challenges of clients in high-growth markets, such as technology, healthcare and life sciences, financial services, industrials, and telecommunications. CTG's clients include large technology and energy companies, major health systems, and government entities.   CTG's greatest asset is our people, and as such we are committed to providing employees programs and processes to support their performance, hone their skills, and advance in their careers. This commitment is reflected by CTG being named a Best Places to Work Company by Modern Healthcare (since 2013) in North America, and a Best Places to Work Company in the United Kingdom (2013), Belgium (since 2007), and Luxembourg (since 2011).     CTG is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and strong advocate of workforce diversity. Minority/Female/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Disability/Veteran.   Additional Information:",Build Analyst / IT Infrastructure Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time Employee,"Salt Lake City, UT 84101",Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureHealthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Build-Analyst-IT-Infrastructure-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-164857507.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=12,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,8710b64719b279cf6d5a472fdd943f9d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:04:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"A long-established Philadelphia Company is seeking a machine operator to laminate and slit a wide range of non-metallic materials. Experience preferred, but will train the right candidate.Desire detail-oriented person with good communication and math skills.We offer competitive pay with excellent benefits.  Pay rate based on experience.All qualified applicants are highly encouraged to apply online today. EEO.",Machine Operator Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19124",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Machine-Operator-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165989253.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=6,,,fbc36afa817cdd7c6e8bd7a0f8dc9a9f
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:04:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"As part of the Global $8 billion Swiss Post organization, Swiss Post Solutions offers a robust selection of outsourcing, administrative, and business services, delivered by people who are passionate about their purpose, excited about what they do, and committed to our clients' success. For more than 30 years, America's leading companies have discovered they can better compete and win by outsourcing key support functions while giving accomplished and effectual experts a gratifying and limitless career path.We are currently hiring a Fleet Copy Operator to work at our prestigious client site in Seattle, WA a prestigious law firm. Shift:  Monday-Friday 8am-5pmPay: $14/hr with benefits & 401k Ideal Copy Maintenance Technicians will be: Articulate, experienced in interacting with high level executives/ clientsPolished, in both physical presentation and manners Customer-service focused, comfortable serving others in different functions Proactive in troubleshooting potential issuesCommunicate effectively with IT, Facilities Dept. to solve equipment issues  Daily responsibilities:Installing, maintaining and repairing copy equipment/printers/scannersClearing paper jamsChanging toner cartridges Replacing or refurbishing worn parts.                           ***All candidates must clear a criminal background check and drug testing.***                                We offer a competitive benefits package including medical, dental and 401K",Copy Machine Technician Job in Vancouver,Full Time Employee,"Vancouver, WA 98663",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Copy-Machine-Technician-Job-Vancouver-WA-US-165981102.aspx?mescoid=4900853001001&jobPosition=9,13.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,ea99168bb6ab84cd8f6b4fa888a54154
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:04:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Technician – Frame and BodyKlaben Ford Lincoln, Inc. is seeking a Frame & Body Technician.  Summary of Essential Duties Repair damaged frames, body parts and bodies of vehicles in accordance with factory and dealership specifications, dealer estimates and generally accepted time standards used by dealership.  Perform all aspects of body and frame repair while safely operating all body shop equipment incidental to such work. Comply with directions from shop management regarding the work process. Perform high-quality repair work on vehicles while complying with all applicable safety and environmental regulations.Other Requirements Minimum 1-years’ experience in work described above.  High School Diploma, GED or other combination of technical education and relevant experience.  Training and experience on state-of-the-art equipment desirable and should be noted on application. Valid driver’s license and clean driving record; obey all traffic laws while operating company vehicles; maintain insurability under Klaben vehicle insurance policy throughout employment. Benefits Available coverage for health, dental, vision, life, disability and employer-participation in 401(k) retirement savings Paid vacation and holidays Equal Opportunity Employer ",Technician - Frame and Body Job in Kent,Full Time,"Kent, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/Technician-Frame-Body-Job-Kent-OH-US-165218908.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e8552af8d01188d3d2ca01c59c7b100a
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:04:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: We are the maker, marketer and distributor of branded food products that have been American favorites for decades. Our employees located in more than 20 offices and plants across North America rally around our mission, Reinvigorating Iconic Brands. We work to transform our brands to be more profitable for our customers and more enjoyable for our consumers.   At Pinnacle Foods, every employee has the opportunity to make an impact—from marketing and research & development, to manufacturing, finance and sales—each function plays a critical role in our success. By living our values of trust, candor and ownership we create great relationships that help us deliver results and drive meaningful change for our brands and business.   SCOPE OF POSI TION: The Production Supervisor is responsible for the day to day management of production operations on shift. This position will ensure employees work safely, manufacturing process and production quality standards are consistent with corporate objectives and are in full compliance with all food safety and regulatory requirements. This position is a key member of the management team at the facility.   ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Essential duties and responsibilities include the following; other duties may be assigned./ Supervise all production activities in accordance with corporate and plant programs and standards concerning safety, quality, productivity and cost. Actively promote plant safety and environmental programs and procedures that are in compliance with corporate and regulatory requirements. Adheres to corporate Quality, GMP and HACCP standards to achieve a finished product within quality control specifications.       Provide continual leadership and guidance to associates for the purpose of increasing their effectiveness and establishing good working relationships. Communicate daily with other Shift Supervisors to ensure good information flow between shifts. Manage staffing levels and assign responsibilities to employees, as required to meet planned production schedules. Manage training and development, assessment and motivation of production associates. Ensure effective sanitation training for team members.       Conduct annual evaluations of associates. Apply disciplinary actions in accordance with plant policies and procedures. Review shift activities and results, making adjustments as required for continuous improvement. Investigate production delays and take corrective action as necessary. Keep management informed of the status of production and promptly notify management of issues impacting production. Coordinate the storage and rework of quality control held products with appropriate plant personnel. Promote an environment conducive to teams, teamwork, and line-driven accountability. Develop and plan employee schedule for weekly work assignments. Complete special projects, duties and assignments, as appropriate. SKILLS & EXPERIENCE: Minimum of 3 years of supervisory experience in a food processing environment. Professional experience within packaging/food products industry, preferred. Experience with continuous improvement methodologies, preferred. Experience working with a diverse group of people. Strong interpersonal skills, written and verbal communication skills and ability to effectively communicate throughout all levels of the organization.   Ability to maintain high expectations for self and others, demonstrating a dedication to achievement of results. Hands on leadership style. Proficient in Microsoft Word, Power Point and Excel. Ability to analyze data and information and make effective and timely decisions. Solid systems understanding and ability to identify improvement opportunities. Ability to work under pressure and to react to situations with a strong sense of urgency. Solid problem solving, project management, multi-tasking and prioritization skills. Detail oriented, organized, reliable and resourceful. Ability to work effectively both independently and within a team environment. Bi-lingual in Spanish is preferred, but not a requirement.   EDUCATION: Bachelor of Science in Food Science, Production Management, Industrial Technology, Engineering or related field, preferred.   SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:   This position provides direct supervision to production employees and contract labor workers. In the absence of a team leader in other key areas this position also provides direction and supervision to team members in those areas as well.   Pinnacle Foods is an Affirmative Action/EEO Employer – qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to protected veteran or disability status, race/color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender expression, gender identity or any other legally protected basis.         Qualifications:  ",Production Supervisor nd shift (Tim's Cascade Snacks,Full Time Employee,"Algona, WA",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-2nd-shift-Tim's-Cascade-Snacks-Algona-WA-Job-Algona-WA-US-166089541.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=5,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,15660a890ab593f72751dc314ae2695d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:04:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full Service Car Wash Site ManagerOur Operation.  Our company has a long history of delivering excellent service to affluent customers.  We are looking for a motivated, dedicated, FT manager who can work Saturdays each week (our busiest day).  Current staff of 28.Purpose:The purpose of a Car Wash Manager is to develop and maintain a team of people to deliver a clean,dry, shiny vehicle to the customer in a safe,speedy, and friendly manner,while continually controlling the costs of operation and the appearance of the facility. KeyResults:1.     Increase car wash volume, decrease time per vehicle.(Customer Service)2.     Maintain a clean,attractive,safe facility. (Customer Service)3.     Maintain the quality of the wash. (Customer Service)4.     Maintain equipment maintenance procedures. 5.     Maintain budgeted operational costs.(Profitability)6.     Develop the skills of the location team to achieve the results above (team is 20+ Full time employees).(Training)7.  Expand detail business (Grow Business) KeyActivities:1.     Recruit, select,and train all location personnel.2.     Resolve all customer complaints and damage claims.3.     Develop the weekly schedule for all employees.4.     Mentor/redirect/coach employees to ensure compliance to company procedures.5.     Monitor and ensure correct chemical usage.6.     Complete timely repairs to equipment as needed (utilizing equipment maintenance contractor for more complex repairs).7.     Monitor/ensure adherence to all equipment and lot maintenance schedules.8.     Handle all purchasing for the location (small retail store + car wash/detail related).9.     Complete all required written reports in the allotted time frame.Spanish fluency and/or Automotive background a plusCompensation based on Experience, need strong OPERATIONS and CUSTOMER SERVICE background with experience managing staff (+15 employees).  PLEASE SEND RESUME WITH SALARY REQUIREMENTS  Prefer Email, Fax is 561-684-2052****May be hiring for assistant manager soon; send resume to same ",Car Wash Manager Job in North Palm Beach,Full Time,"North Palm Beach, FL 33408",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Car-Wash-Manager-Job-North-Palm-Beach-FL-US-164097851.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,"40,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /yearBonuses based on profitability",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),c44a329cf41953411ac5da2d9cba4b40
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:07:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Associate is responsible for building loads for deliveries. In addition, must maintain a safe, clean and well organized lumber yard, load and unload lumber and/or building supplies, and operate a forklift. Other duties as assigned.Essential Functions:Build loads for deliveryLoad and unload lumber and building suppliesOperates forkliftKeeps management aware of any delays or discrepanciesKeeps lumber yard clean, well organized and safeEsta posicion es responsable de mantener un ambiente seguro, limpio y bien organizado con la madera, de carga y descarga de madera y / o materiales|de construccion, entrega de cargas de construccion, y operacion de un montacargas. Debe ser capaz de levantar los materiales de construccion a lo largo del dia. Otras tareas que le asigne.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence and memos; write simple correspondence; effectively present information to others one-on-one.Ability to apply common sense understanding and carry out simple one or two-step instructions Capacidad para leer y comprender instrucciones simples, la correspondencia y notas breves; escribir la correspondencia; presentar informacion de manera eficaz a los demas uno a uno.High school diploma or equivalent; or 1 to 3 months related experience or training.Previous experience working in a lumber yard or similar.Forklift operation experience strongly preferred. Un diploma de escuela secundaria or de educacion general (GED); o 1 a 3 meses de experiencia o entrenamieto relacionado. Tiene la capacidad de usar el sentido comun y puede ejercer simple instrucciones de uno a dos pasos; manejar situaciones regulares con minimo o sin ninguna dificultad.",General Laborer ( G ) Job in Richland,Full Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Laborer-1802-7G-002-Job-Richland-MS-US-164980306.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=13,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,68df2959505b1cd82b123a1f228b9c36
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:07:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:   Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner. Maintains all assigned ancillary areas, department areas, and corridors with the correct preventative maintenance procedures as outlined in department policy as requested. Assists in enhancing productivity and efficient operations of the department. Promotes effective interpersonal and interdisciplinary relationships, maintaining professional conduct at all times. Demonstrates commitment to professional growth and competence by adherence to component and departmental annual training commitments. Inspects and utilizes judgment in determining which cleaning techniques outlined in orientation guidelines to follow. Demonstrated efficient and safe use of housekeeping equipment and solutions as observed by supervisor. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash and bio-hazardous materials. Thoroughly mops and vacuums floors in accordance with established guidelines. Keeps cart properly stocked with equipment and cleaning supplies; ensures all chemicals are properly labeled, and all equipment is in good working condition. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Cleans rooms, hallways, lobbies, lounges, rest rooms, corridors, elevators, stairways, and other areas. Performs all other related duties. Hours:  M-F  4:15pm-8:30pm   Qualifications Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff. Ability to respond effectively to changing demands. Additional Information:",Custodian Service Worker - National Heritage Academies (Alliance - PT PM SW) Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH 45207",,http://jobview.monster.com/Custodian-Service-Worker-National-Heritage-Academies-Alliance-PT-PM-SW-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-165864272.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=19,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,db7bf1ca9839af96962ed9c9643c2c63
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:09:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Machine Repair TechnicianJarvis Airfoil, Inc. is a state of the art manufacturing company with over 100 years of history in manufacturing comprising world-class people, equipment and systems, dedicated to delivering the best value components to the industries that we serve. Located in central CT, Jarvis runs two shifts.SummaryMaintains production and quality by ensuring operation of machinery and mechanical equipment. Maintains contact with vendors for complex repairs. Duties:* Ensures operation of machinery and mechanical equipment by completing preventive maintenance requirements on engines, motors, pneumatic tools, conveyor systems, and production machines; following diagrams, sketches, operations manuals, manufacturer's instructions, and engineering specifications; troubleshooting malfunctions.* Locates sources of problems by observing mechanical devices in operation; listening for problems; using precision measuring and testing instruments.* Removes defective parts by dismantling devices; using hoists, cranes, and hand and power tools; examining form and texture of parts.* Maintains contact with vendors and assists in maintaining inventory of lubricants, cutting fluids, and machine parts * Assists in installing and relocating shop machinery and equipment* Adjusts functional parts of devices and control instruments by using hand tools, levels, plumb bobs, and straightedges.* Controls downtime by informing production workers of routine preventive maintenance techniques; monitoring compliance.* Fabricates repair parts by using machine shop instrumentation and equipment.* Maintains equipment, parts, and supplies inventories by checking stock to determine inventory level; anticipating needed equipment, parts, and supplies; placing and expediting orders; verifying receipt.* Conserves maintenance resources by using equipment and supplies as needed to accomplish job results.* Prepares mechanical maintenance reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends.* Maintains technical knowledge by attending company paid educational workshops; reviewing technical publications; establishing personal networks.* Maintains continuity among work teams by documenting and communicating actions, irregularities, and continuing needs.* Maintains safe and clean working environment by complying with procedures, rules, and regulations.* Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:1.    Minimum of 3 years of experience troubleshooting and repairing electrical, pneumatic and hydraulic devices. 2.    Experience performing preventative maintenance on shop equipment and machinery3.    Experience completing purchase requisitions and maintaining contact with vendors. Skills/Qualifications:Equipment Maintenance, Technical Understanding, Deals with Uncertainty, Basic Safety, Power Tools, Attention to Detail, Flexibility, Supervision, Job Knowledge, ProductivityWage to match experience. Benefits include available medical/dental, 11 paid holidays,401k with match. EEOC M/F/D/V. Send resume to HR@jarvisairfoil.com or apply in person at Jarvis Airfoil, Inc., 528 Glastonbury Tpk, Portland, CT 06480.       ",Machine Repair Tech Job in Portland,Full Time,"Portland, CT 06480",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/Machine-Repair-Tech-Job-Portland-CT-US-163131260.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=11,profit sharing,Experienced (Non-Manager),ae6f6f92051dcb64f9a7ec3c85e5a184
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:09:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Here We Grow Again! -- Certified Tire is hiring!!Automotive Technicians – All levelsJoin one of California's best providers of tires and automotive service. We are now seeking all levels of automotive technicians in nothern and southern California. These positions provide upward mobility as well as top pay, great benefits, and an excellent work environment. We Offer:• Top Pay / Excellent Benefits• Extra pay incentives for Bilingual candidates• Full Medical Benefits / Family Benefits • 401K with Matching• Paid Vacations / HolidaysA family owned company in business since 1997, Certified Tire offers a state of the art auto repair facility equipped with the latest technology and knowledge that allows us to offer a full range of automotive services to all of our customers throughout Northern and Southern California. The success of any organization can be based largely on the quality of its employees. It is for this reason that Certified tire has excelled as a leader in the tire sales and automotive service industry. We are seeking experienced automotive technicians, ASE certifications pay extra, 5 day work week, state of the art training, we pay for educational classes. We use the most advanced equipnment in the automotive industry.",Automotive Technician Job in Martinez,Full Time,"Martinez, CA",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Automotive-Technician-Job-Martinez-CA-US-150069632.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=15,Salary + Benefits + 401(k) + Paid Vacations,,218810d321431dc689db10cd2404ecbe
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:09:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Since 1991, Mid-States Electric has been providing electrical and power-based services for commercial and industrial needs. Our facility management expertise and our focus on safety have made us the number one provider of service, new installations, and maintenance throughout the Midwest.PRIMARY JOB DUTIES:•MEASURE, CUT, BEND, THREAD, ASSEMBLE AND INSTALL CONDUIT•ASSIST IN INSTALLING CONTROL PANELS, MOTOR CONTROL CENTERS BREAKER PANELS, SWITCH GEAR LINE UPS•PERFORM SEMI-SKILLED AND UNSKILLED DUTIES RELATED TO THE INSTALLATION, MAINTENANCE, AND REPAIR OF A WIDE VARIETY OF ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS AND EQUIPMENTREQUIREMENTS:•HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA OR GED•VALID DRIVERS LICENSE•ABILITY TO TRAVEL•PROFICIENT WITH HAND & POWER TOOLSMid States Electric is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate against otherwise qualified applicants on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, age, sex, marital status, national origin, disability or handicap, or veteran status. Women and minorities are encouraged to apply.",Apprentice Job Vacancies Job in Lawton,Employee,"Lawton, IA 51030",,http://jobview.monster.com/Apprentice-Job-Vacancies-Job-Lawton-IA-US-164852639.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),951a0bfb5f32a29e671f88800c00eac7
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:09:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Service Manager Busy Garage is looking for a service manager with excellent customer service and communication skills. The ability to Multi-task and work in a fast paced environment is essential. Please send resume to: PO Box #603, Beaverdale, PA 15921This job listing brought to you by The Johnstown Tribune Democrat",Service Manager Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,15921,Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Service-Manager-Job-US-165880401.aspx?ch=newsjtpa&mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,c405e53a4f0a0193f7d05e29a7302080
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:09:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hello, United Service Technologies is looking for installation and field service technicians.Installation and Service Technician Skills and Qualifications:Electronics Troubleshooting, Analyzing Information, Judgment, Client Relationships, Equipment Maintenance, Reporting Skills, Confidentiality, Quality Focus, Results Driven, Supply Management, Informing Others Required skills -     Technician’s must be able to work independently with little supervision. Field service technicians must be able to manage service calls that require more time than anticipated without becoming frustrated or rushing through a job. They must also possess superb customer service skills and an ability to diagnose and solve problems from non-technical descriptions provided by their customers. You need to be able to use a multimeter and know how to use most hand tools. Driving safely and having a clean driving record is extremely important.  Daily duties -  Service existing accounts by completing work orders; working with your manager and dispatcher to plan daily travel schedule; investigating service related complaints; conducting tests on equipment; resolving problems.Establishes service by studying system requirements; ordering and gathering components and parts; completing installation; performing acceptance tests.Maintains rapport with customers by examining complaints; identifying solutions; suggesting improved methods and techniques; recommending system improvements.Keeps personal equipment operating by following operating instructions; troubleshooting breakdowns; maintaining supplies; performing preventive maintenance; calling for repairs.Documents service and installation actions by completing forms, reports, logs, and records within our service software.Maintains customer confidence by keeping service information confidential.Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications.Accomplishes operations and organization mission by completing related results as needed. If you are hired by United Service Technologies, we provide you with a company credit card, gas card, Android smartphone,GPS,tools needed for service, company work shirts and a service vehicle. You will need to provide non slip shoes and work pants.  We will dispatch you from your house every morning so you will now be paid to commute. We offer full benefits. Vision,Dental and Medical. We also have a 401K. We offer one month of paid training on becoming a field service technician.  We work on average 10 hours a week of over time. We also have our technicians on call one or two weekends a month, depending on the time of year. When you’re on call, you’re free to go about your business as usual, we only ask that you can respond to a service call within 2 hours and keep your phone on you at all times. We also ask that you are flexible to travel one or two weeks a year for training or to help one of our different service areas.  Please check out our website - http://ustservice.com/",Field Service Technician Job in Anaheim,Full Time,"Anaheim, CA 92806",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Job-Anaheim-CA-US-165469037.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=6,"40,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),ec44119c9e035c6379c45cb4b7b2f7de
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:09:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking for an enthusiastic, dependable, customer service oriented person to join our growing team as a Termite Technician. You should be interested in route and service work. We provide a good starting hourly rate (including overtime as applicable) with first raise within 90 days, a State of Tennessee Drug Free Workplace, Simple IRA, paid training and other excellent benefits. Good driving record and communication skills a must.Requirements:Deliver “exceptional” customer service to both external and internal customers/potential customersInspect premises, measure area dimensions, apply appropriate product, set traps as needed and properly operate equipmentAdhere to industry laws, legal codes, government regulations and agency rulesA good driving recordRoute Experience a huge plusNo experience in Pest Control necessary; we offer comprehensive training to obtain Pesticide Applicator Certification by the State of Tennessee.Qualified Candidates will have:High School Diploma or GED equivalentGood verbal and written communication along with problem-solving, negotiation, and time management skillsAbility to work flexible hours (no Sundays)Ability to work in a team setting, as well as independently with minimal supervisionMust have a valid Driver LicenseThis is not just job; this is a career opportunity to join a well-established company with a solid future.Job Type: Full-timeRequired license or certification:Driver's LicenseRequired education:High school or equivalent",Pest Control Technician Job in Goodlettsville,Full Time,"Goodlettsville, TN 37072",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Pest-Control-Technician-Job-Goodlettsville-TN-US-165543675.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=17,,Entry Level,bd7fd53c89f347102fde1bc1547307d2
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:19:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"SMA is the vision of Mr. George C. Coulam who is the owner and founder of the Texas Renaissance Festival. We have been building our private arboretum for the last 11 years on a lovely 200 acre property located between Plantersville and Magnolia Texas in the small town of Todd Mission. Our main plant interests centers on cold hardy palms, American and Asian lotus, canna lilies, and evergreen magnolias. We plan for the arboretum to go public after Mr. Coulam passes away and the entire garden infrastructure is completed. We are looking to hire a non-smoking assistant to help Mr. Coulam and myself in our endeavor. Some of the job responsibilities include: -being involved in daily management of the grounds crew-daily planning meetings with Mr. Coulam and myself-seasonal plant orders-pest and disease management-landscape design and layout-creating and operating under an annual budget-maintaining and expanding irrigation infrastructure-helping develop a master planWe are interested in an individual that is self-motivated, adapts well to change, excellent interpersonal skills, and a quick and innovated thinker. Mapping skills would be helpful. The position is considered fulltime as the company operates year round Monday-Friday and some weekends.Bachelors degree in horticulture or related plant field required.",Assistant Manager of Horticulture and Landscape Operations Job in Plantersville,Full Time,"Plantersville, TX 77363",Agriculture/Forestry/Fishing,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Manager-of-Horticulture-Landscape-Operations-Job-Plantersville-TX-US-165255087.aspx?mescoid=4500767001001&jobPosition=19,"32,000.00 - 40,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),9caf858de4faf2700a1b02f27d3a185f
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:02:20:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"WuXi AppTec Philadelphia is expanding its manufacturing cell & gene therapy capabilities - because of this exciting growth, we are looking for a new Production Planner to plan and forecast for the clinical manufacturing site, conveniently located at the Philadelphia Naval Yard.As a Production Planner,you will be responsible for prioritizing requirements to generate a production schedule that balances manufacturing capacity, operating efficiencies, and inventory levels; provide direction to adequately plan and utilize capacity within the facility and achieve 100% on-time delivery; maintain accurate MRP system data to enable effective production schedules, purchasing requirements, and inventory levels; actively and systematically look to improve business processes related to production planning, material planning, and inventory management; as well as evaluate the effect of system and process changes as they occur within the supply chain.Desired Skills and Experience5 to 8 years of production planning or related logistics experienceBachelor degree in Materials Management, Engineering, or related fieldProven experience with ERP/MRP system in a manufacturing environmentGMP/GLP experience preferredGreat Plains software experience preferredExperience with Lean Manufacturing preferredMust work effectively in a participative team environmentDelivers on commitmentsStrong analytical, computer and organizational skillsInnovative self-starter, goals and task oriented with a bias for actionTime management & multi-tasking abilityDemonstrated problem solving skillsExcellent presentation skills, written and oralAbout Us...WuXi AppTec is a leading global pharmaceutical, biopharmaceutical, and medical device outsourcing company with operations in China and the United States. Our vision is to build an open-access technology and capability platform that enables anyone and any company to discover and develop therapeutic products to benefit patients. As an innovation-driven and customer-focused company, WuXi AppTec provides a broad and integrated portfolio of services throughout the research, development, manufacturing, and regulatory process. Our services are designed to help our customers worldwide, by shortening discovery and development time and lowering the expense of R&D through cost-effective and efficient outsourcing solutions. Evolving from four founders and a single laboratory in December 2000 to over 10,000 employees and 5 million square feet of facility space across 21 campuses in the U.S. and China today, WuXi AppTec is building an alternative R&D engine to serve the worldwide life-science industry, and providing our clients with unprecedented access to global and emerging markets.We are an Equal Opportunity Employer - Woman/Minorities/Disabled/Veteran",Production Planner Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19112",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Planner-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165981043.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a5b7e63dbcdbac0bdd9ac99ce01a6966
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:03:12:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are two schedules available for this position:Tuesday -Saturday from 3:00 PM to midnight ORMonday-Friday from 3:00 PM to midnightSUMMARY Loads, unloads, and moves materials within or near center, cross dock, trailers, yard, or work site by performing the following duties. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES included the following. Other duties may be assigned.Reads work order or follows oral instructions to ascertain materials or containers to be moved. Receives items for shipment, inspects visually for identity, quantity, and condition. Checks for obvious damage and segregates items requiring special handling. Opens containers as directed by work instructions or supervisor. Loads and unloads materials onto or from pallets, trays, racks and shelves by hand or with forklift or other handling equipment. Loads materials into carrier vehicles and installs strapping, bracing or logistic bars padding to prevent shifting or damage in transit. Completes receiving and shipping documents accurately and completely per ProTrans specifications with the scan gun. Counts, weights, and records number of units of materials moved or handled in PTI System. Ensures proper identification. Identifies all shipments by proper marking and labeling, including special handling instructions. Coordinates transportation requirements. Coordinates any special handling problems. Gathers data for preparing reports. Warehouses and stores inbound and outbound cargo awaiting processing and/or onward movement. Stacks or assembles materials into bundles and bands bundles together as direct per work instructions. Lifts heavy objects by hand or with power hoist, and cleans work area, machines, and equipment. Conducts safety and equipment checks daily. Operates machinery such as banding, taping, and sealing. Follows all safety procedures. Actively works to improve individual and center safety record. Actively works for continuous quality improvement. Identifies and implements continual improvement initiatives to enhance the performance of the position, team, and company.REQUIREMENTSHigh School diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Must have at least two years of recent experience with sit down forklift and warehouse experience. Must have basic math skills Scanning experience required Able to lift a maximum of 75 pounds Computer literate Must have experience in shipping/receiving materials Bilingual English/Spanish a plus ",Material Handler Job in Greer,Full Time Employee,"Greer, SC 29650","AllTravel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/Material-Handler-Job-Greer-SC-US-166016109.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=13,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,501f9bdaba974a5c78cb39caed6a53d7
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:03:13:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Description: As the world’s leading supplier of thermal analysis and rheology systems, TA Instruments is a fast growing and highly profitable division of an S&P 500 company, priding itself in innovation and an uncompromising commitment to customer support.  Our continued growth relies on recruiting and developing individuals that can make a positive contribution to our business.  For additional information about our high technology products sold to Fortune Global 500 companies and leading academic institutions and government laboratories around the world, visit our website at www.tainstruments.com.  Headquartered in Delaware, with manufacturing sites in the US and Europe, we are represented in all of the major markets around the world with sales offices in the USA, Canada, Japan, India, China, Taiwan, South Korea, Brazil, Mexico, Australia and across Europe. TA Instruments is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Typical tasks of the position include, but are not limited to:  Perform on-site installations of test systems, specifically focusing on training on ElectroForce WinTest software and general mechanical testing techniques Provide Technical Support to Customers, Sales Reps and other Field Service PersonnelPerform on-site technical services, including troubleshooting and completing electrical or mechanical repairsPerform on-site calibrations on a variety of sensors including but not limited to: load cells, displacement sensors and pressure sensorsCompleting other production tasks: Checkout tests, factory calibration and/or electro-mechanical assembly depending on skills and proficienciesEstablish and maintain prompt professional communications, both written and verbal, with customers and internal resourcesSignificant amount of travel is required (60-80%), primarily focused across the USA but occasionally requiring international travel to Europe and Asia. The successful candidate will have a combination of knowledge, skills, and experience that would include the following: Knowledge normally acquired through completion of a two (2) year technical degree in electronics and instrumentation or a four (4) year bachelor’s degree in mechanical or electrical engineering.  Prior field service experience is highly desirable but not required Demonstrated analytical and problem solving skills Excellent training and communication skills to effectively deal with customers and co-workers Ability to organize and prioritize work activities and to handle multiple projects simultaneously Ability to make practical decisions without appreciable direction or advance preparation Ability to read and understand mechanical and electrical assembly drawings and schematics Demonstrated aptitude in the use of a variety of desktop computer hardware, operating systems and applications software such as Microsoft Excel®, Word®, PowerPoint®, and Outlook®. Working knowledge of networking also highly desirable. Must possess a valid driver’s license and be able to travel both by ground and air carrier Must be able to lift up to and including 70lbs A Credit Card is required for travel purposes",Field Service Engineer Job in Eden Prairie,Full Time,"Eden Prairie, MN 55344",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Engineer-Job-Eden-Prairie-MN-US-158072124.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=4,,Entry Level,74af751e2d9a7d16dbbf806090879960
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:03:42:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:An exciting and new opportunity for experienced Heavy Truck Mechanics in the Buffalo, NY area is available! Mechanics looking to join a stable and welcoming dealership environment are encouraged to apply. The ideal Technician will have over 5 years experience in all areas of truck repairs from regular maintenance to performing repairs and computer diagnostics. Those with strong engine and electrical troubleshooting skills will be given preference. Mechanics with previous factory or manufacturer training is considered an asset. Those wishing to test their expertise and skill with a variety of heavy trucks among qualified professionals will enjoy this opportunity. The successful Technician will subject to a pre-employment drug test and background check. Please forward a copy of your resume if you're interested in this opportunity.Compensation:$15.00 - $26.00/hour. The starting wage is flexible and will be based on experience. This package also includes full benefits, 401K contribution, and performance based bonuses.Shifts:Days, 7:30am - 4:00pm (Monday - Friday)We encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Diesel Truck Mechanic Job in Buffalo,Full Time Employee,"Buffalo, NY",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Truck-Mechanic-Job-Buffalo-NY-US-165659155.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=1,,,be3a333c9621403e089402f980bf49f3
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:03:57:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hertz Equipment Rental Corporation (HERC) is an industry leader specializing in construction and industrial equipment rental. Since 1965, we have provided rental equipment and services for projects and applications including but not limited to commercial and residential construction, industrial and manufacturing plants, and entertainment services.In addition to providing equipment and tools from brand names our customers trust, we employ knowledgeable and dedicated employees at our 260 branches throughout the US and Canada. We are committed to providing the highest quality of service to our customers.Basic Understanding of the following:Construction and Industrial FleetMechanical knowledgeFuel SystemsElectrical SystemsHydraulic SystemsIf you are looking for an exciting and rewarding career with a growth-oriented company, HERC is the right place for you! As an industry leader, HERC offers the opportunity for training, development, and advancement. In addition, we offer highly competitive compensation and benefits package, including a generous vacation program. Apply today to be part of a team built for success!Physical Requirements:Applicant must possess all auditory, speaking and communicating capabilities necessary to complete the responsibilities detailed above. The essential functions of this position include, but are not limited to, the following such as sitting, standing, walking, driving, speaking, hearing, writing, lifting, typing, filing, seeing, and reading. Knowledge of equipment operation such as computer terminal, telephone, portable computer, calculator, copy machine, and fax machine is required.Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Mechanic C Job in Oklahoma City,Full Time / Employee,"Oklahoma City, OK",,http://jobview.monster.com/Mechanic-C-Job-Oklahoma-City-OK-US-165672628.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=9,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,faec0dd531934c21fcd80b250dcadcf1
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:04:07:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  The purpose of this job is to help ensure guest satisfaction by maintaining all dishes, pots, pans, silverware, glasses, equipment, and kitchen utensils in a clean and sanitized condition.  In addition, this job requires that the employee keep the dishwashing machine station, three compartment sink, and related areas clean.   Tasks & Responsibilities: Able to follow directions Work in an environment that at times can be hot and humid Maintain a neat and orderly work station Know and comply with all company policies and procedures regarding safety, security, emergencies and energy Report to work on time and in complete uniform Other duties as assigned Qualifications   Minimum of one year experience Understanding of basic kitchen sanitation Must be able to work holidays, weekends, and varied shifts Must be able to perform repetitive tasks and stand for extended periods of time   Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-04-25",General Utility Worker - Weston Hospital - Patient - Cleveland Clinic Job in Weston,"Part Time, Employee","Weston, FL 33331",,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Utility-Worker-Weston-Hospital-Patient-Cleveland-Clinic-Job-Weston-FL-US-165759357.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=4,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c2e5caffb9c5c96900628b4ed962bbe8
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:04:11:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Responsibilities:If you are seeking a career with Unlimited Possibilities, outstanding co-workers and a chance to make a difference, Plastipak offers an opportunity for mechanically inclined people who can multi-task and thrive in a fast-paced work environment! We are seeking a Machine Operator, who is looking to develop higher levels of process expertise. This position will use technical knowledge of operations, processes, and equipment to aid in the completion of projects aimed at reducing costs, improving quality, improving reliability, expanding production capacity, developing new technologies, and maintaining compliance. The Machine Operator will lead and/or support:-Projects aimed at improvements related to products, processes, and equipment. -Development of technical expertise on current and future processes. -Projects of smaller scope and contribute expertise (based on experience level) on larger projects. -Excellent customer service in all interactions. Responsibilities also include:-Hands-on operation and maintenance of automated blow molding and injection molding equipment.-Monitoring and performing setting adjustments.-Completion of all preventative maintenance. -Mechanical troubleshooting.-Performs quality control checks.-Establishes and fosters all Good Manufacturing Practices (GMP), ISO, and safety standards. -All other duties as assigned.Qualifications: -Certification, Associates Degree, or Technical Degree in Electronics, Automated Technology, Plastics Technology, Electro-Mechanical or related area required -SPC, Six Sigma, Lean Manufacturing and/or statistical analysis experience -Hands-on Injection Molding and/or Blow Molding machine experience preferred -Strong mathematical and analytical skills-Strong verbal and written communication skills -Positive attitude, high energy, flexibility, and personal initiative-Inquisitiveness and ability to implement improvements to processes and policies-Ability to work well under pressure and maintain professional demeanorhttps://loopapply.com/apply/62/E5F5D9B4BD588BF18E2B005056984D64 ""> $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Process Technician(Machine Operator) Job in Modesto,Full Time,"Modesto, CA 95357",,http://jobview.monster.com/Process-Technician-Machine-Operator-Job-Modesto-CA-US-165427447.aspx?mescoid=1700218001001&jobPosition=1,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,fb8e96bb4e6333424ee1ba40d6c366b0
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:04:14:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title:                    Maintenance Specialist Location:             Seattle, WashingtonDept.:                   Maintenance  Reports to:          Facilities ManagerHours:                  Full-time (40hrs. wkly.), Monday - Friday, DaysSalary:                 $15 - $18 per hour D.O.E.Job Number:       M022616.2  The Lighthouse is a mission-driven, private, not-for-profit social enterprise providing employment, support, and training opportunities for people who are blind, DeafBlind, and blind with other disabilities. We are a successful manufacturing organization with over 60 years of experience in precision machining as well as being a professional service provider and federal contractor.  We produce an array of machined parts and plastic injection molding for various aerospace manufacturers, as well as a host of office products and hydration equipment.  The Lighthouse also offers a variety of services to our commercial, federal, and military customers. These include Contract Management Support (CMS) services for government contracting offices and a Contact Center which places and receives inbound and outbound calls.  We also own and operate stores on military bases along the West Coast. If you are interested in being a part of a dynamic and engaged social enterprise that values: Accessibility, Accountability, Communication, Community, Confidentiality, Respect, Safety, Teamwork, Training, and Upward Mobility, you are encouraged to apply for the below position. Summary: The successful Maintenance Specialist candidate ensures all machinery and equipment including building and grounds is in satisfactory working condition and complies with all safety standards. Coordinates with custodial staff, PM staff and contractors as needed to complete building repairs and routine maintenance. Coordinates projects and provides direction to contractors and employees on a project basis. Reports to maintenance supervisor; position has previously reported to Vice President, Administration when facilities supervisor position is vacant.    Essential Job Functions: ·        Maintains and repairs all equipment in production areas including electrical, plumbing, outdoor sprinkler systems, welding, air compressors and vacuums.·        Assists with new jigs and equipment for production areas.·        Sheetrock, paint, and remodel office spaces as needed. ·        Erect cubicles and office furniture as needed.·        Respond to maintenance requests on a daily basis. ·        Determine tools and supplies needed to complete jobs. Complete purchase orders and submit for approval.·        Assists maintenance with repairs and installation of equipment.·        Must be knowledgeable about safety procedures and maintain safe work conditions for all employees.·        Provides machine shop maintenance as needed.·        Performs other duties as assigned. Minimum Requirements: ·        High School Diploma required.·        Proven familiarity with machine shop machinery in a manufacturing environment required. ·        Demonstrated mechanical aptitude to problem solve.·        Ability to maintenance and repair equipment. ·        Ability to perform a wide range of building maintenance projects requiring hands-on construction related experience. ·        Three to five years combined experience performing building maintenance; construction related responsibilities; and maintaining/repairing manufacturing machinery and equipment required.·        Ability to lift 75 pounds required.·        Ability to work safely in a team environment. Ability to work independently and lead teams on maintenance tasks and projects.·        Above average mechanical ability and troubleshooting skills highly recommended.·        Knowledge of electrical circuits, hydraulics, pneumatics, and manufacturing machine operation required.·        Proven ability to drive forklift required.·        Welding experience is desired. Though you may meet the requirements for work eligibility in the United States, this position requires that you meet special government/military compliance regulations (ITAR-International Traffic in Arms Regulations). This means you must be able to provide legal documentation as a U.S. citizen, U.S. permanent resident alien, or other ITAR compliant status. Equal Opportunity Employer, Male / Female / Persons with Disabilities / VEVRAA FEDERAL CONTRACTOR Please send resume to: Kevin Daniel, Sr. Director of Strategic RecruitingThe Lighthouse for the Blind, Inc.2501 S. Plum Street Seattle, Washington 98144Fax number:            206.436.2244Telephone:  206.973.4060E-Mail:           jobs@seattlelh.org  For more information about employment opportunities and information on the Lighthouse organization, please visit our websitewww.seattlelighthouse.org/job_postings",Maintenance Specialist Job in Seattle,Full Time,"Seattle, WA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Specialist-Job-Seattle-WA-US-165408464.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=2,,,f10656e7f540f04790a8d30deb7a8574
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:04:15:23,No,jobs.monster.com," The 2nd Shift Industrial Maintenance Position performs a variety of general maintenance tasks on electrical, hydraulic and pneumatic equipment, including repairs, as well as preventative maintenance according to program outlines.      JOB DESCRIPTIONResponsible for trouble shooting and repairing basic electrical, hydraulic and pneumatic equipment. Conducts preventative maintenance according to program outlines.  Reports and/or documents supplies needed.Responds to production needs in a timely manner.Reads/understands diagrams, instructions and technical manuals. Verifies accuracy and completion of repairs.May perform other duties or work in a production area as needed based upon business demands.Maintains a clean and safe work environment. JOB REQUIREMENTS ·         High School diploma or equivalent required·         3+ years of previous experience in industrial maintenance preferred  ·         Pre-employment technical and electrical testing required·         Strong mechanical/electrical aptitude ·         Mathematical and mechanical reasoning abilities·         Critical thinking skills and the ability to develop new ways to solve tough problems·         Strong problem solving and decision making skills·         Self-motivated and eager to assume additional responsibilities as needed",Industrial Maintenance nd Shift Job in Chardon,Full Time Employee,"Chardon, OH 44024",,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Maintenance-2nd-Shift-Job-Chardon-OH-US-165267478.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,18.00 - 24.00 $ /hour,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,b0a353f6c6e4dbf1c48a9892e57a68cc
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:04:54:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"HOME INSTALLATION SPECIALIST Summary Support Miele's delivery and installation program of large major appliances (i.e. washers, dryers, dishwashers, refrigerators and much more) as part of a two-person team. Adherence to Miele's core principles, professional appearance and conduct standards. Essential Functions Assist with the loading and/or unloading of appliances by hand or with the use of a hand truck or dolly Assist senior installers in the removal of existing appliances, installation, testing, and/or adjusting of appliances in customer's home Instruct customers in the proper use of Miele products Assist in maintaining the delivery truck in safe working order Perform other installation related services as necessary Physical Demands Ability to sit, walk and crawl occasionally Ability to stand, squat, kneel and dexterity to bend/twist neck and waist, frequently Ability to use hands repetitively and power/simple grasp constantly Ability for fine manipulation of hands as well as pushing, pulling and reaching above and below shoulder level constantly Physical ability to lift, pull and push products up to 50 pounds frequently Physical ability to lift, pull and push products that weigh in excess of 100+ pounds occasionally Ability to carry items up to 6 feet occasionally Work Environment Generally works in a customer's home but may be exposed to extremes in temperature, humidity or wetness when in transportation May occasionally walk on slippery or uneven surfaces May have exposure to dust, gas, fumes or chemicals  On occasion, may use special visual or auditory protective equipment Will occasionally climb stairs and work off elevated surfaces Frequently work with bio-hazards for Commercial Technicians only Requirements 100% local daily travel required A valid driver's license High school diploma or general education degree (GED) Knowledge of basic plumbing and electrical skills Good computer skills with knowledge of Microsoft Office Ability to apply concepts of basic math Ability to read, write and comprehend instructions, correspondence, and memos in English Ability to mulit-task Successful pre-employment screening process including drug screen and background investigation Ability to work professionally with colleagues and be a team player Must be self-motivated, customer oriented person with excellent communication skills Provisions by Miele include the following: Competitive pay  Miele service vehicle Installers are equipped with uniforms, tools, laptop and mobile phone Extensive product and Miele service training conducted by factory-trained team members Career Opportunities Health & Wellness Benefits Medical, Dental, Vision, Prescription Plan, Flexible Spending Account Financial Security Benefits 401K, 529 Education Savings Plan, Long-Term Disability, Life Insurance, Affinity Credit Union, Corporate Mortgage Program, Employee Referral Program Quality of Life Benefits Employee Assistance Program, Health Club Memberships, Paid Time Off, Personal Days, Vacation, Volunteer Time Interested candidates that possess dedication, the skills to exceed our customer’s expectations as detailed herein and the drive to join a growing appliance brand are encouraged to apply online at www. mieleusa.com .   ABOUT MIELE There are only a few brands in the world that have sustained their vision, traditions and high-quality standard for more than a century. Fewer still that can claim consistent family ownership and international brand name integrity. And only one that is recognized for creating the world’s most innovative appliances. Founded in Germany in 1899 with a single promise of Immer Besser, a phrase meaning Forever Better, Miele has dynamically grown to become the world’s largest family-owned and operated appliance company with over 16,600 employees, 12 production facilities, representation in nearly 100 countries and annual turnover of USD$3.62bn (2009/10).   As a premium appliance brand represented on all continents, Miele is steadfastly committed to the highest quality, performance and environmental standards. The company’s innovative heritage, state-of-the-art design and engineering aesthetic have inspired comparison to other powerhouse German brands synonymous with innovation: Mercedes-Benz and BMW.  Miele’s range of exceptional consumer appliances includes: vacuum cleaners; laundry systems; rotary irons; dishwashers; built-in convection, speed, steam and combi-steam ovens; cooktops; ventilation hoods; refrigeration; wine storage and coffee systems. Additionally, Miele Professional (the commercial product division) offers dishwashers, washing machines, tumble dryers and rotary irons for commercial use as well as washer-disinfectors for medical, dental and laboratory applications.    To research further, we invite you to visit mieleusa.com for complete and detailed product information or miele-sustainability.com for our public communication regarding Miele’s commitment to our environment and its employees. Miele is an Equal Opportunity Employer and supports and enforces a drug-free workplace.  EOE/AA:M/F/D/V",Driver / Appliance Installer Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Driver-Appliance-Installer-Job-Los-Angeles-CA-US-165813128.aspx?mescoid=4900886001001&jobPosition=5,,General/Other: Installation/Maintenance/Repair,9bd2a922f1ba5f182ad11379794d3c59
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:05:25:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"THIS JOB IS IN NAPLES FLORIDA !!!Works in partnership with the Community Director to lead the ongoing upkeep and improvement of the community, hire, develop and retain effective property management professionals, build, update and track to the capital improvements / maintenance plan, and develop and manage an annual budget.Conducts regular physical inspections of all areas of the property and is responsible for the upkeep of buildings, grounds, and equipment.Orders supplies and materials per TGM policy in order to properly maintain the property.Ensures the timely execution of preventative, deferred, and routine maintenance.Leads, mentors, and trains maintenance staff on an ongoing basis.Schedules and oversees all vendor work to ensure the work is performed to TGM standards.Follows TGM's dress code policy, including selection of outfits from the designated corporate clothing catalog. Maintains a clean, neat, professional appearance at all times.Works to implement and oversee capital projects.Supports TGM staff and ensures superior customer service.Oversees and evaluates all contractor work and ensures the work is being completed according to the project scope.Maintains a team of dedicated and skilled service technicians by providing the required leadership, training and guidance.Makes consistent, balanced decisions while improving NOI.Operates within the parameters of the maintenance and property budget through competitive pricing with vendors, staff time management, proper care and use of equipment, parts and supplies as well as regular preventive maintenance.Oversees the maintenance of all electrical, plumbing and mechanical systems.Maintains TGM standards on performance of maintenance functions for occupied and vacant apartments.Schedules and monitors preparation for market ready units.Keeps shop and storage areas in neat and well organized condition.Provides high-quality customer service when interacting with residents.Schedules maintenance employees according to property needs.Conducts regular physical inspections of all areas of the property (interior and exterior), to maintain a high standard of safety and aesthetic appearance.Proactively diagnoses resident/property/staffing problems, communicates the issue, formulates a solution and implements a plan for correction.",Maintenance Supervisor Job in Ft Lauderdale,Full Time,"Ft Lauderdale, FL",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Supervisor-Job-Ft-Lauderdale-FL-US-162966168.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=2,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),aa06aac921130cb4b6904045af097b1d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:05:27:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Meet DOT requirements and / or CDL qualified as required by job assignment.Bend, stoop, crouch, squat, crawl, climb, stand, sit and turn / pivot.Part-time: Up to 5 1/2 hours per day, 5 days a week.Extended hours may be required as necessary.Report to work on a regular and timely basis.Ability to work varying shifts and extended hours as business needs require.Must be able to travel by car and plane to attend meetings at other locations and call on non-UPS locations and customers.Must be able to supervise and train employees effectively.Perform office tasks using simple hand grasping, fine hand manipulation associated with assigned task such as paperwork, use of computer, filing, calculating and use of telephone.Have a sufficient ability to communicate, through sight and hearing, to perform assigned tasks and maintain proper job safety.Work in an environment with variable temperatures and humidity. Exposure to dust, dirt and noise. Enclosed work areas. Outside inclement weather. Elevated heights and uneven surfaces.Work cooperatively in a diverse work environment.Demonstrate cognitive ability to follow directions and routines. Work independently with appropriate judgment. Exhibit spatial awareness. Read words and numbers. Concentrate, memorize and recall. Identify logical connections and process up to 2-3 steps ahead.Other job functions that may be assigned. ",UPS Part Time Preload Supervisor Job in Franklin Park,,"Franklin Park, IL 60131",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/UPS-Part-Time-Preload-Supervisor-Job-FRANKLIN-PARK-IL-US-166036065.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,ece64c7bf67847ada70695c8dde36e37
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:05:30:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is a leading property manager with a portfolio of more than 17,000 units of high-quality housing. They are now seeking a Maintenance Technician to join their team in rural Florida. This is an excellent opportunity for an HVAC certified maintenance professional looking to take on a varied and diverse role with a successful, growing company. As a Maintenance Technician, you will be responsible for effectively maintaining our client’s apartment community in Bowling Green. Supporting the Maintenance Supervisor, you’ll assist with daily work orders and preventative maintenance activities. Specifically, this will include carpentry, plumbing, appliance, electrical and other typical apartment repairs. Working in a safe and efficient manner at all times, you’ll use protective equipment and ensure that all tasks are completed to a high quality. Additionally, you will participate in an emergency on-call rotation for any out of hours maintenance activities. To be considered for this role, you must have: - At least three years’ experience as a maintenance technician gained within an apartment community - The ability to perform work on appliances, electrical systems, plumbing systems, carpentry, panting and/or sheetrock - Strong organization and customer service skills - The ability to work independently without supervision - Good diagnostic skills - An HVAC certification - Your own set of tools Dependable and reliable, as a Maintenance Technician, you must be friendly and approachable with strong communication skills and good conflict management abilities. Equally important are your time management capabilities. Please note, our client is an equal employment opportunities employer. To apply for the role of Maintenance Technician, please apply via the button shown. This vacancy is being advertised by Web Recruit LLC. Web Recruit, LLC is in the business of performing recruitment services. Additional Keywords: Maintenance Technician, Property, Property Maintenance Technician, HVAC, Custodian, Caretaker, Janitor, Facility Maintenance Technician, General Maintenance Technician, Groundskeeper, Maintenance Specialist.",Maintenance Technician – Apartment Community Job in Bowling Green,Full Time,"Bowling Green, FL 33834",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-%E2%80%93-Apartment-Community-Job-Bowling-Green-FL-US-164911696.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=10,$Competitive,,571dc6bb410907c32108aa90705fce56
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:05:30:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY OF JOBThe Outside Plant (OSP) supervisor manages a dedicated maintenance team responsible for a variety of duties related to the maintenance and repair of the OSP network. The position ensures superior customer service through timely resolution of customer service interruptions and maintaining a proactive plant maintenance plan. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Ensures OSP service affecting issues are resolved promptly – provide guidance in identifying, diagnosing, and resolving plant problems.  Manages the maintenance and relocation of the OSP facilities related to storm damage, road projects, and property redevelopment.Oversee the preparation and the submitting of state highway, railroad, and electrical inspection permits as necessary. Manage test & turn up of plant extensions.Documents changes made to OSP facilities and submit changes to the engineering department.Completes weekly progress forms, project activity reports and all other documentation pertaining to the completion of maintenance projects and new plant activation. Coordinates construction activities with outside utility companies and other sources, including local communities, to ensure smooth project flow. Control material flow with contractors in order to maintain an accurate inventory. Prepares bill of materials and purchase requisition requests. Ensures OSHA, NESC, and Metronet safety regulations and precautions are followed when completing assigned work.  Special projects as required. EDUCATION/TRAINING/EXPERIENCEHigh school diploma or the equivalent is required. Associates degree or equivalent from two-year college or technical school preferred.Five years of CATV/Telco construction supervisory experience. Ability to read and interpret OSP maps and designs.Knowledge of NESC, OSHA, and related state and local codes.Proficient in the use of OTDR’s and fiber optic cable splicing.Windows based software skills (AutoCAD, Excel, Word, Access) preferred. SKILLS/KNOWLEDGE/PERSONAL QUALITIES:      Strong planning, organizational, and follow up skills.  Excellent people and process management skills. Good analytical and communication skills, sound judgment, and the ability to work effectively with multiple department staffs. Ability to recognize priority issues and escalate accordingly. Ability to learn new processes and procedures. A drive to win as a part of a team Passion for your work and the mission of the company",Maintenance Supervisor,Full Time,"Overland Park, KS",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Supervisor-Outside-Plant-Operations-Job-Overland-Park-KS-US-164967285.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=20,,,bd3f61fb491cc71776e331620d32cb0c
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:05:43:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"GVI, Inc., a Government contracting industry leader, is seeking an Engineering Technician II to conduct Sonar / Towed Array module physical inspection, electrical testing, troubleshooting, array assembly and ship board installation of towed bodies while working pier side, in all weather conditions and/or in a warehouse environment. Candidate will be responsible to review technical documentation, identify discrepancies and submit TMDERS (Technical Manuals Deficiency/Evaluation Report) corrections.  Other responsibilities include shipping/receiving/warehousing, government property administration, and asset tracking.  All candidates must have and maintain a valid driver's license and must be able to lift 40 lbs.  Candidates must be able to perform light mechanical maintenance actions and operate a forklift as part of assigned duties and be experienced in the use of Microsoft Office products (2007/2010). Candidates must have a minimum of one year work related experience in electrical/electronic systems.Candidates with a strong electronics background is required is required, including familiarity with general electronics test equipment, such as Multi-Meters, Megohmeters, Oscilloscopes Time-Domain Reflectometers (TDRs), Frequency Generators, Spectrum Analyzers, etc. Candidates with prior US military service, preferably Navy and on a platform utilizing towed sonar systems (submarine or surface ship), including the operation, troubleshooting, and/or repair of towed sonar arrays or experience is a plus.  Position is located in Kings Bay, GA.  Hourly pay rate is $16.57. An Equal Opportunity Employer - It is the policy of GVI, Inc. to recruit, hire, train, and promote persons in all job classifications without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or veteran status",Engineering Technician II Job in Kings Bay,Full Time,"Kings Bay, GA 31547",,http://jobview.monster.com/Engineering-Technician-II-Job-Kings-Bay-GA-US-164597072.aspx?mescoid=1700221001001&jobPosition=16,16.57 - 16.57 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),5e6bbaf250c0a4c48e37b452cbf8f88c
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:06:14:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Goodman Networks is a leader in the design, engineering  and deployment of fixed and mobile networks.  With a track record of success working with the largest service providers in North America, Goodman Networks is leading the industry in the deployment of new technologies such as LTE, Small Cell and DAS solutions.   Company vehicles provided! Seeking a challenging position that rewards hard work and quality service? Wanting to have opportunity to make money based on your performance and motivation to succeed? If so, Goodman Networks Field Services has the opportunity for you!   Goodman Networks is seeking motivated individuals to install and service DirecTV satellite systems residentially. This is a challenging and rewarding job working with the latest technology and providing excellent customer service. We offer paid training, steady work, and real opportunities for advancement. We prefer previous experience in Home Satellite System / Cable / Telephone Installation, but do provide paid training for those who have not installed before.   We are hiring in the following locations:                                                            Texarkana, TX  Hope, AR   Nashville, AR  Hope, AR  Lake Providence, LA  Hamburg, AR  Clarksville, TX  Many, LA  Center, TX  Monroe, LA  Marshall, TX    Castor, LA    Essential Functions: Work independently and responsible for the installation of DirecTV systems in residences and businesses Provide technology service and support to all of our customers Ensuring customer satisfaction at the highest level Determining the best location for customer satellites Making sure the customer is comfortable with all aspects of running the system by providing thorough explanations Running cables and hooking up receivers Stocking vehicle with necessary equipment on a weekly basis Continuing to learn about new technology Goodman Networks considers applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital or veteran status, or any other legally protected status. At least 21 years of age and legally able to work in the United States Possess high school diploma or GED Possess a valid driver’s license Working knowledge of hand tools and power tools Basic computer skills and comfortable operating electronic devices Strong customer service skills Excellent verbal and written communication skills Available for a flexible work schedule (weekends / holidays / evenings) Requirements: Be able to lift up to 80 lbs on a regular basis Be comfortable climbing up to heights of 40 feet Be able to work safely from a ladder rated for a maximum working load of 300lbs including all tools and equipment Be comfortable working in crawlspaces and attics Comfortable working outdoors in all types of weather throughout the year Benefits: Company vehicle will be provided after training Completely paid training and certification program (paid $10 per hour during the training) Biweekly pay at or above industry standard, depending on experience (after training period, paid per job completed) Medical, dental, vision, life, and short-term disability insurance 401K Paid employee referrals Health Advocate service Tuition Assistance Program Leadership and Service Excellence training opportunities Paid Time Off (PTO) Company perks, including employee discounts and free DIRECTV programming that includes NFL Sunday Ticket and NASCAR HotPass Additional income can also be earned by referring customers to additional products offered by Multiband Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 50%",AT&T / DirecTV Installation Technician - Texarkana,Full Time Employee,"Bossier City, LA 71111",Telecommunications ServicesBusiness Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/AT-T-DirecTV-Installation-Technician-Texarkana-OK-Job-Bossier-City-LA-US-164939317.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=19,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f4e0f9860b7392613f28c0fde6a11aa7
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:06:22:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: * Inspect buildings in accordance with state rules and regulations. * Schedule termite re-inspections. * Make termite re-inspections and complete reports. * Complete daily activity reports as required. * Attend technical training seminars to stay abreast of changes. * Maintain vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. * Other duties as assigned. SUMMARY: At Terminix®, our people bring tremendous pride and integrity to everything we do. In turn, we provide a working environment where these skilled professionals can achieve true satisfaction in their own lives. We are proud to offer our exceptional associates competitive compensation, comprehensive benefits and outstanding opportunities for professional development. If you're committed to providing the highest level of customer service, we have an ideal opportunity for you. In this position you will provide building inspection and state reports as required. Sell, schedule, and follow up on termite control service. QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE: * High school diploma or general education degree (GED); one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. LANGUAGE SKILLS: * Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. * Ability to write simple correspondence. * Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. MATHEMATICAL SKILLS: * Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. * Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS: * Licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. * Valid driver’s license. At Terminix, people come for a job and stay for a career. As a Terminix associate, you’ll enjoy excellent compensation and benefits as well as the opportunity for the professional growth and respect that comes from working for an industry leader. Qualified candidates must have a high school diploma or general education degree (GED). We perform criminal background checks, motor vehicle record checks and drug screening. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Technician / Termite Inspector Job in Benton,"Full Time, Employee","Benton, AR",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Technician-Termite-Inspector-Job-Benton-AR-US-165829011.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=2,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,a909e174b49842aa191801e1717ecba5
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:06:24:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pentair Overview We are a global water, fluid, thermal management, and equipment protection partner with industry leading products, services, and solutions that fit your changing needs. We aim to deliver the adaptive, industry-leading solutions that help ensure a safer, healthier future for all. Pentair works at the very center of global commerce, providing critical inputs to a wide range of essential industries. From Filtration and Processing to Flow Management, and from Equipment Protection to Thermal Management, we apply the inventive thinking and disciplined execution to push the boundaries of what's possible. We bring to bear our extensive expertise through deep collaborative efforts, looking ahead to ensure the future of the world's most essential resources, equipment and infrastructure. Everything we do is driven by our passion to help people live better. Business Unit Overview Pentair’s Valves & Controls business is a leading manufacturer and marketer of valves, actuators, and controls solutions, providing products, services and innovation for the most challenging applications throughout the energy and process industries. Whether our customers operate in the oil and gas, power, chemical and pharmaceutical, mining, marine, or food and beverage markets, we endeavor to deliver the highest quality products and value-added services that improve our customers' business efficiency. Job Summary Job Title:              Pressure Relief Valve Technician 3Location:              Pasadena, TXReports To:          Service ManagerSCOPE OF RESPONSIBILITIES:Under the direction of the Service Manager, is responsible for disassembly, inspection, assembly, in process inspection, light machining and final testing of all types of Pressure Relief Valves. These duties are part of the new valve assembly program. The job also requires the person to exhibit an extensive knowledge of ASME/NBIC codes and standards as they relate to pressure relief valves.   JOB DUTIES:Perform receipt inspection of various valves and parts being able to verify and match incoming material with customer and Pentair Valves & Controls receiving documentation.Perform pre-testing, disassembly, cleaning, in process inspection, machining, assembly, final testing, and final inspection on various types of direct and/or pilot operated pressure relief devices and vents.  Must be qualified to supervise start up and operation of the high pressure steam boiler.Must be able to train and perform CI (Certified Individual) inspection.Complete all final documentation for final shipping.Perform training of the ASME/NBIC code as related to pressure relief valves.Perform training to factory proceduresMust be able to read and interpret various part drawings, customer specifications and valve assembly and maintenance instructions.Must understand and follow pertinent Pentair Valves & Controls policies and procedures relative to all assigned duties and responsibilities.Must be customer oriented willing to work overtime as required. Understanding this may involve evening and weekend call in, often times with very little notice.Establishes and maintains acceptable attendance habits.Must be willing and capable of supervising other personnel and jobs when required.Must be capable of using company operating system to assist inside sales in maintaining accuracy of sales orders.Must be capable of performing reviews of incoming ordersResponsible for implementation of production schedule in assigned area to ensure customer delivery expectations are met Perform other duties as required. Job Requirements & Skills QUALIFICATIONS: Physical tasks include walking, grasping, carrying, lifting, seeing, hand-eye coordination, listening, and writing, speaking and traveling.Mental tasks include reading, interpreting, analyzing, calculating, measuring and communicating.Perform product testing, lifting and installing product weighing 35 lbs., Work is performed typically indoors.Some outside work required during local and long distance field service work. Travel generally within 100 miles of Pasadena Facility.Work which occasionally produces a high level of mental/visual fatigue, periodically performed under pressure, requiring intense mental application and attention to detail.Frequent exposure to one or more unpleasant (noise, heat, dust, etc.) or hazardous conditions 21-50% of work time.Ability to successfully complete various in-house and customer safety training programs. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE: General mechanical skills with emphasis on trouble shooting and problem solving specific to pressure relief valvesCI CertifiedCertified National Board trainingFactory product trainingEducation equivalent to High School Diploma or G.E.D.4 to 6 years Pressure Relief Valve experience Required COMPETENCIES:Action OrientedDirecting OthersEthics and ValuesFunctional/Technical SkillsCustomer Focus Decision QualityProblem Solving  Additional Information EEO Statement Pentair is an Equal Opportunity Employer. ",Service Technician III Job in Pasadena,Full Time Employee,"Pentair Overview We are a global water, fluid, thermal management, and equipment protection partner with industry leading products, services, and solutions that fit your changing needs. We aim to deliver the adaptive, industry-leading solutions that help ensure a safer, healthier future for all. Pentair works at the very center of global commerce, providing critical inputs to a wide range of essential industries. From Filtration and Processing to Flow Management, and from Equipment Protection to Thermal Management, we apply the inventive thinking and disciplined execution to push the boundaries of what's possible. We bring to bear our extensive expertise through deep collaborative efforts, looking ahead to ensure the future of the world's most essential resources, equipment and infrastructure. Everything we do is driven by our passion to help people live better. Business Unit Overview Pentair’s Valves & Controls business is a leading manufacturer and marketer of valves, actuators, and controls solutions, providing products, services and innovation for the most challenging applications throughout the energy and process industries. Whether our customers operate in the oil and gas, power, chemical and pharmaceutical, mining, marine, or food and beverage markets, we endeavor to deliver the highest quality products and value-added services that improve our customers' business efficiency. Job Summary Job Title:              Pressure Relief Valve Technician 3Location:              Pasadena, TXReports To:          Service ManagerSCOPE OF RESPONSIBILITIES:Under the direction of the Service Manager, is responsible for disassembly, inspection, assembly, in process inspection, light machining and final testing of all types of Pressure Relief Valves. These duties are part of the new valve assembly program. The job also requires the person to exhibit an extensive knowledge of ASME/NBIC codes and standards as they relate to pressure relief valves.   JOB DUTIES:Perform receipt inspection of various valves and parts being able to verify and match incoming material with customer and Pentair Valves & Controls receiving documentation.Perform pre-testing, disassembly, cleaning, in process inspection, machining, assembly, final testing, and final inspection on various types of direct and/or pilot operated pressure relief devices and vents.  Must be qualified to supervise start up and operation of the high pressure steam boiler.Must be able to train and perform CI (Certified Individual) inspection.Complete all final documentation for final shipping.Perform training of the ASME/NBIC code as related to pressure relief valves.Perform training to factory proceduresMust be able to read and interpret various part drawings, customer specifications and valve assembly and maintenance instructions.Must understand and follow pertinent Pentair Valves & Controls policies and procedures relative to all assigned duties and responsibilities.Must be customer oriented willing to work overtime as required. Understanding this may involve evening and weekend call in, often times with very little notice.Establishes and maintains acceptable attendance habits.Must be willing and capable of supervising other personnel and jobs when required.Must be capable of using company operating system to assist inside sales in maintaining accuracy of sales orders.Must be capable of performing reviews of incoming ordersResponsible for implementation of production schedule in assigned area to ensure customer delivery expectations are met Perform other duties as required. Job Requirements & Skills QUALIFICATIONS: Physical tasks include walking, grasping, carrying, lifting, seeing, hand-eye coordination, listening, and writing, speaking and traveling.Mental tasks include reading, interpreting, analyzing, calculating, measuring and communicating.Perform product testing, lifting and installing product weighing 35 lbs., Work is performed typically indoors.Some outside work required during local and long distance field service work. Travel generally within 100 miles of Pasadena Facility.Work which occasionally produces a high level of mental/visual fatigue, periodically performed under pressure, requiring intense mental application and attention to detail.Frequent exposure to one or more unpleasant (noise, heat, dust, etc.) or hazardous conditions 21-50% of work time.Ability to successfully complete various in-house and customer safety training programs. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE: General mechanical skills with emphasis on trouble shooting and problem solving specific to pressure relief valvesCI CertifiedCertified National Board trainingFactory product trainingEducation equivalent to High School Diploma or G.E.D.4 to 6 years Pressure Relief Valve experience Required COMPETENCIES:Action OrientedDirecting OthersEthics and ValuesFunctional/Technical SkillsCustomer Focus Decision QualityProblem Solving  Additional Information EEO Statement Pentair is an Equal Opportunity Employer. ",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Technician-III-Job-Pasadena-TX-US-165760192.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,589dda5ecdd9b19d480888847329a679
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:07:01:06,No,jobs.monster.com," Earn $190.00+ daily, will train.Duct and Vent Cleaning ServicesRight now our company is training and hiring service technicians for residential dryer duct cleaning in your area. We have been in business since 1983, accredited with the Better Business Bureau since 1997 rated A+. The work is very enjoyable, easy to learn, and we will train.   Work with us... and learn a service trade.  Equal Opportunity EmployerTo apply call our application directly at 1-248-451-0847 for your local area.We do not accept on line applications, call to apply!Professional Maintenance and Cleaning Services         Job Requirements:           1. You will need transportation to drive to the customers, jobs will be in your local area.        2. Start working with us part-time, the hours and days are flexible and be adjusted to your needs. If you have a current job, take classes, or have family obligations you can work around your current schedule. Full time may be available later if you are interested.        3. Work well without supervision, help with some marketing in your area, must be 18+ years old.         4. If you're hired as a service technician you will need dryer duct cleaning equipment and supplies to do this work. The total cost for your dryer duct cleaning equipment and supplies is three hundred eighty five dollars. This cost is reimbursed and paid back to you as you work. If you meet the job requirements, we will train. Call to apply!        Work with us... and learn a service trade.                     Call us directly to apply             at 1-248-451-0847 for your area.                   We do not accept on line applications            We are also hiring chimney cleaners and air duct          cleaners, with experience and your own equipment.  Other job seekers that may have an interest in this job: heating and cooling, hvac, maintenance, repairs, handyman, flexible hours, part time, home repair, services, transportation, general labor, home construction, remodel, building, appliance repair, sales, opportunity, cleaners, clean, cleaning, warehouse, delivery, office, flooring, apprentice, truck driver, transportation, deliver, carpenter, painter, carpet installation, washer, roofing, general laborer, landscaper, builder, assistant, retail sales, salesperson, full time, teacher, student teacher, training, management, seasonal work, advancement opportunity, entry level, customer service, installers, technicians,      ",Vent Cleaning,Part Time,"Oklahoma City, OK",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Vent-Cleaning-190-00-Per-Day-Will-Train-Enjoyable-Work-Call-Job-Oklahoma-City-OK-US-165850235.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=1,,Entry Level,dfa8c9f9fdcaa29445f25eb1365297d6
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:07:02:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: To operate, monitor, maintain and control the operation of Level II production machinery according to production standards and schedules. To manage flavor changeovers, package changeovers, bottle changeovers, line startups and runouts. Days and hours 2nd Shift Monday-Friday 2:00pm- 10:30pm Accountabilities: Perform necessary pre-operation activities to ensure proper equipment start up and operation on multiple pieces of equipment. Monitor multiple pieces of equipment during operation to ensure quality product and minimal unplanned stops Accurately and efficiently perform steps necessary to conduct flavor/package changes and proper shut-downs to minimize down-time wasted resources Housekeeping Minimum Requirements: Read & write; have basic troubleshooting skills; interpret written SOP’s or instructions; interpret verbal instructions;  basic math. High School diploma or equivalent Operations experience with fillers, labelers, depals, denesters, forklifts (Desired). Strong mechanical and machine troubleshooting skills (Desired). See Job Description",Part Time Manufacturing Operator II (Forklift) Job in Nashville,Part Time Employee,"Nashville, TN 37201",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Part-Time-Manufacturing-Operator-II-Forklift-Job-Nashville-TN-US-165999050.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=18,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,ca22651f463154b5b15b3a168d3fb91a
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:07:02:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-Time Brookdale Cape Coral 1416 Country Club Blvd Cape Coral, FL 33990-2198 Job #:  052378Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities: * Maintain scheduled and unscheduled maintenance on, but not limited to: H.V.A.C., elevator, fire and sprinkler equipment, generator, landscape, kitchen equipment and emergency pull cord equipment* Perform general maintenance projects as scheduled or assigned, including installations and repairs involving plumbing and electrical equipment, carpentry work, painting and equipment repair* Respond to maintenance requests by residents for items needing repair in their rooms * Maintain positive communications with local fire marshal, building inspector, and any other jurisdictions governing the community Required skills and qualifications: * High school diploma or GED * Three years of experience with building maintenance (painting, minor plumbing, minor electrical, carpet cleaning, pressure washing, etc.) * Knowledge of building equipment, building codes and building systems * Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed * Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Maintenance Technician Job in Cape Coral,Full Time Employee,"Cape Coral, FL 33990",Hotels and Lodging Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Cape-Coral-FL-US-163788142.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,86a31a166384dcf5196f96728b2cc03a
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:07:03:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Study Start-up Specialist needed for a contract opportunity with Yoh's client located in South San Francisco, CA. The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess: - Knowledge and understanding of ICH-GCP, the regulatory, ethics and contractual requirements for starting clinical trials in relevant country What You'll Be Doing: - The Study Start-up (SSU) Specialist functions as a subject matter expert on all SSU-related activities in the country/region, oversees and leads SSU activities in collaboration with other clinical research stakeholders and serves as a leader for local/global SSU process improvements and patient recruitment strategies. - Coordinates, guides and assists with all start up activities prior to site activation, including but not limited to:Site Informed Consent Form (ICF) localization and guidance in line with regulatory / health authority requirements - Ethics Committee information, meeting dates & costs - Ethics applications & associated online systems - Ethics & Governance submission processes Clinical Trial Health Authority application and regulatory submission process - Contracts & Indemnity request process Localize global Informed Consent Form (ICF) with country requirements - Other materials and documentation used by the study requiring local governance approval - Maintains up to date knowledge, ensure adherence and compliance with local regulatory requirements and associated documentation - Review, analyze and collate metrics to ensure processes are in place that drive efficiency and reduction of timelines across start up and contracts negotiation - Ensures all start up information & requirements are kept up to date in a central repository for project teams - Assists with label preparation and approval (local label representative) for studies in collaboration with local regulatory department - Tracks metrics and study start-up timelines to identify trends and opportunities for improvement What You Need to Bring to the Table: - Demonstrated competence in analysis, planning and problem solving. - Excellent communications skills including the ability to state opinions clearly, ask questions, seek clarification, communicate facts objectively, challenge when appropriate, and pursue issues to resolution - Ability to present clear messages from complex information/data to all levels in the organization in both written and spoken English - Experience working as part of a team with a proven ability to make an active contribution to the team's performance and teamwork - Able to make effective decisions, self-motivated, assertive, and displays initiative - Proven project management and organizational skills and the ability to prioritize and manage multiple tasks with flexibility - Demonstrated computer literacy, usage of MS Office software, web-based systems and databases. - Prior work experience demonstrating knowledge and understanding of clinical trials, such as that obtained in a clinical trial monitor capacity, and experience managing projects. - Demonstrated knowledge and understanding of ICH-GCP, the regulatory, ethics and contractual requirements for starting clinical trials in relevant country Bonus Points! Otherwise Known As Preferred Qualifications: - University Degree preferably in a medical/science-related field Get Hired, Apply Now! Recruiter: Mary Nguyen Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: CLINICAL; J2W: SCIENTIFIC; MONJOB TAX TERM: CON_W2 J2WPACNW Ref: 1070907 SFSF: LS Nearest Major Market: San FranciscoNearest Secondary Market: Oakland Job Segment: Medical, Law, Compliance, Clinical Research, Healthcare, Legal, Research #TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Study Start-up Specialist Job Job in South San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"South San Francisco, CA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Study-Start-up-Specialist-Job-Job-South-San-Francisco-CA-US-166046124.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=7,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,1a2f281bc4dd599a3748720eb9701a37
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:08:02:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Sparta Area School District is seeking candidates for Custodian I at the Administrative & Educational Center. Hours 1:30 p.m. - 10:00 p.m. Full year position. $14.82/hr. Please see job description at http://www.spartan.org/wp-content/uploads/2015/08/ article223.pdf Submit letter of interest, resume', two letters of recommendation, and district application form to Lowell Fromm, Sparta Area School District, 201 E. Franklin Street, Sparta, WI 54656. Application must be received by April 26, 2016.",Custodian I Job in Sparta,Full Time,"Sparta, WI 54656",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Custodian-I-Job-Sparta-WI-US-165885927.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=12,,,858188995a989c288e8b7c979bd38b49
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:08:03:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"B.A. Morrison Means Quality & ServiceB.A. Morrison is a family-owned Heating, Ventilation, Air-Conditioning (HVAC) and General Construction company. We have been in business since 1990 and are fully insured and bonded. Read more about our general construction business history here. Our professional employees are experienced, trustworthy, and honest tradesmen. We are ready to meet your contractor or heat and air needs in a timely scheduled manner, to your satisfaction and at a fair price. We offer regularly scheduled maintenance of your HVAC equipment, new and replacement heaters, furnaces and air conditioner units, furnaces and air conditioning equipment installation, and nearly all your general construction needs.HV/AC Installer Job:Duties:Install and maintain heating, ventilation, and cooling units for both commercial and residential customers. Diagnose and repair of electronic, mechanical and electrical components of these systems.Travel to job sites in service area, and work with dispatch to ensure schedule is maintained and delays are properly communicated to customer.Be available to work nights or weekends, on a rotating basis, to service emergency needs of our customers.Maintain good working order of company vehicle including refueling as necessary, reporting any mechanical issues, and filling out and submitting monthly vehicle inspection form. Vehicles should be washed on a regular basis.Maintain proper stock, parts, tools, and safety equipment in the vehicle.Participate in company provided training opportunities on latest industry technologies.Identify and report to owner potential opportunities for additional business (newer system, service contracts, and additional services).Skills:Five to seven years experience in installation, maintenance, and correcting diverse HVAC issues.Good analytic skills and attention to detail with ability to read and interpret blueprints, plans, and manuals.Excellent customer service skills with desire to exceed customer expectations.Ability to work independently in a timely manner, making sure job is done correctly the first time.Other Requirements:Neat appearanceValid driver’s licenseValid social security numberLift up to 50 pounds; be able to push, pull, carry or maneuver heavier items (with additional manpower or appropriate devices); carry ladders; work from heights, work in small crawl spaces.Observe all company procedures and safety rulesMaintain accurate time records and send to payroll when requiredWork as part of our team to ensure customer satisfaction",HVAC Installer Job in Castro Valley,Full Time,"Castro Valley, CA 94546",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Installer-Job-CASTRO-VALLEY-CA-US-165724581.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=14,"$25.00+ /hourDependent on experience, regular evaluations for raises",Experienced (Non-Manager),a1b0b961cb28eeb777609c5ce001a626
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:08:29:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"SummaryMaintains grounds of industrial, commercial, or private property while complying with Fluor and the client’s environmental and safety policies and procedures. Specific services include mowing, trimming, edging, seeding, sodding, mulching, fertilizing, irrigation, tree and shrub care and planting, erosion and surface drainage control, clean-up, landscaping, and general vegetation control. Essential Duties and Responsibilities·         Cleans grounds and removes litter, rubbish, trash, and debris.  ·         Plants flowers, trees, plants, ground cover, and shrubs and reseeds and resods grass areas using gardening tools. ·         Perform ground maintenance duties, using motorized tools and attachments, such as tractors, mowers, lime or fertilizer spreaders, lawn rollers, leaf blowers, etc.·         Mows various lawn and grass areas.·         Trims and edges around walk ways, flower beds, and walls using clippers, weed cutting tolls, and edgers.·         Rakes and bags leaves and clippings using hand or power equipment.·         Trims around trees, shrubs, cultivated areas, fences, poles, walls, sprinkler heads, valves, and other similar objects.·         Prunes shrubs, bushes, hedges, trees, and other cultivated plants.·         Maintains mulch cover.·         Provides weed control.·         Inspects grounds and grassed areas for the presence and location of pests and disease.·         Implements standard trade practices and procedures (using appropriate safety precautions) for routine maintenance.·         Provides technical and training assistance to junior staff.·         Performs general housekeeping duties in the work areas and shop.·         Complies with all Fluor Corporation safety requirements and programs.·         Executes all work activities with the highest standards for safety, quality, cost, and schedule.QualificationsTo perform this job successfully, an individual must, among other things, be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential and/or non essential functions. Skills/TradesProduces workmanship, including safety, quality, cost, and schedule, commensurate with Journeyman Level in one (1) or more of the following trades: Grounds keeping, Irrigation repair, Electrical, Electronics, HVAC, Millwright, Pipefitter, Plumber, Welding. Education & Experience·         High school diploma or general equivalency degree (GED).·         Trade school, industrial or commercial experience.·         Knowledge and experience with advanced and/or sophisticated hand tools and equipment.·         Knowledge and experience of facilities systems.·         Ability to read and interpret building layouts, system drawings and manufacturers’ equipment specifications.·         Knowledge of standard and specialized maintenance practices.·           The SAP Pay Scale Group will apply as follows based on a combined prior related experience and time-in-grade period of:                                   at least 48 months – Level 4 Language Skills·         Ability to read and comprehend complex instructions, correspondence, memos, and technical service bulletins.·         Ability to write detailed and concise correspondence.·         Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to clients and other employees of the organization. Mathematical Skills ·         Ability to calculate figures and amounts such as discounts, percentages, area, circumference, and volume.  Computer Skills·         Basic knowledge and understanding of windows based PC’s.·         Ability to read, create, and manage documents in Word, Excel, and other related windows based programs.·         Possess a general understanding of the concepts, work flows, and processes of Computerized Maintenance Management Systems (CMMS). Certificates, Licenses, Registrations_______________________________________                         _______________________________________                         _______________________________________                         _______________________________________ ",Landscaper Job in San Diego,Full Time,"San Diego, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Landscaper-Job-San-Diego-CA-US-164214077.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=12,,,fc17198d252990d77972faf2dccfe302
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:08:29:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is currently hiring for Plant Engineering Electrical/Belt Maintenance Mechanic positions. This position is responsible for a broad range of maintenance activities that are performed to keep a UPS package handling facility operating efficiently and effectively.  The work is sometimes fast-paced and requires routine interaction with other hub employees. Ideal candidate must be available to work 2nd or 3rd shift. This is a 24 x 7 operation. A possibility of weekend work. This position requires hands on electrical experience including control circuits and welding. An assessment will be given to assess electrical, welding and other maintenance skills.Major work activities for this position include:Troubleshooting, adjusting, and replacing AC and DC electrical equipment such as batteries, control stations, fuses, motor starters, relays, switches, timers, servo driven equipment, Programmable Logic Controllers (PLCs), photo electrical devices, transducers, Variable Frequency Drives (VFDs) and encoders.Inspecting, troubleshooting, repairing, and/or replacing mechanical components such as motors, reducers, drive chains, sprockets, sheaves, pulleys, rollers, conveyor belts, bearings, and transfer plates.Inspecting, troubleshooting, repairing, and/or replacing pneumatic equipment such as diverters, air compressors, lubricators, hoses, and coils.Inspecting, troubleshooting, repairing and/or replacing hydraulic equipment such as hoses, fittings, cylinders, and pumps.Welding equipment such as hand rails, conveyor supports, package handling equipment, carts, and grading.Performing preventive maintenance inspections of plant equipment such as conveyors, bulk carts, and power industrial equipment.",UPS Plant Eng Electrical / Belt Maintenance Mechanic Job in Louisville,,"Louisville, KY 40213",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/UPS-Plant-Eng-Electrical-Belt-Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-LOUISVILLE-KY-US-164813456.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=13,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,3834bea245f26f6212d293b123d6c57c
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:08:29:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY OF POSITION:Member of the location leadership team. Directly responsible for the overall management of the assigned department including all aspects of current operation to assure acceptable safety, housekeeping, quality, productivity, employee conduct and performance criteria are achieved. Direct responsibility for all department employees to ensure proper orientations, training, development, compensation and working conditions are present.KEY DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:• Responsible for assigned department functions and all associated personnel.• Responsible to appropriately staff and schedule departmental personnel to ensure production requirements are met while minimizing costs.• Responsible for planning departmental operations by establishing priorities and sequences for manufacturing products.• Develops or revises standard operational and working practices and observes workers to ensure compliance with standards.• Observes and coaches personnel on work related issues.• Ensures plant staff (Leads) enforce Company policies and procedures, plant wide safety rules and employee rules of conduct.• Responsible for: developing people; improving processes; reducing costs; quality monitoring and improvements; superior customer service; and on-time delivery.• Incorporates Milgard’s vision and values into day-to-day activities and behaviors; guides and motivates others to remain committed to the Milgard philosophy.• Responsible for interviewing, hiring, training, terminating, disciplining and coaching employees.• Able to motivate employees to achieve results. Must be an effective communicator, capable of teaching and generating results while enhancing the Milgard work environment and supporting the Company philosophy.• Participates in the Leadership Development Program (LDP) for the location.• Creates and executes MPS objectives, meeting MPS commitments and working within the guidelines of MPS; reflects Milgard business values and the Milgard philosophy in all business interactions.• Conducts quarterly MPS reviews with employees.• Actively develops Succession Candidates.The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees in this position. This is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities.LEVEL OF SUPERVISION:• Supervises assigned department Leads. The Production Supervisor must be able to function with minimal supervision.EXPERIENCE REQUIRED:• Minimum three (3) to five (5) years production supervision experience.• Prior employee management experience preferred.EDUCATION/LICENSES/CERTIFICATION/FORMAL TRAINING:• High School diploma or GED.• Bachelor's Degree highly desired; Some college preferred.ESSENTIAL ABILITIES:• Read, write and understand the English language.• Sense of urgency and self-motivation; ability to work independently.• Ability to work under pressure and meet deadlines.• Computer literacy with ability to learn new computer software programs.• Excellent written and oral communication skills.• Attention to detail with strong organizational skills.• Excellent customer service skills.PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:• May be required to frequently lift up to 60 lbs.• Prolonged standing and repetitive motions, bending, stooping, pushing and pulling.• Prolonged sitting and terminal use.• Good hand eye coordination and the ability to discern colors.• Hand dexterity and strength.• May be required to work weekends.WORK ENVIRONMENT:• Work performed indoors and outdoors in a warehouse type facility.Milgard does not tolerate discrimination of any type, and offers equal employment opportunity to all qualified persons without regard to race, color, religion, sex, natural origin, age, disability or medical condition, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status or any other considerations made unlawful by Federal, State or local laws. We believe in providing eligible and qualified employees with opportunities to advance. Milgard is an at-will employer.",Production Supervisor - Swing Shift Job in Sacramento,,"Sacramento, CA",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-Swing-Shift-Job-Sacramento-CA-US-165987975.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=9,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),2a11d88de93f2871ce94840ee7af5b7d
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:08:29:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Land O'Lakes Maintenance Supervisor - Union Center, WI The Land O'Lakes Animal Milk Products plant at 654 Bridge Street, Union Center, WI, presently has a full-time Maintenance Supervisor position opening. This position is responsible for providing leadership to the overall maintenance efforts of the facility and grounds to maximize efficiency; managing and coaching maintenance technicians; determining materials, equipment and supplies needed to perform maintenance efficiently; identifying problem equipment and implementing solutions; managing location maintenance budget including all capital projects. The ideal candidate will be responsible to identify process improvement opportunities along with utilizing experience and training to build additional skills. Qualified candidates will possess strong leadership and communication skills as well as the ability to work in a team environment. Relocation assistance will be provided for the candidate selected for this role. Qualified candidates must possess skills in leadership, mechanical, troubleshooting, pipefitting, fabricating and welding. A 2-year technical degree and/or previous experience preferred. Basic computer skills are necessary. Position requires regular hours in excess of 40 hours per week. Land O'Lakes offers excellent wages and benefits as follows: ""Salary - based on qualifications and experience ""Paid Time Off ""10 Paid Holidays/Year ""Health, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance ""Short-Term and Long-Term Disability ""Supplemental Savings Program (401K) ""Retirement Plan ""Educational Assistance To be considered, apply to Requisition Number #160432 at: www.landolakesinc.com Land O'Lakes is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Land O'Lakes enforces a policy of maintaining a drug free workplace, including pre-employment substance abuse testing.",Maintenance Supervisor Job in Union Center,Full Time,"Union Center, WI 53962",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Maintenance-Supervisor-Job-Union-Center-WI-US-165044255.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=11,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b4108d834628347652d951435178df90
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:09:19:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description: Metals USA – has a Maintenance Mechanic position at our Seekonk, MA Location. Metals USA -Plates and Shapes Division is a solid growth oriented carbon steel distribution center servicing the defense, commercial construction, road construction and fabrication industries. The Maintenance Mechanic under limited supervision, performs routine diagnostic tests, and performs repair and equipment maintenance functions.  Will need to be able to use a variety of tools to perform both electrical and mechanical repairs. Ability to diagnosis malfunctions by utilizing proper troubleshooting techniques using multimeter, ammeter, schematics, hand tools, etc.  Experience troubling shooting PLC controlled equipment is a plus. Ability to replace mechanical components that have failed by employing troubleshooting techniques, reading maintenance manuals, and physical correction of problems using hand tools, burning torches, welders, shop tools and gauges. Experience with the maintenance and repair of oxy-fuel torches, plasma torches, band saws, shears, mobile equipment and cranes is a plus. Follows OSHA safety guidelines and maintains a clean and safe work environment by complying with procedures and regulations. May perform other duties as assigned.Requirements:Basic Measuring skills to read and convert English and Metric systemsBasic arithmetic skills to calculate and convert decimals and fractionsOverhead crane and forklift experience Must have vocational/trade school education in electrical/mechanical work or journey-level experience equivalentMinimum 2 -3 years’ experience in general maintenance repair work. Requires a competent technical aptitude, demonstrated manual dexterity, finger dexterity Great Compensation and Benefits Package Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer M/F/V/D  ",Maintenance Mechanic Job in Seekonk,Full Time,"Seekonk, MA",Metals and Minerals,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-seekonk-MA-US-165546526.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=10,,,89af37873f96c31f7c27b7fbd77f523a
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:09:20:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintain production equipment to achieve production requirements. Analyze equipment failures and Kaizen as needed to reach operation targets. Extensive Electronics and PLC troubleshooting / programming as well as mechanical overhaul and adjustment of machinery. Daily and preventative maintenance on automated equipment. Knowledge of control wiring, strong computer skills and project management skills preferred. Minimum of 2 years of Industrial Maintenance experience or technical education equivalent.Minimum of 1 year of demonstrated ability troubleshooting, modifying, repairing and performing preventative maintenance on automated industrial equipment.Demonstrated cross-functional experience / skills: PLC, HMI, Ladder Logic, Electrical, Mechanical, Hydraulic, Pneumatic systemsStrong Microsoft Excel, Word and Windows experienceExperience with advanced PLC programming, advanced HMI programming, electronic circuit troubleshooting, PC hardware and software repair.Strong knowledge of electronics",Production Maintenance Associate Job in Maryville,Full Time,"Maryville, TN",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Maintenance-Associate-Job-Maryville-TN-US-165851310.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5e613fb9965bd1570f863e6d8c8a8644
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:09:22:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking 2nd shift Production (or Packaging) Supervisor for food/pharma  manufacturing operation with Bachelor’s degree in related field and/or ten or more years of production experience within manufacturing with five or more years of experience in a team leadership capacity.  Must have comprehensive knowledge of HACCP/GMP or Global Food Safety certification and experience working with ERP systems. Must have the ability to create a professional, productive work environment by educating and directing personnel on the use of all control points, equipment, and resources; maintaining compliance with established policies and procedures.Responsible for Safety, Quality and Production related activates.Good salary and benefits.EOE",Production Supervisor Job in Cherry Hill,Full Time,"Cherry Hill, NJ",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-Job-Cherry-Hill-NJ-US-166014540.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=17,bonus eligible,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),cec278f48abb2eaf6b92ac614adbcab6
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:09:38:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Applied Medical, a progressive medical device developer, manufacturer, and distributor, invites exceptional individuals to pursue careers in our innovative organization.  If you would like to be a part of one of the fastest growing and most innovative companies in the medical device field, then Applied Medical is the place for you.  Applied’s team members enjoy an environment that allows opportunity for growth and choice in individual career paths as team members develop their skills, training and business knowledge.  Our common goal of improving healthcare through meeting the needs of clinicians and patients is achieved through the dynamics of our team and its universal dedication to improved patient outcome.   Job Description We are currently looking for High Speed Mill Machinist (all shifts), EDM Wire Machinist (all shifts) CNC 7-Axis Mill/Turn Machinist (all shifts), EDM Sinker Machinist (2nd and 3rd shift), CNC/Manual Lathe Machinist (2nd and 3rd shift), CNC/Manual Grinding Specialist (2nd and 3rd Shift), Jig Grinder (all shifts) and CNC/Manual Mill Machinist (2nd and 3rd Shift) to work within the framework of a team. Job Requirements This position requires the following skills and attributes:·         5 years experience interpreting blueprint dimensions.·         Experience using measuring tools while holding close tolerances.  ·         Working knowledge of MI’s, QSR, ISO, SPO’s, work rules and safety guidelines.  ·         Must be able to read, speak and write in English and have strong interpersonal communication skills.·         3 shifts available. Company Benefits Applied Medical offers an excellent and competitive compensation and benefits package including medical and dental coverage, flexible benefits account, 401(k) and generous holiday and vacation accrual schedules.   How to Apply If you are interested in joining Applied Medical and meet the job requirements above, please click on Apply or forward your resume to MachinistCareer@appliedmedical.com or fax resume to (949) 713-8882. Applied Medical is an Equal Opportunity Employer.  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability or genetic information. Applied Medical is a tobacco free campus. ",Machinists-Multiple Specialities Job in Rancho Santa Margarita,,"Rancho Santa Margarita, CA 92688",,http://jobview.monster.com/Machinists-Multiple-Specialities-Job-Rancho-Santa-Margarita-CA-US-165977203.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=11,,,5ec89febf2f3305d078013d7b3f0faf8
United States of America,US,05/Nov/2015:09:38:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"AUTOMOTIVE SALES PORTERSunnyside Honda is seeking a full-time Sales Porter.  Qualified applicants must have a clean driving record, a valid driver’s license and pass a drug screen.  Job Duties Include:Keeping a clean and orderly lotShuttling cars Keeping lot cars cleanOther general duties as assigned We Offer the following benefits:Great centralized location ( I-71 & Pearl )Unlimited advancement opportunitiesPaid Time Off (PTO)401kMedical, Dental & Vision plan Drug-free workplace Applications are available at our receptionist desk or email your resume to belliott@sunnysideauto.com.",Sales Porter Job in Cleveland,Full Time,"Cleveland, OH 44130",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Porter-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-165005490.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,Entry Level,2c611a5ed0826856d8c693c705065f8f
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:14:59:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Regus is the world’s leading provider of professional workplaces on demand. Vision To lead the flexible workplace revolution. Purpose The Customer Service Representative (CSR) in conjunction with the rest of the centre team plays a key role in delivering an exceptional professional and friendly service to all business centre customer, visitors and prospective clients. The CSR is an extension of our clients business ensuring that they are able to concentrate on their work, while we manage their office needs Key Areas of Responsibility  - First point of contact for new and existing customers and visitors therefore providing an exceptional impression and service  - Responsible for the day to day running of the centre and providing services including:  - Managing switchboards; handling calls of various internal /external clients as well as various Regus areas of business  - Managing meeting room booking system  - Preparing offices for move-in/ move-outs  - Responsible for maintaining and troubleshooting basic IT and telecom technical issues, set up and queries  - Resetting Meeting Rooms to accommodate bookings  - Administrative tasks- delivering their mail, answering their phones, sending their packages, ordering their office supplies,  - Procurement  - Demonstrate ownership of the centre to ensure the centre is ‘show ready’ at all times-  - Ensure continual upkeep and standards of business centre to include offices, meeting rooms and communal areas  - Contributes to the overall revenue of the centre by identifying opportunities to promote Regus products and services  - Duties may vary depending on centre needsKey Skills and Experience & Competencies Key Skills  - Exceptional Customer Service skills, including the ability to remain flexible and calm in high pressure or continually changing situations  - Effective and professional communication skills in both local language and English (written and oral)  - Solid organisational skills, including the ability to prioritise and multi task in a demanding environment  - Working knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite, including Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook and the ability to understand further programmes to assist in the day to day centre operations  - Ability to operate basic office equipmentCompetencies  - Ability to build and maintain strong working relationships  - Embraces Change  - Takes Ownership and uses initiative  - Good Communicator  - Team Player  - ResilientKey Relationships  - New and existing customers (In-house clients, Meeting Room Clients, Virtual Office Clients)  - Centre team  - Line manager",Community Associate Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30308",All,http://jobview.monster.com/community-associate-job-atlanta-ga-us-178277618.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),31c81d2fb4677fcd74aec16ebe14d7cf
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:15:25:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO)Position Summary  This position is responsible for providing detailed instruction and guidance on corporate Lean initiatives through advanced facilitation, management, and administration of related principles, tools, and values including promotion & advancement of strategic planning, training & development, and physical implementation.  Essential Functions·         Defines requirements for operations and ensures the implementation of Lean strategies and initiatives to effectively meet or exceed requirements & customer expectations·         Ensures developmentally productive environment for all employees·         Administers and communicates company policies, goals, strategies, and vision·         Supervises and develops staff and otherwise carries out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization’s policies and applicable laws·         Facilitates quality systems, continuous process improvement, and safety initiatives in accordance with Lean thinking throughout the organization·         Responsible for advancing customer metrics (safety, quality, cost, delivery, and morale)·         Develops, models, and coaches Lean Warehousing Systems applications·         Regularly reviews Lean performance expectations with leadership teams across the organization, providing expectations, performance planning, feedback, training & development and performance discussions·         Performs administrative duties commensurate with the requirements of the organization including data gathering, metrics, reports and news letters ·         Mentors, coaches and trains various levels throughout the company Scope and Accountability:Applies broad knowledge to act as a key contributor on complex or critical assignments; contributes to the standards around which others will operate and acts as an advisor/coach to mentor other team members. Develops solutions and execution strategies in complicated or novel situations. Impacts the business by influencing decisions through advice, counsel or facilitating services to others in area of specialization.  Qualifications Knowledge:  Degree in Logistics, Operations, Management, Lean Manufacturing or related field required. Skills: o    Lean Warehouse Knowledgeo    Transportation Knowledge and Managemento    Safety & Security§  OSHA and MSDS Regulations -Warehouse compliance§  Safety program experience and oversighto    Business Management Skillso    Planning – Strategic and/or Tacticalo    Quality Management System Knowledgeo    HR Administrationo    Computer Skills§  Microsoft Office – Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Visio, Access§  Microsoft Project§  Computer based WMS technology Experience: This Position requires 3-5 years leading Lean in an operation with additional managerial experience (Education may substitute for years of experience) providing overall direction, implementation, and continuous improvement of Lean systems infrastructure in all phases of warehousing and distribution. Must be willing to travel 70+% of the time. Person must have capabilities to manage multiple tasks at the same time. Physical Demands and Work Environment:Physical Demands:  While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands or finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk and hear.  The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.Work Environment:  The duties of this job are performed in both an office environment and a warehouse environment, thereby experiencing some minor to moderate level of noise due to office equipment and warehouse equipment.   May require extended hours in order to meet customer’s needs.  Travel will be required to specific customer and XPO locations. Job location to be determined based on the needed support.         We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Project Mgr Job in Lithia Springs,"Full Time, Employee","Lithia Springs, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-mgr-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178653688.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,1fc429346ae42754647d7251ce638705
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:15:28:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Leads and performs Customer Service functions regarding a specific or assigned number or assigned customers which could include regional, dedicated or National Accounts. Will work in conjunction with other internal departments to achieve territorial balance of capacity and freight while achieving high service levels. Will take total responsibility of ensuring all requirements are met company wide in regards to Customer expectations.Lead two (2) JIT/ high exposure accounts or one major account for Swift and have the skill set necessary to meet customer expectations.Lead and solicit business from a specific or assigned number of customers by using daily available capacity. Serve as an extension of Sales to expand business revenue by exploring all dedicated, rail and logistics opportunities with Customers. Be aware of the system wide balance/imbalance within the Swift network to book freight accordingly.Serve as Customer's first line of communication and refer Customer to the proper departments if/when necessary (i.e. Pricing, claims, etc.) Responsible for managing service issues by researching and coding all applicable service failures in the system to support accurate service reporting. Responsible for monitoring and tracing loads so that follow up can be made to Customers regarding late pickups and or deliveries; as well as any other changes that may occur. Anticipate and facilitate problem resolution on all load issues to meet or exceed total satisfaction of Customers.Commit to and receive detailed customer load information by telephone, fax or electronic tendering, and input all load information into the system accurately to ensure system integrity.Maintains knowledge of customer contractual requirements relative to trailer pools in order to keep turns at the level set to gain optimum utilization of company equipment..Responsible for managing and clearing assigned user discrepancy queue to expedite the billing process to ensure the number of days from e-calls to cash are minimized for cash flow optimization.Responsible for managing EDI related requirements regarding 214 Status releasing or other similar electronic transmissions as required by Customer.Create monthly reports regarding service levels for customers as well as participate on any service oriented conference calls to supply definition.Maintain a positive work atmosphere by acting and communicating in a manner which facilitates the success of business operations in order to meet company and customer requirements.Perform additional duties as assigned by leadership.Skills: Must possess professional skills deemed necessary to interact with Customers on a corporate level including making on-site visits when warranted. Use exemplary telephone skills to present a quality oriented image where the Customer is treated in a consistent, courteous, and efficient manner, so that the impression is one of excellence. Ability to set priorities and to communicate to areas involving changes that could affect daily operations. Keyboard skills, working knowledge of PC and AS400, Excel, Word, ability to work in a fast-paced team environment, excellent time management skills.Education: High School Diploma or GEDExperience Required: Minimum of three (3) years (five years is preferred) Customer Service or Customer Service Relationship experience required preferably in related industry; one (1) two (2) years of internal Customer Service Representative III preferred. Position RequirementsMust possess professional skills deemed necessary to interact with Customers on a corporate level including making on-site visits when warranted. Use exemplary telephone skills to present a quality oriented image where the Customer is treated in a consistent, courteous, and efficient manner, so that the impression is one of excellence. Ability to set priorities and to communicate to areas involving changes that could affect daily operations. Keyboard skills, working knowledge of PC and AS400, Excel, Word, ability to work in a fast-paced team environment, excellent time management skills. Required EducationHigh School Diploma or GED Required ExperienceMinimum of three (3) years (five years is preferred) Customer Service or Customer Service Relationship experience required preferably in related industry; one (1) two (2) years of internal Customer Service Representative III preferred.",Customer Service Representative Level Iv Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-level-iv-job-atlanta-ga-us-178685542.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,,,c1dcde9737d4820de1d77c837a4c073e
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:15:35:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Come work for a great company! Stable and wonderful work environment.Working hours: 8am-5pmSkills:- 1+ Years Accounts Receivable Experience- 2+ Years Customer Service ExperienceRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Accounts Receivable Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30093",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-job-norcross-ga-us-178466929.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=14,14.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,,d11d4a47238b94cc4d92b88994f4046a
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:15:43:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"p.p1 {margin: 0.0px 0.0px 0.0px 0.0px; font: 12.0px Helvetica} p.p2 {margin: 0.0px 0.0px 0.0px 0.0px; font: 12.0px Helvetica; min-height: 14.0px} Job Description:Our client, is currently seeking a Personal Lines Property Damage Claims Supervisor based out of their Atlanta, GA office. This person would be responsible for overseeing a team of of Property Damage adjusters, while giving general direction and administration of the Property Damage department to ensure consistent delivery of high quality services.Company Benefits:Medical, Dental, Vision401(K) RetirementPaid Time Off and Paid HolidaysRequired Qualifications:2+ years experience supervising Personal Auto Property Damage Claims AdjustersExperience overseeing teams of 6 - 10 Property Damage Claims AdjustersMust possess excellent organizational skills, ability to prioritize work, problem solve and make timely decisionsCarrier experienceActive Adjuster LicensePreferred Qualifications:Bachelors DegreeExperience handling multi-state jurisdictionsAbout TheBestIRS:TheBestIRS, Insurance Recruiting Specialists, is the leading provider of insurance jobs in Georgia for Claims Supervisors concentrating in Workers’ Compensation, Property, Commercial Lines, Personal Lines and Catastrophe. TheBestIRS have been placing insurance professionals in direct hire, temporary and temp-to-hire opportunities with insurance carriers, self-insurance companies and third party administrators for nearly 2 decades and are adding new clients every day. Apply for one of our insurance jobs in GA and find out why TheBestIRS is the best choice for your insurance career.",Claims Supervisor - Property Damage Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30339",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-supervisor-property-damage-job-atlanta-ga-us-177881636.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=14,"60,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,b882a29dfe6f25b8b7b93660841830d8
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:15:43:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Driver Helpers will earn $13.00/hr.UPS is hiring individuals to work as temporary, seasonal Driver Helpers. This is a physical, fast-paced, outdoor position that involves continual lifting, lowering and carrying packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. It requires excellent customer contact skills and a lot of walking. As a Driver Helper you will not drive the delivery vehicle but assist the driver in the delivery of packages. Driver Helpers usually meet the UPS driver at a mutually agreed upon time and location each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays. Hours vary but usually begin after 8:00 a.m. and end before 8:00 p.m. Driver Helpers must comply with UPS appearance guidelines.Driver Helper seasonal opportunities are typically between the Thanksgiving and Christmas holiday time period.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",Delivery Associate Job in Roswell,,"Roswell, GA 30076",,http://jobview.monster.com/delivery-associate-job-roswell-ga-us-176325426.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,4b96c52a528b0ebdbc911511bf3c2625
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:15:43:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Benefits Counselor Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30312",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/benefits-counselor-job-atlanta-ga-us-178561176.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=1,,Customer Support/Client Care,94bbb36fafb5824139c9aef517d00922
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:15:52:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Managing Director provides leadership for their assigned operating company. This person is responsible for all performance activities within a single (multiple) location(s), including, but not limited to, training, mentoring/motivating, business development, candidate recruiting, conflict resolution, customer service and retention, intra-operating company synergies, P&L responsibilities. They are responsible for managing and developing a team as well as leading by example, particularly in the areas of production and business developmentGreater responsibility for new sales development; Implement strategies to capture market share; manage sale and delivery of products/services to achieve agreed end result; budget accountability; goals and objectives management; maintain communication with established clients to ensure successful business developEDUCATION:• Undergraduate degree required.• Advanced degree in Marketing, Business Management or related field strongly preferredEXPERIENCE:• 3 – 6 years related business experience with strong emphasis on sales and supervision.SKILLS REQUIRED:• Proven track record of quantified sales and service abilities within a similar environment• Ability to develop high performing consultants and teams• Solid accounting skills/work experience• Proficient with Microsoft Office tools including Word, Excel, PowerPoint• Proficient using Google mail, calendaring and shared drives• Strong customer focus and customer service skills• Experience presenting to C-level executives• Excellent communication, interpersonal and organizational skills• Demonstrated experience managing large, complex accounts or projects• Experience describing and documenting project or client requirements• Must be detailed oriented with a concern for quality expressed by continually initiating system and process improvements• Strong management skills based on several years of experience, including people development and team building• Superior consulting, leadership, management, interpersonal and mentoring skillsGet to know us and find out ""What More Could You Do"" at RandstadEqual Opportunity Employer: Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.",Managing Director Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30092",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/managing-director-job-norcross-ga-us-177765521.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=9,,,8cf29873907abae4582180cfe48c5b92
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:15:53:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO)JOB SUMMARY Provide leadership for quality assurance support on assigned program(s) and/or areas to ensure the product/service is built/performed in accordance with customer and company quality requirements.  Assists in making formal presentations of findings, recommendations, and specifications in reports.  Assists in planning and coordinating implementation projects.  Projects may also involve major changes in resources (equipment, staff, and organization) and basic changes in methods and techniques employed. DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES 1.        Reviews program quality performance to provide analysis and issues and obtains corrective actions where necessary. 2.        Participates in the generation of program-specific quality and test philosophies to ensure compliance with company and customer requirements. 3.        Participates in the review of customer or contractual documentation to identify and ensure fulfillment or requirements. 4.        Provides interface and support to customer quality concerns to facilitate responsiveness to customers. 5.        Establishes and maintains the program quality plan and documents to ensure compliance to ISO9001 standard. 6.        Provides input and recommendations to management on process of procedural system improvements, such as configuration management and operations functions. 7.        Assists in with design and coordinates physical layout of equipment. 8.        Prepares, maintains, and analyzes production statistics. 9.        Observes and reports equipment performance deficiencies. 10.      Reviews and approves production work instructions for operations. 11.       Interfaces with customer for resolution of any problems with in-process or final product acceptance. 12.      Completes assigned projects in a timely manner, within project resources. 13.      Meets project objectives, providing results that operate in a cost-effective manner. 14.      Keeps upper management informed of project progress and problems, particularly as to needed changes in schedule, resources, or product. 15.      Assists in formulation of project objectives and requirements. 16.      Ensures all work and documentation meet the standards of the Company, customer, and project.  17.      Ensure that facility/department training status and set-up is reviewed at the required frequency and the training requirements are met in a timely manner  Minimum Qualifications: Education and Experience:Bachelor’s Degree preferred.Four years of experience in quality assurance and/or supply chain management and/or 3PLPrior experience with ISO9001 and/or other Quality Standards preferredPrinciples and practices of quality assurance management.Principles and practices of effective customer service.Knowledge of warehouse operations.High Fluency with Experience with computer systems, warehouse systems and computerized scanning equipmentFluent with sampling plans ANSI/ASQ Z1.4, and process capability analysis#LI-AH1  We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Quality Manager Job in Union City,"Full Time, Employee","Union City, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-manager-job-union-city-ga-us-178654344.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=7,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e5913bf23342277ad12f646124f4886d
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:15:53:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"PAE is currently seeking an Forensic Case File Manager to support our customer in Ft. Gillem, GA. Primary responsibilities include: Monitors forensic laboratory cases received. Interacts closely with all divisions, encompassing the work of scientific professionals and administrative employees. Maintains surveillance of workload and programs in progress throughout the laboratory.Works with little to no supervision but keeping lead advised of unusual situations and potential problem areas and recommends course of action and/or conclusive actions.Monitors laboratory workload, collects, maintains and analyzes data related to quality of customer service including, but not limited to, productivity, timeliness and level of customer satisfaction.Manages laboratory evidence processing operation and facility. Ensures all evidence submitted to the laboratory is handled in accordance with all Army, Federal, and local regulations.Monitors adherence to evidence handling procedures; ensures 100% accountability of evidence received; and ensures submitting agencies are kept apprised of case status and given prompt and accurate responses to inquiries and requests.Acts as quality control for all of the forensic casework performed to ensure compliance with regulations, policies and organizational standards.Assist with the development of policies, plans and procedures that impact the GFXC's overall operational function. Identifies needs and requirements.Serves as a liaison with Department of Defense (DOD), Department of Justice (DOJ) and other agencies and organizations on matters relating to forensic/biometric requirements in CONUS and OCONUS locations.Collaborates and coordinates with DOD, law enforcement agencies, deployed laboratories, and the Forensic Exploitation Directorate (FXD) management regarding standardization to enhance the efficiencies of the laboratories. Required Qualifications: A minimum of a Bachelor's Degree coupled with 2+ years' experience; OR a High School diploma coupled with 6+ years' experience.Must be able to successfully pass all medical requirements for deployment if required U.S. citizenship and Valid US Passport that will not expire throughout deploymentMust hold an active DoD SECRET security clearance Desired Qualifications: An overall knowledge of computer operations, networking and file transferAbility to absorb, organize and analyze information to solve problems and formulate solutionsPrior military experience preferred Experience working with an OIF/OEF Laboratory, TEDAC facility, or other NGIC, DoD or ATF Lab; interagency or state/local law enforcement forensics labs preferred",Forensic Case File Manager Job in Fort Gillem,Full Time,"Fort Gillem, GA",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/forensic-case-file-manager-job-fort-gillem-ga-us-177283438.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=19,,,77ce6309f5c3841ca82743feae5db6e4
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:16:09:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you able to work 7am - 7pm?Randstad has a need for someone to start a very long term assembly assignment on Friday, December 16th. Position will allow you to sit or stand for the 12 hour shift while assembling very small pieces to create a finished product. Hours: 7am - 7pm, 3 days on, 3 days of ongoing including weekends (Saturdays & Sundays) when requiredPay is $8.25Serious Candidates Only--Working hours: 7am - 7pm 3days on, 3 days off ongoing including weekendsSkills:Must have reliable transportation, this company is NOT on the busline.Please apply online and call Patrice at 770-590-9070 to schedule an appointmentRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Assembly Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30062",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/assembly-job-marietta-ga-us-178457482.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=19,8.25 - 8.25 $ /hour,,5705519be8450a431bb3633f33bca3c7
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:16:09:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad at Cobb is seeking a Technical Recruiter for a large Healthcare client in the Marietta area. The client has just acquired another large Healthcare company and is looking to add to the team. Come join a company which is People Focused, respecting and listening to both internal employees and external customers. (Please note that the position is temporary for now, and based on performance and budgetary requirements, the client might take a few people on permanently).Under the direction of the Manager, acts as strategic business partner with site leadership on all Technical Talent Acquisition related issues. Proactively engages the Leadership teams to establish a common understanding of Technical Talent Acquisition processes, outcomes and service standards. Serves as consultant with Leadership in the development of effective Technical Talent Acquisition, on-boarding and new hire retention strategies.Responsibilities include but not limited to:- Responsible for sourcing, screening, recruitment, coordinating of interviews- Coordinating all travel arrangements and site visits for prospective employees - Conducting all references and negotiating employment offers to all prospective employees - Develop effective strategies/campaigns for IT recruitment of Medical Staff in training and practice in designated specialties including direct mail, print and internet advertising, residency programs and state/national medical organizations and specialty meetings.- Maintains database of all IT candidate information to include curriculum vitae, contact information, referrals and follow-up information. - Acts as a liaison with IT candidate and practice regarding contractual, credentialing and other issues. - Limited amount of travel necessary to attend job fairs, conferences to secure contacts for IT recruitment needs.Working hours: 8:00 AM - 5:00 PMSkills:Skills and Qualifications include but not limited to:- Bachelor's Degree in Business, Human Resources or related field required- EPIC software experience is preferred - Required Minimum Experience: Three years experience in related technical recruitment experience in a large Hospital is preferred, or experience handling high volume technical recruiting for large corporations- Required Minimum Skills: Exceptional interpersonal, organizational, interviewing and negotiation skills. Ability to work independentlyRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Technical Healthcare Recruiter Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30062",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-healthcare-recruiter-job-marietta-ga-us-178459835.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=18,40.00 - 45.00 $ /hour,,e076ba5e7f1d1c9534fdcfcaec0b3939
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:16:35:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Construction Services InspectorDuration is one year plusNeed two resourcesNeed Forestry experience and Linear Construction experienceConstruction Support Inspector Job Description:CONSTRUCTION INSPECTORJOB SUMMARYThis position is responsible for inspecting and monitoring the work of contractors on various construction sites across the state of Georgia performing civil, silvicultural, and environmental compliance activities on linear construction projects for Company Transmission Construction. These construction site types include Initial Clearing for Transmission Lines, Right of Way Perfection, Site Preparation and Grading, and NPDES storm water management and compliance. Candidate should be knowledgeable in linear construction project standards for utilities, concrete and soils testing, ASTM standards, as well as construction surveying. Candidate should be familiar with civil engineering design drawings in the areas of topographical, cut/fill, erosion control, and construction layout for utilities. Candidate must ensure that work is in compliance with industry specifications and environmental regulations. Candidate must be able to appropriately articulate these activities to property owners and represent the company in a professional manner. (Metro Atlanta - South), but will involve considerable statewide travel and routine overnight stays throughout the state of Georgia.JOB REQUIREMENTS (Education, Experience, Knowledge, Skills)Education Level• High School Diploma / GED• 2 year or higher degree in Civil Engineering, Civil Engineering Technology, Construction Management, Forestry or Business Management preferred.Experience• Minimum of 5 years experience directing and/or managing civil linear construction activities in medium to large projects. • Proven Project Management Record.• Proficient knowledge of Civil Construction methods and industry standards.Knowledge, Skills & Abilities• Excellent computer skills required.• Planning and Project Management Skills.• Excellent interpersonal and communication skills.• Working knowledge of contract administration as it relates to monitoring civil contractor construction activities. Working knowledge of civil construction methods and standards as it relates to grading and excavation, structural concrete, and surveying.• Must be certified in NPDES and have necessary skills to keep jobs in compliance.• Must be highly motivated, a self starter and work well under general supervision.• Must have a proven ability to build relationships with internal and external customers. Please submit your resume to dan.mintz@trcstaffing.com #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Construction Services Inspector Job in Forest Park,Full Time Employee,"Forest Park, GA 30297",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-services-inspector-job-forest-park-ga-us-178595985.aspx?mescoid=4700828001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9e2b87c3249f64dade21f88448536c5c
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:16:38:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO)1. Summary of FunctionsThis position is responsible for assisting supervisor in efficient day-to-day work flow and trouble shooting. This positions emphasis is on leading, guiding, assisting and training fellow associates and communication to the supervisor any issues or problems. Lead is also to assist Supervisor in implementation or modification of new or existing processes. Supervisor may require Lead to champion a particular issue or task in which they are to guide fellow associates to complete in an efficient and safe manner. 2. Essential FunctionsTakes direction from SupervisorProvide direct guidance and leadership of warehouse associates to ensure safe, efficient, and clean operation of the warehouse. Maintain schedules and assignments to ensure efficient operation. Apply clear communication and motivational techniques in guiding, and coaching employees. Train all new hires and ensure that existing associates are up-to-date with latest revisions of work instructions.Available to employees to answer questions, evaluate operations and solve problems. Suggest recommendations to supervisor on programs to improve warehouse operations.Ensure all equipment is utilized in an approved manner according to established company policy. Coordinate all maintenance needs with supervisor.Interact with management to deliver superior customer service to our client. Attend warehouse meetings as directed by your supervisor.Ensure that all records/reports are completed on time and consistently maintained. Understand and aid in the achievement of operating goals and standards.Ensure that employees are trained on applicable job functions, safety procedures, and follow XPO Logistics policy and mission statement.Train and maintain the organization operational standard. Review Warehouse operations daily to ensure that all safety procedures and policies are followed. Operate in compliance with OSHA, state, and local code/standards.Ensure and maintain accurate stock in the warehouse in accordance with established inventory control processes.Possesses intermediate computer literacy skillsActively participates in department/shift/team meetingsParticipation with safety or quality suggestions; maintain proper housekeeping and safety standards i.e.: proper use of personal protective equipment; proper use of safety devices, such as lock-out, as requiredSafe operation of all machinery, tools and equipmentPossesses attention to detailParticipates in special projects and provide reports to management on findings, as assignedParticipates in inventory, preparation and countingFollows company policies and procedures, enforce safety regulations, and assure proper procedures are followed by all co-workers; maintain a neat, clean and organized appearance and work area per company policy Other duties may be assigned that pertain to the classificationDemonstrates job duties and knowledge for the job classification 3. Quality RequirementsDemonstrates an understanding of XPO Logistics – Supply Chain (XPO)  quality policyAdheres to the XPO 7S program and maintains a clean environment at all timesMaintains a safe work environment by adhering to and enforcing safe work practices and following safety practicesDemonstrates a positive attitude and teamwork in meeting goals and objectivesDemonstrates commitment to process excellence by ensuring proper, efficient and accurate use of the processCommunicates well with leadership, team members and other departments 4. Physical RequirementsMay also include frequent bending, stooping, squatting, pushing and pulling of parts and part containers can also be expected.Ability to lift 10 to 40 pounds, and up to 50 pounds on an frequent basisSpecific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, read small print, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, ability to adjust focus, and ability to distinguish primary colorsAbility to sit or stand for long period of timeEffectively performs the position through effective communication and exchange of information with all parties that you may come into to contact with while performing the essential functions of the position 5. Education and/or Experience RequirementsHigh school diploma or general education degree (GED) and 3 to 6 months related experience and/or trainingDemonstrated ability to comprehend simple instructions, communicate orally or in written form effectively with co-workers, departments, preferably customers and vendors as wellAbility to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals; ability to interpret graphsAbility to apply common sense understanding to carry out instruction furnished in written, oral, or diagram form; ability to deal with problems involving several concrete variables in standardized situationsComputer literate, skills (start computer, log in, use browser, fill in forms, logout, and shutdown computer safely) ability to use Microsoft Office and XPO Logistics systems; executes as a process expert within the specific departmentDemonstrated skills in leadership, organization, and communicationExperience with computer systems, warehouse systems and computerized scanning equipmentAbility to communicate with all levels of an organization from hourly associates to senior management and customer contacts.Proven ability to multitask; set and manage priorities based on operations requirements We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Lead Job in Ellenwood,"Full Time, Employee","Ellenwood, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-job-ellenwood-ga-us-178652286.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,fb1871c3d82418216fa213895c589377
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:16:43:02,No,jobs.monster.com," Job ID:  99428 Georgia Masonry Supply is a division of the Oldcastle Architectural Products Group (APG). APG is North America’s leading manufacturer and supplier of concrete masonry, dry mix, and hardscape products. With over $2B in sales, APG operates across 33 states and 6 Canadian provinces through a network of over 165 operating locations and more than 5,000 employees. Essential Duties and Responsibilities Load and unload products on dump trucks or flatbed trucks with MoffettUnload multiple stop loadsUnderstand proper placement of materials at jobsiteIdentify different types and sizes of materialAssist customers and outside vendors with any issues (i.e. matching materials and quantities)Keep assigned equipment in proper working condition/clean at all timesDaily maintenance check sheet; report any concerns to his/ her supervisorPerform other work-related duties as assignedOther duties may be assigned to meet business needs Qualifications / Requirements CDL Class A License with 2 plus years of commercial driving experienceMust have Moffett ExperienceAbility to drive dump truck and straight truck with MoffettPrevious flatbed and dump truck experience requiredCertificate of driving school trainingMust have acceptable driving record throughout employment (driving record changes/ updates will be monitored annually)Detailed orientedAble to work in team environmentMust be able to complete all required paperwork for job site assignmentsMeet the DOT federal regulations for certification annuallyCommunicate effectively, both verbally and in writing, with superiors, colleagues, and individuals inside and outside the Company Physical Requirements Must be able to sit, bend, walk, and climb in and out of trucks and Moffett in an outdoor setting for up to 8 plus hours a day Preferences Prior forklift experience highly desirable What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development, and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs  About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Georgia Masonry Supply is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Georgia Masonry Supply is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.   ",Truck Driver / CDL A / Home Nightly - Conley,Full Time Employee,"Conley, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-a-home-nightly-conley-ga-job-conley-ga-us-177362496.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=4,,,fba954ad85f0ebc78fac73acaad637a1
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:16:58:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our customer in the Atlanta, GA area is currently looking for two Presentation Specialists to join their team on a long term direct hire basis.Job Duties:• Structures ideas and concepts and converts them into a meaningful graphic• Consults and supports the design of important presentations and picture editing• Support the management team with the creation of important internal presentations• Develops tables and data charts in Excel• Creates and formats complex text documents in Word• Further develop and define the presentation standards for organization in collaboration with the German headquarters• Train new consultants in presentation skills and standards• Creates and revises presentations and graphics in PowerPointRequirements:• Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent level of experience with a focus in Media Design, Information Management or Graphic Design• A minimum of 5 years of work experience in creating presentations as well as software like Photoshop, InDesign, Illustrator• 3-5 years experience creating presentations with a consulting firm• Proficiency with Microsoft Office Suite (PowerPoint, Excel and Word)• Ability to structure, be creative and demand a great deal of high quality• Experience in the visualization of complex correlations Submit resume to heather.moore@trcstaffing.com#TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Presentation Specialist Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30328",,http://jobview.monster.com/presentation-specialist-job-atlanta-ga-us-178596054.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),86d79867e9cb067400567786cbf3a937
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:17:10:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad Lithia Springs is currently seeking a Maintenance Mechanic to work at a client site on a direct hire permanent basis. The Maintenance Mechanic will be responsible for overseeing, maintaining and repairing equipment as well as other facility structures in a warehouse environment. Maintenance Mechanics are measured by a variety of variables including accuracy of records, passing inspection requirements and whether the machines and equipment in the mechanic's care function properly. Job duties and responsibilities may include but are not limited to reading specifications and blueprints, performing mechanical tasks, troubleshooting and repairing machines and equipment, performing preventative maintenance and modifications on equipment, providing equipment status reports, following all safety guidelines, and daily cleanup of work area.Working hours: All shiftsSkills:Minimum of 6 months experience required. Strong attention to detail and accuracy.Flexibility to work in different environments.For immediate consideration, please send an updated resume and contact information to Tye Brooks via email at tye.brooks@randstadusa.com to schedule an interview.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Maintenance Mechanic Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-mechanic-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178460350.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=18,22.00 - 27.00 $ /hour,,e8a99bea9a1271c3a842ae2dfd5fbc08
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:17:11:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Director of Quality Williams Industrial Services Summary: Responsible for the development, maintenance, auditing, and enhancement of all corporate Quality Management Systems (QMS) at Nuclear and Non-Nuclear sites; responsible for the management of direct and indirect departmental budgets; participates in technical consensus organizations. Essential Functions: Ensure company compliance to 10 CFR Part 50, Appendix B, Quality Assurance Criteria for Nuclear Power Plants.Mentor and provide leadership to company management team; develop training programs for project personnel.Assist the estimating efforts in the review of Quality requirements for project proposals; develop the pricing or cost related to quality needs for bid proposals.Develop QA procedures for review, approval and issue in accordance with approved procedures; audit operations and projects to assure compliance to regulatory, client and corporate requirements.Provide assistance in the development of technical and construction procedures.Interface with the customer engineering or quality representatives for project management.Interface with State and Federal regulatory authorities on the company's behalf.Spearhead company strategic initiatives involving new technologies and systems.Provide written reports, summaries, and analysis of field issues; provide cost-effective resolutions consistent with company strengths; prepare quarterly and annual reports, review for possible adverse trends.Interface with customer personnel to provide direction on issues related to technology and quality.Advise management when actions are either ineffective or not timely in resolving concerns or correcting identified deficiencies; provide continuous process improvement techniques.Technical Skills: Experience with developing/documenting procedures.Use of Quality Engineering methods in inspection.Demonstrated skill and knowledge with applicable Quality codes and standards and NRC regulations.Proficient knowledge of MS Excel, MS Word, MS Outlook and database applications.Level III Quality certifications required.Supervisory Responsibility: Directly supervise employees and carry out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization's policies and applicable laws. Responsibilities can include interviewing, hiring and training employees; planning, assigning and directing work; appraising performance; rewarding and disciplining employees; addressing complaints and resolving problems.Behavioral Skills: Ability to interact with individuals at all organizational levels; conduct self in polite and professional manner; actively listen to what others have to say and restate information to ensure understanding.Ability to maintain confidentiality and handle sensitive material.Ability to apply organizational skills when given a project; ability to handle multiple projects simultaneously to meet deadlines.Ability to multi-task and handle varying tasks simultaneously to meet deadlines.Must be able to motivate and manage individuals to accomplish departmental goals.Use resources effectively to generate solutions; take initiative when resolving problems.Physical Requirements: Ability to sit for prolonged periods of time and to type on a keyboard.Ability to work in office and perform in corporate environment and to converse over a telephone.Must be physically capable of climbing ladders and scaffolding in a construction environment.Must have a visual acuity of Near Side 20/20 using a Jaeger #1 and a Far Side of 20/20 either corrected or uncorrected in at least one eye.Education: Bachelor's degree in Mechanical or Manufacturing Engineering required; equivalent experience considered at discretion of management. Experience: 10+ years of recent/current quality assurance-related experience in the Nuclear power industry, including minimum of 3 years supervisory experience; equivalent experience considered at discretion of management.Lead auditor certification to ASME NQA-1 and/or ANSI N.45.2.23.Special Requirements: Must be able to be badged at U.S. commercial nuclear power plants.This job description is a general description of essential job functions. It is not intended to describe all duties someone in this position may perform. All employees of Global Power and subsidiaries are expected to perform tasks as assigned by supervisory/management personnel, regardless of job title or routine job duties. Report","Williams Industrial Services Job Application for Director of Quality | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Williams Industrial Services,Energy and Utilities; Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure; Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-quality-job-tucker-ga-us-177227013.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=14,,,c302e8b2b56e3d9528dc7bfbe7b29377
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:17:12:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"What if you could actually live that life you dreamed of? What ifyou didn’t have to go at it alone? What if you had the Power? Here,nothing is impossible. Your success is in your own hands, and we have your backthe whole way. Strong leaders, mentors, training and powerful tools – they’llhelp you push yourself to the top, and keep pushing, until your idea of the topis higher than you ever imagined. It’s time to kiss your dreams hello. NamedFortune Magazine’s #1 Workplace for Millennials, when you begin your salescareer at Power, you know you will be set up to thrive from day one.  All sales representatives are full-time, W-2 employees whocomplete our proven sales training program — a comprehensive approach tolearning corporate sales strategy, communications, and leadership skills thatwill map out a path to future opportunities and financial independence. Sales representatives will also gain exposure to a variety ofother areas within the company, including business development, marketing andoperations — and will be provided ongoing opportunities for growth in the formof sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis, as well as unparalleledleadership conferences featuring high-profile, world-renowned speakers inbusiness, entertainment, sports, and government twice a year. Primary job responsibilities include: No cold calls required as all leads are pre-qualified Delivery of interactive sales presentations to homeowners on Power’s eco-friendly, green products and services Participation in ongoing sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis Qualifications: Highly developed interpersonal, organizational and communication skills Ability to speak publicly with confidence and poise Strong sense of ambition, self-motivation and self-discipline Committed individual who is passionate about fulfilling the company’s mission Naturally positive, outgoing and articulate individual who thrives in social settings Previous sales experience preferred BA/BS preferred Salary and Benefits: $75,000-90,000 average first-year compensation Monthly opportunities for performance-based rewards, such as luxury vacations, high-end electronics, gift cards and tickets to concerts and sporting events Various medical, dental, life and disability insurance plans that can be tailored to your specific needs or the needs of your family Ample paid vacation and holidays A competitive 401(k) retirement savings program, matched by Power Access to the latest technology, such as laptops, smart phones and tablets that will help you reach your earnings goals faster and more efficiently A dynamic social program filled with can’t miss events, parties, and activities, including an annual bonus in the form of a company trip to a tropical destination for you and a guest.",Sales Representative Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30093",All,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-job-atlanta-ga-us-177678763.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=18,,Marketing/Product,d6a8801fa2178c85cd9b4efbc7a60f97
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:17:42:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"TRC is looking for an energetic, highly self-motivated, and detail oriented Mechanical Engineer to work on a permanent basis with our customer in the Fulton Industrial (Atlanta, GA) area. Title: Mechanical Engineer Department: Engineering Reports To: Engineering Manager Objective: Support and further develop the sophisticated product & production methods of membrane drying technology. Provides hardware and system designs within product design guidelines maintaining high levels of standardization at minimal costs. Communicates the product designs through drawings, specifications, and other related documents. The production process includes polymer extrusion, CNC-based mechanical processes, machining, casting and coating processes as well as quality control operations. We are most interested in dynamic and driven individuals with a solid engineering background and excellent interpersonal skills.•Solid Modeling Experience•Parts Management•Prototyping•Manufacturing methods & equipment•Validation Description•Mechanical design engineering of standard and custom compressed air membrane dryers which meet market requirements of cost, quality and lead time.•Provide designs which comply with basic Lean Engineering concepts of standardization and modularity.•Provide documentation, including, but not limited to, Bills of Materials, Manufacturing and Sales drawings.•Project management of standard and custom product development projects.•Review and generate responses to job specific requirements for review, including, but not limited to, technical responses, cost estimates, and design feedback•Process engineering changes.•Support of Sales, Manufacturing, Purchasing, Quality and Product Support.•Comply with and ensure department compliance with company health, safety and environmental policies. Technical Competencies: •Working knowledge of sources for component parts pursued for product and product systems development.•Demonstrated ability to systematically approach and resolve production and equipment challenges•Demonstrated ability to analyze and evaluate product and process parameters•Basic knowledge of plant operations and processes.•Bachelor or master degree in mechanical engineering.•5-7 years of progressive experience in CADD design using up-to-date software tools and technology or an equivalent gained through a combination of education and experience.•Prototype experience for parts to be manufactured via SLA-stereo lithography, SLS-selective laser sintering, DMLS-direct metal laser sintering, machining, injection molding and casting.•Proficiency in 2-D & 3-D CAD; AutoCAD, Solidworks, preferred.•Familiarity with New Product Development and Engineering Change Management processes. Non-technical Competencies: *•Interpersonal skills (relationship building, teamwork, conflict resolution, customer orientation).•Communication (verbal communication, listening, written communication).Judgment and (original thinking, judgment and decision making, problem solving).•Performance skills (accuracy with detail, planning and organizing, efficiency).•Personal characteristics (motivation and commitment, flexibility, assertiveness, development orientation).•Familiarity working with outside suppliers.•Ability to set priorities and organize work independently. Responsibilities include the following (other duties may be assigned as needed):•Develops design drawings to fulfill technical objectives consistent with established guidelines, customer requirements and design specifications. Provides input to alternative product and system designs as required.•Initiates Engineering Change Orders per Engineering Change Order procedures.•Reviews design alternatives as applied to product systems, products or parts development and provides input to design changes which meet production capabilities at favorable costs.•Communicates technical designs through drawings, specifications and other related documents to manufacturing, purchasing, vendors and customers for appropriate implementation.•Participates in planning and scheduling of design and drafting projects.•Participates in all phases of project pre-design (feasibility) through fabrication, including manufacturing reviews.•Prepares or assists in preparation of product instruction manuals and engineering standards, as required.•Keeps informed of new or improved methods, materials and other advances in engineering technology and software.Please submit your resume to dan.mintz@trcstaffing.com #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Mechanical Engineer Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30336",,http://jobview.monster.com/mechanical-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-178596006.aspx?mescoid=1700184001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),61737240ee2bfa1d3c9cdec90feeb4d5
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:17:59:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is an exciting time to join Honeywell. Honeywell Building Technology has a great opportunity available. This is a great position to showcase your talents in a highly visible role. If you desire an exciting opportunity with exceptional earning potential and challenges - than we invite you to apply. Make Honeywell your employer of choice. Honeywell Home and Building Technologies helps homeowners stay connected and in control of home comfort, security, fire systems, and air and water purification. We help building owners and occupants ensure their facilities are safe, comfortable, and sustainable. Our products and technologies are installed in more than 150 million homes and 10 million buildings worldwide. The Dispatcher is the primary liaison between the customer and the field workforce in defining and meeting customer requirements. • Manages all customer calls regarding (Planned & Unplanned) dispatching requests. (P.M., SPOT, Emergency, Warranty, Etc.) • Ensure that the Service Business Process is adhered to in all transactions. • Dispatches the appropriate technician to the customer based upon customer requirements (Technical Expertise, Timeframe, Availability, Special Needs, Etc.) • Coordinates with District Service Leader and Local Team Leaders to ensure that the SMS database is accurate with regards to contract information and customer requirements. • Makes changes and updates as required. Ensures that the field workforce meets scheduling commitments by following through with the individual technicians on completed/open work orders.| • Provides updates the SMS (Service Management System) database as required. • This includes being aware of the priority of all service calls and contract entitlements so as to insure all are informed of approaching SLA expirations, as per the Service Process. Ensures a ""Closed Loop"" communications process is in place with all customers. • Reviews new customer contracts and requirements with District Service Leader, Local Team Leader, • Sales Rep and Customer (if required) to identify expectations and ensure a smooth start-up of the contract. • Determines manpower scheduling and planning to ensure routine service, preventative maintenance and all planned dispatching requests are met. • Determines the tools and equipment needed at the job site and orchestrates the availability or delivery of tools and equipment for job site. • Promotes flexibility of resources and sharing of technicians between geographic areas (when appropriate) to meet customer requirements. • Performs to the standards as noted on individual Scorecards or Performance Feedback mechanisms as provided by the Team Lead. (This includes all frontline phone responsibility metrics, Call Averts, and Branch Frontline performance). • Participates with other assigned GSRC-related tasks as assigned by the Team Lead. • This may include work with Honeywell after hours dispatch, National Accounts, etc. Basic Qualifications: • Associate Degree with 1 year of Customer Service experience or in lieu of a degree 2 years of Customer Service experience within a call center environment. • 2 years of experience using Microsoft Office, including Word and Excel (data entry). • Bilingual English and Portuguese (Brazil) both writing and speaking. Preferred Qualifications: • Excellent communication skills both written and verbal.",Dispatcher Job in Decatur,Full Time,"Decatur, GA 30030",All,http://jobview.monster.com/dispatcher-job-decatur-ga-us-177233414.aspx?mescoid=4300733001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5abf64a94ae802f6ae43464af7317fe5
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:18:16:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Disney, Ikea and The Home Depot. XPO is a leading provider of transportation and logistics services throughout the supply chain, including freight brokerage, intermodal, contract logistics, expedite, last mile and global forwarding. We're passionate about helping our customers operate efficiently - and we've put tremendous resources in place to support our commitment. (NYSE: XPO) Warehouse Associate  Job DutiesAssist with shipping and receiving, unloading of truck, checking in merchandise, matching purchase orders to sales orders and distributing to sales orders and distributing to sales associates for processing.Read customer orders, work orders, shipping orders, or requisitions to determine items to be moved, gathered, or distributed and/ or shipped.Filling requisitions, work orders, or requests for materials, tools, or other stock items and distribute items to shipping or to designated route driver storage area.Ensuring warehouse is accessible and safe for employee and customer traffic.Marking materials with identifying information using appropriate method.Assisting with the counting of physical inventoryMay be assigned facilities maintenance duties as needed such as sweeping, dusting, and mopping.Wearing the proper safety equipment, and adhering to all safety procedures and programs.  Qualifications/ Requirements High school diploma or GEDThree months or more related experience or training.The ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules,Operating and maintenance instructions and procedure manuals.Ability to write routine reports and correspondence.Ability to add, subtract, multiply and divide in all units of measureUsing whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Warehouse Associate Job in Hammond,"Full Time, Employee","Hammond, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-job-hammond-ga-us-177894372.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,0e7363e8dd84c9bc759b0dd0e9fa6d15
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:18:17:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"PAE is currently seeking an Forensic Case File Manager to support our customer in Ft. Gillem, GA. Primary responsibilities include: Monitors forensic laboratory cases received. Interacts closely with all divisions, encompassing the work of scientific professionals and administrative employees. Maintains surveillance of workload and programs in progress throughout the laboratory.Works with little to no supervision but keeping lead advised of unusual situations and potential problem areas and recommends course of action and/or conclusive actions.Monitors laboratory workload, collects, maintains and analyzes data related to quality of customer service including, but not limited to, productivity, timeliness and level of customer satisfaction.Manages laboratory evidence processing operation and facility. Ensures all evidence submitted to the laboratory is handled in accordance with all Army, Federal, and local regulations.Monitors adherence to evidence handling procedures; ensures 100% accountability of evidence received; and ensures submitting agencies are kept apprised of case status and given prompt and accurate responses to inquiries and requests.Acts as quality control for all of the forensic casework performed to ensure compliance with regulations, policies and organizational standards.Assist with the development of policies, plans and procedures that impact the GFXC's overall operational function. Identifies needs and requirements.Serves as a liaison with Department of Defense (DOD), Department of Justice (DOJ) and other agencies and organizations on matters relating to forensic/biometric requirements in CONUS and OCONUS locations.Collaborates and coordinates with DOD, law enforcement agencies, deployed laboratories, and the Forensic Exploitation Directorate (FXD) management regarding standardization to enhance the efficiencies of the laboratories. Required Qualifications: A minimum of a Bachelor's Degree coupled with 2+ years' experience; OR a High School diploma coupled with 6+ years' experience.Must be able to successfully pass all medical requirements for deployment if required U.S. citizenship and Valid US Passport that will not expire throughout deploymentMust have the ability to obtain a DoD SECRET security clearance Desired Qualifications: An overall knowledge of computer operations, networking and file transferAbility to absorb, organize and analyze information to solve problems and formulate solutionsPrior military experience preferred Experience working with an OIF/OEF Laboratory, TEDAC facility, or other NGIC, DoD or ATF Lab; interagency or state/local law enforcement forensics labs preferred",Forensic Case File Manager Job in Fort Gillem,Full Time,"Fort Gillem, GA",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/forensic-case-file-manager-job-fort-gillem-ga-us-177550925.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=5,,,e8b4ae5e14ca599c7e41311208b751da
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:18:47:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is actively looking for a Dialysis RN for a client located in the Buckhead, GA area.  This position is full time and permanent! This job will have the following responsibilities:• Enforces all company approved policies and procedures, as well as regulations set forth by state and federal agencies and departments.• Maintains overall shift operation in a safe, efficient, and effective manner.• Act as a resource for other staff members.• Routinely meets with the Clinical Manager to discuss personnel and patient care status, issues, and information.• Collaborate and communicate with physicians and other members of the healthcare team to interpret, adjust, and coordinate care provided to the patient.• Provides assistance as needed to patients regarding prescription refills according to corporate policies.• Ensures all physician orders are transcribed and entered into the Medical Information system in a timely manner.• Oversees all documentation of patient information.• Maintains facility drug list for all required stock medications.• Maintains competency with all emergency operational procedures, and initiates CPR and emergency measures in the event of a cardiac and/or respiratory arrest.• Ensures verification and availability of adequate emergency equipment.• Ensures provision of appropriate vaccinations, immunizations, and annual Tuberculosis (TB) testing.• Administers medications as prescribed or in accordance with approved algorithm(s), and documents appropriate medical justification if indicated. EDUCATION:• Must be a graduate of an accredited School of Nursing.• Current appropriate RN state licensure. EXPERIENCE AND REQUIRED SKILLS:• Minimum of one-year medical-surgical nursing experience preferred.• Hemodialysis experience highly preferred.• ICU experience preferred.• Successfully complete a training course in the theory and practice of hemodialysis.• Successfully complete CPR Certification.• Provide coverage at any or all area facilities as required by management. ALL INTERESTED AND QUALIFIED CANDIADTES PLEASE SEND YOUR MOST UPDATED RESUME TO MIKE STUARD AT MSTUARD@JUDGE.COM OR CONTACT MIKE DIRECTLY AT 484.270.1817.",Dialysis RN Job in Buckhead,"Full Time, Employee","Buckhead, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/dialysis-rn-job-buckhead-ga-us-177766155.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,fc7aeb383aba6a0a01cff82d75ec897d
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:19:03:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Production Supervisor for a manufacturing company located in the Atlanta, GA area.  This job will have the following responsibilities:Will supervise the production floor to ensure on-time production and/or delivery.Will Train employees to produce above efficiency.Responsible for evaluating and maintaining quality standards.Responsible for enforcing safe work practices and good sanitation/housekeeping proceduresResponsible for keeping machines running and working efficiently while reporting and repairs that need to be completed.Responsible for recommending any  improvement in methods and equipment.Responsible for keep up to date accurate reports and record keeping. Qualifications & Requirements:Bachelor's degree highly preferred, may consider an Associate Degree with additional work experienceMust have 4-15 years of experience supervising others in a manufacturing facilityFormal continuous improvement experience is highly desired.  Competitive  salary + bonus + relocation assistance is available  Please send resumes to Samantha Jett: Sjett@judge.com ",Production Supervisor Job in Lithonia,"Full Time, Employee","Lithonia, GA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/production-supervisor-job-lithonia-ga-us-177549315.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=1,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,eff0355c5d6021a336a97e8bc70f12cf
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:19:22:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad is currently seeking a fast paced scanner/packer/auditor in the Lithia Springs area. The position requires computer skills to include basic Microsoft skills. The position is Monday - Friday from 6:00AM - 2:30 PM, with possible overtime, if needed. You will be required to scan 1,000 pieces per day and pack items for delivery.Working hours: Monday - FridaySkills:- PC skills a must- 1 year of Scanning experience - 1 year of warehouse experience- 1 year of proven production experience- Ale to stand, bend and move products in an 8 hour period- Able to pass a drug screening- Able to pass a criminal background check- Good Attendance is a MUST!Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Auditor/Packer/Scanner/Admin Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/auditor-packer-scanner-admin-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178649039.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=13,11.50 - 11.50 $ /hour,,8682f71297c3022b7ba1f926fe79c8da
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:19:24:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody {word-spacing: 3px;line-height: 18px;} #TrackingJobBody br:nth-child(2n + 2){display:none !important;}.CJT-about-text {word-spacing: 3px;line-height: 18px;}Acuity Brands Lighting, Inc is seeking an innovative, highly motivated, results driven Engineer with demonstrated competence and success who will champion resolution to Voice of the Customer (VOC) opportunities reporting to the Director of Quality. This Engineer role will identify and resolve Top 10 material/product Quality improvement opportunities, investigate, analyze, identify root cause corrective actions with resolutions and implement changes to eliminate reported VOC complaints. This Engineer will work in a highly-aligned/loosely coupled matrix organization to collaborate with Engineering, Manufacturing, Sourcing, and suppliers to influence necessary changes and improvements related to materials, components, products and systems. VOC data, Customer Claims Workbench, and Post Sales will be used as a metric to identify this Engineers success to improve the Customer Experience. This position will be based in Decatur, Georgia at our Innovation Engineering Center. Key Tasks and Responsibilites:- Review Acuity VOC data for product Cost of Poor Quality (COPQ) issues, feedback deficiencies in data collected to owners of Claims Work Bench- Responsible for creation and monitoring of detailed data to generate true COPQ for internal and external issues.- Drive and manage the investigation and analysis of products, components, and materials related internal or external product nonconformances.- Utilize Internal and External Labs for analysis of material and products to identify root cause and corrective action.- Generate clear and well-written technical analysis reports with supporting data and documentation to influence the necessary changes which reduce COPQ and improve Quality of Acuity products. Create tracker for completion of items when feedback to proper group.- Cross functionally identify and implement material/product/process solutions from investigations, analysis, and testing to improve the Customer Experience and reduce the VOC complaints for Top 10 issues. Utilize Top 10 visual Fast Response Status Board with regular reports outs.- Completion of necessary documentation for QMS to ensure compliance of changes made to eliminate top 10 VOC issues .- Creation, Documentation, and implementation for Behavior Based Quality (BBQ) system. SD action for Layered Process Audits to ensure all sites/cells have ABS required Standard Work, Critical to Quality, Bill of material audits, first piece audits, functional testing yields - Review Acuity VOC data for product Cost of Poor Quality (COPQ) issues, feedback deficiencies in data collected to owners of Claims Work Bench- Responsible for creation and monitoring of detailed data to generate true COPQ for internal and external issues.- Drive and manage the investigation and analysis of products, components, and materials related internal or external product nonconformances.- Utilize Internal and External Labs for analysis of material and products to identify root cause and corrective action.- Generate clear and well-written technical analysis reports with supporting data and documentation to influence the necessary changes which reduce COPQ and improve Quality of Acuity products. Create tracker for completion of items when feedback to proper group.- Cross functionally identify and implement material/product/process solutions from investigations, analysis, and testing to improve the Customer Experience and reduce the VOC complaints for Top 10 issues. Utilize Top 10 visual Fast Response Status Board with regular reports outs.- Completion of necessary documentation for QMS to ensure compliance of changes made to eliminate top 10 VOC issues .- Creation, Documentation, and implementation for Behavior Based Quality (BBQ) system. SD action for Layered Process Audits to ensure all sites/cells have ABS required Standard Work, Critical to Quality, Bill of material audits, first piece audits, functional testing Required Experience/Education:- 3+ years preforming the above job description (JD) and skills with Bacholor of Science Preferred Experience/Education:- 2+ years preforming the above JD and skills with Masters of Science/Masters of Engineering- Experience analyzing big data that translates into results. Required Experience:- Demonstrated experience with Electronics Manufacturing Processes- Demonstrated experience in investigation and root cause identification for product or material nonconformances - Demonstrated capability to influence teams and independently drive results using technical skills and accurate, precise, and compelling analysis and reports- Demonstrated success in engineering/technical role focused in electronics, materials, design validation, failure analysis, manufacturing, or reliability engineering.- Experience in automotive or medical, or aerospace, consumer electronics or semiconductor industry- Demonstrated excellent written and verbal communication skills in cross functional disciplines- Demonstrated experience (2yrs) using thermal analysis, cross-sectioning, SEM analysis, x-ray analysis for the identification of root cause corrective actions related to failures and nonconformances- Demonstrated expert level understanding and demonstrated use of statistical theory, tools and numerical analysis- Expert level understanding of industry standards (IPC, ASME, etc) Preferred Experience:- Background, education, and experience related to the field of Physics- Experience with LEDs and Lighting Industry- Product validation with Design for Manufacturability, Reliability, Testability, etc (Dfx)- Understanding and demonstrated capability of Lean principles- Understanding and demonstrated capability of Six Sigma principles- American Society of Quality: Six Sigma Black Belt- American Society of Quality: Design for Six Sigma- Ability to use MiniTab- Experience in the PCB fabrication industry Other: - Required to travel 25-50% of work schedule or as required to support Acuity business needsEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Quality Engineer Job in Decatur,Full Time,"Decatur, GA 30035",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-job-decatur-ga-us-178654134.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e99ab3e1bd9d78e3bb22d3a412f39a46
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:20:12:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Outpatient Physical Therapy Group is seeking a Territory Sales Representative with a Bachelor's Degree for Part-Time employment for candidates that have proven their success. This will be about a 20-24 hour work week. Your territory will be: 2 clinics in Decatur and 1 clinic in Lithonia GA. Our Territory Sales Reps will embody the USPh way: dedication to make a difference, a humble and winning attitude, and a background of collaboration and teamwork. You'll work closely with the company and clinic leaders to grow the referrals in each of your clinics by building and maintaining physician and physician office staff relationships. Candidates will be responsible for:Establishing and maintaining close relationships with new medical referral sources and existing sources throughout the territory by: • Meeting regularly with physicians, physicians staff, alternative referral sources, and businesses in your targeted territories. • Identifying potential referral sources and introducing them to our services, providers and processes • Maintaining contact with current referral sources and monitoring overall satisfaction with quality and timing of services provided • Identifying opportunities to improve patient and referral source satisfaction. • Prepares 3 weekly reports summarizing contacts made, schedule, and referral results. • Participates in a variety of sales training and planning meetings to learn about new providers, services and marketing promotions, and to share information about sales goals. • Maintains a high level of knowledge about your clinics and competitor offerings and their advantages and disadvantages. • Sets and achieves personal performance goals for sales volume, new contacts made, new client sales and other related sales results achieved. • Travels by car to perform sales duties with clients, medical providers and industries within the current network • Performs a variety of other sales related duties, as required. Summary of minimum qualifications:• Education and/or experience equivalent to a related Bachelor's Degree.• A minimum of one full year of direct sales experience, preferably in the medical arena.• Ability to communicate effectively with and to understand the needs of others in a sales relationship.• A high degree of personal motivation and drive to achieve personal and professional goals.• Excellent oral presentation skills and the ability to think quickly to apply facts in analyzing a problem and explaining that answer to a group of medical technicians and clinicians.• Ability to work effectively as a team member to achieve organization goals.• Ability to utilize business mathematics to figure percentages, prepare financial and sales information.• A high degree of personal organization skills, including the ability to record and report information and to document work performed.• Ability to work independently with a minimum of supervision.• Ability to travel extensively throughout our region and work long hours to achieve goals, as required.• Demonstrated computer skills preferably spreadsheets, word processing, database and other applicable software programs. We offer a competitive Hourly wage plus a commission plan. We also have a 401(k) savings plan available as well. We offer excellent training to help get you ramped up. Candidate must currently reside locally. Candidate must have a valid dirver's license and any offers are contingent upon a clear background check. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer - M/F/D/VPI96409416",Sales Rep Job in Decatur,Part Time,"Decatur, GA 30033",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-job-decatur-ga-us-178691942.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=18,Hourly Wage,Experienced (Non-Manager),6e3d0849e9814d329eff7405944ed389
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:20:12:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad is looking for experienced assemblers that meet the below criteria;- Must be able to read, understand, and apply customer specifications/ blue prints- Utilize standard shop tools- Industrial Math skills - Must be able to safely and effectively use a variety of tools, identify unit components, install, and make labels per instructions- Lift up to 50lbs - Performs minor repair and refurbishment of parts- Quality Check the product- Troubleshoot to fix any issues that ariseWorking hours: 1st shiftSkills:2 years Assembly experienceRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Fabrication/ Assembly Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30092",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/fabrication-assembly-job-norcross-ga-us-178447457.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,11.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,,436f922d814ad90c20bc5e281ae89d41
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:20:12:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a great opportunity with a busy warehouse in Fairburn. These are temp to hire positions with the opportunity to grow with the company. We are looking for motivated individuals with flexibility to work OT. Must have at least 6 months of forklift experienceDuties include but are not limited to;Pulling ordersOperating PIT equipment Other warehouse dutiesWorking hours: Various ShiftsSkills:Must have the flexibility to work MANDATORY overtimeMust have the ability to work in a fast paced environmentMust pass Background Check, Drug Screen and e-VerifyMust have recent work history in the last 6 months consecutively.Needs to have reliable transportationRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift Operator Job in Union City,Full Time Employee,"Union City, GA 30291",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-union-city-ga-us-178456598.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=18,10.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,,efcfea29c02796ebf8f3fd7b553ff983
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:20:12:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Field Engineer is needed for a leading manufacturing organization. The Field Service Engineer is responsible to manage a fleet of complex electro-mechanical machinery projects, identify service areas of improvement, and conduct validation initiatives with the R&D Team. Daily tasks will pertain to assisting with equipment design specifications, managing servicing initiatives, and identifying service areas of improvement. Qualified candidates must have 1+ year related experience as a field service engineer or operations engineer with complex electro-mechanical systems. Qualified candidates must be experienced with PLC Programming, and possess CAD/ design software proficiency. This position will require 50% regional travel, and is located in the northeastern Metro Atlanta area. Our client is only seeking local talent at this time. Responsibilities for the Field Service EngineerManage component replacement projects for a fleet of complex electro-mechanical machinesInterface with R&D on product development and specifications and validation initiativesIdentify areas of improvement with filed service subcontractors Evaluate technician service abilities Requirements for the Field Service Engineer1+ year related experience as a field service engineer or operations engineer with complex electro-mechanical systemsExperience with PLC's is required Must be able to interpret electrical schematics and mechanical drawings Proficiency with a CAD software, preferably Solidworks Ability to travel up to 50% of the time regionally BenefitsComprehensive benefits 401 KCareer growth opportunities This Job is located in Atlanta, GA -> United States",Field Service Engineer - PLC/CAD/Electro-mechanical Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30328",,http://jobview.monster.com/field-service-engineer-plc-cad-electro-mechanical-job-atlanta-ga-us-178559868.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=18,"60,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",,c084a132ffc4ca2c5d1ef25ddb704aa8
United States of America,US,04/Nov/2015:20:24:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Project Manager -Bilingual Spanish with experience, please read on!Top Reasons to Work with Us- Great room for growth- Terrific staff / teamWhat You Will Be Doing- Manage all aspects of technical order processing- Work as a liaison between departments- Read technical drawings and specs- Set up daily plans- Requires some travelling to EuropeWhat You Need for this PositionAt Least 3 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Project Manager- Mechanical Engineering- AutoCAD- Project Management- Bilingual Spanish- SpanishWhat's In It for You- Great annual compensation up to 60k- Full benefits packageSo, if you are a Project Manager -Bilingual Spanish with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Project Manager -Bilingual Spanish - Project Manager,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Jacob Baeza,Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-bilingual-spanish-project-manager-mechanical-job-atlanta-ga-us-178389861.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=18,,,9612350634a53666d8eca8cc516c7d32
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:19:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"4 Full-Time shifts available (30 to 32 hours/week) - benefits eligible2 Full-Time night shifts available - benefits eligible2 Part-Time (3rd shifts available)Horizon Bay Clearwater, FL 3141 North McMullen Booth Rd Clearwater, FL 33761 Job #: 041259bBrookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Key responsibilities: * Provide direct care to residents following an individual service plan, treats each person with respect and dignity, recognizes individual needs, and encourages independence * Assist residents with activities of daily living to include: bathing, dressing, grooming, and toileting * Transfer residents to and from activities and meals according to their individual needs * Serve meals to residents in the dining room or their apartments * Observe and record changes in residents' eating habits, and reporting updates to supervisor * Foster a home-like environment throughout the community by encouraging independence and participation in activities, and providing emotional support Required Skills and Qualifications: * High school diploma or GED * One year of previous direct care experience strongly preferred* Must be able to pass a drug screen and background check * Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed * Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Resident Care Associate Job in Clearwater,Full Time Employee,"Clearwater, FL 33761",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Resident-Care-Associate-Job-Clearwater-FL-US-165185211.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,eb93a0e09c1f3728de5781f6e55d6e57
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:37:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provides professional nursing care for the comfort and well-being of patients. Prepares equipment and assists physician during examinations and treatments. Administers prescribed medications, changes dressings, cleans wounds, and monitors patient vital signs. Observes and maintains records on patient care, condition, reaction, and progress.Education: Minimum of an Associate's Degree and Registered Nurse license required.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Rn ltc - FT - p-a - St. Joseph's - Monroe,"Full Time, Employee","Monroe, LA 71203",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Rn-ltc-FT-11p-7a-St-Joseph's-Monroe-LA-Job-Monroe-LA-US-165237884.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,1237d1e04e0a9a05704b19263e44b690
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:46:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Universal Health Services, Inc. (UHS) is one of the nation’s largest and most respected health care management companies, operating through its subsidiaries acute care hospitals, behavioral health facilities and ambulatory centers nationwide. Founded in 1978, UHS subsidiaries now have more than 65,000 employees. The UHS business strategy is to build or purchase health care properties in rapidly growing markets and create a strong franchise based on exceptional service and effective cost control. Our success comes from a responsive management style and a service philosophy based on integrity, competence and compassion. Palmetto Pee Dee Behavioral Health is a 60-bed behavioral healthcare facility located in Florence, SC. The facility provides services for psychiatric and substance abuse issues for geriatric, children and adolescents. Palmetto Pee Dee Behavioral Health currently has a Clinical Services Director's position available. The Director of Clinical Services will be responisble for the following: Ensures & oversees the day to day operations of the clinical staff. Responsible for providing direct supervision to employees assigned to the clinical department and provides indirect guidance to direct care staff regarding clinical programming and treatment expectations. Works directly with the Nursing Director to ensure effective & safe therapeutic practices are being provided at all times. Ensures facility compliance with all regulatory and accreditation guidelines and expectations. Directly supervises therapists. Collaborates with the Medical Records Department regarding the regulatory oversight of Medical Records. Ensures compliance and completion of all documentation requirements for the Facility are maintained and current Job Requirements:·          Master’s Degree in a Human Services field Licensure as a mental health professional (LMSW, LISW, LPC or LMFT), in South Carolina required. ·          A minimum of two (2) years of supervisory experience in a hospital setting. ·          Five (5) years prior clinical services experience with a psychiatric mental health population preferred. ·          Must have a valid SC driver’s license in good standing. ·          Must possess knowledge of therapeutic relationships, therapeutic processes, adolescent growth and development, limit-setting and behavior management, crisis management ·          Must have knowledge of assessment process, counseling, and psychopathology ·          span>Demonstrates extensive knowledge of the network of state agencies, community resources, and aftercare. Demonstrates strong communication skills, written and verbal. ·          span>Demonstrates the ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with co-workers, supervisors, referral sources and the general public ·          Demonstrates the ability to establish credibility and be decisive. Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=183862&site_id=35",Director of Clinical Services Job in Florence,"Full Time, Employee","Florence, SC 29501",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Clinical-Services-Job-FLORENCE-SC-US-165264535.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,094bd6bb6d662e8a21f9fbe5a3c507d9
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:46:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Licensed Clinical TherapistFHN Family Counseling CenterFreeport, IL  Exceptional Healthcare...Every Step of the Way FHN is a regional healthcare system committed to the health and well-being of the people of northwest Illinois and southern Wisconsin. We have services nearby for all ages, so every member of your family can receive caring, personal, professional healthcare.People Are a Priority at FHN The people of FHN know the specifics of our own jobs as well as the system's ""big picture"" objective: To focus on patients' well-being. Every employee who comes into contact with you – from check-in to check-out, from your family doctor to the food service staff – is committed to this promise. We are dedicated to making sure you are pleased with your care. This commitment has not gone unrecognized. FHN consistently ranks higher than the national average when it comes to patient satisfaction, and we continually set extremely demanding goals in this area. FHN also is dedicated to employee satisfaction, which helps us attract a talented and dedicated workforce and maintain a low employee turnover rate. FHN currently has an opening for a Licensed Clinical Therapist at the FHN Family Counseling Center in Freeport, IL Full-time Primary Hours 8:30am-5:30pm Monday-Friday with call 1-3 evenings/nights per monthJob Summary: Provide competent outpatient mental health assessment and treatment to individuals, families and groups regarding biopsychosocial concerns and develops and implements a treatment plan. Provide clinical supervision to interns and sign off on their clinical hours. Job Responsibilities Provide 60% billable direct service to clients Provides comprehensive mental health assessments to determine the focus of outpatient treatment. Develops treatment plans in conjunction with the clients which address the focal problems identified in the mental health assessments. Provides time limited outpatient, clinical intervention and therapy to individuals, couples, families, and groups. Assures linkage to needed community resources through arrangement for case management services. Participates in after hours on call by providing 24 hour crisis coverage as scheduled including the evaluation of psychiatric emergencies at risk of hospitalization. Interprets psychiatric treatment to client’s family/guardian and helps to reduce fear and stigma obstructing acceptance of mental health care and continuation of treatment. Serves as a mentor for newly hired staff. Supervises Master or Doctorate level inters/students Backup for Mental Health HospitalistEducation/Experience:  Master's Degree in human service related field with 5-8 years prior field related experience required. Doctorate Degree acceptable.  Clinical knowledge of Evidence Based and Informed therapeutic interventions for the mentally ill and dually diagnosed individuals throughout the age span. Must be licensed. Supervisory skills and ability to train others Comfortable and well versed with computer programs. Excellent communication skills. Excellent time management skills. Licensure/ Certification/Registration: Licensed as an LCSW/LCPC or PHD. PsyD.FHN offers first-day benefits and a sign-on award is available for this position. If you have any questions or problems, please read the FAQs.",Licensed Clinical Therapist Job in Freeport,Full Time,"Freeport, IL 61032",,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Clinical-Therapist-Job-Freeport-IL-US-164319245.aspx?mescoid=2900496001001&jobPosition=6,,,ee50bc65f000440983b530e16f523e17
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:11:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are a social services agency looking Full Time Peer Support Specialists. Functions within the scope of practice as established by the Certification of Peer Specialist. As a fully-integrated member of the ACT Team, the Peer Specialist will provide peer support services to adults with a serious and persistent mental illness. All Peer Specialist services will promote hope, wellness, and recovery outcomes for clients. The Peer Specialist will also reinforce a culture of recovery and client-centered services within the ACT Model. ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS AND REQUIREMENTS Meets with each qualified participant in their home and in the community with the ability to provide support and encouragement to each participant as requested in an effort to reduce hospitalizations for each participant. Maintains confidentiality of all client documents, files and communication in written, electronic and/or verbal form.Peer Specialist services to clients:Works with persons individually and in group settings to develop recovery plans which build on their strengths.Assists persons in achieving their recovery goals.Provides hope and encouragement by serving as a role model in recovery.Teaches skills and strategies to problem solve, identify and combat negative self-talk, overcome fears, cope, self-manage illness, and prevent relapse.Provides individualized assistance and education in obtaining community services, maintaining life supports such as housing or income, carrying out the tasks of daily living, and participating in support groups or other community networks.Offers education and support in working toward physical and mental wellness, including healthy living behaviors.Peer Specialist role on the ACT Team:Serves as a resource to the Team on incorporating recovery strategies and tools into all client services. Reinforce an approach of client self-determination in all aspects of service planning.Provides an ongoing perspective to the ACT Team members on the experience of mental illness and recovery.Participates in ACT Team meetings providing input in developing client assessments and service plans.Prepare daily case notes on services provided to clients. Maintain other client or service documentation as required by the ACT Team.Participate in any in-service training for ACT Team members. QUALIFICATIONS Must have personal experience of living with a Serious Mental Illness and must have successfully emerged to a place of recovery.The Peer Specialist will be required to get a minimum of 1 Ethics CEU per year, and a minimum of 3 additional CEUs pertaining to PSR, ACT, or mental health, per year, from their date of hire. Annual requirements of all ACES staff such as fire safety training also apply.Must have current Idaho Peer Specialist Certification.Must pass a criminal background check conducted by the DHW. ",Peer Support Specialist Job in Coeur D Alene,Full Time,"Coeur D Alene, ID 83814",,http://jobview.monster.com/Peer-Support-Specialist-Job-Coeur-d-Alene-ID-US-165166305.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=19,,,6c844af8c4e3d882df79659cccd44894
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:15:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Greater Philadelphia Health Action, Inc. (GPHA) is hiring Full-time MA/RA's (Medical Assistant/ Registration Assistant's) at multiple locations. Foreign language skills not required, but Spanish or Chinese language proficiency is a plus.  We require Medical Assistant certification (CMA or RMA) and High School Diploma or GED with one year of Medical Assistant training in primary care. Associate’s Degree preferred. Ability to deal with people sympathetically and effectively to obtain necessary information. Ability to make independent decisions when circumstances warrant. Ability to work harmoniously with other personnel. CPR certification required. Electronic Medical Records (EMR) experience preferred. NextGen experience a plus.  Specific Responsibilities and duties include: Prepares patient for office visits and assists clinician with physical examination, Schedules external referrals, Completes all necessary forms, prepares specimens for pick up by Laboratory; follows Laboratory Tracking systems; Maintains required logs; Performs specific procedures ordered by provider, Processes all medical forms as necessary; Performs Lab Quality Control procedures accurately; and, Maintains a safe and orderly nurse's station and clinical environment.The MA/RA also Operates paging/telephone system as assigned; Greets, gives direction/information to patients, visitors, guests and sales representatives professionally and cordially; Attends all mandatory staff development/training sessions and staff meetings; Enters and updates patient's demographic, financial and insurance information accurately and timely; and, Perform other duties as assigned by the supervisor.GPHA offers competitive salaries and great benefits to include group medical & dental, tuition reimbursement and 401(k) with company match.GPHA is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Medical Assistant/ Registration Assistant (MA/RA) Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19123",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Assistant-Registration-Assistant-MA-RA-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-161640417.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f216d26f1ebadd2158c9c23bb93cd6bb
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:16:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director of SecurityConveniently located in beautiful north Tampa, just a short drive from Tampa International Airport on Dale Mabry Highway is Florida Hospital Carrollwood. We are proud to offer our neighbors advanced, compassionate care in a cutting-edge, state-of-the-art environment.Our campus features our main hospital, an educational auditorium, a 20,000-sqaure-foot medical office building and another brand-new 54,000-square-foot medical office facility.You will be responsible for:The Director of Security oversees Security and Safety for the campus and its patients, visitors, staff, vendors, physicians, and etc.Able to assess risk and take appropriate action. Provides education to leadership on security and safety risks and response.Maintains operating expenses within budget.Assists the Director/Risk Management in the Management of the Emergency Management program. In the following functions:Acting as a liaison between Federal, State, and Local emergency planners.Ensuring that emergency plans and activities meet local and state requirements.Implementing emergency management grants from state when received.Conducting annual vulnerability analysis.Assisting in developing and filing the required reports with the county Environment of Care (EOC) Committee.Planning, conducting, and critiquing annual emergency plans.Preparing annual reports on effectiveness of emergency management program.Directs the Life Safety programsConducts required fire drills, makes recommendation for performance improvements.Collaborates closely with risk management department.Assists Risk Management with annual reports on the effectiveness of all EOC programs.Ensures proper response to security and safety concerns.Serves as a liaison with local law enforcement agencies.Maintains incident reports and reports on trends to EOC Committee.Participates in Quality Improvement Committee (QIC), Patient Safety Committee, Environment of Care Committee, and Patient Experience Committee; reports on performance indicators for department.What will you need? Bachelor’s Degree from an Accredited UniversityMust have experience working in an Acute Care Hospital SettingKnowledge of Federal, State, Local regulations/standards related to healthcare, security and safety management.Knowledge of healthcare, accreditation and regulatory standardsSupervisory healthcare security enforcement background or 10 years of healthcare security experience with an emphasis on investigation and risk reductionSecurity Class D License required and Florida Drivers’ LicenseNIMS Training and CertificationHICS Training and Certification (certification within 12 months)CPI Crisis Prevention Certification (certification within 12 months)IAHSS Management Certification (within 12 months)IAHSS Supervisory Certified or eligible (Preferred)Master’s Degree from an Accredited University (Preferred)Prior knowledge and participation in healthcare accreditation and regulatory surveys, and policy/procedure management. (Preferred)",Director of Hospital Security Job in Miami,Full Time,"Miami, FL 33131",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Hospital-Security-Job-Miami-FL-US-165184742.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d46ae8a8306a9d21a529d41b5b9767e7
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:20:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Special Investigations Unit (SIU) Medical Coding Quality AnalystThe OptumHealth Behavioral Solutions (OHBS) SIU Medical Coding Quality Analyst is responsible for coding and auditing services specific to administrative fraud, waste and abuse cases. This includes the analysis, documentation, explanation and translation of medical and behavioral diagnosis and procedures. The Medical Coder/Analyst will support the OHBS SIU in research, issues and inquires that relate to their reviews and SIU policies on Medical Coding/Auditing.Primary Responsibilities:Conducts reviews on records that have been identified as suspicious and/or potentially fraudulent, utilizing most current reference materials to include, but not limited to: Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), Internal Classification of Disease (ICD-9/ICD-10) and Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCs) guidelinesDocuments Decisions on reviews through notations and enters notes in appropriate company systemsAbility to discuss and present on decisions made to appropriate internal and external individuals/groupsCoordinate with team members to understand trends and schemes related to billing issues/coding trendsQualifications:Required Qualifications:3+ years of experience in coding and medical billing Associates degree or related field experience Clinical and/or coding expertise in a Physician office, SNF, ALF, Hospital setting, and/or billing/officeStrong oral and written communication skills Strong organizational/time management skills and be able to work independently or as a team Strong knowledge of CMS 1500 and UB04 data elements Strong knowledge of ICD, CPT, HCPC and Revenue CodesAbility to support heavy work load volume and meet unit standards while engaging multiple priorities Current CPC CertificationPrevious Call center experience Experience working in appealsPreferred Qualifications: Problem solving skills Serves as a resource on moderately complex issues related to coding / billing  At OptumHealth, you will perform within an innovative culture that's focused on transformational change in the health care system. You will leverage your skills across a diverse and multi-faceted business. And you will make contributions that will have an impact that's greater than you've ever imagined.Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.Job Keywords: CPC certification, Appeals, claims, Medical coder Analyst, San Francisco, CA /Philadelphia, PA, Multiple Locations",Coding Quality Analyst,"Full Time, Employee","Description:Special Investigations Unit (SIU) Medical Coding Quality AnalystThe OptumHealth Behavioral Solutions (OHBS) SIU Medical Coding Quality Analyst is responsible for coding and auditing services specific to administrative fraud, waste and abuse cases. This includes the analysis, documentation, explanation and translation of medical and behavioral diagnosis and procedures. The Medical Coder/Analyst will support the OHBS SIU in research, issues and inquires that relate to their reviews and SIU policies on Medical Coding/Auditing.Primary Responsibilities:Conducts reviews on records that have been identified as suspicious and/or potentially fraudulent, utilizing most current reference materials to include, but not limited to: Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), Internal Classification of Disease (ICD-9/ICD-10) and Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCs) guidelinesDocuments Decisions on reviews through notations and enters notes in appropriate company systemsAbility to discuss and present on decisions made to appropriate internal and external individuals/groupsCoordinate with team members to understand trends and schemes related to billing issues/coding trendsQualifications:Required Qualifications:3+ years of experience in coding and medical billing Associates degree or related field experience Clinical and/or coding expertise in a Physician office, SNF, ALF, Hospital setting, and/or billing/officeStrong oral and written communication skills Strong organizational/time management skills and be able to work independently or as a team Strong knowledge of CMS 1500 and UB04 data elements Strong knowledge of ICD, CPT, HCPC and Revenue CodesAbility to support heavy work load volume and meet unit standards while engaging multiple priorities Current CPC CertificationPrevious Call center experience Experience working in appealsPreferred Qualifications: Problem solving skills Serves as a resource on moderately complex issues related to coding / billing  At OptumHealth, you will perform within an innovative culture that's focused on transformational change in the health care system. You will leverage your skills across a diverse and multi-faceted business. And you will make contributions that will have an impact that's greater than you've ever imagined.Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.Job Keywords: CPC certification, Appeals, claims, Medical coder Analyst, San Francisco, CA /Philadelphia, PA, Multiple Locations",,http://jobview.monster.com/Coding-Quality-Analyst-Behavioral-Health-San-Francisco-CA-Job-Oakland-CA-US-164169608.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=18,,Medical/Health,2b42389159604a40552265471c2a31ee
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:40:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"PAREXEL currently has a great opportunity for a Quality Manager. The selected candidate will be responsible for providing advice and support to Operations staff (mainly Project Leadership) in the implementation of, and adherence to, processes, controlled documents, tools, and templates to enhance the quality of deliverables. Work with Project Management Quality Management (PMQM)/ Process Quality Management and Operations staff in the identification of process improvement opportunities, process authoring and review; Support process re-engineering; contribute to the development of training materials as process subject matter expert.Responsibilities: Provide GCP and process expertise to designated operational group(s). Support the identification, management and prevention of quality issues. Provide audit and inspection support and oversee the collection and reporting of quality metrics. Mentor and train Senior/Quality Specialists. Supervise quality management projects including the oversight of team members as assignedMaintain a positive, results orientated work environment, building partnerships and modeling teamwork, communicating to the team in an open, balanced and objective manner. Maintain a familiarity with PAREXEL project-related systems and related processes. Remain informed about developments in relevant regulations and guidelines.Work with Quality Management and Operations staff to develop and/or update quality/process documents, tools, and templates. Consider process for effectiveness measurement. Coordinate the review of PAREXEL Controlled Documents (CD); summarize and collate responses from the TRG. Work with Quality Management and Operations staff to develop and implement operational quality gates (QG), quality checks (QC), and verification checks (VC), including necessary assessment tools and checklists used during the QC process (as applicable). Prepare quality metrics reports for management review; distribute and file as appropriate. Support Quality Management and Operations staff in the coordination of, preparation for and follow up of internal/external audits and inspections as required. Support the preparations for audits and inspections; confirm closeout of assessment findings, remediation of Quality Assurance (QA) audit and regulatory inspection findings in accordance with stated response times; represent Quality Management in audits and inspections as required. Support Operations staff in the use of automated quality systems; summarize automated quality system reports and provide metrics as appropriate. Provide support for the management of quality issues. Facilitate and advise on corrections and corrective actions related to designated quality issues. Develop preventive actions and ensure resolution by operational, line management and Quality Management staff. Facilitate local compliance to the corrective and preventive action (CAPA) program Processes and Systems: Provide support to Operations staff in the application of, and adherence to, processes and the day to day use of relevant systems used to manage a project, proposal or contract, as appropriate. Use process mapping and analysis techniques to identify areas for efficiency gains and process improvements within Operations and Quality groups, subsequently developing and implementing action plans as appropriate. Represent PMQM for SBU and Corporate process improvement initiatives as required. Work closely with management and staff to enable continuous process improvement. Perform Process Lead role for Partnerships and/or key accounts OR provide process support to Partnerships and/or key accounts, as assigned Training: Work with the relevant training functions including PAREXEL Academy / Learning & Development and Operations. Assist with the development or enhancement of training materials as assigned. Qualifications Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills. Client focused approach to work. A flexible attitude with respect to work assignments and new learning. Ability to manage and prioritize multiple and varied tasks efficiently and accurately. Willingness to work in a matrix environment and to value the importance of teamwork. Understanding of audit/inspection process. Attention to detail and strong organizational skills. Ability to work independently and take ownership of, and responsibility for, work assigned. IT literate – Experience with Microsoft based applications and a general knowledge of PC functions. Culturally aware and ability to think and work globally. Ability to travel as needed for the position. Education: Educated to degree level (technology, biological science, pharmacy or other health related discipline preferred) or equivalent qualification or clinical research experience Master’s degree in a science, technology or industry related discipline, preferred Minimum Work Experience: Relevant experience in the Clinical Research field (pharmaceutical industry or CRO) or other relevant experience in the areas PMQM support required Knowledge of GCP / compliance required Project Management / Technology / Business Operations experience, as appropriate, required Training experience, as appropriate, required Experience of working in a global environment Relevant experience in Quality Management preferred Leadership and/or project management experience preferred EEO DisclaimerPAREXEL complies with all applicable federal, state, and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.",Clinical Trial Site Quality Manager,Full Time Employee,Home Based,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Trial-Site-Quality-Manager-Process-Job-Billerica-MA-US-164650885.aspx?mescoid=1900254001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),23985794b20a6f56ac5b904f9b48ad3b
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:44:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Technician II, Quality Control Description   Life-changers work here At CareFusion, we create innovative ways to help our customers improve patient care. We rely on bold and inspired employees who share our commitment to helping solve some of healthcare's most critical challenges.CareFusion is now part of Becton Dickinson, a global medical technology company focused on addressing many of the world's most pressing and evolving health needs. With our combined technology and expertise, we will become a global leader helping to transform the quality and cost of care for patients and clinicians worldwide. Join us in our mission to improve the future of healthcare and help all people lead healthy lives.Job Title: Technician II, Quality Control CareFusion Business Description   The quality and integrity of our products and services are critical to our success and essential in helping our customers deliver safe, effective patient care. On this site, you'll find resources to help support our quest toward a best-in-class quality management system.     Accountabilities Experience with various types of quality control functions including incoming, in-process & finished goods inspections as well as environmental monitoring Experience with automated inspection equipment Possess high volume manufacturing experience Keywords:   Quality Control, Medical Device, Manufacturing Job Family Summary Quality Control is responsible for the efficient and effective performance of testing in conformance with regulations and standards.What is expected of you for success in your role   Demonstrates general knowledge of specific testing methods and products Demonstrates working knowledge of applicable regulations and standards Expands skills and techniques in testing methodologies Works within established SOPs and/or scientific methods Adheres to quality and departmental guidelines Works with a moderate degree of supervision Complies with regulations and standards Identifies non-compliance within regulations and standards and documents appropriately   Qualifications   Qualifications High School diploma/GED 2-3 years of experience preferred     Basic computer skills Experience with SAP Daytime shift (8:00am-8:00pm) or Night shift (8:00pm – 8:00am) Candidate must be able to work 12 hour shifts on a rotating 12/7 schedule *MSJA *LI-AR1 CareFusion is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, disability status, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Requisition ID :   160500AZ Primary Location :   North Carolina-Creedmoor Travel :   No Schedule :   Full-time Job Posting :   Mar 8, 2016, 1:29:02 PM",Technician II,Full Time Employee,"Technician II, Quality Control Description   Life-changers work here At CareFusion, we create innovative ways to help our customers improve patient care. We rely on bold and inspired employees who share our commitment to helping solve some of healthcare's most critical challenges.CareFusion is now part of Becton Dickinson, a global medical technology company focused on addressing many of the world's most pressing and evolving health needs. With our combined technology and expertise, we will become a global leader helping to transform the quality and cost of care for patients and clinicians worldwide. Join us in our mission to improve the future of healthcare and help all people lead healthy lives.Job Title: Technician II, Quality Control CareFusion Business Description   The quality and integrity of our products and services are critical to our success and essential in helping our customers deliver safe, effective patient care. On this site, you'll find resources to help support our quest toward a best-in-class quality management system.     Accountabilities Experience with various types of quality control functions including incoming, in-process & finished goods inspections as well as environmental monitoring Experience with automated inspection equipment Possess high volume manufacturing experience Keywords:   Quality Control, Medical Device, Manufacturing Job Family Summary Quality Control is responsible for the efficient and effective performance of testing in conformance with regulations and standards.What is expected of you for success in your role   Demonstrates general knowledge of specific testing methods and products Demonstrates working knowledge of applicable regulations and standards Expands skills and techniques in testing methodologies Works within established SOPs and/or scientific methods Adheres to quality and departmental guidelines Works with a moderate degree of supervision Complies with regulations and standards Identifies non-compliance within regulations and standards and documents appropriately   Qualifications   Qualifications High School diploma/GED 2-3 years of experience preferred     Basic computer skills Experience with SAP Daytime shift (8:00am-8:00pm) or Night shift (8:00pm – 8:00am) Candidate must be able to work 12 hour shifts on a rotating 12/7 schedule *MSJA *LI-AR1 CareFusion is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, disability status, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Requisition ID :   160500AZ Primary Location :   North Carolina-Creedmoor Travel :   No Schedule :   Full-time Job Posting :   Mar 8, 2016, 1:29:02 PM",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Technician-II-Quality-Control-Job-creedmoor-NC-US-164659433.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,2014afbd6d49a892c7ebf16a207131f1
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:45:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Department Marketing/Communications Schedule full time (40 hours or more per week) Shift 1st Hours Monday - Friday, 8:00am - 5:00pm Job Details JOB SUMMARY   Write effective and engaging copy aligned to brand strategy for both internal and external audiences. Develop copy that is synergistic with accompanying creative graphics and work to simplify complex information. Create content that will tell LHI's story and collaborate with designers, marketers, operations and leadership to create compelling headlines and copy to support business directives. Support creative services team by developing video scripts, storyboards and assist with video editing.   Manage and update online content as needed, both external and internal sites. Revise, edit and proof content as directed. Identify solutions to non-standard requests and problems. Develop communications strategies for corporate initiatives and campaigns. Translate concepts into practice; assess and interpret customer (internal) needs and requirements. Coordinate press releases and conferences; assist with proposal writing and publishing. Ensure that all content meets the organization's high quality standards and style guidelines.   JOB QUALIFICATIONS   Required:   Ø  Bachelor's Degree in English, Communications, Marketing or other related field Ø  6 years of copy writing experience Ø  Equivalent combination of education, experience and/or applicable military experience will be considered Ø  Must have creative writing experience, including press releases, marketing collateral, and communication plans. Exceptional writing skills a must. Ø  Knowledge of public relations principles and practices as they pertain to the internal/external communications needs of a large organization, and knowledge of corporate branding Ø  Strategic thinking skills in order to quickly grasp complex issues and distill information into clear and concise messages that audience can understand Ø  Proficient computers skills including Microsoft Office programs required - Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint Ø  Must have a demonstrated ability to take initiative, multi-task, and work effectively under tight deadlines and manage projects independently                 Preferred:   Ø  Branding and campaign experience Ø  Work experience within a healthcare industry Ø  Knowledge of media and crisis communications training and experience Ø  Familiarity with local and national media, knowledge of AP style guides Ø  Experience writing white papers Ø  Experience managing website and/or web portals, scripting online training modules a plus, video production and graphic skills Ø  Adobe Creative Suite (this package includes InDesign, Illustrator, and Photoshop) Ø  The ability to speak well for voice over purposes and on camera is a plus Ø  National Career Readiness Certificate     LHI is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.   Extended: Applications will be accepted until 5:00pm CT on Friday, April 01, 2016.   *MON*       Apply External Candidates apply here Apply later Current employees apply here Search Results Return to Search Results New Search",Senior Copywriter Job in La Crosse,,"La Crosse, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Copywriter-Job-La-Crosse-WI-US-165211666.aspx?mescoid=2700442001001&jobPosition=15,,,c0a62e9f693d381237931f6dfd4c37e9
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:45:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full Time Position in HEAP Dept., at The Breathing Association, Heap Case Manager See job description at www.breathingassociation.org under employment. Only emails or faxes will be accepted, no phone calls. To be considered for an interview, include salary requirement in cover letter. This listing brought to you by The Columbus Dispatch and www.columbusjobs.com/monster.",Heap Case Manager Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43215",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Heap-Case-Manager-Job-Columbus-OH-US-164765821.aspx?ch=newscold&mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),be7af8b2f7f9e190afa04adcb6cd9303
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:52:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requirements:License/Certification/Education: This position requires a Medical Technologist Degree or equivalent and city/state licenses or permits to qualify as a Technologist w/1-3 years experience in a Clinical Laboratory.Job Description: Performs tests and analyses according to established procedures in designated technical department. Technologist, Stat Lab – Med Center, TX LabCorp is seeking a Technologist in the Kelsey Seybold Offices of Houston! This first shift position will have the hours of 10:00am – 7:00pm, Monday – Friday, hours may change based on locations.  The candidate must demonstrate strong communication skills in the areas of the technical lab. They need to know the ins and outs of a lab. The functions of the Technologist position will include, but will not be limited to the following: Responsible for performing CLIA waived and non-waived testing in clinic laboratory setting Complying with LabCorp and regulatory agency policies and procedures Ability to perform general lab assays, including CBC’s with manual diff, wet preps, UA microscopic exam, routine chemistry testing Ability to multitask with minimal onsite supervision including performance of required QC and proficiency testing Working closely with other departments in the laboratory Prior Technical laboratory experience and MT or MLT strongly preferred About LabCorp ® Laboratory Corporation of America® Holdings, an S&P 500 company, is a pioneer in commercializing new diagnostic technologies and the first in its industry to embrace genomic testing. With annual revenues of $5.8 billion in 2013, over 34,000 employees worldwide, and more than 220,000 clients, LabCorp offers more than 4,000 tests ranging from routine blood analyses to reproductive genetics to companion diagnostics. LabCorp furthers its scientific expertise and innovative clinical testing technology through its LabCorp Specialty Testing Group: The Center for Molecular Biology and Pathology, National Genetics Institute, ViroMed Laboratories, Inc, The Center for Esoteric Testing, Litholink Corporation, Integrated Genetics, Integrated Oncology, Dianon Pathology, Monogram Biosciences, Inc, Colorado Coagulation, Cellmark Forensics, MedTox, and Endocrine Sciences. LabCorp conducts clinical trials testing through its LabCorp Clinical Trials division. LabCorp clients include physicians, government agencies, managed care organizations, hospitals, clinical labs, and pharmaceutical companies. To learn more about our organization, visit our website at: www.labcorp.com .",Technologist - STAT LAB Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Technologist-STAT-LAB-Job-Houston-TX-US-165193574.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,280f9fd6b4e43c74f1696d18e91d9378
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:52:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"COURIER for medical group. Medical or Lab courier exp. pref. Excellent driving record, background & drug screening req. Good customer service and basic computer skills a must. M-F part-time.Send resume to HR@sarapath.com or fax 941-362-8992",COURIER - Sarasota Job in Sarasota,Full Time,"Sarasota, FL 34239",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/COURIER-Sarasota-Job-Sarasota-FL-US-165317008.aspx?ch=newssara&mescoid=4300731001001&jobPosition=5,,,c80a1366636575ac0d152e4e0d8823f8
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:52:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Certified Nursing Assistant CNA CNA's Part time - All ShiftsPleasant working environment. Vacation, Personal time & Benefits.Apply in person: Mon-Fri 10am-4pm400 North US One, Tequesta, Florida 33469 EOEEmail: lgallagher@terracecommunities.com",Certified Nursing Assistant CNA Job in Tequesta,Part Time,"Tequesta , FL",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Certified-Nursing-Assistant-CNA-Job-Tequesta-FL-US-165200174.aspx?ch=coxwestpalm&mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=9,,,d82d07a7e2e6152dffdce3050aeaa91a
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:53:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Caduceus Healthcare is seeking a Physiatrist to provide services at our VA Division in Tacoma, WA and our VA Medical Center in Seattle, WA. About Position:·      Regular Schedule; Monday- Friday 7:30am-5pm·      Average about 10-12 patients a day·      6 month Contract (May 1, 2016- September 30th, 2016) Responsibilities:  ·      Evaluate, diagnose and treat all general rehabilitation patient populations including electrodiagnostic evaluation and shall have expertise in the evaluation and treatment of spine/MSK disorders. ·      The provider shall be a physician with specialty in Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation with experience in Neurorehabilitation and skills in the diagnosis and treatment of acute and chronic conditions that result in spine and musculoskeletal pain. There may be opportunity for the physician to provide cervical, thoracic and spine injection procedures and radiofrequency neurotomy if they have the appropriate expertise and a clinical need is determined. ·      Physician may also be required to participate in provision of Electrodiagnostic services and Rehabilitation consults. Education and Experience:  ·      Minimum of 6 month experience in Outpatient or Inpatient PM&R Care.·      Board Certified/ Board Elgible by the American Board of Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation (ABPMR)·      BLS and ACLS certification must be obtained through the American Heart Association and/or Red Cross approved training program. All certifications require proof a cognitive and skills (hands-on) training/assessment was conducted.·      Neurorehabilitation and Spine/ Musculoskeletal (MSK) Disorders. ·      Optional Credentials - Certification by ABEM (American Board of Electrodiagnostic Medicine). If provider is going to be performing electrodiagnostic studies and is not board certified by ABEM, documentation of at least 200 studies performed will be required as well as peer letter demonstrating competence in Electrodiagnostic skills. If provider will be performing spinal injections as noted below, the provider shall have American Board of Physical Medicine and Pain Medicine subspecialty certification and Individual shall have documented proficiency with the practical application of the interventional pain management procedures and techniques for the requested privileges. For lumbar procedures, documentation of performance of at least 100 procedures (at least 50 of which are epidural steroid injections) with 50% or greater under guidance of an individual who has been credentialed by a Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organization (JC) to perform the procedure(s) for which privileges are sought. For cervical procedures, documentation of 50 procedures is required, with 50% or greater under guidance of an individual who has been credentialed by a JC organization to perform the procedure(s) for which privileges are sought. ·      Technical Proficiency: Contractor’s physician(s) shall be technically proficient in the skills necessary to fulfill the Government’s requirements, including the ability to speak, understand, read, and write English fluently.·       To Apply:Contact Allie Joseph at 770-357-2400 or email your resume to jobs@CaduceusHealthcare.com",Physiatrist - Tacoma/Seattle,Full Time,"Seattle, WA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Physiatrist-Tacoma-Seattle-WA-Job-Seattle-WA-US-165269531.aspx?mescoid=2900478001001&jobPosition=5,,,67cec7a1c1b07b9d2844f885530f1cd6
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:10:56:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that the care we give can make every moment count.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s how our Hospice improves quality of life in the final stages of life. By delivering palliative care by hospice professionals, our patients can spend their remaining days in comfort and peace.   Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. We believe that every moment matters. We believe in compassionate care. Most of all, we believe in dignity and respect for each patient we serve. I believe my work is my calling.As a Hospice Registered Nurse, you will:Provide skilled professional nursing care to patient/family/caregiversOversee and provide primary care, including all clinical care, palliative care, and symptom control and identify other physical, psychological, social and spiritual needs for assigned patients.Regularly assess the patient for nursing needs.Implement the Plan of Care Provisions to meet their needs, initiate appropriate intervention and support for the patient and family upon admission and re-evaluate the patient’s nursing needs to provide appropriate, comprehensive and responsive care plan interventions. Work closely with other members of the interdisciplinary team to ensure all patient and family care needs are being met. Work in collaboration with the Patient Care Manager and the Interdisciplinary Team in the planning, implementation and evaluation of medical and nursing care. Required SkillsQualificationsCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureBachelor’s degree and C.H.P.N. (Certified Hospice and Palliative Nurse) certification preferredMinimum of one year general nursing preferred with current Hospice, home health, medical, surgical or critical care experienceExperience with pain and symptom management interventionsAbility to work within an interdisciplinary settingUnderstanding of Hospice philosophy, principles of death/dyingRequired ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse,  Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.877.44.HOSPICE.  Job LocationWichita, Kansas, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Per Diem Hospice Registered Nurse Job in Wichita,,"Wichita, KS",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Per-Diem-Hospice-Registered-Nurse-Job-Wichita-KS-US-165304031.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=8,,,a2541812ed83010be4200e476d6afbbe
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:11:02:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have a strong desire to help others, while working in a rewarding environment? CHC is seeking experienced Medical Assistants! At CHC, our Medical Assistants are the foundation of each care team who use their full range of skills and knowledge in a fast-paced environment with cutting edge technology.Core Responsibilities:·         Rooms patients.·         Obtains and prepares specimens for processing.·         Performs lab tests and EKGs as directed by medical professional staff.·         Administers treatments, immunizations, and medications correctly as directed by medical professional staff.·         Performs phlebotomy as needed.·         Cleans, prepares, and stocks supplies in examination rooms.·         Maintains equipment and supplies; cleans and prepares instruments for sterilization.·         Maintains records and reports all data pertinent to patient care. Demonstrates an understanding that all patient interactions are to be documented in the patient record.·         Performs appropriate patient follow up including, but not limited to, notification of diagnostic test and lab results, returning patient phone calls and managing prescription refills within the time frames outlined in CHC policies.·         Utilizes the skills and knowledge of their certificate/diploma to the fullest capability within their scope of practice, as defined by IA/IL State Law and CHC, to insure they are maximizing their role within the patient centered care team.  Education: Completion of an accredited Medical Assistant program of study required. No exceptions.Experience: 1 year previous experience as a Medical Assistant preferred.CHC is an Equal Opportunity Employer   ",Medical Assistants Job in Davenport,Full Time,"Davenport, IA 52801",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Assistants-Job-Davenport-IA-US-164142424.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=8,12.00 - 20.00 $ /year,Entry Level,8d3ef64edba97e15875d7e3ebac775c5
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:11:24:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva and Girling, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Occupational Therapist for Girling, you will:Assess/screen patient's daily living/work-related skills and develop therapeutic retraining programs with measurable objectives.  Administer and interpret diagnostic and prognostic tests of function to patients in their homes or other settings to assist the physician in evaluating the patient’s level of function.Confer with the patient's physician and other health care team members and participate in development/revision of the Plan of Care Treatment.Provide therapeutic treatment and instruction to patients in accordance with physician orders to improve/restore strength, coordination, range-of-motion and function or teach compensation measures.Review/expand the retraining programs in a manner consistent with the behavioral goals of each patient and within the guidelines of the rehabilitation program as a whole.Consult with other vocational team members, as appropriate, to develop and implement vocationally oriented plans consistent with the needs and capabilities of patients.Report patient status and progress to the physician, rehabilitation staff, Clinical Manager, patient and family members.Participate in care coordination and discharge planning activities and act as a resource to other health care personnel in meeting patient's needs.Design community reintegration activities to assist the client in the physical reconditioning effort, and/or the psychological adjustment and coordinate the plan with members of the interdisciplinary team.Recommend and/or design special adaptive equipment for clients to improve residence or working environments or improve their participation in the rehabilitation program and/or community.Design/train staff and family members to carry out the retraining program including dressing, feeding, grooming and hygiene skills, participate in team and family educational meetings.Coordinate/oversee/supervise/instruct and evaluates Occupational Therapy Assistant and Home Health Aide performance in implementing occupational therapy services.Accurately and thoroughly document patients' care observations, interventions and evaluation on the day services are rendered.  Ensure that interim (verbal) orders received from the physician are accurately documented and implemented.  Submit evaluation, treatment plans and discharge summary to the supervisor and care management staff.Required SkillsQualificationsDegree from an accredited Occupational Therapy ProgramA minimum of six months occupational therapy experience preferredHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted OT licensureCurrent CPR certificationGood organizational and communication skillsRequired ExperienceTo learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVA. Keywords: Acute care, ADL, ADLs, ALF, BLS, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, clinical rotation, geriatric, geriatrics, Healthcare, health care, hand therapy, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, inpatient, inpatient OT, inpatient O.T., inpatient occupational therapist, inpatient therapist, licensed therapist, licensed OT, licensed O.T., licensed occupational therapist, modalities, OT, O.T., OTR, O.T.R., OTL, O.T.L., occupational therapist, occupational therapy, medical, medical care, therapist, therapy Care Manager, therapy case manager, therapy case management, therapy Job, therapy Jobs, OT job, OT jobs, O.T. job, O.T. jobs, occupational therapy job, occupational therapy jobs, occupational therapist job, occupational therapist jobs, Oasis, outpatient, outpatient clinic, out patient, outpatient rehab, outpatient OT, outpatient O.T., outpatient therapist, outpatient occupational therapy, outpatient occupational therapist, PRN, PDM, rehab, rehab OT, rehab O.T., rehab occupational therapist, rehab setting, rehabilitative, therapeutic, skilled visit, SNF, subacute, sub acute, post acute, therapy, travel OT, travel O.T., travel therapist, travel occupational therapist, traveling OT, traveling O.T., traveling occupational therapist, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. Job LocationSalisbury, North Carolina, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Home Health Occupational Therapist Job in Salisbury,,"Salisbury, NC",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Home-Health-Occupational-Therapist-Job-Salisbury-NC-US-165304143.aspx?mescoid=2900496001001&jobPosition=20,,,c7e919169d5c70293d027a115a94916e
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:11:24:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Company is an industry leader looking for an enthusiastic Area Director to join our family. Is your focus on your guests’ experience, anticipating and understanding guests’ needs and exceed their expectations? If this sounds like the type of Area Director you are or want to be, we need to hear from you!!  Apply Today for our North Andover market. We make certain that our Area Director Professionals have the opportunity to focus on exciting, challenging tasks and are given every source of information they need to do their finest work. If you are looking for a career an Area Director that has true growth potential and the opportunity for both personal and professional pride Apply Today.Title of Position: Area DirectorJob Description: We are looking for the right fit as an Area Director for our company. The person in this position will be in charge of these daily duties: setting sales targets, maximizing sales and providing your team with a stimulating and supportive atmosphere. The Area Director will be responsible for maintaining and increasing standards of customer service and also controlling the training and development of your staff. This is a stimulating job where you act as a role model, take full operational responsibility for your specific product lines and the credit for a job well done. The Area Director must have fantastic leadership skills as you’ll need to be capable of inspiring and motivating many individuals. The Area Director must be able to lead and develop people, build great teams, and think strategically.Benefits: Competitive Salary Quarterly Bonus Potential Advancement Opportunities Energetic Fun Working Atmosphere Paid Vacation Medical BenefitsQualifications: The Area Director must have multi-unit management experience of at least two years A passion for mentoring and developing others is a must for the Area Director A solid track record in achieving financial results is a must for the Area Director The Area Director must be extremely guest orientated with the highest degree of honesty and integrity The Area Director should make themselves available to the restaurant at all timesIf you would like to be considered for this position, email your resume to Brian Blum at brian@geckohospitality.com and we will call you within 24 hours for an interview if you meet the above qualifications. ",Area Director - Quick Serve Restaurant Co. Job in North Andover,Full Time Employee,"North Andover, MA 01845",,http://jobview.monster.com/Area-Director-Quick-Serve-Restaurant-Co-Job-North-Andover-MA-US-164946687.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,"60,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year ",Food Services/Hospitality,0b48740e811d92a83f8d33cf988e453f
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:11:27:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"What's Waiting For You In The Neighborhood? Real rewards for real performance! If you are a value driven leader with an unrelenting passion for guest service, business results, and your community, a world of opportunity is waiting for you at IHOP. An exciting opportunity currently exists to join our Manager Trainee Program!!! We bring individuals into our management training program with at least 2-3 years restaurant management experience to master ALL aspects of our business.  Normal progression would be Manager Trainee, Assistant Manager, Manager and then General Manager. Do you have what it takes?IHOP managers have a wide range of responsibilities managing a multi-million dollar business. Applicants should be results oriented with a proven track record in:Driving sales and profitability through operational excellence Local restaurant marketing and innovation Selecting and training top talent to build high performing teams Leading a team to achieve goals and objectives  Our ideal candidate will have: At least 2-3 years restaurant management experience A degree in Hospitality, Business, or Hotel/Restaurant Management or other related field is preferred Bi-lingual is a plus Serve Safe Food and Serve Safe Alcohol Certifications a plus  Real Life - Benefits for You Along with an inclusive environment and great advancement opportunities, we offer a banquet of benefits that will protect your health, ensure your future and provide the tools you need to succeed at work and in life. Competitive Pay Bonus opportunity Medical, Dental and Life Insurance for you and your family Paid Time Off Equal Employment Opportunity Employer  When thousands of people embrace their responsibility to our communities and our planet, the results can be astounding. The good news is…we’re just getting started.  At IHOP, we operate under a cultural framework that we call our Vision and Values.  Our Vision and Values are the foundation of our relationships with our guests, suppliers, communities and each other. It is an articulation of our values and behaviors that define who we are and how we work. We value innovation, collaboration and diversity as we behave with integrity. These core values and beliefs are also how we hold ourselves and each other accountable to the vision of what we want IHOP to be. Our Values drive our decisions and the actions we take each day. At IHOP, we value and strive for:Integrity – We do the right thing. We are committed to the highest ethical standards.Excellence – We expect the best from ourselves and each other. Innovation – We find creative, new ways to delight our guests. Accountability – We do what we say we will do. We are responsible for our actions.Inclusion – We respect and value the diversity of others. We benefit from many points of view.Trust – We collaborate and build trust through open, honest communication.Community – We make a difference in the neighborhoods and communities that we serve. ",Manager Job in Jonesboro,Full Time,"Jonesboro, AR 72401",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Manager-Job-Jonesboro-AR-US-161973857.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=13,,,cd2b46b57044ae7ec4ee3cb62f69156d
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:11:29:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: ServerGrillSmith Restaurants is hiring in Lakeland, Wesley Chapel, Carrollwood, and Clearwater.SUMMARY:The Server is responsible for providing world-class service throughout a guests “Favorite Restaurant” dining experience. He / she must be a positive, consistent hospitality oriented role model to other staff and guests.RESPONSIBILITIES:       Promote and maintain positive guest relations.       Adhere to and maintain company policies and standards.       Suggestively sell wine and food products.       Follow all service sequences.  Serve products according to standards and procedures.       Establish professional, hospitable rapport with each guest you serve.       Comply with local alcoholic beverage laws.       Comply with appearance and grooming standards.       Account for every product served.       Be aware of the cost of supplies and proper handling procedures.       Always exceed guests’ expectations, making GrillSmith their “Favorite Restaurant.”       Perform opening, running, and closing sidework assignments.       Always perform as a team member.  Abide by “the entire floor is your station” rule.       Attend and participate in on-going training sessions.  Read line up notes and attend shift meetings.ACCOUNTABILITIES:       Reports to work on time each day.        Dresses according to company policy.       Keeps immediate supervisor informed of all business matters pertaining to all areas of responsibility. Takes prompt action to resolve problems or barriers and suggest alternative solutions or actions when necessary.       Performs all duties in a timely, effective, and proficient manner in accordance with established company policies to achieve the expected results of the position responsibilities.       Maintains favorable business relationships with peers, field staff, vendors, and other company team members to foster and promote a cooperative and harmonious working climate.       Demonstrates effective project management, communication, and follow-up skills at all times.        Performs other duties and special projects as required that affect the GrillSmith concept.       Maintains strict confidentiality with information or knowledge considered sensitive or confidential in nature.QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS:To perform this job successfully, the individual must be able to perform all job responsibilities and accountabilities. The items listed in the job description are representative of the knowledge, skill, and / or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE & MINIMUM AGE REQUIREMENTS:High school graduate, with college course work or professional certification / education in restaurant or business / training field is highly desired and recommended. Responsible alcohol vendor certification recommended.  Food safety certification required.  Must be at least twenty one (21) years of age.LANGUAGE SKILLS:Ability to read, write, and communicate in English. Additional or secondary / primary languages are encouraged. Ability to write, analyze, and evaluate operating reports, manuals, internal & external business correspondence, and use e-mail, computer skills. Present information in an organized and accurate, clear, concise format.MATHEMATICAL & REASONING ABILITIES:Calculate figures & amounts. Add, subtract, multiply, divide, statistics, and some advanced math may be required. Understand percentages and projections. PHYSICAL DEMANDS:Standing, bending, crawling, using hands to grasp, stoop, reach overhead, sit, walk, maintain fast pace for 8-10 hours at a time. Lift small, medium, large objects up to 50 lbs. lift up to 15 lbs., on a regular basis. Must use senses: taste, smell, sound, sight. Stamina to work 40 hours each week. Be able to work a variety of shifts or varying schedule and / or hours as required. Standing on one’s feet for long periods of time, walking constantly, and communicates for 8-10 hours at a time.WORK ENVIRONMENT:Will be exposed to moderate to high noise levels in a restaurant / food-service environment 95% of the time and 5% in a meeting room / office environment with possible extreme heat and or wet, dry, humid conditions. Gas, electric, and other cooking equipment or utensils. Sharp objects, cutters, and knives. Hot water, cold water, cleaning chemicals. Possible harmful fumes or other airborne particles.TRAVEL:Minimal travel as needed or required for work-related meetings and events. ",Server Job in Tampa,Full Time,"Tampa, FL",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Server-Job-Tampa-FL-US-164800300.aspx?mescoid=3500614001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),46f3fe1e0a3ab1d4f77ac47965990bf8
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:11:59:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full TimeBrookdale Franklin 910 Murfreesboro Rd Franklin, TN 37064 Job #: 054719Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Direct food service operations within the community, including all food preparation, dining room operations and dining delivery services* Purchase all food and manage inventories, ensuring effective cost controls and vendor service and quality* Hire, train and manage all supervisory staff for the kitchen, dining room, catering and delivery services; ensure supervisors maintain a safe and sanitary environment* Consult with chefs and cooks to develop and maintain pleasing and nutritious menus for residents * Develop department budget, including purchasing and staffing expenditures* Inspect all work, storage and serving areas, ensuring regulations governing food safety and sanitation are followedRequired skills and qualifications:* Associate's degree in food service or hospitality management preferred* Three years food service industry experience, including supervisory experience* Current ServSafe certification required; obtain/hold any local, state and/or county required food handling/sanitation licenses and/or certificates * Ability to communicate effectively with residents, families, staff, vendors and the general public* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as neededIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Dining Services Director Job in Franklin,Full Time Employee,"Franklin, TN 37064",Healthcare Services Restaurant/Food Services Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Dining-Services-Director-Job-Franklin-TN-US-165015350.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=19,,Food Services/Hospitality,597bfd78468fff6388b42f9fb5fac268
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:12:00:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Delivers patients’ meal trays and food items in assigned areas according to established procedures, quality standards, sanitary food service practices, and universal precautions. Greets patients in a courteous and professional manner and offers assistance with meal trays according to established procedures. Communicates relevant information in a responsive manner to personnel in other departments to ensure quality patient care. Identifies patients correctly by checking bed/wrist identification against the name written on the patients’ menu. Maintains floor stock inventories, as assigned, and restocks cart daily. Maintains sanitation of floor supplies stock cart. Makes recommendations for nourishments to clinical staff. Cleans patient rooms daily and provides trash removal. Offers refills on hot beverages and substitutions or corrections on meal trays (according to menu). Adheres to all Aramark appearance standards and maintains a professional dress at all times while working. Reports any problems found during meal service to dietitian or zone manager and takes corrective action to resolve any issues as they arise. Qualifications   High School Degree or GED preferred. Current student considered. Previous experience in food service or related field is preferred. Must be able to read and write to facilitate proper communication with others. Mathematical ability required. Must be able to perform simple mathematical calculations.   Additional Information:",Host/Hostess - Baylor Medical Center Carrollton Job in Carrollton,"Full Time, Employee","Carrollton, TX 75010",,http://jobview.monster.com/Host-Hostess-Baylor-Medical-Center-Carrollton-Job-Carrollton-TX-US-165213832.aspx?mescoid=3500618001001&jobPosition=20,,Food Services/Hospitality,be67a0c7b3057f91ef1a1e2cb510c035
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:12:59:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time; Shifts: 12 - 8 and 4 - 9Brookdale Lexington SNF (KY) 2770 Palumbo Drive Lexington, KY 40509 Job #: 042925aBrookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities:* Provide quick, efficient and pleasant delivery of food, ensuring that quality standards and service are being delivered* Take food orders and deliver meals to residents and guests in a timely manner* Ensure safety and proper handling of dishes, glassware and utensilsRequired skills and qualifications:* High school diploma or GED equivalent* One year restaurant experience preferred* High degree of service orientation and a positive attitude* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Server Job in Lexington,Part Time Employee,"Lexington, KY 40509",Healthcare Services Hotels and Lodging Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Server-Job-Lexington-KY-US-165091713.aspx?mescoid=3500614001001&jobPosition=4,,Food Services/Hospitality,6866aebe3852f89cc25dd312f989b19b
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:12:59:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Come Join the Applebee’s Team Today!   Wisconsin Hospitality Group, LLC is looking for quality, hard-working Associate Managers that have an established career in leadership in the hospitality industry.If you feel this best describes you then come join our family!  Wisconsin Hospitality Group is an exciting company with two terrific concepts and more than 5,000 employees.  We are a Wisconsin based company that provides many advantages over our competitors: Size, Growth, Support, and Community Involvement.Wisconsin Hospitality Group is a local operator of 36 Applebee’s Grill & Bar Restaurants & 82 Pizza Hut Restaurants in Wisconsin.   Purpose & Summary   The responsibility of the Associate Manager is to meet customer service guidelines and direct the operation of the restaurant, attain sales and profit objectives, maintain the highest standards of food quality, service, cleanliness and sanitation by assisting in directing and supervising management and hourly employees.      Dimensions:              Assigned budget            Minimum number of direct / indirect staff: 50             Single store responsibility   Primary Core Responsibilities:      1.     Ensures prompt, friendly service according to company guidelines.         2.     Directs overall activities and performance of hourly staff.       3.     Handles verbal guest complaints immediately, and refers verbal and written complaints to the General Manager.4.     Monitors and maintains adequate food and beverage inventories.        5.     Teaches and enforces alcohol awareness.  Builds a positive relationship with local authorities by seeking their assistance in alcohol related issues.6.     Assures the compliance with the local, state and federal laws, regulations and guidelines.         7.     Ensures timely product preparation and presentation meets company standards.  Ensures product preparation meets sales volume by use of daily line checks.8.     Ensures maintenance of restaurant cleanliness and sanitation according to company guidelines and government standards.9.     Completes daily reports and documents on a timely basis.10.  Schedules staffing in an effective manner ensuring sales volume and service levels.11.  Ensures the adherence of all cash handling procedures.12.  Directs hiring, assignment, training, motivation, evaluation, promotions, discipline, and termination of restaurant personnel.13.  Maintains effective safety and security programs according to company policy and government.14.  Communicates effectively with other management staff.15.  Keeps abreast with all relative computer application, forms and spreadsheets.16.  Completes all other assigned duties and responsibilities.Primary Associate Manager Responsibilities:1.     Directs overall activities and performance of associates on a shift by shift basis.        2.     Ensures restaurants administrative and accounting duties are promptly and properly completed.         3.     Assures the compliance with the local, state and federal laws, regulations and guidelines.       4.     Ensures the restaurant is meeting or exceeding operating budgets. 5.     Manages all service contracts to ensure that routine and preventative maintenance occurs.        6.     Monitors and manages capital expenditures within the restaurant.7.     Analyzes systems and procedures with the DO for continual improvement of earning goals.        8.     Responsible for preparing/overseeing and submitting of accurate daily/weekly/monthly paperwork to the DO.   9.     Maintains adequate inventory (food and beverage) levels.  Supervises inventories and estimates food and beverage needs and costs.  Uses PC to facilitate collection and analysis of information.  Maintains knowledge and ability on all forms inventory.Qualifications:        High school education or equivalent is required.  Continuing education is desired.  Some coursework in basic management principles including finance, accounting, and human resources.           Three years full service general management experience in the restaurant industry.       Two years management experience, with a minimum of three months each in all of the following operational areas; Kitchen, Bar, Front of House Operations and Financial/Human Resource and Systems Management is required.        Strong Leadership skills; demonstrated ability to lead people and get results through others is required. Must be able to speak, read, write, and understand the primary language(s) of the work location.              Ability to speak Spanish is a plus.              Ability to exhibit a professional image is required.              Ability to exert well-paced mobility for periods of up to six (6) hours in length and have the ability to lift 10 pounds frequently and up to 50 pounds occasionally.          Ability to have the stamina to work a minimum of 50 hours a week.",Associate Manager - Applebee's West Allis Job in West Allis,Full Time Employee,"West Allis, WI 53214",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Associate-Manager-Applebee's-West-Allis-Job-West-Allis-WI-US-162764548.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=3,"38,000.00 - 47,000.00 $ /year",Food Services/Hospitality,c85dd77ecae50134cf13804eb95e38bb
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:12:59:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Orthopedic Physician Assistant ORTHOCOLORADO HOSPITAL LOCATION: LakewoodDEPT: AdministrationPOSITION TYPE: Full-time / PermanentDAYS: Monday-Friday (Rotating) - 4 days / weekHOURS / SHIFT: (10 hrs) / DaySALARY: DOE (Pay scale)RELOCATION: Relocation available for out-of-state applicants, please contact for more info BENEFITS:·         Health·         Dental·         Vision·         PTO·         6 paid holidays·         Short- term / Long-term disability·         EAP·         401k contributions REQUIRED LICENSE/CERTIFICATION:·         State of CO licensed Physician Assistant·         Certification to be maintained by completion of continuing education requirements and/or re-testing·         Current BLS·         Successful completion of a Physician Assistant Program, accredited by CAHEA JOB DESCRIPTION:The Orthopedic Physician Assistant shall work with his/her sponsoring physician, who is on the active medical staff of OrthoColorado Hospital and whose medical education, training and experience and active practice exceeds that of the PA. The PA may continue to provide care for the patient depending upon the needs of the patient and the mutual agreement of the PA and the physician. Reports and is supervised by the CMO. ",Orthopedic Physician Assistant Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO 80228",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Orthopedic-Physician-Assistant-Job-Denver-CO-US-163149094.aspx?mescoid=2900483001001&jobPosition=6,Relocation and Full Benefits,Entry Level,e14949d0129a5d6a0fc7457c352d5f38
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:12:59:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Medical Receptionist Podiatry practice in Lake Worth. Duties are varied including but not limited to phones, scheduling, and patient assistance. Opportunity for career growth with training and experience. Approx 35 hours per week during season. Contact Tracy Ph: 561-586-3100 Fax: 561-586-4400",Medical Receptionist Job in Lake Worth,Full Time,"Lake Worth, FL",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Medical-Receptionist-Job-Lake-Worth-FL-US-165043645.aspx?ch=coxwestpalm&mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=2,,,3b5737bdd2311c9c0239d7035f0ad8d6
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:13:46:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"CARE TO Make a Difference? $1,000 Sign-on bonus available! Certified Nursing Assistant Full-time and Part-Time positions available for state-certified nursing assistants. We offer great pay and benefits to full-time associates in a team-oriented environment. Life Care Center of Michigan City Jaimie_Corradini@LCCA.com LifeCareCareers.com' Equal Opportunity Employer",Certified Nursing Assistant Job in Michigan City,Full Time,"Michigan City, IN 46360",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Certified-Nursing-Assistant-Job-Michigan-City-IN-US-165044364.aspx?ch=nwindiana&mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=6,,,a922022e84ecfb1c26a9d470074d342c
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:13:46:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"DESCRIPTION:As a Registered Nurse you will be responsible for administering healthcare to ill, injured, convalescent, or disabled patients. You may advise patients on health maintenance and disease prevention or provide case management.Additional responsibilities of the Registered Nurse include:� Monitoring, recording, and reporting symptoms or changes in patients' conditions� Maintaining accurate, detailed reports and records� Recording patients' medical information and vital signs� Ordering, interpreting, and evaluating diagnostic tests to identify and assess patient's condition� Modifying patient treatment plans as indicated by patients' responses and conditionsQUALIFICATIONS:To qualify for the Registered Nurse, you must have effective communication skills and be able to work with individuals of all ages.Additional requirements of the Registered Nurse include:� Current active and valid Licensure or certification� Excellent communication skills� Ability to organize and prioritize with good interpersonal skills� CPR Certification or ability to achieve upon employment� Basic Computer SkillsADDITIONAL INFORMATION:*M*Good Samaritan Society - Prophets Riverview- a skilled care, NO-LIFT, 5-star facility is seeking compassionate RNs to answer the call to serve our residents on a part time basis. A career with us is a chance to touch people on a personal level and play a profound role in their lives. Long-term care & supervisory experience is preferred, but will train the right mission-minded individual.**$2000 bonus will be awarded to a qualified RN that stays employed with the Good Samaritan Society - Prophets Riverview for 1 year.Please complete the online application for consideration.All qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, color, religion, national origin, citizenship, age, disability, veteran status, genetic information, marital status or other protected status.*If you need assistance to complete this application or during the interview process such as sign language interpreters, readers or other accommodations, please contact the person listed.",Registered Nurse (RN) - Healthcare Nursing Staff RN Job in Prophetstown,Full Time Employee,"Prophetstown, IL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Healthcare-Nursing-Staff-RN-Job-Prophetstown-IL-US-164559967.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,fa2a365c842fe472a4b63b7be3ffc614
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:14:01:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Urgency Room, operated by Emergency Physicians PA, offers a new and better way to receive emergency medical care. We are currently accepting resumes for our medical support team as a Registered Nurse at our Vadnais Heights and Eagan, MN locations.We offer very competitive wages and a great benefits package if eligible employment status. We provide a professional yet fun work environment while providing a comforting and pleasant experience for our patients and guests.We currently have part-time positions available. We provide great care to patients 365 days a year, so our positions may include evenings,  weekends and holidays or a combination. learn more about The Urgency Room visit www.urgencyroom.com Apply here or at our Urgency Room website, under careers.Emergency Physicians PA is an EEO/AA employer.Job Title:   Registered Nurse                                                              Reports To: Clinic ManagerStatus: Non-exempt Purpose: The Registered Nurse (RN) manages the current episode of patient nursing care independently.  The RN may directly care for the patient, or indirectly coordinate patient care by delegating to other ancillary health care personnel. Key Result Areas:  The primary responsibilities for the Registered Nurse include but are not limited to: 1.     Develop an individualized plan of care for each patient using an evidence-based approach and application of appropriate growth and development principles.2.     Adhere to the physician’s plan of care. 3.     Deliver excellent nursing care keeping in mind safety, ethics, efficiency, and patient diversity.4.     Direct, evaluate, and supervise the work of other ancillary health care personnel in providing delegated nursing services. 5.     Administer all technical aspects of the patient’s experience or delegate these aspects including phlebotomy, intravenous cannulas, assistance with sterile procedures, conscious or deep sedation, and administration of medications, oxygen therapy, EKGs, and any other technical task ordered by the physician.6.     Document the patient’s plan of care and revise the plan as needed based on patient response.7.     Collaborate with other health team members as well as the patient/family to acquire the necessary resources and provide continuity of care.8.     Communicate essential health care and patient data to other members of the health team.9.     Assess patient and family learning needs and provide teaching to patients and families.10.  Adhere to all clinic policies and procedures.11.  Practice within the scope of the Minnesota Nurse Practice Act.12.  Adhere to the American Nurses Association Code of Ethics for Nurses.13.  Perform other duties as required or assigned. Education and Experience: Bachelors Degree preferred from an accredited school of registered nursing and 3-5 years’ experience in Emergency Nursing or inpatient hospital telemetry, advanced cardiac care or intensive care. Core Competencies: ·        Ability to assess, implement, and evaluate a plan of nursing care for patients which results in the best outcome for the patient.·         Provide direction or delegation to other health team members to achieve best patient outcomes.·         Coordinate the episode of patient care from assessment to discharge.·       Technical patient care skills requiring use of equipment for monitoring of patient status and interpretation of information, including cardiac monitoring and rhythm recognition and treatment.·         Must be highly organized and possess excellent time management skills for a fast-paced environment.·         Ability to problem solve under pressure.·         Demonstrated commitment to high professional ethical standards.·         Strong prioritization skills.·         Strong critical thinking skills.·         Exceptional customer service skills.·         Strong verbal communication skills.·         Extensive understanding of health care teamwork and patient flow.  Equipment Systems Used:·         Familiar with telemetry monitoring systems and centralized cardiac monitoring·         Familiar with use of defibrillators and emergency medicine equipment·         Telephone system·         Fax Machine·         Computer skills·         Photo Copier·         Nurse call light system Required Certificates, Licenses and Registrations:Valid Minnesota Driver’s License or photo identificationValid Minnesota Registered Nurse LicenseCurrently valid Cardiopulmonary Resuscitation (CPR) cardEmergency Nursing Pediatric Certification (ENPC)Trauma Nursing Core Course Certification (TNCC)Currently valid Basic Life Support (BLS) and Advanced Cardiac Life Support (ACLS) certification Preferred Certifications:PALS (Pediatric Advanced Life Support)",Registered Nurse (RN) Job in Eagan,Part Time,"Eagan, MN 55121",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Job-Eagan-MN-US-165096445.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=20,,,83d4a275a5ad79c42528a05ac420ab87
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:01:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"UCLA Health offers health professionals the widest range of opportunities to practice the kind of care that every patient deserves. For more than half a century, we have provided the best in health and the latest in medical technology to the people of Los Angeles and throughout the world. If youre interested in being a part of one of the most comprehensive and advanced health systems on the planet, consider this opportunity with UCLA Health. UCLA, one of the nation’s most highly respected hospitals, is seeking a Spanish/English interpreter to ensure that we are communicating clearly, completely and accurately with our Spanish-speaking patients and their families. Conversations may take place in person, on phone or in video chats, and could include discussions of nearly any medical topic. You will assist with recruiting and training volunteer translators as well. Required Skills: To qualify, you will need absolute fluency in both Spanish and English and a certificate in the completion of an Interpreter Training Program or the passing of a Certified Interpreter Exam is preferred.  You’ll need a detailed knowledge of anatomical terminology in both languages, and the ability to understand and convey meaning, nuance and idiomatic expression. Two (2) years’ experience as a Spanish/English interpreter is preferred, ideally in a medical setting. As a valued full-time member of our staff, youll enjoy outstanding benefits, including health, dental and vision plans that begin on your first day and a retirement plan that is one of the best in the nation. You will also receive 13 paid holidays and 15 vacation days beginning your first year. Relocation assistance is available for those who qualify.Please be advised that ALL new hires will be required to successfully complete a criminal background investigation and a medical examination, which includes a drug screening, prior to employment at UCLA Health. The receipt of satisfactory responses to reference requests, and the provision of satisfactory proof of an applicant's identity and legal authority to work in the United States are also required. Any misrepresentation, falsification or material omission may result in a candidates failure to receive an offer, or if already hired, an immediate dismissal from employment.In an effort to promote and maintain a healthy environment for our patients, visitors, and employees, UCLA Health is a smoke-free site.For more information, go to www.uclahealthcareers.org or contact Nicole M Yoney atNYoney@mednet.ucla.edu EOE",Medical Interpreter- Spanish/English Job in Los Angeles,Full Time,"Los Angeles, CA 94305",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Interpreter-Spanish-English-Job-Los-Angeles-CA-US-165110291.aspx?mescoid=2700444001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),421cb5e8365ec9ebc94501cad3b5a983
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:01:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under the general direction of the Practice Administrator and supervision of the Attending Physician, the Nurse Practitioner is responsible for providing primary healthcare to patients and families, focusing on health maintenance, disease prevention, patient education and counseling following established guidelines as required and within established scope of practice. The nurse practitioner will abide by the lawful and ethical principles of his/her profession and the staff bylaws, rules and policies of IASIS Healthcare. A)   Graduate from an accredited advanced practice registered nurse program. (APRN) B)   Current Licensure to practice as a registered nurse in the State of Texas C)   Recognized by the Board of Nurse Examiners for the State of Texas as an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse qualified to see patients of the ages appropriate        to their license and training. (i.e. Family Nurse Practitioners can treat all ages. Pediatric Nurse Practitioners can treat from birth to age 18.) D)  The NP must hold a current prescriptive privilege number granted by the Board of Nurse Examiners of the State of Texas. (Eligible to make application for a prescriptive        privilege number.) E)   The NP must be eligible for delegated prescriptive privileges by the Texas State Board of Medical Examiners. (i.e. DPS and DEA number in good standing)     Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Additional Information:",Nurse Practitioner - Extended Hours Clinic Job in Port Arthur,Full Time Employee,"Port Arthur, TX 77640",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Practitioner-Extended-Hours-Clinic-Job-Port-Arthur-TX-US-165005780.aspx?mescoid=2900505001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,c673b7468ba080ba521609cbcc8e3b14
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:32:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tredyffrin/Easttown School DistrictGeneral Kitchen Workers T/E School District is seeking applicants for part-time General Kitchen Workers. All vacancies are 4 hrs/day, 5 days/week, 10 months/year. Starting rate: $11.80 p/hr. Interested applicants should apply online at www.tesd.net TESD is an EOE.Click to apply at: http://www.tesd.net",General Kitchen Workers Job in Wayne,Part Time,"Wayne, PA 19087",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/General-Kitchen-Workers-Job-Wayne-PA-US-165324285.aspx?ch=mainlinetimes&mescoid=3500609001001&jobPosition=5,,,33e6755f299fa993cb8797cea52b3b3d
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:32:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: Travis Air Force BasePosition: Radiation TherapistGCI is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, disability, or national origin. GCI gives preferential treatment to veterans.Global Consulting International seeks candidates for a full time position providing Radiation Therapist services to the men and women of the United States Air Force and their families at Travis AFB in California.RADIATION THERAPIST 1. QUALIFICATIONS. 1.1 Graduation from a radiation therapy training program accredited by the Joint Review Committee on Education in Radiological Education (JCERT). 1.2 Current registration as a Radiation Therapist by the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists (ARRT).　1.3 Have a minimum of 24 months of experience within the last 48 months in clinical radiotherapy under the supervision of either a board-certified radiation oncologist or a radiotherapy physicist. 2. TYPE OF WORK. The duties include but are not limited to the following: 2.1 Assures that all radiation therapy procedures are performed in accordance with established protocols and only upon the order of a person who is lawfully authorized to prescribe radiation therapy. 2.2 Performs warm-up and quality control checks on the radiation therapy treatment machines prior to the first scheduled appointment. Ensures all equipment operates in a satisfactory and safe manner through daily checks, prompt reporting of defects to the physicist, and follow up to ensure repairs are satisfactorily executed. 2.3 Sets up ultrasound unit and assists physician during volume studies and brachytherapy procedures. 2.4 Performs simulation therapist duties when required. 2.5 Performs computerized tomography simulation for treatment planning to include but not limited to: 2.5.1 Inserts Intravenous Catheters (IV). 2.5.2 Administers contrast media through means of auto injector/hand injection. 2.6 Assists physicians in set up of head ring and positioning of patient for CT simulation and treatment for stereotactic radiosurgery. 2.7 Completes documentation in accordance with MTF policies.",Radiation Therapist - Travis AFB Job in Travis Afb,Full Time,"Travis Afb, CA 94535",,http://jobview.monster.com/Radiation-Therapist-Travis-AFB-Job-Travis-AFB-CA-US-165009016.aspx?mescoid=2900489001001&jobPosition=1,,,682fb8e6b66f49707992a2a5c7fb347e
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:32:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"                                                             Home Care Coordinator - RN  St. Joseph PACE, a member of Trinity Health, is seeking a Home Care Coordinator RN for its newest location in South Bend, Indiana. This is an exciting opportunity to be part of a start-up, come help us build our program from day one. This position will be Monday through Friday from 8 a.m. to 5 p.m.  Under the direction of the Program Director the Home Care Coordinator is responsible for the planning and monitoring of in-home services and the hiring and ongoing supervision of the home care scheduler. Saint Joseph PACE will be contracting for the Home Health aides. The contracted Home Health Aids will be under the supervision and direction of the Home Health agency. Saint Joseph PACE employed Home Care Coordinator will coordinate in home aide care with the Home Care agency. Programs of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) coordinate and provide all needed preventive, primary, acute and long term care services so that older individuals can continue living in the community. PACE is an innovative model that enables individuals who are 55 years old or older and certified by their state to need nursing home care to live as independently as possible. Through PACE, today’s fragmented health care financing and delivery system comes together to serve the unique needs of each individual in a way that makes sense to the frail elderly, their informal caregivers, health care providers and policy makers. Many PACE participants get most of their care from staff employed by the PACE organization in the PACE center. PACE centers meet State and Federal safety requirements and include adult day programs, medical clinics, activities, and occupational and physical therapy facilities.  St. Joseph PACE provides a competitive compensation and benefit package that complements this opportunity for personal growth and professional advancement. This position reports to the Center Manager.    General responsibilities will include:Participate as a member of the interdisciplinary team (IDT) and in initial, semi-annual, unscheduled, and annual assessments; attend morning updates and report changes in participants’ baseline status to appropriate staff on a daily basis.Ensure that home care schedule is accurate and that participants are allocated the time/services as authorized by the IDT.Coordinate service orders with contracted home care agencies, monitor delivery of services, and monitor quality of services provided by home care contractors.Assure that documentation for home care is accurate, current, and that the home care documentation is up to date.Provide on-call coverage during center hours of non-operation. Candidates will have:Must be a graduate of an accredited Nursing Degree program and possess a current, unencumbered, active license to practice as a Registered Nurse in the state of Indiana. BSN preferred.Must have, as a minimum, two (2) years' experience in a home care, one (1) of which must have been in an instructing/teaching and/or supervisory capacity required.Minimum of one (1) year of documented experience working with a frail or elderly population.Experience in the provision of nursing care, including assessment skills, health education, and current nursing treatments and protocols solid problem solving skills and a high level of accuracy and thoroughness in documenting the delivery of services.Must possess strong interpersonal skills in order to interact in extremely delicate, sensitive and/or complex situations.Candidates should have excellent communication skills, with the ability to communicate with multiple levels in the organization.Must possess strong analytical and organizational skills. Must have the ability to meet strict deadlines with a high level of accuracy, ability to prioritize tasks in a highly automated setting and possess strong interpersonal skills. Candidates should also possess the ability to work as part of a team. Please forward resume along with salary requirements to Megan.LeBlanc@trinity-health.org",Home Care Coordinator- RN Job in South Bend,Full Time,"South Bend, IN 46635",,http://jobview.monster.com/Home-Care-Coordinator-RN-Job-South-Bend-IN-US-165077572.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=5,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),c2b55f4362624404c9719a4d7a5feb5b
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:44:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"A growing and well-respected long term care facility has an opening for a Director of Nursing in Columbus, Ohio. If you are passionate about resident care, and are looking for an organization that shares your passion, and provides competitive salaries with a strong benefits package, join our team!Great opportunity for an experienced RN with excellent clinical supervisory, communication & organizational skills to lead our long term care nursing department. Must be a self-starter with proven leadership ability and commitment to resident care. Prefer knowledge in Medicare/Medicaid, MDS/PPS regs, employee relations & have an excellent survey history. Salary based on experience, comprehensive benefit package: life, medical, dental insurance, disability, vacation, personal & holidays, 401k & bonus plan. Apply today!",Director of Nursing Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Nursing-Job-Columbus-OH-US-165075183.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=11,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),8b8e0f6975ab5a28bcc592e4bc1ee9eb
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:51:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"KFC Restaurant Management Now Hiring Restaurant General Managers for the Kansas City, MO area! TOP PAY FOR TOP PERFORMERS!! Are you ready for something more?!  If you are tired of the same old job and want to really make an impact, come work for our fast-growth model company with opportunities for Managers and General Managers who want to work along-side executives in creating a thriving company with open-ended opportunity. KBP Foods has been named one of The 10 Fastest Growing Restaurant Chains and one of The Top 150 Fastest Growing Businesses! With growth, comes the need for creative talented people who understand the business and want the opportunity to advance within a company.   We offer the following: •Competitive starting salaries w/ bonus opportunities •401K with company contribution •Medical, dental and vision insurance •Paid time off •Short term disability •Life insurance  Great career opportunities: •People first company culture •Promote from within philosophy •Comprehensive training programs  RequirementsThe ideal candidate for the position will possess: •Dedication to providing exceptional customer service •Good oral and written communication skills, and strong interpersonal and conflict resolution skills •Basic personal computer literacy •High School Diploma or GED preferred. •1-2 years of restaurant management experience  If you're qualified, please submit your resume to KBPFood@SelfOpportunity.com  to jump start your next career move!www.kbp-foods.com/join-us.html We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. ",Restaurant Manager - KFC Job in Kansas City,Full Time,"Kansas City, MO 64105",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Restaurant-Manager-KFC-Job-Kansas-City-MO-US-164866507.aspx?mescoid=3500602001001&jobPosition=12,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),fe6a5c93e7894b8f9d16328e017196c2
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:51:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"There's No Place Like The Neighborhood!It's a whole new Neighborhood and a new career for you at Applebee's.  Put your passion for service, commitment to excellence and unrelenting drive for success to work for one of the most successful restaurant chains in the industry. An exciting opportunity currently exists to join our team as a Restaurant Manager.  Nobody Brings Neighbors Together Like Applebee's!At Applebee's, our heart and soul belongs to the Neighbors we serve.  It is our mission to make a difference in each of the neighborhoods in which we do business.  Our managers and team members play a vital role in their communities.  Whether it is sponsoring a charity event, volunteering, teaching children about the restaurant business or any of the other countless ways our teams are involved, the Applebee's team makes significant impact on the lives and well-being of our neighbors.Key Responsibilities Applebee's managers have a wide range of responsibilities managing a multi-million dollar business. ·Driving sales and profitability ·Operational excellence ·Local restaurant marketing ·Selecting and training top talent to build high performing teams ·Leading a team to achieve goals and objectives Qualifications·At least 2-3 years restaurant management experience ·A degree in Hospitality or Hotel/Restaurant Management is a preferred ·Bi-lingual is a plus ·Serve Safe Food and Serve Safe Alcohol Certifications also a plusBenefits  Along with an inclusive environment and great advancement opportunities, we offer a banquet of benefits that will protect your health, ensure your future and provide the tools you need to succeed at work and in life. ·Competitive Pay ·Quarterly Bonus Opportunity ·Medical, Dental and Life Insurance for you and your family ·Domestic Partner Benefits ·Flexible Dependent and Health Spending Accounts ·401(k) Savings Plan with company matching ·Paid Time Off ·Dining Privileges and a whole lot more!  ",Restaurant Manager - Applebee's Parsippany,"Full Time, Employee","Parsippany, NJ 07054",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Restaurant-Manager-Applebee's-Parsippany-N-J-Job-Parsippany-NJ-US-164732677.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=13,50.00 - 65.00 $ /year,Food Services/Hospitality,4fb8c68e3b6efcec902801a96f2cb004
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:53:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description***Full-time and Part-time opportunities available!*** American Home Care, a Genvita company,is currently seeking caring and dependable people to work in the homes of elderly or disabled clients. You will assist the clients by:Preparing mealsShoppingAssisting with personal careRunning errandsPerforming light housekeepingRequired SkillsQualifications:At least 18 years of agePhysical ability to perform personal care tasksAbility to read, write, understand, carry out directions, keep simple medical records and function with minimal supervisionMust have reliable transportationMust not have a criminal conviction which bars employmentMust have no adverse record or be listed in the Nurse Aide Registry or Employee Misconduct Registry Please apply online, call our branch at 417-890-1200 or stop by our branch which is located at 2200 E Sunshine, Ste 128, Springfield MO, 65804.     Required Experience Aid, Aide, Assistant, Assisted Living Facility, Caretaker, Caregiver, care giver, Certified Medical Assistant, Certified Nursing Assistant, Certified Nurses Aide, CMA, CNA, CAN job, Companion, Customer Service, Direct Care, Direct Support Professional, Daily Living, Entry Level, Entry Level Job, Facility, Healthcare, Helper, HHA, HHA job, Home Care, Homecare, Homecare Assistant, Home Care Assistant, Home Health, Home Health Aide, Homemaker, Home maker, Hospice, Hospice Aide, Hospital, housekeeping, house keeping, long term care, longterm care, Medical Assistant, Medical Certifications, Med Tech, Medical Tech, Medical Assistance, Nurse Extern, Nurses Aide, Nursing Assistant Job, Nursing Home, Nursing Student, Orderly, Para, Paraprofessional, Patient Care Tech, Patient Care Technician, PCA, PCT, PCW, Patient Care Aide, Patient Care Attendant, Personal Care Aid, Personal Care Aide, Personal Care Attendant, Personal Care Worker, Preparing meals, Private Duty, Private Duty Aide, PRN, PDM, Part Time, Part-Time, Retail, Running errands, sitter, STNA, Transportation, Care Ride, Volunteer, PCP, Personal Care Provider, Gentiva, Gentiva Home Health, Gentiva Hospice, Girling, Girling healthcare Girling Health Care, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, Girling Community Care, Emerald Coast Hospice, Hospice of Charleston, Odyssey, Odyssey Hospice, VistaCare Hospice, Vista Care Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Olsten, Olsten Kimberly Care, Olsten Kimberly Quality Care, Gentiva Safe Strides, Gentiva Cardiopulmonary, Gentiva Orthopedics, Gilbert's Home Health, Gilbert's Hospice, Physicians Home Health, Family Home Care, Advocate Hospice, Hope Hospice, Kindred~MON~ Job LocationBranson, Missouri, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Caregiver Full-time/Part-time opportunities available! Job in Branson,,"Branson, MO",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Caregiver-Full-time-Part-time-opportunities-available!-Job-Branson-MO-US-165010984.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=3,,,9e2f97e686a8e44de118753427bfda1f
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:53:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ninety Nine Restaurant & Pub is one of the largest full-service casual dining restaurant concepts in the Northeast. We believe our Vision, Values and Culture and live by them every day. If you'd like to work for a great company, you'll love working for the Ninety Nine Restaurant & Pub.Restaurant ManagerWe're looking for leaders with 2+ years of full service restaurant management experience along with a passion for ensuring a high quality guest experience, a track record of achieving results and building a winning team!We offer a comprehensive Management Training Program, Competitive Salary and Benefits Package that includes Medical, Dental, Life, Company-Matched 401k, Short Term and Long Term Disability. 99 | Ninety Nine | NinetyNine | 99 Restaurant | 99 Restaurants | The 99 Restaurants | Restaurant | restaurant manager | manager | restaurant job | restaurant employment | restaurant careers | restaurant management jobs | restaurant manager jobs | Restaurant manager careers | restaurant management job | Restaurant manager career | Full Service Restaurant | restaurant manager | restaurant managers | assistant manager | FOH manager | restaurant jobs | assistant kitchen manager | restaurant management | restaurant management careers | restaurant management | manager | kitchen manager | full service | casual full service | managers | restaurants | restaurant | dining | casual dining | management |",Restaurant Manager Job in Pembroke,Full Time,"Pembroke, MA 02359",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Restaurant-Manager-Job-Pembroke-MA-US-164952719.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=10,,,edfa3cbc97c46b65218d842ea00119c6
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:58:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Restaurant Manager/Director  Big League Dreams Sports Parks, the premier developer and operator of recreational sports complexes, has an opening for an Assistant Director of Food and Beverage at our Manteca, California location. We are seeking a dependable self starter with excellent communication and computer skills. This full time position requires the ability to work nights and weekends.Primary Duties and Responsibilities:* Manage/Supervise daily restaurant operations.* Deliver customer service that exceeds customer expectations.* Food and supply ordering.* New hire orientation.* Shift scheduling.* Staff management.Qualifications and Requirements:* Two or more years of experience with the above captioned duties and responsibilities.* Excellent communication, computer and written skills.Interested candidates should apply online through Monster. No phone calls please.",Assistant Restaurant Manager / Food & Beverage Supervisor Job in Manteca,Full Time,"Manteca, CA 95337",Sports and Physical Recreation,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Restaurant-Manager-Food-Beverage-Supervisor-Job-Manteca-CA-US-125964842.aspx?mescoid=3500602001001&jobPosition=13,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),1365a3c9865f363892c2b969df388e63
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:15:58:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-TimeThe Sycamores at Sugar Land - 770 Brook St. Sugar Land, TX 77478 Job #: 054200Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities:* Provide quick, efficient and pleasant delivery of food, ensuring that quality standards and service are being delivered* Take food orders and deliver meals to residents and guests in a timely manner* Ensure safety and proper handling of dishes, glassware and utensilsRequired skills and qualifications:* High school diploma or GED equivalent* One year restaurant experience preferred* High degree of service orientation and a positive attitude* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Server Job in Sugar Land,Part Time Employee,"Sugar Land, TX 77478",Healthcare Services Hotels and Lodging Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Server-Job-Sugar-Land-TX-US-164761227.aspx?mescoid=3500614001001&jobPosition=20,,Food Services/Hospitality,6dca2e49c43da05109d197584f8c30bd
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:16:44:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"WellStar Named on the 2015 FORTUNE 100 Best Companies to Work For® List At WellStar we deliver world-class healthcare. Over 11,000 individuals work together to meet health demands and needs. To deliver world-class healthcare, we equip our facilities and team members with the best technology, resources, and education. We seek to improve the way we deliver care knowing each day holds more miracles, more life, more chances, more compassion, and more opportunities. Join the team named one of the Top 100 Companies by Working Mother Magazine  Our Operating Room Nurse is responsible for implementing the nursing process based on expanded knowledge and experience.  Responsible for providing patient care with an understanding and awareness of age specific needs.  Addresses the biological, emotional, developmental, psychosocial, and educational needs of the patient and family.  Responsible for delivering patient care in complex situations. Coordinates activities and staff development within his/her practice setting. Assumes responsibility for professional growth and self-development. Able to perform core job functions as identified in the skills checklist with minimal supervision.  Must be able to deal professionally in stressful situations.  Some charge nurse duties may be required.   Education:Graduate of an accredited school of nursing License/Certification:Current/active license as a registered nurse in the State of Georgia requiredCurrent CPR/BLS card from the American Heart Association required on the first day of employment Experience:Sufficient experience to function independently in multiple perioperative specialties; minimum two years perioperative experience preferred Skills:Demonstrates a thorough knowledge of new trends and techniques in nursingAbility to multi-task using critical thinking skillsHolds CPR certification and participates in annual safety and infection control programsBasic computer skills are requiredMust be able to effectively communicate and understand verbal and written English languageMust be able to communicate effectively in a courteous, professional and tactful manner.Emergency call coverage is required.  WellStar is a shining example of what happens when talented and passionate people dedicate themselves to making a difference in the communities we serve. Every time we treat, heal, and encourage a patient toward wellness, we achieve our mission and realize our vision.We are an equal opportunity employer.                                                                                                           Thank you for your interest in WellStar!",RN Operating Room Job in Douglasville,,"Douglasville, GA 30133",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Operating-Room-Job-Douglasville-GA-US-165019658.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=7,,,0da6575c09447fc5202ea6bf135bb5f3
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:17:11:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Drive-In. Move Up! Company Summary Sonic dates back to 1953, when Troy N Smith, a Shawnee, Oklahoma, entrepreneur, opened Top Hat Drive-In. The restaurant became Sonic America’s Drive-In. Soon it became known for its “Service at the Speed of Sound.”In 1967, D.L. Rogers Corp. was formed by Don L. Rogers in Eureka, Kansas. Don was soon building restaurants in the Midwest section of the Sun Belt. Don’s oldest son, Darrell L. Rogers, took over the company in 1983. Darrell was soon expanding stores on the East Coast, and we haven’t stopped growing. We currently have almost 200 Stores in eight different states: Kansas, Arkansas, Oklahoma, Missouri, Texas, North and South Carolina, Louisiana.As we expand, we need fresh faces to come on board our growing team. Becoming a Sonic partner opens the door to unlimited opportunities. For over 30 years, D.L. Rogers Corp. has provided opportunities for many people to control their own destiny by owning part of their own business. We offer an outstanding compensation package and excellent health benefits. Sonic is a great way to soar to success.________________________________________Operating Partner OpportunitiesAssumes full responsibility for operations, training and development of all employees within a Sonic Drive-in; including the execution of all policies, programs and systems, including the Sonic Operation Manual. Creates and maintains an “Employer of Choice” environment.Duties and ResponsibilitiesThe fundamental and primary job duties and responsibilities include, but are not limited to:1. Assumes full responsibility for insuring that the drive-in operates in a manner that provides consistent day-to-day operations and guest satisfaction, in compliance with the Sonic System. 2. Prepares employee work schedules in a timely manner to ensure continuous ability to properly serve guests while controlling labor hours within guidelines. 3. Effectively manages the drive-in’s cost control procedures for food, labor, paper and inventory. Qualifications Required• Makes effective decisions with limited time and information. Determines decision-making criteria based on priorities.• Is a compelling and articulate speaker in a variety of settings. Easily adjusts the message to match the audience. • Places primary importance on delivering superior customer service and SPEED!• Multi-level management experience is required. Skills include strategic planning, influencing others, and supporting organizational change. • Responsible for profit and loss responsibility for an organization. Forecasts and monitors results against financial goals and prior year actuals.• You know what you ""stand for"" and your work is what you do, not who you are!• In the daily employee training process you will observe and take strong leadership effort to create the environment for great employee production and servicing of customers. • In this position, your work is the hub of success and you mentor another to stand in your place. You oversee all customer satisfaction and crew success.• Ability to expand job responsibilities, suggest improvements, and collaborate with others to generate ideas and improve processes.• Uses understanding of the business to develop long term strategies to competitively position the company.• Skilled at controlling costs of food and paper products, labor, repairs or other cost objectives.• Skilled at describing mathematical relationships among operating and financial activities that can affect actions toward financial objectives.Knowledge, Skills and Abilities1. Knowledge of federal, state and local regulations and laws relating to employment and labor practices, Equal Employment Opportunity and wage and hour compliance.2. Recruiting, interviewing and selection practices.3. Knowledge of federal, state and local health and sanitation laws and regulations. 4. Leadership and supervisory practices and skills.5. Proficient verbal and written communication skills.6. Basic accounting skills.7. Problem solving, decision-making, and conflict resolution skills.8. Time Management skills.9. Organizational skills.10. Ability to multi-task primary job responsibilities.11. Able to prioritize tasks.12. Ability to follow-up with employees to complete assigned duties.13. Ability to use restaurant planning tools. 14. Works with autonomy.15. Communicates the Sonic and DLRC Mission Statement and Core Values.Education and Experience RequiredHigh School diploma or equivalent required. Three (3) years of restaurant management experience, which includes P&L responsibility. Working Conditions and Physical RequirementsRequires considerable bending, stooping, lifting, and stretching. Also requires the ability to work within the confined area of the drive-in and work under significant time constraints; such as, delivering food orders and making accurate change within a 2-3 minute time frame. Requires long periods of standing and the ability to lift, push, or pull a maximum of 50 lb with or without assistance. Requires frequent immersing of hands in water to wash and rinse food and small wares. Working environments both inside and outside the drive-in are variable as a result of weather conditions. Requires ability to work irregular hours, nights, weekends, and holidays. Requires ability to be on-call 24 hours a day and work a minimum of 50 hours per week. Relocation a Possibility. ________________________________________Opportunities are also available for:• Multi-Unit Supervising Partners• Co- Managers - Offers leadership in carrying out the restaurant plan. Hey, this is Fast Food! Don't be slow to respond. This is a people company. Your leadership skills can grow at your pace but the food is delivered at Super Sonic Standards!• Assistant Manager - Assists the drive-in management as directed and specializes in a particular shift. • Crew - Performs general work functions in the Sonic Seven Basic Stations.",GENERAL MANAGER Job in St. Joseph,Full Time,"St. Joseph, MO",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/GENERAL-MANAGER-Job-St.-Joseph-MO-US-104975305.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=11,"60,000.00 - 160,000.00 $ /yearsalary, bonus and commision",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b382a75fdcb0d2b1a253159138edc401
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:17:13:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"MARINA DEL REY CONVENTION & VISITORS BUREAUJob Title:Visitor Services Specialist Reports To:CEO Classification: Summary:Full time position, Non-Exempt Provides day-to-day assistance to guests at the Marina del Rey Visitors Center and the Marina del Rey tourism, hospitality, and residential community. Duties & Responsibilities:Ø  Responds to public inquiries from visitors and prospective visitors about what to see and do in Marina del Rey, neighboring communities and major area points of interested. Ø  Serves as a liaison between the Marina del Rey Convention and Visitors Bureau and local hotels, apartments, restaurants and other public organizations, keeping them informed of events and activities taking place within the community and providing visitor resource information on a regular basis.   Ø  Works on special projects and visitor related promotions in collaboration with restaurants and tourism related businesses.  Ø  Represents the organization in a professional and positive manner throughout the community. Ø  Communicates effectively with local hospitality partners via email and e-newsletters to share information about visitor activities or available visitor resources Ø  Represents Marina del Rey Convention & Visitors Bureau at community events and/or tradeshows.  Ø   Organizes, maintains and updates information about hotels, dining, in-water activities, nightlife, community events, and transportation; refills and organizes brochure racks daily. Ø  Works in collaboration with the Department of Beaches & Harbors Community & Marketing Services Division, and shares limited responsibility for DBH inquiries and customers. Ø  Maintains database for community contacts in the tourism and hospitality industry.  Ø  Frequently reviews visitmarinadelrey.com, social media outlets, county information and other tourism resources to stay well informed, and to report any inaccuracies. Ø  Solicits bulk quantities of relevant maps, brochures, and publications from visitor attractions.   Maintains orderly inventories and storage of these materials. Ø  Updates Community Bulletin Board displays and brochures racks on a quarterly basis. Ø  Maintains daily visitor logs concerning communication and traffic within the center. Ø  Ability to compile and create reports regarding visitor traffic and trends. Ø  Provides administrative support to administrative staff as directed, including but not limited to correspondence, preparation of mailings, local errands, events, online tasks, projects. Ø  Takes initiative to learn about new and existing tourism services and facilities in Marina del Rey and surrounding areas. Ø  Attends training, tours and events as required to improve skills, knowledge and service. Ø  Maintains well-kept, regularly cleaned work space. Ø  Handles sales of destination merchandise as needed.  Requirements:                           Salary:    Ø  Minimum of 2 year college degree preferred. Ø  Minimum of 2 years’ experience in customer service environment, preferably in the travel and tourism industry. Ø  Ability to type a minimum of 35 wpm. Ø  Exceptional business ethics and excellent customer service skills.Ø  Strong people interaction skills and ability to work with numerous personalities.Ø  Ability to handle stress effectively.  Ø  Warm, friendly, upbeat, and flexible demeanor and attitude.Ø  Strong office, telephone and computer skills.Ø  Proven relationship building skills.Ø  Strong knowledge of email and internet. Ø  Ability to multi-taskØ  Ability to use Microsoft Office, Outlook, Constant Contact and Excel.Ø  Knowledge and understanding of social media. Ø  Confidence in both an independent and team work environment.Ø  Ability to work weekends or evenings during occasional special events. Ø  Must have reasonable mobility, be able to lift 40 pounds; have use of own car and show proof of valid driver’s license and car insurance.    Starting salary is $15.00 per hour, 35 hours per week, Monday-Friday 9 a.m. to 5 p.m. Position includes health benefits package, paid time off, 401k  Qualified candidates will be invited for a personal interview.  No phone calls please.    ",Visitor Services Specialist Job in Marina Del Rey,Full Time,"Marina Del Rey, CA 90292","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/Visitor-Services-Specialist-Job-Marina-del-Rey-CA-US-165263984.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,,b47a1b9238254de8f895584a9053d2af
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:17:16:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Registered Nurse, you will: Provide admission, case management, and follow-up skilled nursing visits for home health patients.Administer on-going care and case management for each patient, provide necessary follow-up as directed by the Clinical Manager.Confer with physician in developing the initial plan of treatment based on physician's orders and initial patient assessment.  Provide hands-on care, management and evaluation of the care plan and teaching of the patient in accordance with physician orders, under Clinical Manager's supervision.  Revise plan in consultation with physician based on ongoing assessments and as required by policy/regulation.Coordinate appropriate care, encompassing various healthcare personnel (such as Physical Therapists, Occupational Therapists, Home Health Aides and external providers).Report patient care/condition/progress to patient's physician and Clinical Manager on a continuous basis. Implement patient care plan in conjunction with patient and family to assist them in achieving optimal resolution of needs/problems. Coordinate/oversee/supervise the work of Home Health Aides, Certified Home Health Aides and Personal Care Workers and provides written personal care instructions/care plan that reflect current plan of care.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Discharge patients after consultation with the physician and Clinical Manager, preparing and completing needed clinical documentation.Prepare appropriate medical documentation on all patients, including any case conferences, patient contacts, medication order changes, re-certifications, progress updates, and care plan changes.  Prepare visit/shift reports, updates/summarizes patient records, and confers with other health care disciplines in providing optimum patient care.Required SkillsQualificationsDiploma, Associate or Bachelor Degree in NursingMinimum of one year nursing experience preferredStrong med surg, ICU, ER, acute experienceHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Required ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse,  Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVA Job LocationHickory, North Carolina, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Home Health Registered Nurse Job in Hickory,,"Hickory, NC",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Home-Health-Registered-Nurse-Job-Hickory-NC-US-165010981.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=4,,,3dc8a465e5e8abf0f7019cc6d1a23c30
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:17:16:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Discover career-defining opportunities at TimkenSteel. We are a modern-day startup company with nearly 100 years of steelmaking behind us. We manufacture some of the world’s cleanest alloy steel using state-of-the-art technologies to help customers push the bounds of what’s possible. And we rely on our core values – ethics and integrity, quality, innovation and independence – to create steel products and services to solve the world’s toughest challenges. Discover career-defining opportunities at TimkenSteel. We are a modern-day startup company with nearly 100 years of steelmaking behind us. We manufacture some of the world’s cleanest alloy steel using state-of-the-art technologies to help customers push the bounds of what’s possible. And we rely on our core values – ethics and integrity, quality, innovation and independence – to create steel products and services to solve the world’s toughest challenges.   The Occupational Health Nurse assesses, identifies, and manages the health of associates through the application of medical training in the recognition and evaluation of the physical and psychosocial needs of associates. The PHWP (paid hourly for work performed) position is a part-time position. The candidate selected for this position will work various shifts--including days, afternoons, and midnights--primarily on weekends.   Responsibilities: Administer treatment and follow-up care to ill and injured associates. Conduct physical examinations pursuant to company or legal mandates. Provide technical expertise, training, and support to other departments as required. Provide support to company physicians as required. Administration of OSHA record keeping. Maintain accurate medical and Worker's Comp records. Support first responder teams. Assist with wellness initiatives for the facility.   Required: Diploma, Associate's degree, or higher in Nursing or related and minimum 1 year of related experience. Computer skills in Microsoft Office Professional, medical charting, and case management software Excellent communication, office, and people skills Minimum LPN license   Preferred: Bachelor's degree in Nursing or related and minimum 3 years of related experience. RN license     All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-03-18",Occupational Health Nurse (part time - primarily weekends) Job in Canton,Part Time,"Canton, OH 44706",Metals and Minerals,http://jobview.monster.com/Occupational-Health-Nurse-part-time-primarily-weekends-Job-Canton-OH-US-165015816.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2dc28116b3702a9a3734fca065e91ff9
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:17:16:31,No,jobs.monster.com," JOB SUMMARY: Under the general direction of the Perioperative Services Director, the Perioperative RN is responsible for demonstrating the knowledge and skills to carry out the nursing process when providing care to all patients.  The Perioperative RN is responsible for meeting the established standards of the ASPAN nursing practice in supervising, delegating, and coordinating personnel assigned to the unit when in charge; and for promoting teamwork with physicians and personnel of other departments.   POSITION REQUIREMENTS: ·        Current license as a registered nurse in the State of Texas.  ·        Current Basic Life Support certification required·        ACLS and PALS required. ·        One or more current years of acute care hospital experience as a registered nurse with one-year Perioperative nursing experience preferred.Must be able to provide care to patients of all ages according to patient population",Registered Nurse (RN) Recovery Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX 77091",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Recovery-Job-Houston-TX-US-164381211.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6b99680192c2abc1586e26da448e534e
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:17:48:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary: Serves as Assistant to the Navy Lodge Manager in ensuring an efficient and profitable operation which meets the standards and guidelines of the Navy Lodge Program. Duties and Responsibilities: Maintains contact with guests to ensure guest satisfaction. Responds to all guest inquiries and problems. - Conducts inspections of guest rooms, public access areas and outside grounds for cleanliness and appearance. Identifies deficiencies and ensure corrections are implemented. - Coordinates the preventive maintenance of the Navy Lodge facilities and equipment with maintenance personnel. - Responsible for/knowledge of the overall operations of the Navy Lodge Management System (LMS) computer system. - Develops local instructions concerning housekeeping, maintenance and reporting procedures, non-availability of units and a variety of related facility requirements. Recommends changes to operating procedures to update operations and forwards to the Navy Lodge Manager. - Maintains liaison with vendors, suppliers and other appropriate authorities within the local area to ensure adequate levels of service and to establish maximum vendor relations. - Coordinates services requirements with the Acquisitions Manager for those items, supplies, services and labor which lend themselves to contact negotiation procedures. - Ensures compliance with all safety, fire and sanitation regulations and is also responsible for the safety of guests and employees. - Performs supervisory duties. Responsible for providing adequate staffing for areas of responsibilities and ensures performance plus training is accomplished. Approves leave, evaluates performance, initiates disciplinary/corrective action, etc. - Under the direction of the Navy Lodge Manager, delegates authority and assigns responsibilities to department heads. Responsible for reporting deficiencies to the Navy Lodge Manager. Assumes Navy Lodge Manager duties in his/her absence. - Carries out EEO policies and communicates support of these policies to subordinates. - Performs other related duties as assigned. The incumbent of this position must file a Financial Disclosure Report (OGE) Form 450, as required A total of 4 years of experience, consisting of the following: GENERAL EXPERIENCE: 3 years of experience in administrative, technical or other responsible work which enabled the applicant to gain a general knowledge of operational practices and procedures; skill in dealing with others in person-to-person work relationships, and the ability to exercise mature judgment. OR SUBSTITUTION OF EDUCATION OF EXPERIENCE: 1 year of academic study above the high school level may be substituted for 9 months of experience, up to a maximum of a 4-year bachelor's degree for 3 years of general experience. AND SPECIALIZED EXPERIENCE: One year of responsible experience that provided an in-depth knowledge of hotel/motel or institutional management or other related service industry management and operations. Such experience should include background in most of the following: procurement of supplies and equipment, operational efficiency, sanitation, internal finance controls, budgeting, staffing, room design and decorating; or similar work which demonstrated the knowledge and abilities of the operational area. Additional Information:",NAVY LODGE ASST MGR (+ ROOMS) Job in Jacksonville,Full Time,"Jacksonville, FL 32212",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/NAVY-LODGE-ASST-MGR-150-ROOMS-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-165008686.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=11,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),324b2410607e12b08a3d8b53d686d6cc
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:17:49:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cooley Dickinson Hospital, a Massachusetts General Hospital affiliate, is a 140 bed acute care community hospital in Northampton Massachusetts, offering medical/surgical, orthopedic, obstetric/gynecologic, psychiatric, geriatric, palliative, emergency, ambulatory, diagnostic, and rehabilitation services.   Cooley Dickinson Hospital is currently looking for a per diem Chaplain in our Pastoral Care program.The Chaplain is responsible for providing pastoral services to patients, families and members of the Cooley Dickinson Hospital Health Care Team as appropriate.   This position will share rotating weekend on-call coverage, and may be trained to provide week day coverage as well. Coverage will require on-call Chaplain to present onsite to a call within 30 minutes.  Minimum RequirementsBachelor's Degree required, Master's degree preferred.  Candidates with a minimum of one unit of Clinical Pastoral Education (or equivalent) preferred. A minimum of one year of hospice or pastoral care experience, preferably in a hospital or health care environment. Experience in ministering to persons involved with life-threatening illnesses required.  Cooley Dickinson offers competitive salaries and a work environment that supports your personal and professional growth.For more information and to apply online, please visit our website, www.cooley-dickinson.org. ",Chaplain Job in Northampton,,"Northampton, MA 01060",,http://jobview.monster.com/Chaplain-Job-Northampton-MA-US-164938252.aspx?mescoid=2100324001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),644afe6ca58eadd09ede6ea82bb4ba90
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:17:53:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"MIDTOWN is looking for a Cook to add to our first class organization.About Our CompanyMIDTOWN Corporate Office is a pleasant work environment serving our upscale athletic clubs and club management partners across North America. Our team of associates is committed to exceptional performance, delivering our promise to members, and supporting a workplace where every one can reach their full career potential. MIDTOWN ATHLETIC CLUBS is an industry leader in upscale fitness and sports resorts. Founded in 1970 as a single tennis club in Chicago, Midtown now has 8 full-service tennis and fitness facilities in the United States and Canada. To learn more, read Our Story. MIDTOWN HEALTH, sister company to Midtown Athletic Clubs, is a leader in fitness center management and employee wellness solutions for medically-integrated and corporate fitness centers throughout the United States. To learn more, click here.Position SummaryAs an important part of the café team, our Cooks are friendly and attentive professionals who strive to delight our members and guests by:   Quickly and efficiently preparing food orders Inspiring a sense of community and providing personal attention Maintaining clean and sanitary kitchen areas to promote a safe and enjoyable member experience Committing to department responsibilities and working effectively within a team environment Assisting with inventory of product and supplies Assisting with taking orders and busing tables as needed Our Cooks:   Have at least two years of food preparation and cooking experience Possess current Department of Health and Sanitation Certification Understand the importance of complying with Department of Health sanitary guidelines Have great personalities that naturally connect with a wide variety of people Demonstrate strong customer service skills and enjoy serving others Have the ability to work gracefully and quickly under pressure Possess a keen memory and delightful sense of humor Are highly organized and efficient Have excellent communication skills Associate BenefitsFull-time Midtown associates are eligible to receive a competitive compensation package and benefits plan including: group health, dental, life, vision, prescription drug program, flexible spending account, short/long term disability, matching 401k, professional development account, and a complimentary club membership.MIDTOWN is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Cook Job in Bannockburn,Full Time Employee,"Bannockburn, IL 60015",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Cook-Job-Bannockburn-IL-US-164163096.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=18,,Food Services/Hospitality,53d879c0ac3ac9b3516d04deaea42574
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:17:53:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description/Job SummaryReceive and inspect deliveries, check temperatures, check date times to verify freshness, cleanliness, consistency, and quality throughout case lots, and store and rotate properly. Refuse acceptance of damaged, unacceptable, or incorrect items, returning items to vendors, tracking rejected items, and communicate to appropriate management. Maintain cleanliness of work areas and serving areas throughout the day, practicing clean-as-you-go procedures. Eliminate cross contamination by processing and handling raw and ready-to-eat products separately. Ensure that coolers, freezers, bread drawers, and steamwells (e.g., gravy, soup) are set at the correct temperatures and labeled, and record equipment and food temperatures on HACCP chart. Set up workstations with all necessary supplies. Break down all workstations. Organize cleaning chemicals and supplies and keep them separate from food products. Clean and sanitize floors, food stations, food equipment, and drains, and dust/wipe down walls, doors, lights, ceiling tiles, vents, and trash cans. Elicit and listen to feedback from customers, including customer surveys; maintain client satisfaction at a level that ensures account retention. Report accidents, injuries, and unsafe work conditions to manager/supervisor; complete safety training and certifications. Follow all company policies and procedures (e.g., safety and security, food handling); ensure uniform/dress code and personal appearance are clean and professional; protect the privacy and security of customers and coworkers; support workplace diversity initiatives. Speak with others using clear and professional language. Develop and maintain positive working relationships with others; support team to reach common goals; listen and respond appropriately to the concerns of other employees.  Ensure adherence to quality, cleaning, and maintenance expectations and standards; work with customer to ensure satisfaction.Required SkillsSafetyFollow proper food handling procedures. Use proper equipment, wear appropriate personal protective clothing (PPE), and employ correct lifting procedures, as necessary, to avoid injury.Follow company and department safety, security, and loss prevention policies and procedures to ensure a clean, safe, and secure environment.Report work related accidents, or other injuries immediately upon occurrence to manager/supervisor.Follow all compliance programs (e.g., safety and fire, hazardous materials and waste program, emergency management program, utility management program, medical equipment management program, infection and control).Follow policies and procedures for the safe operation and storage of tools, equipment, and machines.Identify and correct unsafe work procedures or conditions and/or report them to management and security/safety personnel.Complete appropriate safety training and certifications to perform work tasks.Policies and ProceduresEnsure uniform/dress code and personal appearance are clean, hygienic, professional and in compliance with company policies and procedures.Follow all federal, state, and local regulations, as well as Sodexo/client policies and procedures (e.g., Quality Assurance, Safety, Operations, Human Resources).Protect company tools, equipment, machines, or other assets in accordance with company policies and procedures.CommunicationCommunicate with customers with a professional and polite demeanor. Working with OthersSupport all coworkers and treat them with dignity and respect. Partner with and assist others to promote an environment of teamwork and achieve common goals.Develop and maintain positive and productive working relationships with other employees.Quality Assurance/Quality ImprovementComply with quality assurance expectations and standards. OperationsMaintain clean and clutter-free work space, including public areas. Clean and maintain property and premises, ensuring all cleanliness standards are met.General Food ServicesMaintain cleanliness of work areas and serving areas throughout the day, practicing clean-as-you-go procedures.Follows all Sodexo safety requirements within assigned area of responsibility, as well as all local, state, and federal regulations.Date, label, and rotate all items according to company standards. Store food following company cooking and storage temperature guidelines. Eliminate cross contamination by processing and handling raw and ready-to-eat products separately.Ensure that coolers, freezers, bread drawers, and steamwells (e.g., gravy, soup) are set at the correct temperatures and labeled, and record equipment and food temperatures on HACCP chart.Notify management of maintenance repair issues. Report any employee, customer, and/or vendor incidents and accidents to management and Security at the time of the incident and/or accident.Assist own and other departments when needed to ensure optimum service to customers.Organize cleaning chemicals and supplies and keep them separate from food products.Ensure that coffee makers, bread drawers, toasters, and/or steam tables are turned on/off at the appropriate times.Clean and sanitize floors, food equipment, and drains, and dust/wipe down walls, doors, lights, ceiling tiles, vents, and trash cans.Inspect storage areas for organization, use of First In First Out (FIFO), and cleanliness, and rectify any deficiencies.Communicate additional meal requirements, allergies, dietary needs, and special requests to the kitchen.Complete and maintain required departmental paperwork, such as throwaway record sheets, invoices, and assignment notices.OpeningSet up workstations with all necessary supplies. Complete opening duties including setting up necessary supplies and tools, including bank, and ensuring      work area is clean and everything is in working order.Line up for opening with appropriate tools and equipment. Steps of ServiceRespond to customer complaints regarding food or service. ClosingBreak down all workstations, including cleaning and sanitizing stations and equipment.Monitor and maintain cleanliness, sanitation, and organization of assigned station and service areas.Complete closing duties, including storing all reusable goods, breaking down goods, cleaning all equipment and areas, returning equipment to proper locations, locking refrigerators, restocking items, turning off lights, locking doors, and completing daily cleaning checklist. Retail SalesGreet customer at beginning of transaction. Verify cash drawer at beginning of shift. Shop InventoryKeep storeroom neat at all times. Merchandise Stocking/DisplayStock shelves/racks and rotates stock (if appropriate) to ensure freshness. Maintain cleanliness and orderliness of store by sweeping, dusting, mopping, or vacuuming.Organize and clean shop during shift, removing all trash, cleaning/dusting work area and organizing all retail items.Identify damaged items, remove them from the floor, and notify manager/supervisor.Display merchandise in a neat, eye-appealing manner that encourages customer purchases.Label merchandise accurately and in accordance with standards (e.g., front and back).ConcessionsReplenish foods at serving stations. Scrub and polish counters, steam tables, and other equipment, and clean glasses, dishes, and fountain equipment.Take customer orders and prepare food, using standard formulas or following directions.Wrap menu items such as sandwiches, hot entrees, and desserts for serving or for takeout.Coffee Bar/CartSet up, stock, and maintain work areas. Greet customers and answer any questions they may have about menu items. Brew coffees, following standards to ensure freshness. NutritionEnsure trays, utensils, plates, and cups are clean and undamaged prior to use.Prepare food items, such as sandwiches, salads, soups, and beverages. StockingAdhere to food safety and handling policies and procedures, such as First In-First Out (FIFO) and Cold Chain compliance, across all food-related departments or areas.Reduce workplace hazards in storeroom by following safe handling and storage policies and procedures.Calibrate thermometers daily. Maintain log temperatures for coolers/freezers in accordance with Cold Chain procedures.Identify and remove merchandise that is outdated, distressed, or unacceptable in appearance to ensure quality and freshness.Organize and clean all food storerooms, refrigerators, and freezers. Maintain the security standards of the food storeroom and refrigerator/freezer.Receive and inspect deliveries, check temperatures, check date times to verify freshness, cleanliness, consistency, and quality throughout case lots, and store and rotate properly.Monitor equipment, including freezer systems, such as fans, drains, and doors, for proper operation.Complete and maintain up-to-date logs for food products. Communicate to management and document overstock or slow moving products (e.g., push list) for proper   utilization.Refuse acceptance of damaged, unacceptable, or incorrect items, returning items to vendors, tracking rejected items, and communicate to appropriate management.DishwashingAllow cleaned items to air dry. Ensure clean wares are stored in appropriate areas. Use detergent, rinsing, and sanitizing chemicals in the 3-compartment sink at the appropriate levels to clean dishes, ensuring the chlorine levels are between 50 and 100 parts per million and that the water temperature is sufficiently hot.Collect dirty pans from the cooking line and transport to pot station for cleaning.Inspect, pull, and stack cleaned items, send soiled items back for re-scrubbing and re-washing.Hand wash dishes as appropriate. Ensure water temperature and chemical levels are appropriate to run the dishwashing machine, and complete proper documentation.Clean the dishwashing machine, including removing trash and spraying the inside of the machine, cleaning and unclogging the spray arms and jets, cleaning the outer surfaces of the machine, and troubleshoot dishwasher malfunctions as required.Rack dirty items (e.g., silverware, plateware). Maintenance, Sanitation, and Cleaning ActivitiesClean equipment (e.g., coffee maker, tea brewer, salad refrigerator), surfaces (e.g., counters, tables, shelves), table items (e.g., salt, pepper, sugar containers), and work station following MAC cleaning procedures using approved cleaning chemicals, compounds, and products. Clean room, including sweeping, disposing of trash, and wiping counters and tables.Clean and mop all areas in assigned departments (e.g., sink area, shelves and counters in dish room, tops of chemical bottles, outside of the dish machine, dish room door and walls, bus carts) and display “wet floor” signs.Break down cardboard boxes and place them and other recyclables in the recycle bin.Empty full trashcans, ensuring each can is clean, relined, and covered, and maintain dumpster area.Clean and maintain storage and stock areas. Clean and maintain sanitation areas and organize cleaning supplies including hanging up mops and brooms.Dispose of glass in the proper containers. Transfer supplies and equipment within and between storage and work areas such as pantry and dish room.Organize supply rack, including pots, pans, serving spoons, utensils, etc. DetailsCRITICAL COMPETENCIESPersonal AttributesSafety Orientation Dependability Cleaning and SanitationPersonal Hygiene   QUALIFICATIONSEducationHigh School diploma / G.E.D. equivalentRelated Work Experience1 year related work experienceSupervisory ExperienceNo supervisory/managerial experience ",Food Service Worker I Job in Pawtucket,Full Time,"Pawtucket, RI 02861",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Food-Service-Worker-I-Job-Pawtucket-RI-US-164495023.aspx?mescoid=3500611001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,b53a35580211b4a2e82daaccf7299be9
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:18:13:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"MEDICAL NETWORK MANAGERPOSITION SUMMARY:  This individual is responsible for the performance of all medical networks (PPOs) utilized by TRISTAR Managed Care customers and is responsible for developing a comprehensive network strategy to support growth and medical savings targets ***THIS POSITION CAN BE BASED ANYWHERE IN THE U.S.***DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:·         Develops and recommends network strategy on a nationwide basis for worker’s compensation customers·         Authenticates contracting and credentialing processes for all leased networks nationally·         Completes Quality Assurance oversight to ensure accuracy of results·         Presents TRISTAR Managed Care capabilities to customers·         Responds to all regulatory inquiries and ensures all networks meet regulatory guidelines·         Analyzes effectiveness of networks                 QUALIFICATIONS REQUIRED: Education/Experience: Bachelor’s degree mandatory; 3+ years of PPO, medical network management experience.  Worker’s compensation experience preferred. Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: ·         Ability to prioritize multiple tasks, meet tight deadlines, and delegate effectively.  ·         Experience in negotiating network contracts·         Excellent analytic skills including the ability to identify unusual trends and results·         Excellent presentation and communication skills·         Microsoft Office products·         Excellent EXCEL capabilitiesOther Qualifications:      Strong communication and excellent negotiation skillsAbility to work in a fast paced environmentExcellent time management skills  ",Medical Network Manager Job function wrap(EL,Full Time,Job location not provided,,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Network-Manager-Job-US-163594084.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=17,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),072b27595a457d16eed819aaf2a42a20
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:18:15:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Director HSE-POS_00470805-0002JCDescriptionSanofi, a global healthcareleader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused onpatients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, humanvaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animalhealth and Genzyme.Sanofi USAt Sanofi US, we are committed to the growth of our people,connected in purpose by career, life and health.Headquartered in Bridgewater, NJ, Sanofi US is part of a leadingglobal healthcare company dedicated to discovering, developing and distributingtherapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, human vaccines,innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health andGenzyme. Sanofi US employs approximately 17,000 people across the country alldedicated to protecting health, enhancing life and responding to the hopes andpotential healthcare needs of seven billion people around the world.Commitment is our Strength. Ready to grow together?Sanofi US endeavors to makeour career center accessible to any and all users. If you are experiencingdifficulty and need assistance applying online, please call 1-800-207-8049Option 7, then Option 3.Sanofi US Services, Inc. and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity andAffirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce.All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment withoutregard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry;nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender,gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability;veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violencevictim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (includingthe refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protectedby law.DEPARTMENTDESCRIPTION:The Health Safety Environment department (HSE) isresponsible for implementing programs and policies that comply with Sanofirequirements and all local, state and federal HSE rules and regulations for theFramingham campus, including the Biologics and Biosurgery IndustrialOperations, the Framingham Facilities and Engineering Operations and theFramingham Science Operations. POSITIONOVERVIEW/KEY RESPONSIBILTIES*:Position SummaryReportingto the Site Head of Framingham Biologics, the Senior Director HSE managesemployees directly or indirectly engaged in occupation, health, safety andenvironmental affairs, compliance and management. This position is responsible forHSE programs implemented for the entire Framingham, Massachusetts, campus. This role will have a matrix reporting toSanofi HSE leadership.Core ResponsibilitiesDevelop and assure continuous improvement of the Company's HSE Management Systems. Acquire and maintain third party certification of the Company's ISO 14001 Environmental Management System, BS 18001 Health and Safety Management System and ISO 50001 Energy Management System.Lead the systematic reduction of Health, Safety, Environment Risks and Hazards under the management systems.Align site operations with the Business HSE maturity model and achieve annual performance targets.Assure continuous improvement of the site's Safety Performance as measured by LTI Rate reduction and the reduction of potentially significant events. Achieve Sanofi Safety goals for employees, temporary and contracted Workers.Assure continuous improvements in operational efficiency to reduce cost of goods and deliver Right First Time services, programs and procedures. Reduce/eliminate business interruptions, reduce operational costs and assure collaboration with all site Departments, Organizations and Platforms.Develop, implement and maintain compliance with Safety, Health and Environmental Laws (OSHA, EPA, FDA, DEP, HHS, CDC etc.) and Company standards, policies, guidelines and SOPs as measured by self, third party and regulatory inspection performance.BusinessManagement:Manage business activities associated with the HSE budgetAssess individual and team performance utilizing the Company’s performance management system Actively participate in the Site Leadership Team (SLT) meetings and Governance activities. Actively participate in the Business HSE Governance Network In collaboration with the SLT, participates in strategic planning, establishing business/HSE objectives and Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) for HSEDevelop, maintain and report applicable department and/or organizational metricsLead management HSE reviews with Site and Network Leadership Teams* Key Responsibilities may differ amongemployees with the same job title and may change over time, in accordance withbusiness needs.LEADERSHIPQUALIFICATIONS: Lead and develop team of HSE professionals to ensure the right expertise and skills to drive a highly effective HSE cultureAct as a role model consistent with the Sanofi LEAD Competencies of: Think Strategically; Develop People; Lead Teams; Make Decisions; Act for Change; Cooperate Transversally; Strive for Results; and Commit to Customers·Build effective partnerships across thevarious functions at the site as well as through team building within the HSEorganization·Create an environment of problemsolving utilizing quality improvement principlesQualificationsBASIC QUALIFICATIONS:·Bachelor’sdegree·Minimumof 15 years’ experience in an HSE role · Minimumof 10 years’ experience in a leadership role Environmental, Health and Safetyin a manufacturing and/or laboratory environment. PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:·Master’s degree·Expertisein Industrial Hygiene (IH), ergonomics, process safety or risk management.·HSECertification in CSP, CEP, CHMM, or CIH.·Certificate as leadauditor in ISO 14001/OHSAS 18001.·Experienceworking within cGMP, industrial or equivalent environment·Excellentcommunication skills.·Experienceusing data analysis and problem-solving tools and techniques·Experiencein incident command, emergency response, HAZMAT, First Aid, or other relevant HSEtopics.·Workingknowledge of ISO 14001/OHSAS 18001/ANSI Z10Job:HSEPrimary Location:United States-Massachusetts-FraminghamJob Posting:Feb 18, 2016, 9:01:26 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Senior Director HSE Job in Framingham,,"Framingham, MA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Director-HSE-Job-Framingham-MA-US-165097332.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,8d27f993da58da813b021464a420681a
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:18:59:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"FULL TIME DELI POSITION OPENINGS. Pay based on experience ($12+ for full time). Shifts consist of days, evenings and weekends. Also Part Time Cashier openings for evenings shifts. Stop in at Mike's Food Center in St. Charles to pick up an application.",Deli Openings Job in St. Charles,Full Time,"St. Charles, MN 55972",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Deli-Openings-Job-St.-Charles-MN-US-164715749.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=2,,,c849265c90e72aa581f7b766b0699645
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:19:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES:  Prepare a daily report that verifies transactions Be able to work quickly and concisely under pressure Understand what is inclusive of a reimbursable meal Ensure storage of food in a proper and sanitary manner Organize and assist in major cleaning of refrigerators, freezers, and cooking and serving equipment at the regularly scheduled intervals Ensure food items and supplies are checked in as they arrive Ensure daily cleaning and sterilization of all dishes, silverware, and cooking utensils Promote good public relations Attend in-service meetings as scheduled by the General Manager/Lead Proper utilization of leftovers as required Maintain a constant sense of cost control Adhere to all HACCP regulations for sanitation, food handling, and storage Adhere to the uniform policy Communicate with the Kitchen Manager daily to understand and properly prepare menu for the day Serve food at proper portions as requested Adjust thermostat controls to regulate temperature of ovens, broilers, grills, roasters, steam kettles, and all other cooking and serving equipment Measure and mix ingredients according to standardized recipes using blenders, mixers, grinders, slicers, and other preparation equipment to prepare entrees, soups, salads, sandwiches, gravies, desserts, sauces, casseroles, and other food items Bake, roast, broil, boil, and steam meats, fish, vegetables, and other foods Observe and test food being cooked by tasting, smelling, and taking temperature to assure it is cooked May wash, peel, cut, and shred vegetables and fruits to prepare them for use May bake bread, rolls, cakes, and pastries Other related duties as assigned MUST BE ABLE TO: Skillfully use hand tools or machines needed for your work Read instructions for items to be made Use math to calculate change Work with client(s) with tact and diplomacy Perform work that is routine and organized PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Lifting twenty (20) pounds unassisted and more with assistance; frequent lifting and/or carrying of objects weighing up to twenty (20) pounds Reaching, handling, seeing, standing, walking Inside Job (defined as spending approximately 75% or more of the time inside) Temperature changes: variations in temperature, which are sufficiently marked and abrupt to cause noticeable bodily reactions. Qualifications QUALIFICATIONS: Foodservice Sanitation Certificate as needed High School diploma/GED Additional Information:",Food Service Worker - Roycemore School Job in Evanston,"Part Time, Employee","Evanston, IL 60201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Food-Service-Worker-Roycemore-School-Job-Evanston-IL-US-164914050.aspx?mescoid=3500611001001&jobPosition=3,,Food Services/Hospitality,b9362744bab6ae127b5d927da33098e5
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:19:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"For the past 20+ years, we have grown from a couple units in the Northeast to become one of the largest and most well-known (and loved) names in the restaurant industry. How have we done it? While others emphasize speed of service over quality, we’ve successfully balanced both. Our restaurants feature a wide array of healthy meals that can satisfy any craving quickly. We have become an integral part of the community wherever we have opened up, which has helped fuel our growth and ensure our success.Title of Position: Restaurant Assistant General Manager Job Description: The Assistant General Manager will see overall responsibility of restaurant operations in General Manager's is not on duty and build store profitability by following established procedures. The Assistant General Manager will operate and ensure compliance with prescribed policies and practices. Assist with the recruitment and training of restaurant employees and participate in building the brand image in the local communities. As the Assistant General Manager you will investigate and resolve customer complaints regarding food quality or service when General Manager is absent and uphold sales and service techniques to ensure a great guest experience.Benefits: Excellent Compensation Health Benefits Life Insurance 401(K) Paid Vacation Sick Time Policies Bonus Plans Qualifications: Minimum of 2-3 years current experience as a Restaurant Manager in a high volume (over $2m per year in sales) Fast Casual conceptA stable work history - no more than two jobs in the previous five years Ability to increase sales and build rapport in the community Strong leadership, communication, and organizational skills Hands-on with hiring, training, and developing hourly employees Excellent work ethic and drive to succeed Apply Now - Restaurant Manager in Philadelphia!",Restaurant Manager Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Restaurant-Manager-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-163634778.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=6,"35,000.00 - 45,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),dd6095a349a33ad72d89ec1df4fbb93f
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:19:14,No,jobs.monster.com," Hyatt is a place where high expectations aren't just met-they're exceeded. It's a place of outstanding rewards, where talent opens doors to exciting challenges in the hospitality industry. The Hyatt Shared Service Center provides accounting support for over 150 Hyatt Hotels in North America and Latin America. Some of the accounting functions are: billing customer service, accounts receivable, accounts payable, sales and use tax, payroll, and treasury. However, the functions the Hyatt Shared Service Center supports continues to grow.The purpose of this role is to complete both pre-arrival and post departure billing functions for events within the Hyatt Hotels. The Analyst will be responsible for completing all processes accurately and efficiently, according to Hyatt policies. This role will support multiple hotels, depending on size and seasonality. Essential Functions:Monitor, review, and update accounting systems to ensure accurate event invoicing Import and upload reports from accounting systems to produce event invoicesComplete credit application forms Post, code, and trace deposits in accounting systemCorrespond with hotel staff and customers via phone and/or emailMeet daily, weekly and monthly deadlines as well as deadlines set per eventMeet deadlines as set per eventIdentify, recommend and support billing solutions that improve business processes and reporting efficiencies Work well with others at multiple levels within the organizationMaintain confidentially when handling propriety information Reprioritize workload and address urgent demands quicklyEscalate issues that may negatively impact the customer’s experience, as appropriateExceptional attention to detail. Other duties as may be assigned by supervisors.Ideal candidate will also possess the following behavior characteristics: Ability to collaborate with cross-functional teams across all levels of the organization Ability to work inclusively, independently, and without excessive supervision Ability to communicate appropriately to all-levels of the organization. Appreciates diversity Ability to learn new skills, technologies and business processes quickly. Adapt to new demands  Qualifications:1-3 years customer service experience in one of the following industriesHospitalityAccountingBusiness to Business SalesCommercial Oil and Gas6 months working experience with the following:Accounting or Property Management SystemMicrosoft Office Suite, including AccessHigh school diploma or equivalentExperience with the following software a plus:OracleOperaSAPMicrosoft OutlookAbility to multitask between PC and web-based programsAbility to communicate easily with both internal and external customersExceptional time management and organizational skillsAccurate and efficient data entry skills",Event Billing Analyst Job in Moore,Full Time,"Moore, OK 73160",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Event-Billing-Analyst-Job-Moore-OK-US-164895347.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=9,16.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,94d19a7b08f942753576110be835edf4
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:19:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time (2:30pm-7:00pm; weekends)Brookdale Richmond 3700 South A St Richmond, IN 47374 Job #: 053781 Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities: * Prepare and cook all community meals under the direction of the Dining Services Coordinator/Manager * Ensure proper portioning, preparation and serving of foods according to standardized recipes * Adhere to all kitchen sanitation and safety standards under the direction of the Dining Services Coordinator * Follow departmental procedures, including proper storage of dishes, utensils and cooking equipment Required skills and qualifications: * High school diploma or GED * ServSafe Certification preferred - obtain and hold any local or state required food handling/supervision/sanitation licenses and/or certifications * One year of commercial cooking in a fast-paced setting * Working knowledge of kitchen organization, food preparation and special diets * Flexibility with schedule, including availability to work weekends and holidays as needed * Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Cook Job in Richmond,Part Time Employee,"Richmond, IN 47374",Healthcare Services Restaurant/Food Services Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Cook-Job-Richmond-IN-US-164560573.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=10,,Food Services/Hospitality,286e4d6b776749acdd443dd9e979dee7
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:21:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Top Performing Restaurant General Managers and Assistant Managers!~Reach Your Career Goals in 2016~Interviews Being Scheduled Immediately for our Upbeat, Fun, Full Service Concept in the Jonesboro, AR area !We offer:×          Starting Salary Packages up to $58,000 for Assistant Manager level×          Substantial Bonus packages ×          Comprehensive Benefits packages for all levels of Restaurant Management×          Unique Employee rewards and programs ×          Generous & Unique Rewards for Top Performers×          Upward Mobility with extensive training and support for all Restaurant Managers and team members×          Rock Solid Stability×          5 Day work weeks×          2 weeks Paid Vacation 1st year×          Fast paced environmentCareer Qualifications include:×          2+​​ years CURRENT salaried Restaurant Management experience×          High School education - Diploma or GED are both acceptable×          Valid Drivers Lic.​​×          All Managers will be subject to drug testing×          All Managers will be subject to background checks and education verification×          An ""Every Shift Counts"" attitude×          Proven track record of Success in measurably improving P&L's×          Strong Restaurant Operational background with an emphasis on developing and outstanding service team ×          Excellent interpersonal skills ×          Outstanding conflict resolution skillsIf you are ready to step up your Restaurant Management career, submit your resume today and work with a team that is committed to your success!All Qualified Restaurant Managers will be interviewed!         Restaurant | restaurant manager | manager | restaurant jobs | restaurant job | restaurant recruiters | restaurant recruiter | restaurant employment | restaurant careers | Restaurant resumes | restaurant resume | restaurant job search | restaurant career | restaurant job listing | restaurant job listings | restaurant management jobs | restaurant manager resume | restaurant management recruiters | restaurant manager jobs | restaurant manager resumes | restaurant manager resume | Restaurant manager careers | restaurant management employment | restaurant Manager recruiter | restaurant management job | restaurant management jobs | Restaurant manager career | restaurant manager employment | restaurant | Restaurants | manager | managers | experienced manager | experienced managers | Management | Full Service Restaurant | Quick Casual Restaurant | Fast Food Restaurant | multi unit operator | Food Service | Hospitality | Bar Manger | Shift Manager | search firm | hospitality search firm | restaurant search firm | restaurant manager | restaurant managers | general manager | assistant manager | bar manager | FOH manager | BOH manager | restaurant jobs | assistant general manager | restaurant management, restaurant management jobs | restaurant franchises | franchising | managers | buffet | restaurant management careers | restaurant management | recruitment | manager | recruiter | recruitment | career | kitchen manager | opportunity | job opportunities | full service | assistant manager | casual full service | food service | family style | buffet | casual dining | quick service | fast food managers | general manager | restaurant manager | general manager | managers | restaurant managers | resta",Restaurant Manager Jonesboro Job in Jonesboro,Full Time,"Jonesboro, AR",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Restaurant-Manager-Jonesboro-Job-Jonesboro-AR-US-164806595.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=2,"48,000.00 - 58,000.00 $ /yearComprehensive Medical Benefits, Bonus Program and Much More!",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),5c27c3b58f7ae26b17e54449ddc00687
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:23:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Compounds and dispenses medications and other pharmaceuticals. Prepares and maintains all necessary records on prescriptions, patient charges and inventory. Provides information to the staff members on drugs and pharmaceuticals.Requires RPh license.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Pharmacist-Pharmacy Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78229",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pharmacist-Pharmacy-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-164485983.aspx?mescoid=2900462001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,93f3b7a34de20bb8e641b7c8147c9cae
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:26:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Emergency Room (ER) RN Registered Nurse - Travel to New York Info for Emergency Room (ER) RN Travel Assignment: ·         12 Hour Day and Night Shift·         8 or 13 week assignments·         Various locations: NYC, Long Island and Hudson Valley Region What is travel nursing whit White Glove Placement, Inc. all about, anyway? As the largest nursing agency in NY, White Glove offers you an exclusive selection of travel assignments in NY. As a White Glove Travel Nurse you get the possibility to work in some of the post prestigious facilities in the nation. Take your chance to visit the best of New York – the EmpireState. Fro the “city that never sleeps”, to the scenic country areas… White Glove has contracts available throughout the state. BrowseRockefellerCenter… Visit Niagara Falls… and everything in between. At the same time, get paid top Travel Nursing salary and benefits you deserve! What are benefits for White Glove Travel Nurses? ·         Variety of ER RN Travel Nurse Assignments at top ranking facilities – you get to choose which one! Reserve your slot for upcoming orientation so your file can be submitted timely.·         Daily pay at participating facilities·         Free housing or tax-free housing/meal stipends·         Travel reimbursement·         NYS license/certification reimbursement·         Free health and dental insurance·         Completion bonus·         Metro cards·         Extra cash bonus for referring your Nurse friends·         Any other benefits you want... just let us know so we can include it in your contract! What are requirements for RN Registered Nurse Emergency Room (ER) Travel Nursing Jobs? ·         Current unrestricted NYS RN License (our recruiters are ready to assist you in applying for one… plus we reimburse it in your contract)·         At least 1 year experience as a Registered Nurse RN in Emergency Room (ER)·         Eligibility to work in United States ",Emergency Room (ER) RN Registered Nurse - Travel to New York Job in New York City,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"New York City, NY 10003",,http://jobview.monster.com/Emergency-Room-ER-RN-Registered-Nurse-Travel-to-New-York-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-163353401.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,8940b2cf3ddf27195da8bae2a1c9c075
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:37:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:Produce visually appealing and good tasting foods to Guckenheimer standards. Prepare, season, and cook soups, meats, vegetables, desserts, or other foodstuffs as required. Serving customers during meal periods.Qualifications:ServSafe certificationCulinary School or Hospitality certification or work equivalent.2 year providing excellent one on one customer service.Must be able to communicate with others to convey information effectively.Must be able to communicate in English with customers.3 years food preparation experience.Ability to use basic computer programs for inputting and organizing data and menus.Position Responsibilities:Maintain HACCP program requirementsSeason and cook food according to recipes and experience.Observe and test foods to determine if they have been cooked sufficiently, taking temperatures. Adjust seasoning to customer tastes.Weigh, measure, and mix ingredients according to recipes, using various kitchen utensils and equipment.Portion, arrange, and garnish food, and serve food to patrons.Regulate temperature of ovens, broilers, grills, and roasters.Substitute for or assist other cooks during emergencies or rush periods.Must follow all safety rules and actively prevent accidents.Commitment to the service values and ethics of the client company.Use of food cost control methods.Essential Skills and Experience:Must be able to correctly and safely use standards kitchen equipment. Chefs' knives; Convection ovens; Rotating rack ovens; Meat and cheese slicing machines, steamers, mandolins, grills andn broilers.Knowledge of principles and processes for providing customer service. This includes customer needs assessment, meeting quality standards for services, and evaluation of customer satisfaction.Knowledge of raw materials, production processes, quality control, costs, and other techniques for food preparation.Job requires being reliable, responsible, and dependable, and fulfilling obligations.Job requires accepting criticism and dealing calmly and effectively with high stress situationsNonessential Skills:Preparation of catered food.Menu planning for the café and catering.Costing of menu items and catering.Assisting with Inventory completionCommitment to scratch cooking and healthful foods.Product ordering and receiving.Identify new recipes for use.Physical Demands and Work Environment:Must be able to lift a minimum of 25 #. Employee must be able to work on their feet 7.5hour per day excluding breaks.Employee has to work under pressure and time deadlines during peak periods**Daytime Weekday Hours Available**",Cook Job in Foster City,Full Time,"Foster City, CA 94404",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Cook-Job-Foster-City-CA-US-164869333.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=10,,,1bb0ae1e8b33f2e5ce9e025e7d783e79
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:39:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Catering Director Brown University Dining Services Providence, Rhode Island The Assistant Catering Director will lead and manage the Catering sales team to ensure a high level of professionalism and guest services while managing budgetary requirements and fostering a cohesive team that is dedicated to customer satisfaction. This role is responsible for development of business leads, soliciting potential clientele and servicing of existing accounts, while also contributing to the marketing and sales of all other departmental services and options. Other responsibilities will include the management of key accounts, acting as the primary public relations liaison to Catering clientele with particular emphasis on clients such as Alumni Relations, Corporation Office, Conference Services and Advancement. The Assistant Catering Director will work closely with The Catering Director on projects and initiative such as budget, marketing, and menu development as well as the overall effectiveness and success of the Catering department. Qualifications: Bachelor’s degree in event planning, hospitality management, or related, plus five years’ experience in the hospitality industry in positions of progressively increasing levels of responsibility, preferably in catering or event planning, or equivalent combination of education and experience. Supervisory or management experience. Demonstrated effective leadership, motivation and team building skills. Strong written and oral communication skills. Ability to effectively communicate with people at all levels. Sales experience with a proven track record. Demonstrated high standards and strong customer service orientation. Extremely organized and detail-oriented, and able to prioritize effectively. Sensitivity to diversity and cultural differences. Knowledge of trends in the catering/event planning business. Highly professional with a positive attitude. Solid interpersonal skills and ability to build relationships both with clients and colleagues. Demonstrated competence with windows-based word processing and spreadsheet software; Experience with catering or event planning software preferred. RI Food Safety and Bar Code certification preferred; willingness to obtain upon hire required. Experience working in a union environment preferred. Brown Catering operates seven days/week throughout the year, executing everything from coffee breaks to black tie dinners. The Catering department serves all segments of the Brown community including a diverse student population, as well as the public at large. The Assistant Catering Director position requires flexibility and the ability to adapt to change. It also requires the ability to both lead and motivate a team of Event Coordinators and build relationships with staff at all levels to ensure the smooth execution of catered events. Success requires dedication, creativity and passion and a can-do attitude. The position will require early morning, night and weekend hours as dictated by business needs. Events are staged throughout the campus so the position also involves some walking. To View More Details and To Apply, please use the following link to this position on Brown’s Career Site: https://brown.wd5.myworkdayjobs.com/en-US/staff-careers-brown/job/Sharpe-Refectory/Assistant-Catering-Director_REQ121904 Brown University is committed to fostering a diverse and inclusive academic global community; as an EEO/AA employer, Brown considers applicants for employment without regard to, and does not discriminate on the basis of, gender, race, protected veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status. About Brown (Please visit our website and get to know us better at: www.brown.edu ) Located in historic Providence, Rhode Island and founded in 1764, Brown is an independent, coeducational Ivy League institution comprising undergraduate and graduate programs, plus the Alpert Medical School, School of Public Health, School of Engineering, Executive Master of Healthcare Leadership and the IE Brown Executive MBA. Brown is being recognized by the Alliance for Work-Life Progress for success in work-life programs, policies and practices. To earn the Seal of Distinction, Brown had to meet criteria and be assessed in each of the seven categories listed for work-life effectiveness that defines a best-in-class work-life portfolio in today's workplace.",Assistant Catering Director Job in Providence,Full Time,"Providence, RI",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Catering-Director-Job-Providence-RI-US-161245503.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=3,,,08cd3f5178200b68ec60580d84f119c1
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:40:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"SERVICE MANAGER,   KITCHEN MANAGER,    RESTAURANT MANAGER ARE YOU LOOKING FOR THE HOTTEST CASUAL DINING CONCEPT IN 10 YEARS? WE HAVE IT!  AVERAGE SALES $5M, COMPLETELY FROM-SCRATCH KITCHENS, ENTREPRENEURIAL CULTURE(NOT A SINGLE CHECKLIST!), HUGE GROWTH PLANS AND FUN ENVIRONMENT!Yet again, RMS brings the hottest opportunities in the hospitality industry directly to you!We are conducting a search for Salaried Restaurant Managers in the Raleigh/Cary area.  Our Client is the fastest-growing Casual Dining company in the US, and will open over 200 new locations in the next few years!!!We work very closely with top leadership from companies who are hiring in the region. We specialize in QSR, Fast-Casual and Casual Dining Restaurants and if you are a leader in this niche of the industry considering a career change - contact us today for an eye-popping view of the landscape of opportunities available to you right now.PLEASE DO NOT APPLY UNLESS YOU MEET THESE NON-NEGOTIABLE CRITERIA:     At least 2 years of Salaried Restaurant Operations experience with a Casual Dining concept     Willing to work shifts in both BOH & FOH     Able to lead and inspire Team Members towards successful completion of goals     Strong math, verbal and written communication skills     Excellent communication and people skills     Strong organizational skills     Ability to lead by example using hands-on, shoulder-to-shoulder work ethic     Able to work a flexible work schedule and meet business demands, including weekends and holidaysWe take pride in our reputation of moving fast with top candidates. You will hear from us within 24 hours if your experience is in line with the expectations of these searches. Apply today for IMMEDIATE and CONFIDENTIAL consideration.",Restaurant Manager Job in Raleigh,Full Time,"Raleigh, NC",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Restaurant-Manager-Job-Raleigh-NC-US-164459814.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=15,"45,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),6810886efcd296ad5ce6b70f4e8df240
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:41:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARYThe Milieu Counselor under the direct supervision of the Service Coordinator is responsible for maintaining the overall structure of the treatment environment by:-Monitoring client self-administered prescription and over the counter medications.  -Conducting nightly prescription medication counts, tracking and documenting discrepancies.-Supervising and verifying completion of routine tasks of daily living and community environmental upkeep.-Conducting and documenting routine checks of facility equipment to maintain compliance with regulatory agencies.  -Conducting routine room checks to ensure client, child, and infant safety.-Facilitating and monitoring nightly client phone calls.-Transporting or arranging transportation for routine and/or emergency medical appointments or situations.-Completing and submitting Serious Incident Reports.-Supervises family visitation at regularly scheduled times.-Inventorying and searching new client belongings and conducting room searches as necessary to maintain a safe living environment.-Administering and documenting routine and unscheduled drug screens.-Communicating daily and/or nightly with clinical staff about significant client issues.-Encouraging and supporting clients in their efforts towards short term and long term recovery.-Enforcing program rules as outlined in the client handbook  issuing rule infractions and merit memos when appropriate.-implementing the daily routine of the program which includes:  assisting clients in Residential and Detoxification levels of care by direct monitoring of clients, facilitation of educational and activity groups, co-facilitation of process groups, observation of client breaks, assisting with admissions and assessments when needed,  writing daily progress notes, and other duties as assigned by the Service  Coordinator and requested by the medical and counseling staff, as well as acting in behalf of the clinical staff in their absence.  JOB REQUIREMENTSEducation/Knowledge: Must have graduated from high school with a diploma or have a GED.Experience: Experience in alcohol or drug facility or health related field preferred but not required.  Potential hires will be assessed depending on how close their work experiences in other areas have prepared them for the job. Physical: Normal residential treatment environment.  Close eye work for writing and computer work.  Staff will possibly including but not limited to: lift up to 50 lbs. pushing/pulling up to 150 lbs. frequent sitting, standing, walking, bending, stooping, reaching,  participating in client activities, as well as driving agency vehicle with clients.Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1132&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",PRN New Beginnings Milieu Counselor Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/PRN-New-Beginnings-Milieu-Counselor-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-164565289.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,fd6fef515ac1c36bae19b18b87574551
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:19:46:31,No,jobs.monster.com,NOW HIRINGMANAGEMENT POSITIONSDQTEXAS STOP SIGNCompetitive SalaryBenefit PackagesHoliday and Vacation PayApply Onlinewww.richesondq.com This job listing brought to you by The Gainesville Daily Register,Restaurant Management Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,76241,Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Restaurant-Management-Job-US-165317199.aspx?ch=newsaine&mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=6,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),40b914f06b5cb288450264c22ce4b851
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:20:03:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client, the unquestioned leader in the Fast-Casual segment, is looking to hire Fast-Track General Managers in Charlotte. They are expanding quickly across North America, operating over 1,500 company-owned and franchise-operated locations.They provide a culture of warmth and an environment which embraces diverse backgrounds, values, and beliefs. Your talents and our vision combine to provide opportunities that promote your individual development and our continued success.CultureOur essential ingredient? We really care.We care about your future. Our continued success has created excellent career and personal growth opportunities for more than twenty-five years.We care about family. Our industry-leading compensation and benefit programs are more than just rewards; they're thanks for all you do as part of our family, making it easier to take care of your own.We care about all individuals. Our dedication to inclusion in our bakery-cafes, where differences are respected and valued, carries through to our external partnerships as well.We care about success. Our company has demonstrated consistent market leadership through a tradition of warmth, caring and growth, redefining success in our industry.We care about community. Our commitment to improving the lives of all individuals has led us to develop give-back programs that help individuals get ahead.  Benefits, Pay & ProgramsThe health and well-being of our associates is a high priority. We offer competitive compensation and benefits to both hourly and salaried associates, based on eligibility and availability. We believe these are key components of our associates' Total Rewards and employment experience. Medical, Dental & Vision Insurance 401(k) Retirement Plan Flexible Spending Account Employee Stock Purchase Plan Competitive Pay Incentive Programs Life Insurance Disability Program Employee Discount ProgramOur Client is proud to achieve the following: #1 ranking on J.D. Power and Associates' Annual Restaurant Satisfaction Survey Several ""Quick-Track Awards of Excellence,"" including the highest-rated chain on restaurant cleanliness  Over 90% of our retail management associates are ""highly satisfied"" with their careers  A recognized market leader winning awards for our products, service and efficiency No alcohol service and grease-free environment No late nights for Retail ManagersQUALIFICATIONS Minimum of 2 years salaried Management experience with a Fast-Casual or Casual Dining concept Highly motivated, self-directed, and results driven with a solid, accomplishment-based track record Able to manage multiple priorities in a fast-paced environment and make great decisions under pressure Understanding of Profit and Loss Statements, with the ability to identify opportunity areas and develop action plans Leads by example, with strong skills in interpersonal communication, staff development, and team-building Able to pass a thorough background check, including criminal and drug screen ",General Manager Job in Charlotte,Full Time,"Charlotte, NC",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Manager-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-164801613.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=14,"45,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),0ecc4c638cf7d8edb88ca9e85e9e1ca2
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:20:24:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Responsibilities: In this role as Hospitality Manager, you are responsible for creating a spirit of hospitality in the Front-of-the-House through creating a warm and positive environment, selecting friendly and talented Co-workers, leading the human and financial resources in the Front-of-the-House to achieve a profitable operation and environment that 'makes pleasurable dining affordable,' while providing a dining experience that ensures our guests become long term loyal customers. As a member of the restaurant operations management team, you are also responsible for the restaurant's overall operations, including food quality, production, safety, and labor in absence of the General Manager and Kitchen Manager.   Other Requirements:  Hours of work for this position are approximately 55-58 hours per week. Position requires standing and walking for periods of 2-5 hours without a rest break, and task sequencing and the completion of complex administrative responsibilities. Occasional moderate to heavy (10-25+lb) lifting and carrying, bending and reaching overhead may be required. Work environment includes heavy customer contact, working with cooking equipment and slippery walking surfaces. Position is under minimum levels of day-to-day supervision. Some travel may be required for training and operations meetings. We require a strong, stable work history along with management experience in a high-volume, casual dining or family-style restaurant.  Education and training normally associated with college coursework in business or hospitality.  Successful completion Golden Corral's comprehensive management training program. Golden Corral offers a variety of benefits designed to meet the particular needs of employees and their families. Compensation and benefits packages for managers include:Bonuses Paid Monthly with No Cap On Bonus Potential Medical Insurance Dental Insurance Vision Insurance 401(k) (Company Matching Program) Tuition Reimbursement Company Paid Life Insurance Short and Long-Term Disability Insurance 5-Day Workweek Paid Vacation Continual Training and Development During Career Are we the company for you?  If so, please click on the application link to take a few minutes to complete our official online application so that our recruiters can evaluate if we have a position that may be the best fit for you. Upon completion of the application, you will be asked to complete a brief online assessment for further consideration for opportunities with Golden Corral. Your application will be kept on file for consideration for future openings. We thank you in advance for providing this detailed information and appreciate your interest in Golden Corral Corporation. Our commitment to valuing diversity helps create an environment where everyone can be successful.Find us on Facebook at: http://www.facebook.com/pages/Golden-Corral-Careers/53336067800?ref=ts",Restaurant Manager / Hospitality Manager Job in Fort Pierce,"Full Time, Employee","Fort Pierce, FL 34945",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/Restaurant-Manager-Hospitality-Manager-Job-Fort-Pierce-FL-US-164700757.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=6,,Food Services/Hospitality,8ea22dd47ab969a2baca03b9d6592bd6
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:20:26:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Private Family seeks an experienced live-in Housekeeper to assist with the daily cleaning and care of their Southampton and Florida residences. The successful candidate will coordinate with separate Housekeeper and Estate Manager. Responsibilities will include but are not limited to: Overseeing cleaning and deep cleaning of residences; maintaining residences for guest readiness at all timesGreeting and providing hospitality to principals and all guests; includes formal serviceCaring for fine furnishings, art & antiques; polishing fine surfaces (marble, brass, steel, china, crystal, etc.)Handling all general household organizationLiaising with vendors and contractorsAssisting with special events and parties as neededMaintaining household inventories and purchasing supplies / groceries as neededLaundress duties; includes laundry, ironing, closet organization, seasonal wardrobe maintenance, light repairs, etc.Preparing daily meals for principals and all guestsMaintaining sanitation and cleanliness of kitchenCommunicating and coordinating with a large team of additional staffAssisting with pet care; Family has one dog and one birdRunning errands, responding to special requests as needed This position will be full-time live-in position with a 5 day work week. The Fort Lauderdale & Palm Beach property will be attended to from October-May during the Fall & Winter months and Southampton during the Spring & Summer months. This position also includes PTO and potential for annual bonus. The successful candidate will be provided with a private bedroom and bathroom. Requirements Excellent references required from current and previous employersMinimum 3 years related work experience in a Fine ResidenceStrong command of the English language both written and verbalAbility to work independently and as part of a large team; “hands on” attitudeProfessional, polished, and discreetExceptional organizational skills and attention to detailExcellent time management and organizational skillsTech savvy; Fluency in MS Office SuiteComfortable working around childrenAvailability to travel with family; including extended travelExcellent culinary skills; Raw and Vegan meal preparation a plusFlexible scheduling with availability to work overtime and weekends as neededValid driver’s license with clean driving recordUS work authorization SOCIETY STAFFING295 Madison Avenue, 14th FloorNew York NY 10017Tel: (646) 681 4780Agency DCA License #2008231Due to the volume of employment applications received, Society Staffing is unable to respond to each application individually. Applicants will be contacted directly if selected as a candidate. Please be advised that the first round of our interview process involves a direct meeting at our Manhattan offices for all positions located in the tri-state area.",Housekeeper,Full Time,"Southampton, NY",,http://jobview.monster.com/Housekeeper-Live-In-Hamptons-Palm-Beach-Fort-Lauderdale-Job-Southampton-NY-US-165298957.aspx?mescoid=3700623001001&jobPosition=13,"$50,000.00+ /yearPTO and potential for bonus",Student (High School),9557dbe6eefb3a18a8658b426e70d998
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:20:46:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale Castleton 8480 Craig Street Indianapolis, IN 46250 Job #:053565Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Prepare and cook all community meals under the direction of the Dining Services Coordinator/Manager* Ensure proper portioning, preparation and serving of foods according to standardized recipes* Adhere to all kitchen sanitation and safety standards under the direction of the Dining Services Coordinator* Follow departmental procedures, including proper storage of dishes, utensils and cooking equipmentRequired skills and qualifications:* High school diploma or GED* One year of commercial cooking in a fast-paced setting* ServSafe Certification preferred - obtain and hold any local or state required food handling/supervision/sanitation licenses and/or certifications* Working knowledge of kitchen organization, food preparation and special diets* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Cook Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46250",Healthcare Services Restaurant/Food Services Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Cook-Job-Indianapolis-IN-US-164466041.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=1,,Food Services/Hospitality,aec2b0335dd52448f2d62554953369c1
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:20:46:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Biology/Microbiology degree – In Vitro Fertilization Laboratory Assistant and Patient Consent Coordinator  Immediate opening for a Patient Consent Coordinator and Laboratory Administrative Assistant for the In Vitro Fertilization Laboratory (IVF) at Fertility Laboratories of Colorado in Lone Tree, Colorado near Sky Ridge Medical Center. Full time Monday through Fridays, one weekend per month and some holidays.   This is an entry level position with primary responsibilities to assist with obtaining patient consent forms for in vitro fertilization patients.  The secondary responsibility is providing administrative assistance in our in vitro laboratory including phone triage, data entry, procedure scheduling, and other assigned duties.   The right candidate may have an opportunity to train as an entry level embryologist after a few years of employment.  Bachelor’s Degree in biological sciences with strong laboratory experience required.  New graduates who enjoy the laboratory are welcome to apply; must be an expert in Microsoft software including Word and Excel with strong computer software skills.  Previous data entry experience preferred. Must have strong customer service/patient interaction skills.  Must have demonstrated the ability to work well with others and show extreme accuracy and attention to detail in work assignments.  Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision.  Previous experience working in a medical setting preferred. Any interested candidates should forward their resume, references and salary requirements to the email provided.",PATIENT CONSENT COORDINATOR Job in Lone Tree,Full Time,"Lone Tree, CO 80124",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/PATIENT-CONSENT-COORDINATOR-Job-Lone-Tree-CO-US-164702927.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,2ec2f3c11b0996fd959a8fcdf1a63b3c
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:20:58:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESTAURANT GENERAL MANAGER wanted in Miami, FL for an AGGRESSIVELY GROWING, innovative and upscale, high volume multi-venue concept.Qualifications:4+ years General Manager experience in a high volume, upscale casual restaurant with sales upwards of $10 million+Must be local to the area and have strong networking and connections in the communityAbility to oversee the management of multiple conceptsExperience using POS and Back Office computer systemsProven track record of successfully developing and coaching others and setting the restaurant up for successUpbeat personality and positive energyHospitality focused with a high profile in the marketMust possess strong P&L knowledge and a proven track record of positively impacting financial resultsBenefits:Industry leading salary for a General ManagerBonus potentialPaid vacationComprehensive training (must be available to go out of state for training for 6 weeks)Health/ Dental InsuranceFood discountsMuch more! Please respond to this job posting with your resume, apply directly at http://www.duganstaffing.com or fax it to 301-637-4032.If you meet the qualifications of this Restaurant Assistant Manager position, and/or any other positions we may have that fit your experience, we will contact you upon receipt of your resume to discuss the opportunity in greater detail. About Dugan Staffing, Solutions, Inc.Founded in 1997, Dugan Staffing Solutions, Inc. is a nationwide recruitment firm specializing in the placement of management professionals in both the hospitality (restaurant and hotel) and retail industries. As a designated recruiter for a variety of clients, we serve as a bridge between stable, growing companies and executives, managers, and chefs who are searching for careers/ jobs that offer opportunity for personal and professional advancement. With 19 years of industry experience as Hospitality & Restaurant Recruiters as well as Retail Talent Acquisition, an impeccable reputation and customer service that surpasses all industry standards, Dugan Staffing Solutions, Inc. takes pride in our continued success in matching management candidates with our highly respected clients as we build the bridge to provide a successful and lasting partnership.We are partners with national leading restaurants, hotels, and retail operations and our clients consist of Fortune 500 companies; large, corporate companies; franchises; and independent owners. Our hotels are internationally recognized and prestigious concepts and our restaurants range from the fine dining end of the spectrum to fast food establishments (including everything in between such as upscale casual, casual dining, and fast casual/ QSR restaurants). We provide candidates with the opportunity for exposure in the job market, as well as the opportunity to meet and interview with national brands in restaurants, hotels, and retail operations. We work with candidates in helping them land the ideal career by offering restaurant jobs, restaurant management jobs, restaurant multi-unit jobs, restaurant corporate positions, hotel jobs, retail management careers, and Human Resources positions.",Restaurant General Manager Job in Miami,Full Time,"Miami, FL",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Restaurant-General-Manager-Job-Miami-FL-US-164222004.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=20,"100,000.00 - 115,000.00 $ /yearPlus Bonus and Benefits",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),07f34c4837d790679e4eb6bc8d3f3810
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:20:59:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Nurse Liaison (LPN/RN) – Full-time or Part-time positionsSouthview Acres Health Care Center, a 241 bed long-term care, memory care and transitional care facility located in West St. Paul, MN. has the following openings: Full-time/Part-time Nurse Liaison (LPN/RN). Hours are: 9:30 A.M.- 6:00 P.M. Duties will include, but not limited to: Assisting with and monitoring meals in dining roomAssisting with the admission/discharge processCompleting treatments, ie. Blood sugarsWorking with health unit coordinator and NP’s / Dr’s to input, sign off ordersAssist with clinical monitoring programs such as restorative program, falls prevention program, weight loss prevention, infection control program, and other therapeutic programsAssist clinical managers and licensed nurses in mentoring and supervising new staffParticipate in organizational quality improvement programs We are seeking someone that is team oriented, energetic, proficient with computers, has experience with electronic medical records, and has current LPN/RN licensure in Minnesota.  We offer an environment that is compassionate, team-oriented, fast-paced, energetic and fun. We have an exceptional compensation package including a competitive salary, PTO, free parking & other attractive benefits. If interested, please send resume to: MariaC@southviewacres.com or fax to 651-451-9538  Application materials can also be found at:http://www.southviewacres.com/employment.htmlEOE/AA",Nurse Liaison (LPN/RN) – Full-time or Part-time positions Job in West Saint Paul,Full Time,"West Saint Paul, MN 55118",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Liaison-LPN-RN-%E2%80%93-Full-time-or-Part-time-positions-Job-West-Saint-Paul-MN-US-164484568.aspx?mescoid=2900502001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),74e8e74f0c0ae418a5c529cc762f3385
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:21:53:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Registered Nurse, you will: Provide admission, case management, and follow-up skilled nursing visits for home health patients.Administer on-going care and case management for each patient, provide necessary follow-up as directed by the Clinical Manager.Confer with physician in developing the initial plan of treatment based on physician's orders and initial patient assessment.  Provide hands-on care, management and evaluation of the care plan and teaching of the patient in accordance with physician orders, under Clinical Manager's supervision.  Revise plan in consultation with physician based on ongoing assessments and as required by policy/regulation.Coordinate appropriate care, encompassing various healthcare personnel (such as Physical Therapists, Occupational Therapists, Home Health Aides and external providers).Report patient care/condition/progress to patient's physician and Clinical Manager on a continuous basis. Implement patient care plan in conjunction with patient and family to assist them in achieving optimal resolution of needs/problems. Coordinate/oversee/supervise the work of Home Health Aides, Certified Home Health Aides and Personal Care Workers and provides written personal care instructions/care plan that reflect current plan of care.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Discharge patients after consultation with the physician and Clinical Manager, preparing and completing needed clinical documentation.Prepare appropriate medical documentation on all patients, including any case conferences, patient contacts, medication order changes, re-certifications, progress updates, and care plan changes.  Prepare visit/shift reports, updates/summarizes patient records, and confers with other health care disciplines in providing optimum patient care.Required SkillsQualificationsDiploma, Associate or Bachelor Degree in NursingMinimum of one year nursing experience preferredStrong med surg, ICU, ER, acute experienceHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Required ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse,  Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVA Job LocationShelbyville, Kentucky, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Home Health Registered Nurse -KAH Job in Shelbyville,,"Shelbyville, KY",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Home-Health-Registered-Nurse-KAH-Job-Shelbyville-KY-US-165011007.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=18,,,568cca5decad7d6eb03994b861f52aaa
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:21:54:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESTAURANT MANAGERNOW HIRING FOR SAN ANTONIO!ARE YOU LOOKING FOR THE HOTTEST CASUAL DINING CONCEPT IN 10 YEARS? WE HAVE IT!  AVERAGE SALES $5M, COMPLETELY FROM-SCRATCH KITCHENS, ENTREPRENEURIAL CULTURE(NOT A SINGLE CHECKLIST!), HUGE GROWTH PLANS AND FUN ENVIRONMENT!Yet again, RMS brings the hottest opportunities in the hospitality industry directly to you!Our Mission: Help you navigate the minefield of career opportunities, and put you on the path to long term success. We are conducting a search for experienced Restaurant Managers in San Antonio, TX.  Our Client is the fastest-growing Casual Dining company in the US, and will open over 300 new locations in the next few years!!!We work very closely with top leadership from companies who are hiring in the region. We specialize in QSR, Fast-Casual and Casual Dining Restaurants and if you are a leader in this niche of the industry considering a career change - contact us today for an eye-popping view of the landscape of opportunities available to you right now.PLEASE DO NOT APPLY UNLESS YOU MEET THESE NON-NEGOTIABLE CRITERIA:    At least 2 years of Back-of-House Restaurant Operations experience with a Casual Dining concept    Able to lead and inspire Team Members towards successful completion of goals    Strong math, verbal and written communication skills    Excellent communication and people skills    Strong organizational skills    Ability to lead by example using hands-on, shoulder-to-shoulder work ethic    Able to work a flexible work schedule and meet business demands, including weekends and holidays We take pride in our reputation of moving fast with top candidates. You will hear from us within 24 hours if your experience is in line with the expectations of these searches. Apply today for IMMEDIATE and CONFIDENTIAL consideration. There are NO FEES for you and CONFIDENTIALITY is ASSURED!",Restaurant Manager- BOH Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Restaurant-Manager-BOH-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-164304143.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=2,"40,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),cd4775b09986a3cdc90310ce0961f3ab
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:22:22:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Delivers patients’ meal trays and food items in assigned areas according to established procedures, quality standards, sanitary food service practices, and universal precautions. Greets patients in a courteous and professional manner and offers assistance with meal trays according to established procedures. Communicates relevant information in a responsive manner to personnel in other departments to ensure quality patient care. Identifies patients correctly by checking bed/wrist identification against the name written on the patients’ menu. Maintains floor stock inventories, as assigned, and restocks cart daily. Maintains sanitation of floor supplies stock cart. Makes recommendations for nourishments to clinical staff. Cleans patient rooms daily and provides trash removal. Offers refills on hot beverages and substitutions or corrections on meal trays (according to menu). Adheres to all Aramark appearance standards and maintains a professional dress at all times while working. Reports any problems found during meal service to dietitian or zone manager and takes corrective action to resolve any issues as they arise. Qualifications   High School Degree or GED preferred. Current student considered. Previous experience in food service or related field is preferred. Must be able to read and write to facilitate proper communication with others. Mathematical ability required. Must be able to perform simple mathematical calculations.   Additional Information:",Host/Hostess - University Health Shreveport - Food Job in Monroe,"Full Time, Employee","Monroe, LA 71202",,http://jobview.monster.com/Host-Hostess-University-Health-Shreveport-Food-Job-Monroe-LA-US-164810047.aspx?mescoid=3500618001001&jobPosition=17,,Food Services/Hospitality,99d575cc43debe6f2a5a938e067993a4
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:22:58:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  The purpose of this job is to help ensure guest satisfaction by maintaining all dishes, pots, pans, silverware, glasses, equipment, and kitchen utensils in a clean and sanitized condition.  In addition, this job requires that the employee keep the dishwashing machine station, three compartment sink, and related areas clean.   Tasks & Responsibilities: Able to follow directions Work in an environment that at times can be hot and humid Maintain a neat and orderly work station Know and comply with all company policies and procedures regarding safety, security, emergencies and energy Report to work on time and in complete uniform Other duties as assigned Qualifications   Understanding of basic kitchen sanitation Must be able to perform repetitive tasks and stand for extended periods of time Additional Information:",General Utility Worker - Vonage Job in Holmdel,"Full Time, Employee","Holmdel, NJ 07733",,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Utility-Worker-Vonage-Job-Holmdel-NJ-US-164866364.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=13,,Food Services/Hospitality,d0a63b30f7ab7eeccbdfa470aa29ff02
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:22:58:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"ECMStaffing,Inc is currently hiring for an Operating Room RN in Auburn, Washington.  This assignment offers $75/hr with a $2000 completion bonus.Here are a few of the details:Amazing team work between nurses, techs & docs with committed & approachable anesthesiologists.  Best pot lucks you will ever see!One Nights (will accept 12 hr)One 12 hr 10a-10:3opWA license, BLS, OR expThis contract will fill soon, so please do not hesitate!Emerald City Medical Staffing offers excellent pay rates, medical benefits, referral and sign-on bonuses.  If you are looking to secure an assignment please contact Micah or Jennifer today at (877) 475-0695.Visit or apply online at www.emeraldcitymedicalstaffing.com",Registered Nurse (RN) Job in Auburn,Full Time,"Auburn, WA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Job-Auburn-WA-US-163276088.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=11,$75/HR with Bonus,Experienced (Non-Manager),d9df274be9635fc74da2c18973c265ea
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:22:58:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"CUSTOMER SERVICE ASSOCIATESExperienced Sandwich Makers - Prep Associates - Cashiers - Salad Makers PRODUCTION ASSOCIATESLine Cooks - Kitchen Help7030 Amador Plaza RoadDublin, CA 94568Customer Service Associate Opportunities Our customer associates know what our customer wants and deliver it -- fast, accurate and with friendly service. We hear and sense customer needs and keep our manager and fellow team members informed. We take pride in every aspect of our work and perform it with energy and enthusiasm. We are strong team players, with a commitment to continuous learning, who provide quality service and products to our customers through true craftsmanship. Production Associates: • Prepare menu items in a fast and accurate manner • Contribute to a positive team-work environment • Are committed to providing quality service • Enjoys working behind the scenes • Understands the value of providing true craftsmanshipFor immediate consideration, please apply online today at PaneraBread.jobs!We offer our teams a place where we take care of you, your family and your community!Flexibility in your work schedule Variety of health and related benefits* A rewarding place to work that gives back to all Wholesome food Paid vacation KinderCare tuition discounts Family tuition discounts with College for America Discounted meals during your shift Work experience, resume builderAdvancement opportunities*Some restrictions apply.Job Requirements: Some food service or retail experience preferredMinimum age -- 16 years of age for Customer Service Associates, 18 for Production Associates and QCMust understand and practice basic food safetyEOE",Customer Service Associates - Line Cook,Full Time Employee,"Dublin, CA 94568",RetailRestaurant/Food ServicesFood and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Customer-Service-Associates-Line-Cook-Cashier-Prep-Part-time-Full-time-Job-Dublin-CA-US-164697732.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=5,,Food Services/Hospitality,9b88aff8ec635c08fab1fcb6c7a54934
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:22:58:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB PURPOSE:   The purpose of this position is to serve as a liaison between the corporate office and corporate restaurants to ensure consistency and to help drive results through the implementation of new business programs and development. This position will oversee the Midwest marketsCORE JOB FUNCTIONS/RESPONSIBILITIES: ·         Responsible for the design and implementation of results-oriented programs and processes that are aligned with operations initiatives·         Oversee the successful implementation and execution of the Guest Experience Business Model·         Develops and makes recommendations for strategic goal planning·         Sets budgets and ensures that they are appropriately managed·         Works closely with marketing on promotional calendars to ensure alignment and continuity across the market·         Train and develop management in market for increased leadership scope and responsibilities ·         Participates in and makes recommendations regarding real estate and market reviews ·         Owns the business analysis for own market·         Helps identify objectives and systems to improve consistency and synergy throughout our restaurants·         Assesses and customizes new products and services that utilize system-wide technologies·         Generate and facilitate performance reviews with direct reports, oversight of all reviews in market ·         Directs new business development initiatives ensuring on track and timely completion of projects·         Consults with the operations team and other departments regularly on program and project feedback·         Supervises the production and implementation of all internally and externally produced operations systems and services·         Analyzes, reports and communicates key data involving new and existing restaurants·         Supports Operations in all other areas as directed by the DVP MAGNITUDE/SCOPE:  Knowledge/Skills: ·         Skills to communicate performance improvement through a working knowledge of industry standards and techniques to effectively increase company store sales and profits·         Clear written and verbal communication skills·         Skill in time management and organization with excellent attention to detail·         Ability to partner with and influence Team Members within the restaurant, as well as external to the restaurant (Home Office partners, vendors, Guests, and the community)·         Strategic thinker·         Analytical skills associated with strong P&L management·         Proven track record in building high-performing teams·         Proven ability to grow a services business ·         Ability to transfer strategic concepts knowledge to others·         Demonstrates a passion and commitment to success and brand loyalty·         Champions and leads change·         Strong decision making abilities·         Skills to source, attract, select and retain top talent within and outside of Buffalo Wild Wings Freedom to Act: ·         Operates with integrity and lives the Buffalo Wild Wings values·         Creates and maintains an open door policy with Managers and Team Members inspiring open and honest communication, consistency of standards and appreciation for contributions and suggestions  Size and Complexity: ·         Ability to lead and influence market to achieve results in a manner that is a positive influence on the Buffalo Wild Wings brand Interaction: ·         Abilities in project management and strategic planning to working with teams to take ideas from concept to implementation·         Ability to handle confidential information with the utmost level of professionalism ·         Builds relationships with Team Members at all levels in the organizationEDUCATION/EXPERIENCE  Required·         Bachelor’s degree or 10+ years of relevant industry experience·         5+ years multi-unit experience·         Ability and willingness to travel up to 75%·         Valid driver’s license ·         Ability to successfully complete a criminal background checkPreferred·         Bachelor’s degreeBuffalo Wild Wings specific experienceRequirements: https://rn11.ultipro.com/buf1003/jobboard/NewCandidateExt.aspx?__JobID=7478&__jbsrc=3DC059B2-B301-405E-B59C-E10B25ABA92D",Director of Operations Job in Midwest Region (Wi / Ks),,"Midwest Region (Wi / Ks), KS 64112",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Operations-Job-Midwest-Region-WI-KS-KS-US-164790404.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=10,,Food Services/Hospitality,431bfe8e85e4188c3e2a5e801c1022c0
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:23:53:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is currently seeking a Nurse Practitioner in the Fremont, CA area! All candidates must have the following:Qualifications & Requirements:Current and Active NP License Occupational Health experience Knowledge of workplace health and safety concepts and OSHA regulationsCare Type: Acute-Episodic Care Schedule: Tuesdays & Wednesdays (8am-4pm)If interested, please send your most UP TO DATE resume to Samantha at Sadames@judge.com or contact my direct line at 610-617-1483.Thank you!Samantha Adames",Nurse Practitioner Job in Fremont,"Full Time, Employee","Fremont, CA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Practitioner-Job-Fremont-CA-US-164947850.aspx?mescoid=2900505001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,d9bc813b8f0ab2e9bacf482c81f3d6b9
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:00:19:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Administrative Assistant Position Features:? Full Benefits? Close To Public TransportationTerrific opportunity for a professional individual ready to move ahead in a great career. As a administrative assistant for this growing, stable Business Services - Other company, you will be responsible for data entry, manage edit documents and support management. Experience dependable, team player and attention to detail or similar a big plus. Top compensation and a rewarding work environment that offers full benefits, close to public transportation. Apply for this great position as a administrative assistant today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1076060 Job Experience:,, Microsoft Office, Typing (40 wpm)Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - Full Benefits Job in Concord,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Concord, CA 94521",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-full-benefits-job-concord-ca-us-172921129.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),997a764e7be113fc1f20bd44c649ee0c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:00:21:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"LOCATION: Madison JOB TYPE: Temporary - Full Time SHIFT: First Shift JOB ID: 88615 PAY: $14.00 PROFESSION: Office DATE POSTED: 9/27/2016 Summary: Great opportunity to make some extra money and not be tied to one position! A local school district is looking for Receptionists / Office Assistants to join an on-call pool for same day work for the upcoming school year. Our client calls us right away in the morning to let us know which schools are in need of help that day. We call people in the pool to work that day and calls may happen as early as 6am for reporting between 7:30am - 8:00am; some may come in a bit later. Many weeks we get calls every day, but you can decide which day or days work for you. You are not obligated to take shifts if you are unable. We'll just call you the next time! If you are open to short term work, are available on short notice and enjoy assisting others, this job is a great match for you. Pay is $14.00 per hour. Responsibilities: Answer phones Assist with attendance Complete data entry, filing, copying and other administrative duties as needed Assist with mailings Assist with various projects as assigned Qualifications: Ability to answer a call for work between 6:30AM - 7:00AM and typically available to work the same day Previous reception or customer services experience Typing speed of 30-40 words per minute Comfortable performing basic tasks on a computer M2 Reference Code: MMAS-88615CB",Receptionist Job in Madison,"Full Time, Employee","Madison, WI",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-job-madison-wi-us-172939868.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=14,,Administrative/Clerical,19d6588cdc00688acc75c7580865608a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:00:24:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Customer Service Rep – Nashville, TN – Contract to Possible HireCompany Profile:Our client is a well-established intermodal transportation company with offices nation-wide. This company continues to be leader in their industry and has been in business for over 35 years. Our client handles freight transportation utilizing rail logistics to capitalize on the advantages of rail transportation. Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits:The company offers traditional benefits including: Health, Dental, and Vision insurancePaid Time Off (PTO) Paid holidays Customer Service Rep Position:The Customer Service Rep will handle a variety of responsibilities involving customer support, logistics, shipping, and administrative support. Daily duties will include:•    Answer phone calls from customers•    Order entry for customer shipments •    Process and confirm orders including customer follow up•    Maintain organization of shipments including filing and scanning documents •    Communicate with various departments regarding customer orders/shipments•    Track work orders and shipments •    Verify and confirm customer information for billing and shipments•    Assist with review and process of invoicing for billing purposesThe Customer Service Rep will take on additional responsibilities relating to shipping and logistics. Someone with a trucking or logistics background would be helpful. Background Profile: 1-2+ years of related experienceBilingual in Spanish and English would be helpful, not requiredHS DiplomaTrucking or logistics industry preferredMS Office proficiency including Word, Excel, and Outlook Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/the-woodlands.html and https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/accounting-finance.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). ",Customer Service Rep Job in Nashville,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Nashville, TN","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-rep-job-nashville-tn-us-172808088.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=4,,Administrative/Clerical,116e97e8c0380fe25bf8330efff6a620
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:01:05:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  695190Job SummaryPlans and implements strategic communications programs for business or enterprise initiatives. Provides counsel and advice regarding communications plans, strategies and/or tactics to support business and enterprise objectives and priorities. Manages multiple relationships and communications channels to ensure products, services and/or business initiatives are effectively positioned with internal and/or external audiences.Job OverviewDevelops, maintains, and implements complex communications programs/plans that identify key messages, target audiences, and intended outcomes. Assesses program or plan effectiveness.Works closely with multiple stakeholders and business partners to integrate and align deliverables with communications plans and programs. Resolves issues and navigates obstacles to deliver work product.Writes, edits, produces, and distributes development of appropriately styled communications. May coordinate necessary approvals and/or produce and deliver critical messages for senior leaders.Leverages technical and business knowledge proficiency to provide communications guidance to clients and business partners.Contributes to the development of effective public relations campaigns and programs. May conduct media interviews or act as a company spokesperson (for enterprise communications only).EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Communications Partner Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/communications-partner-job-san-antonio-tx-us-172603549.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),801668fd9725aa82348d6879350870d5
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:01:59:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"NRT LLC, a subsidiary of Realogy, operates all company-owned real estate offices under Realogy’s world-renowned brands of Coldwell Banker®, Coldwell Banker Commercial®, Sotheby’s International Realty® and ZipRealty®, as well as the powerful regional brands, The Corcoran Group® and Citi Habitats®. As the nation’s largest residential real estate brokerage firm, NRT owns and operates companies in more than 50 of the 100 largest metropolitan areas in the United States, with approximately 790 offices, 46,400 affiliated sales associates and 5,300 employees. Responsibilities Coldwell Banker Residential Brokerage has an immediate need for an Office Coordinator to work at our Petaluma Office located on First St.  This position maintains the front desk switchboard and provides administrative support to the office.  The schedule for this position is Monday-Friday from 9:00-5:30, 40 hours a week.  Job responsibilities will include assisting sales associates with administrative needs, processing & maintaining listings, entering listings, sales and closings into document management system, filing and checking paperwork, sending requests for W9’s, setting up offices listing & sales files, compiling information to make duty calendar, accounts payable, lockboxes and maintaining office equipment and inventory, back up person for ads, flyers, etc. (general marketing), processing mail and other administrative duties as assigned.  Familiarity with the use of general office equipment such as email, fax, scanners, copiers, printers and phones required.  This position requires a high level of customer service ability. Basic Skills/Qualifications: Requirements include: HS diploma or equivalent, prior Real Estate office experience helpful, minimum of one year experience as a receptionist or administrative assistant, minimum of one year experience demonstrating accurate data entry, minimum of one year experience utilizing MS Word, Excel, Outlook and the Internet, minimum one year general administrative experience, desire to promote Best Practices, ability to handle multiple tasks and coordinate various assignments while maintaining poise and excellent customer service, ability to be proactive and work independently, strong organizational, time management and communication skills. To Apply  To be considered an applicant for this position you must show how you meet the basic qualifications of the job in a resume or document you upload.  Please do not contact the office directly to apply. 33897  NRT LLC, a subsidiary of Realogy Holdings Corp, is committed to providing equal employment opportunity (“EEO”) and will make employment decisions without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, citizenship, age, sex, gender, sexual orientation, sexual preference, gender identity or gender expression, veteran status, marital status, disability, or any other characteristic protected under applicable laws and regulations. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable laws and regulations.  Under the Americans with Disabilities Act and other applicable laws Realogy will provide reasonable accommodation to disabled applicants upon request during the application process to ensure equal opportunities to be considered for employment. NRT LLC will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with the requirements of the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.  ",Office Coordinator Job in Petaluma,Full Time Employee,"Petaluma, CA 94952",,http://jobview.monster.com/office-coordinator-job-petaluma-ca-us-172994749.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=4,,Administrative/Clerical,c2e5d4aaf6d0c4eb48b9bf600f545bfb
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:02:00:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:an administrative assistant that 1. Greets visitors and customers and directs them accordingly. Prepares letters, memos, and reports as required.3. Maintains departmental logs and final reports. 4. Orders office supplies. Please apply to this position. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074603 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - Job in El Monte,Temporary/Contract/Project,"El Monte, CA 91731",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-el-monte-ca-us-172603945.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),850a04d9fa7d899348ef54804d61d83b
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:02:53:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Local AG Company is in need of an Administrative Assistant. Position features ? Benefits ? Growth ? Exciting and warm environment. This a great opportunity for an individual seeking a challenging but rewarding position that offers benefits, growth, and an exciting work environment. Being detail-oriented, organized and driven will be keys to success in this growing, dynamic organization. Will be responsible for ensuring prompt and accurate compliance with all applicable offerings and compliance policies and practices, coordinating and documenting and insuring proper interpretation to the employee`s of any and all policy options, and directly supporting the department manager. An ideal candidate will have worked in an administrative support role for at least 2 years and is comfortable multi-tasking and interfacing with all levels of personnel. Bilingual in Spanish will be a huge plus. Apply for this great position today! Please send your resume to David Allen We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=904964 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - Agriculture Job in Bakersfield,Full Time Employee,"Bakersfield, CA 93308",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-agriculture-job-bakersfield-ca-us-172751541.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9ee7bedca8178d5cfd0f5ab019e42d09
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:03:09:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Development Assistant Northwest Harvest - Seattle, WA 98102 Posted: 9/26/2016 - Expires: 10/7/2016 Job ID: 172850549",Development Assistant Job in Seattle,Job Type Part Time Employee,"Seattle, WA 98102",,http://jobview.monster.com/development-assistant-job-seattle-wa-us-172850549.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=5,,Career Level Experienced (Non-Manager),676a3a9651e74af56f38fa5f129d5f52
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:03:10:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Customer Service RepresentativeThe Tribune-Democrat, the region' s largest daily newspaper, is hiring a Customer Service Representative for our Classified Department. Our Customer Service Representatives are the very face of The Tribune-Democrat, and their performance has a huge impact on our performance and customer perceptions. The ideal candidate will be computer literate, must be able to multi-task and have a positive, pleasant attitude along with some telephone sales experience preferred. Customer Service Responsibilities Include:-Providing service to our customers and educating them on products and services provided by The Tribune-Democrat.-Classified Pagination in Quark-Handling payment transactions-Cash register & payment transactions -Input ads into Classified system, plus outbound calls.-Use of Postage Meter for outgoing mailJob Requirements:-An Associate' s Degree in marketing, communications or business is required. Entry level job seekers with a proven track record are encouraged to apply.Pay and Benefits:The Tribune-Democrat offers: -Hourly wage & Paid Holidays -Accrued time off /Ongoing training -Advancement opportunities Apply today to:Betsy Konar, Classified Supervisor bkonar@tribdem.com Include resume and cover letter.Before September 30, 2016.This job listing brought to you by The Johnstown Tribune Democrat Report","Tribune Democrat Job Application for Customer Service Representative | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Phone 8145325101 Address 425 Locust StJOHNSTOWN, PA 15907",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-johnstown-pa-us-172673796.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,,,61dc6ba7438be51c40603ec0b8d13b6f
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:04:25:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Processing Specialist handle insurance documents on behalf of our financial institution clients, directly impacting the timeliness and accuracy of the homeowner's property insurance coverage. This role requires proven ability to manage deadlines and meet quality standards with accuracy and consistent attention to detail. It also requires the use of good judgment to solve problems and make business-appropriate decisions consistent with Assurant procedures and best practices.Processing Specialist is responsible for:■Process documents in an accurate and timely manner to ensure proper insurance coverage for homeowners and client satisfaction goals.■Identify policy type and determine appropriate action needed. For example: PUD, Townhome, Flood, Wind, etc.■Make appropriate updates to client database in order to meet regulatory obligations.■Make timely premium payments from established escrow accounts to ensure continuous coverage.■Manage time to handle multiple demands and competing priorities.■Meet deadlines and quality standards■Communicate and coordinate with insurance agents and/or insurance carriers to verify information, update status, and meet deadlines/requirements.■Be professional in all communications, act in a manner consistent with Assurant values and honor Assurant's commitments.■Demonstrate empathy regarding your work and the impact it has on the Client and homeowner.■Address any questions, concerns, or suggestions in a timely and appropriate manner.■Build and maintain effective internal working relationships and support teamwork in meeting company goals.■Understand how the Processing Specialist role fits into the larger organizational context and ensure the smooth handoff of work (incoming and outgoing).■Communicate status updates and appropriately escalate issues and opportunities to meet the needs of clients and homeowners.",Processing Specialist - Full Time Job in Springfield,Full Time Employee,"Springfield, OH 45505",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/processing-specialist-full-time-job-springfield-oh-us-172855392.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=12,,Administrative/Clerical,be42b2d43382b27a89a623918dfd4a33
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:04:26:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Terrific opportunity for a professional individual ready to move ahead in a great career. As a sales support/admin to $60k for this dynamic, stable sales organization, you will be responsible for putting proposals together, doing presentations, sales support, traffic management, report generation, and basic admin duties. Experience great excel skills, professional image and stable work history or similar a big plus. Top compensation and a rewarding work environment that offers a great environment, free coffee and fantastic career growth. Apply for this great position as a sales support/admin to $60k today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075397 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Admin/Sales Support to $K - Great Environment Job in Bellevue,Full Time Employee,"Bellevue, WA 98004",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/admin-sales-support-to-60k-great-environment-job-bellevue-wa-us-172751479.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f413dfc7659199c7e195837bb077fafa
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:04:28:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:We work with a well-known title company that has an immediate opening for 10 Escrow Assistants.Hourly rate: $19-22hr (based on experience)Duties: The position will provide PreC-losing and Closing support to the Contract Closing team. Must have prior industry experience and knowledge of how to properly prepare the initial and final CD. Familiarity and experience with the TRID changes that went into effect in October 2015. Provides superior customer service to all clients Answers/places calls in order to gather necessary information for scheduled closings Makes analytical decisions and appropriately documents findings Ability to accurately perform all job duties in a multi-task, fast paced environment Results driven and works with a sense of urgency while delivering quality, error-free work Strong computer skillsProcess/prepare Settlement StatementsProcess Funding ConditionsPrepare loan docs for executionReview and package docsBalancing; Handling of Funds for Escrow ClosingsPre-closing maintenanceKnowledge of full closing and escrow processSkills: Prior mortgage or escrow support experience, 1-2 years as an Escrow processing assistant or 3 years in a related field Education: High School diploma or equivalent # of Positions: 10Contact Angela at the Orange office of AppleOne for immediate consideration! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075849 Job Experience:,, Escrow, TRID, HUDYears of Experience Required:",Escrow Assistants needed in Santa Ana,Full Time Employee,"Santa Ana, CA 92705",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/10-escrow-assistants-needed-in-santa-ana-up-to-22hr-job-santa-ana-ca-us-172849894.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),aadc341f5c86fe9a65529fa545815e8d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:04:33:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Are you known as a hard working person that is driven and bright? Do you demonstrate the personality traits of someone who is consistently on top of their work load and always striving to help others? Being in an administrative position, you are in charge of keeping the office running while supporting the efforts of an executive, managers, or professionals in the work place. These qualities will help you get your foot in the door with a respected company that wants to see their employees grow in their career path. Our client is looking for a candidate with the following skills and responsibilities:? Working knowledge of Microsoft Office programs? Ability to handle multiple tasks and to prioritize ? Excellent communication skills (written and verbal)? Strong attention to detail and ability to maintain a high level of accuracy ? Motivated candidates that are passionate about growth opportunities within the companyIf you picture yourself working for an organization that wants to help you work hard but also will provide you opportunities to grow, please apply today by sending your resume in a Word document. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074487 Job Experience:,, Front Desk, Clerical, Administration, Assistant, Call CenterYears of Experience Required:",Administration Assistant Job in Broomfield,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Broomfield, CO 80020",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administration-assistant-job-broomfield-co-us-172601534.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),07a095b3a482734a9cabf2f481ce6bad
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:05:13:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Receptionist in San Francisco, CA Would you enjoy working for dynamic healthcare institute? Are you looking for advanced career growth and networking opportunities? Do you have excellent customer service and front desk experience? If so, then we have the job for you! A top tier healthcare services company is hiring an immediate full-time Receptionist to join a professional team. This short-term contract offers public transportation options and a dynamic work life. Qualified candidates should submit a resume for immediate consideration.   Job Responsibilities: Work closely with sales department and support workflow Responsible for calendar coordination and detailed data entry management Assist with reporting and sales projects    Qualifications: Minimum one year relevant experience  Must be Proficient in Microsoft Excel and Outlook  Please apply below and submit your resume to Ashley at ashley.wright@ajilon.com with “Receptionist” in the subject line. For more opportunities, visit Ajilon Professional Staffing‘s website at www.ajilon.com    ",Receptionist in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94105",,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-172667637.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=1,,Administrative/Clerical,ae05ed5a93e9118122df8db9c68098c1
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:05:25:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are sourcing for a dynamic Executive Assistant who functions in an efficient, detail-oriented, and proactive manner.The candidate should be extremely motivated, resourceful, organized, communicative, able to complete tasks independently with strong attention to detail.Client DetailsMy client is a British multinational banking and financial services company headquartered in London. It is a universal bank with operations in retail, wholesale and investment banking, as well as wealth management, mortgage lending and credit cards. It has operations in over 50 countries and territories and has around 48 million customers.Description* Responsible for calendar management, anticipate necessary background material, and other items required for each activity on the schedule. Maintain and coordinate calendars, schedule meetings, ensure managers arrive to meetings on time. * Work closely with personal assistants and residential support staff, including daily transportation arrangements. * Answer phones, coordinate conference rooms, meal arrangements, and AV support for global marketing meetings and town halls. * Handle travel planning including airline reservations, hotel accommodations, car rental reservations, car service arrangements and driving directions as needed. * Process and track expense reports and reimbursements. * Produce letters, memoranda, presentations, reports, etc. as necessary; proofread documents for appropriate grammar, punctuation and spelling. * Perform ad hoc projects as needed.Profile* Ability to read, review, prioritize and respond to emails with minimal direction * Strong analytical, interpersonal and communication skills. * Excellent phone manner and management is a must. * College degree preferred or equivalent experience. * Minimum five years of corporate administrative experience in roles that interfaced with external clients and executive management. * Previous experience managing a team or office strongly preferred. * Must have superior skills in MS Word, Excel, Outlook and proficient knowledge in PowerPoint. * Excellent organizational skills; detail oriented. * Strong time management skills; ability to handle multiple concurrent assignments, with a high degree of accuracy, and meet deadlines in a high pressure environment. * High energy level.Job Offer* Competitive pay * OT eligible",Executive Assistant - Financial Services Job in Menlo Park,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Menlo Park, CA 94025",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-assistant-financial-services-job-menlo-park-ca-us-172733272.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=1,,Administrative/Clerical,ed8808a4d1b4b4b7374452663195dd76
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:05:27:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Join the industry leader!  KAG is North America’s largest independent fuels delivery and bulk liquids carrier. At KAG, we pride ourselves on providing the safest and highest quality service to our customers by delivering every load on time, without incident. If you want to contribute to KAG’s excellent tradition of innovation and leadership in the logistics and transportation industry, we invite you to apply! Start helping us achieve Our Vision of revolutionizing transportation and logistics within the liquid bulk industry through our national scale, advanced technology and an uncompromising commitment to be the employer of choice. Benefits of Partnering with KAG include: Flexible daytime schedule with no weekends Benefits package for fulltime employees including health, vision, and dental insurance 401(k) retirement plan with company match On-site gym, cafeteria, and café Team Members in our Billing Department: Utilize multiple software applications to create electronic invoices; verify information according to billing guidelines established for each customer. Communicate regularly with terminal staff, drivers, and internal and external customers to solve problems, obtain missing paperwork/information, verify information, and escalate issues. Identify errors or issues with invoices based on obtained knowledge of billing guidelines. Investigate issues to determine root cause and consult with management to determine a solution. Monitor and generate ad hoc system generated billing reports regularly Job Requirements:Potential Team Members should have: High school diploma or equivalent; some post-secondary education preferred Working knowledge of Microsoft Office, specifically Excel, Word and Outlook Strong interpersonal skills; ability to communicate effectively 10-key data entry experience Ability to meet deadlines in a fast paced environment Must be able to multi-task Basic familiarity with accounts payable and accounting processes preferred Please plan on 10-15 minutes to complete the application process on our company career page. Kenan Advantage Group, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. No person will be discriminated against in any aspect of their employment on the basis of any status or characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.",Entry Level Office: Billing Job in North Canton,Full Time Employee,"North Canton, OH 44720",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-office-billing-job-north-canton-oh-us-172056795.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=13,,Administrative/Clerical,9f18e8392ce6d1f5e35744943684afda
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:06:22:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Administrative Assistant Position Features:? Room For Growth? Tenured Employees? Ongoing Training Programs ? Great Pay up to $50KImmediate need for an Administrative Assistant seeking room for growth, tenured employees and ongoing training programs. Bachelors degree, proficiency with Microsoft Office and 2-3+ years of administrative experience will be keys to success in this prestigious organization. In this role, you will be responsible for supporting tax managers, working closely with the tax coordinators, maintaining company logs to ensure compliance, data entry, preparing documents/presentations for meetings, preparing tax files and e-filing documents for Financial Services company. Great benefits. Apply for this great position as a administrative assistant today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1076007 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant Job in Mountain View,Full Time Employee,"Mountain View, CA 94043",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-mountain-view-ca-us-172921162.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8517c3faa80751d12d274624a3ba4aa7
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:06:24:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our well establish financial organization is currently in need of an Office Manager!Salary: Up to 65K DOEHours: Full Time - Monday-Friday/ 8:00AM-5:00PMBenefits: Fortune 500 Benefits Package!!! Job Duties Include: ? Administrative duties ? Tenant relations? Lease administration? Maintain property databases and produce reports? Coordinate property maintenance ? Read and understand complex lease and contract terms and make recommendations? Handle sensitive and confidential information Qualified candidate must possess:? A minimum of 5+ years? experience in property management or commercial real estate environment? 5+ years of recent Office Management experience ? Personality will be a KEY component to this positionKey Competencies? Basic Accounts Payable, Basic Accounts Receivable, Intermediate MS Excel.? Keen sense of accuracy and attention to detailWe are moving quickly on this position! Don't wait and apply with your resume today!!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:Bilingual in Mandarin Chinese is a HUGE plus!!!Years of Experience Required:",Office Manager - Canoga Park Job in Canoga Park,Full Time Employee,"Canoga Park, CA 91304",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-canoga-park-job-canoga-park-ca-us-172656392.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d0939e857da68a4a776515f8dfe765fd
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:07:03:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Marketing Administrative Services Coordinator needed to work in Pasadena on a temporary basis ASAP. Provide support to the Digital Media & Marketing Specialist (as assigned) in planning, managing, and monitoring Marketing projects & Recruitment events. Assists in coordinating and preparation of marketing & communication materials. Assists in planning and execution of all Recruitment Events for the department. Assists in implementation of marketing and communication projects. Participates in the development and execution of organization initiatives May participate in special projects, process improvement initiatives, etc. Performs other related administrative duties as required. Qualifications: Bachelor's Degree or four (4) years of equivalent work experience in Marketing, Communications, or other related field. Knowledge of media and communication vehicles preferred. Knowledgeable of marketing trends preferred Excellent verbal communication, writing and editing skills required. Able to link organization objectives to communication planning. Ability to multi-task, planning and prioritizing a large volume of work in accordance with changing deadlines. For immediate consideration, please send your resume as an MS doc and place a follow up call to VIVIAN We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1076038 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Marketing Administrative Assistant - needed ASAP in Pasadena Job in Pasadena,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Pasadena, CA 91101",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-administrative-assistant-needed-asap-in-pasadena-job-pasadena-ca-us-172921168.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6871392fa5dc1c88b8c317dbd97cf7bd
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:07:04:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Convenience Clerk (Part Time) - Howland GetGo Job in Warren,Full Time Employee,"Warren, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convenience-clerk-part-time-howland-getgo-job-warren-oh-us-173003841.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=1,,Administrative/Clerical,94a5e414260b7f224bf1feb580f3c18c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:07:52:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"DTI is the nationâ€™s largest independent provider of e-discovery, managed document review, facilities management and knowledge process outsourcing. DTI serves the nationâ€™s leading law firms and Fortune 500 corporations through its 26 highly secure service centers located in major cities across the United States. We believe that we have achieved this success by providing our customers the highest level of quality and service. This reputation for quality and performance rests 100% on the efforts of our employees. In order to continue our growth and success, we must constantly look to add high-caliber individuals to our team. If you have a â€œcan doâ€ attitude, together with a â€œclient firstâ€ set of priorities, we guarantee that we have an opportunity for you. Position Description:DTI Global, LLC provides management solutions for Law Firms all over the world- including but not limited to: Data Management, Court Reporting, Accounting and IT Support, and On-Site Legal Administrative Support.This is a full-time, permanent position in a Law Firm. This person is the first line of contact with the client's visitors, and therefore needs to have a great personality, along with the ability to function with a high level of patience, tact, and diplomacy in handling any complaints and situations.Responsibilities:Answer and direct telephone calls, take messagesCopying/print/scan/fax, etc.Greet guests and clientsInteract professionally with C-Level executives, attorneys, and other employees of the Law Firm and DTIMail: sorting, distributing, loading/unloading parcels, delivering of parcelsMonitor and listen to clients to understand inquiries and requests Provide accurate information about the facilities and services with prompt assistanceAccurate tracking, monitoring and recording of charges, overtime, logs and entries Work closely with the client's staff to ensure seamless day-to-day serviceMaintain neatness and organization of reception desk and front closet areas with various administrative duties as outlined by the Site ManagerQualifications:Minimum 1 year of previous Reception experienceExcellent Customer Service SkillsHas handled and completed law firm administrative dutiesPrevious experience performing invoice verificationsHas completed car service requests Has handled catering OrdersWillingness and ability to learn new skillsFlexibility in dealing with simultaneous projectsAttention to detailAbility to lift or move 40 lbs. or greater Qualifications:.",Receptionist /  Job in Redwood City,"Full Time, Employee","Redwood City, CA 94065",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-1863-job-redwood-city-ca-us-172678155.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=7,,Administrative/Clerical,efbf02e5d29c13aab2e37497475a7caf
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:08:01:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business Office ManagerOur client in Hermitage, TN is seeking a Business Office Manager to join their team on a Direct Hire basis. Company Profile:Our client is a medical practice that has been in business over 17 years.  They are ingrained in the medical community in the area and boast physicians across multiple specialties, a walk-in clinic, on-site testing, and various additions to be as convenient as possible for their patients. Features and Benefits:The company offers excellent benefits such as: Medical coverage – multiple plans from which to choose Vision & Dental coverage Health Savings Account (HSA) Company paid Life, Short-Term, and Long-term insurance Supplemental benefits are available at employee’s expense Paid time off (PTO) Vacation/Sick time Business Office Manager Role:The Business Office Manager is a critical role whose primary responsibility is oversight of Front Desk, Scheduling, and Billing operations for the practice and maximizing collections for services rendered to patients.   Daily duties would cover a wide range including:• Supervision of approximately 10-14 employees• Ensure business office compliance with all company policies • Enter daily deposits into system • Supervision of all ACH and portal system payments • Stays current on all applicable coding and maintains CPS billing file for effective billing• Oversight of patient collections process, policy, and procedure• Supervision of all front desk and cashier functions • Maintenance of all insurance company contracts and schedules and communication with insurance companies to regarding any and all changes to such • Staff evaluation, training, and development; including the interviewing and hiring of new staff The Business Office Manager role has a direct impact on the productivity of the office.  This requires someone who is capable of managing a variety of personalities and being an example to their team of professionalism, customer service, and competency.  Expertise with Primary Care billing is an essential part of this position as well. Business Office Manager Background Profile:5+ years of experience as a Business Office Manager or similar role Degree is preferred but will consider direct experience in lieu of education Expertise with Primary Care billing Comfortable working in a fast-paced environment Excellent communication and organizational skills Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/nashville.html and https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html or https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/nurse-staffing.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Business Office Manager Job in Hermitage,"Full Time, Employee","Hermitage, TN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-office-manager-job-hermitage-tn-us-172808282.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=3,,Administrative/Clerical,0f2bb0cbada6321fdb89ff6446d9294c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:08:02:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well known company is looking to hire a Jr. Administrative Assistant/Office Coordinator. Duties:Will program telephones, screen and direct a high-volume number of calls; greet persons entering the office; provide general administrative and clerical support; prepare letters and documents; and receive and sort mail and deliveries. Orders and maintains coffee and office supplies. Successfully operates a variety of standard office machines, including a personal computer and a variety of computer applications, phone, fax, and shredding and photocopy machines. You will assist with special events with the back end administrative duties such as scheduling, ordering materials, processing invoices and helping with the set up for the events. Skills The candidate must have excellent computer/typing, verbal and interpersonal skills and be detail oriented, able to multi-task, work independently in a fast-paced environment, plan meetings, and be available to work overtime as needed. Must be punctual and dependable. Professional, motivated, energetic.Requirements: Must be proficient with PC and/or MAC. Must have knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel and Outlook. Knowledge of PowerPoint and Adobe Programs a plus! Education: High School Diploma or equivalent. Associates degree or Bachelors preferred. Apply for this great position as a Jr. Administrative Assistant/Office Coordinator today! Email resume as a Microsoft word attachment to Azuri Ross for immediate consideration. Call the Downtown Los Angeles Act-1 office and ask for Azuri Ross. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074532 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Junior Administrative Assistant/Office Coordinator Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90028",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-administrative-assistant-office-coordinator-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172601541.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1cacebc77be22028cd45285fc9cc012c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:08:37:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Academic Administrator Job in San Francisco, CA Would you be interested in working with a healthcare educational institute in downtown San Francisco? Would you want to be a part of a growing academic department? Do you have experience working on processing policies, planning events and supporting a team of professionals with onboarding? Are you seeking leadership and career growth? If so, then this is the perfect job for you! A medical department is hiring a full-time Academic Administrator in San Francisco, California. If you have excellent follow through skills and heavy scheduling experience, then please send us your resume for immediate consideration. Job Responsibilities: Responsible for heavy calendaring, travel arrangements and support faculty with onboarding  Assist with administrative duties, coordinate interviews and book conference meetings  Support staff with applications, data entry and membership questionsManage special projects, track registrations and oversee expense reports  Qualifications: Minimum 2-4 year experience with recruiting coordination Bachelor’s Degree strongly preferred but not required Proficient in Microsoft Office, Word and Excel Very organized, highly accountable and professional Healthcare experience is a plus!  Please apply below and submit your resume to Ashley at ashley.wright@ajilon.com with “Academic Administrator” in the subject line. Check out more opportunities on Ajilon Professional Staffing‘s website at www.ajilon.com  ",Academic Administrator Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94143",,http://jobview.monster.com/academic-administrator-job-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-172739186.aspx?mescoid=1100038001001&jobPosition=16,,Administrative/Clerical,98608d3e8284a25bb63c45cc9a62b380
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:08:45:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"*TOP JOB*MANAGER TRAINEERTrucking company now hiring a manager trainee. Individual must have the ability to multi-task, computer knowledge, strong organizational and communication skills with leadership qualities. 2-3 years of transportation experience required. Must pass a background check and drug screen. This is a full time position with an excellent benefit package. Monday - Friday daylight hrs.Send resume to:Box Q-1c/o THE REVIEW210 E. 4th St.E. Liverpool, OH43920provided by The East Liverpool Review",MANAGER TRAINEE Job in East Liverpool,Full Time,"East Liverpool, OH 43920",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-trainee-job-east-liverpool-oh-us-172753914.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bb72cc98983cdefcaa3b3f3a2d91b3e4
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:08:49:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking to hire a strong Administrative Assistant for a job located in the El Segundo area.  This is a fast moving position with a large property management company who is experiencing a LOT of growth.  This is a career opportunity for someone who wants to move up in their career.  The people there are extremely nice, fun and family oriented.  They are hardworking and hard playing type people.  If you are looking for a new job, want to learn more about a business and have the ability to support the President of a growing company, you need to read on. Responsibilities: Preparation of communication, memos and all correspondence for the PresidentBooking, negotiating and management for travelNew hire administrative work including offer letters, benefits and reconciling premiums  You must have: At least an AA degree or a BA degreeA minimum of 5+ years of working experience as an Administrative Assistant to a VP or higherEnjoy juggling a LOT of tasks at onceExcellent written and spoken communication skills  If this job sounds interesting, or if you are looking for another administrative or operational role, email me directly at Nadiah.albadri@ajilon.com or apply now below.  You can always go to our website at www.ajilon.com to see all of our openings.  We hope to talk with you soon! ",Administrative Assistant Job Located in Los Angeles Near LAX Job in El Segundo,Full Time Employee,"El Segundo, CA 90245",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-located-in-los-angeles-near-lax-job-el-segundo-ca-us-172739695.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=9,,Administrative/Clerical,301f40e24815e47842bb3e5ba7a09bcd
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:09:18:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking an Executive Assistant to support the CEO for leading global investment bank! Must have previous supported board level.Client DetailsLeading Investment bank in New York City is seeking an Executive Assistant to support the CEO. With a strong presence in the market and a great reputation, a candidate of the highest professionalism and experience is required.DescriptionCoordinate travel arrangements both international and domestic flights, car services, and hotelsCalendar management (multiple calendars) and complex itinerariesHigh phone call volumeEvent managementExpense reports via ConcurTraining of the administrative staff Ad hoc projects as neededProfileBachelors degreeMust have supported board level within financial servicesProfessional and polished at all timesExcellent interpersonal skillsStrong business acumenComfortable in a fast-paced, corporate atmosphereJob OfferCompetitive base salary + annual bonusFull benefits401K20 paid vacation daysSick days11 company holidays",Executive Assitant to CEO Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-assitant-to-ceo-job-new-york-ny-us-172903898.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=9,,Administrative/Clerical,5152a11c04a79354bd3e6e3cc329812a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:09:20:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Executive Assistant Job in San Francisco, CA Are you interested in working with a high-profile company in downtown San Francisco? Would you enjoy working for a leading energy company that offers career growth? Do you have experience scheduling for C-level executives or a CEO? If you have exceptional coordination experience and thrive in a demanding environment, then we have the job for you. Our client is hiring a full-time Executive Assistant to start immediately for a long-term contract. This contract has the potential to become permanent and offers competitive compensation.We are seeking a highly ambitious and detail oriented individual with previous experience managing heavy calendaring. Please submit a resume for immediate consideration. Job Responsibilities: Manage CEO calendar and confidential information Responsible for answering calls, track workflow and travel arrangements Assist executives with meeting coordination, edit correspondences and presentations  Provide administrative duties and act as a liaison between clients and executive team  Qualifications: Minimum 4-5 years executive assisting or senior administration experience Bachelor’s degree required Excellent written and verbal communication skills Proficient in Microsoft Office, Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook    If you feel that this position is a match for you, please apply below, and submit your resume to Ashley at ashley.wright@ajilon.com with “Executive Assistant” in the subject line. For more opportunities, visit Ajilon Professional Staffing‘s website at www.ajilon.com Thank you for taking the time to explore this opportunity!    ",Executive Assistant Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94111",,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-assistant-job-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-172531589.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=1,,Administrative/Clerical,42909c5b432740f682eb3d62e33770e8
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:09:56:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Office Services Associate is a member of the on-site Williams Lea team delivering exceptional customer service at our client locations. Responsibilities include mail distribution, copy services, hospitality and conference room set-up, reception assistance and other general office duties as needed.Job Responsibilities:Process high volumes of incoming and outgoing mail. Deliver mail and packages throughout the client location, following applicable distribution procedures.Complete large numbers of reprographics requests according to job ticket instructions.Bind, cut, and/or assemble reprographics jobs as necessary.Load copiers with paper and toner as needed.Set-up conference rooms including audio/visual equipment, furniture configuration, and food/beverages as needed.Assist with reception coverage, including managing multiple phone lines and visitor check-in.Handle sensitive and/or confidential documents and information.Communicate with manager and client on job or deadline issues.Job Requirements:High school diploma or equivalent.Open to entry level with retail or customer service experience.Ability to work in a fast-paced team environment.Attention to detail with emphasis on accuracy and quality.Ability to prioritize work to balance multiple projects and deadlines.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Exceptional customer service skills.Basic computer skills required.Must be able to lift up to 50 lbs. on a regular basis.Must be able to work standing up all or most of the time.Williams Lea offers an exciting and supportive business environment. We develop our people and reward their contribution. We work with openness and integrity. We are an equal opportunity employer. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform preemployment substance abuse testing.WLRSR",Office Services Associate Job in Washington,"Full Time, Employee","Washington, DC",,http://jobview.monster.com/office-services-associate-job-washington-dc-us-172931638.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=18,,Administrative/Clerical,36311e70da115160e825e4fdcb33c864
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:10:13:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Office Manager Our client in West Houston, TX is seeking an Office Manager to join their team on a direct hire basis. Company Profile:Our client is a well-established practice.  They pride themselves on the high level of efficiency and customer service provided.  Though they have been in practice over 16 years, they are currently going through a rapid expansion and are seeking the right team members to assist in that growth. Features and Benefits:This is an excellent ground-floor opportunity to make an impact and grow with the company. You will operate with a high level of autonomy and are trusted to direct your team as you see fit.  This is a very professional and high-energy office.  Office Manager Role:The Office Manager is an essential role whose primary responsibility is managing the day-to-day operations for greatest efficiency and communication.  Daily duties would include: • Coordinate staff schedules and facilitate cross-training• Track and guide staff performance and attendance • Facilitate daily staff meetings • Coordinate facility and staff credentialing • Review operations seeking opportunities for process improvement This is a wonderful opportunity for a results-driven Office Manager to see the immediate impact they make on an overall operation. There is excellent employee buy-in on the overall mission of the office to increase efficiency and be the go-to facility for men’s health. Office Manager Background Profile:5+ years of proven Management experience required High school diploma required, some college preferred Medical experience is a plus, though not requiredHighly organized with excellent follow-through Self-driven and self-disciplined; capable of successfully leading a team Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/houston-galleria.html and https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). ",Office Manager  Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-job-houston-tx-us-172842643.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=2,"40,000.00 - 55,000.00 /year",Administrative/Clerical,077fe93a265710a5d7cdd341d7e8f2f5
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:10:14:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"LOCATION: Madison JOB TYPE: Temporary - Full Time SHIFT: First Shift JOB ID: 88360 PAY: $14.25 PROFESSION: Office DATE POSTED: 9/27/2016 Summary: Our client in Madison, WI is seeking an Administrative Assistant to assist their team on a temporary basis. The person in this role will be verifying the contents of pledge envelopes handed in from Dane County companies and assisting with front desk duties as needed. The ideal candidate will have cash handling experience, as handling cash and coins is part of the job as well. This role is expected to start in early October and last for about 3 weeks. Pay rate is $14.25 per hour. Responsibilities: Verifying contents of pledge envelopes Counting and handling cash and coins Auditing, processing and reconciling pledge forms Entering donor data into the system Answering phones and greeting visitors Other administrative duties as needed Qualifications: Experience with cash handling Ability to reconcile totals Fast and accurate data entry skills Solid problem solving skills Highly organized and detail oriented Quick learner who can adapt to new software Comfortable answering phones and greeting visitors M2",Administrative Assistant Job in Madison,"Full Time, Employee","Madison, WI",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-madison-wi-us-172939871.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=13,,Administrative/Clerical,e9967b530b9238a486891bad49dcf132
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:10:16:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description This position is responsible for providing leadership to designated patient care and service delivery areas, including oversight of staff, budget and quality issues. This person assumes the responsibility as delegated, for the facility in the absence of the Chief Nursing Officer/Administrator as directed. KHS Minimum or Preferred Qualifications Current NYS Registration as a Registered Professional Nurse required. Bachelor of Science Degree in Nursing or related field required. Master’s degree in Nursing/Healthcare or Business Administration or a related field required. Five (5) years of experience in women’s health care, progressive management experience in health care, including budget/financial systems, quality improvement, and knowledge of regulatory and accrediting agency standards. Experience in leading complex teams and program development.",Director Womens Services Job in Buffalo,Full Time Employee,"Buffalo, NY",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-womens-services-job-buffalo-ny-us-171633600.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=12,,General/Other: Administrative/Clerical,876c1b344d35526f30b751048070d0ac
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:10:36:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 3rd Shift - 10p - 6a (Overnight) Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Overnight Convenience Sub Shop Clerk (PT) Beechwood & State GetGo Job in Alliance,Full Time Employee,"Alliance, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/overnight-convenience-sub-shop-clerk-pt-beechwood-state-getgo-job-alliance-oh-us-173005453.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=14,,Administrative/Clerical,5d8e9f8eb8e9cff6b0a0af7d7a6be2ff
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:02:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:We are looking for an extremely organized office manager who comes with experience in dispatching. Candidates must be proficient in Microsoft Excel and QuickBooks. This is a small company that is expanding and needs help getting the office in order and running smoothly. If this sounds like you, apply now! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074568 Job Experience:,,Years of Experience Required:",Office Manager Job in Sherman Oaks,Full Time Employee,"Sherman Oaks, CA 91403",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-job-sherman-oaks-ca-us-172603948.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),002cc54040054df6cb7e2e189226d220
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:04:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:About the job: We are looking for a motivated multi-tasker who takes pride in their work and thrives on daily accomplishments. We need an organized Office Coordinator/Receptionist to be the back bone of the office. An exceptional candidate will be responsible, personable, and able to work alone as well as a part of a team. This is a dynamic workplace, and the right candidate will provide important support to the management team as well as presenting a professional face for the company to the diverse clientele passing through the front doors on a daily basis. Responsibilities include: Facilitating phone and email communications, providing support to administrative staff, and greeting office guests. Candidates should be able to multi task and have clear communication skills. College degree preferred. We are looking to hire the right person to join our team! If you relish in confirmation, encouragement, and positive coaching for career success, send us your application today. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075755 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",$-/hr Bilingual Receptionist needed for beautiful office! Job in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92131",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/17-22-hr-bilingual-receptionist-needed-for-beautiful-office!-job-san-diego-ca-us-172849892.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0b654d23af018060336e8431462e9617
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:05:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:If you have a minimum of 5 years experience supporting either the construction or engineering industry this could be the opportunity for you! Reputable company is seeking a PMA to support with various phases of contract/project management. Ideal experience will include contract review, invoicing, and change order coordination, etc. Professional and tenured team looking to add to their stable family! Apply today for immediate consideration! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075589 Job Experience:,, construction, engineering, contractYears of Experience Required:",Project Manager Assistant Job in Hampton,Full Time Employee,"Hampton, VA 23666",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-assistant-job-hampton-va-us-172830657.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b42a300fdc49f9b84d79ac5efd8ed118
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:07:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Position: Team Assistant – 19571 Duration: 6 month contract Location: Fort Washington, PA Team Assistant will be supporting processing with the following tasks Request written or verbal verification of employment for Borrowers Order/resend request for tax transcripts (form 4506-t) Order internal and external payoffs Updating flood cert information in Encompass Issue flood hazard notice as required Review Fraud Guard to identify additional properties owned by Applicants Update homeowners and flood insurance in fulfillment system Reviewing files with subordinations to ensure that they are on track Issue loan commitment As applicable per product guidelines; PMI Certificates and Condominium questionnaires. Contact by phone; customers, Title Companies/Attorneys, Realtors, and other third parties to obtain additional information required to fulfill the loan Skills/Competencies: Excellent communication skills (written, verbal, listening) Detail oriented and well organized Ability to handle multiple priorities and produce results Ability to work independently as well as part of a team Ability to handle frequent changes Proficiency in Microsoft word and excel application Ability to confidently utilize technology Creative/innovative problem solver High level of integrity Self-motivated/takes initiative Report","Horizontal Integration Job Application for Team Assistant –  | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Position: Team Assistant – 19571 Duration: 6 month contract Location: Fort Washington, PA Team Assistant will be supporting processing with the following tasks Request written or verbal verification of employment for Borrowers Order/resend request for tax transcripts (form 4506-t) Order internal and external payoffs Updating flood cert information in Encompass Issue flood hazard notice as required Review Fraud Guard to identify additional properties owned by Applicants Update homeowners and flood insurance in fulfillment system Reviewing files with subordinations to ensure that they are on track Issue loan commitment As applicable per product guidelines; PMI Certificates and Condominium questionnaires. Contact by phone; customers, Title Companies/Attorneys, Realtors, and other third parties to obtain additional information required to fulfill the loan Skills/Competencies: Excellent communication skills (written, verbal, listening) Detail oriented and well organized Ability to handle multiple priorities and produce results Ability to work independently as well as part of a team Ability to handle frequent changes Proficiency in Microsoft word and excel application Ability to confidently utilize technology Creative/innovative problem solver High level of integrity Self-motivated/takes initiative",,http://jobview.monster.com/team-assistant-%E2%80%93-19571-job-fort-washington-pa-us-172986188.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=7,,,2723e416588b87f72802e49825332861
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:09:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Shipping and Receiving Company products in an accurate and timely manner Insure all Company products are received by our customers in a saleable condition Stock product in the warehouse Ordering products and managing warehouse inventories to acceptable levels  Fast pace setting with room for advancement Qualifications Exceptional organizational and warehouse logistics skills At least one year of warehouse and forklift experience preferred (order picker experience also a plus!) Must be able to lift a minimum of 50 lbs",Warehouse Associate - Monday-Friday :am-:pm - Nashville Job in Nashville,"Full Time, Employee","Nashville, TN 37210",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-monday-friday-6-30am-3-00pm-nashville-job-nashville-tn-us-172232203.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=15,,Administrative/Clerical,8e6f392234352479df7430cc1334bce0
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:09:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary: Responsible for performing a wide variety of departments within First Foundation Advisors, including but not limited to, Client Service, Operations, and Account Services.  Will perform a variety of clerical duties in addition to project oriented tasks; some client communication will be required. Other duties will be assigned depending on the department needs.    Duties and Responsibilities: Employee is responsible for adherence to all compliance programs and the completion of all required and assigned training by established due dates. Executive Assistant Related Assistance: Pull birthday card list and prepare physical cards to be mailed Assist in holiday card list and card preparation Provide back-up to the receptionist on an as needed basis Input client/prospect/COI information utilizing the company CRM Work with Executive Assistants to validate and/or correct CRM data Filing responsibilities, including both physical and electronic documents Assist in pulling marketing lists for potential invites for company events Work with Executive Assistants to help with meeting preparations, including but not limited to, making outbound confirmation calls, binding and running various reports. Help organize physical clients files in order to prep them for scanning and archiving Help with meeting set-up, ordering lunch, conference room set-up and clean-up as needed Assist in organizing and clean-up of electronic client files Help with other ad hoc projects across FFA departments as needed. Performs other departmental duties and special projects as assigned.  Education and/or Experience: High school diploma or GED required. Minimum of 1-2 years experience as an administrative assistant.. PC proficiency in Microsoft Office. Highly organized and flexible. Excellent verbal/written communication skills with the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of personnel. Self-motivated, detail-oriented team player. 60 wpm typing skills. Strong knowledge of business English, spelling, and punctuation. Present a professional image in dealing with customers, interdepartmental and external representatives.   First Foundation is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status, status as a qualified individual with disability, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other characteristic protected by law.  Req. Code : FFA 574 Division/Department : First Foundation Advisors",Administrative Assistant Job in Irvine,Full Time,"Irvine, CA 92612",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-irvine-ca-us-172831677.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3ea4f0c10facd27b5aa66e27bd6fc12c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:09:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 16 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Convenience Sub Shop Clerk (Part Time) - St Marys GetGo Job in St. Marys,Full Time Employee,"St. Marys, PA",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convenience-sub-shop-clerk-part-time-st-marys-getgo-job-st.-marys-pa-us-173007168.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=6,,Administrative/Clerical,806a23a85bd32aa0a3360f0002845eb1
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:09:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:We are currently looking for a candidate who has an extensive administrative and/or clerical background. The ideal candidate will handle multiple office duties including, but not limited to, high call volumes, handling record keeping, scanning and faxing documents. They will also be in charge of scheduling and coordinating meetings and appointments. We would like someone who is qualified within Microsoft programming (e.g., word, excel, etc.). Knowledge in basic standard office equipment is a must. Required Skills:- Bilingual is required. - Minimum 2 years experience within the administrative and/or clerical field. - Able to multi-task efficiently. - Detail-oriented. - Great time management skills. We look forward in meeting all of our qualified applicants! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074416 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Bilingual Administrative Assistant - Job in Bakersfield,Full Time Employee,"Bakersfield, CA 93308",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-administrative-assistant-job-bakersfield-ca-us-172599770.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7011fdbb29b3e7ab5acd11ab5ee997b7
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:09:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Since 1971, Pennrose Management Company has provided results-oriented multifamily property management throughout the Mid-Atlantic and beyond. Through superior resident services and the constant attention we give owners and investors, we create value and preserve assets. Our properties are true bright spots in their neighborhoods and we make sure they stay that way. Currently, we manage a portfolio of over 145 properties comprising more than 8,500 units in Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Maryland, Ohio, Tennessee, Alabama and Connecticut. To ensure we get the best, we offer numerous employee benefits and programs that start with:•Competitive salary and benefits with a goal-oriented bonus system•Regular participation in conferences, workshops and other training activities geared towards real estate developmentPennrose Management Company is excited to be recruiting for a Property Manager.The Property Manager is responsible for providing leadership and direction to associates at assigned properties. Mentors associates and ensures all support corporate mission and understand roles in achieving established goals. Advocates on behalf of associates to enhance individual performance. Provides excellent customer service to residents.Incumbents must have a High School Diploma/GED, certifications in the following: Housing Credit Certified Professional, Certified Occupancy Specialist, and Specialist in Housing Credit Management. You must have two years of experience in multi-family property management, including direct supervision of others and proven Marketing and Leasing experience.For additional company information or to view all available opportunities please visit www.pennrose.com Pennrose is an equal employment opportunity employer.Eoe m/f/d/v",Property Manager Job in Chester,,"Chester, PA 19013",All,http://jobview.monster.com/property-manager-job-chester-pa-us-172996901.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=12,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),179ff5c2e684a51bd6c854f57997b858
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:09:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our well establish financial organization is currently in need of an Office Manager!Salary: Up to 65K DOEHours: Full Time - Monday-Friday/ 8:00AM-5:00PMBenefits: Fortune 500 Benefits Package!!! Job Duties Include: ? Administrative duties ? Tenant relations? Lease administration? Maintain property databases and produce reports? Coordinate property maintenance ? Read and understand complex lease and contract terms and make recommendations? Handle sensitive and confidential information Qualified candidate must possess:? A minimum of 5+ years? experience in property management or commercial real estate environment? 5+ years of recent Office Management experience ? Personality will be a KEY component to this positionKey Competencies? Basic Accounts Payable, Basic Accounts Receivable, Intermediate MS Excel.? Keen sense of accuracy and attention to detailWe are moving quickly on this position! Don't wait and apply with your resume today!!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:Bilingual in Mandarin Chinese is a HUGE plus!!!Years of Experience Required:",Office Manager - Canoga Park Job in Canoga Park,Full Time Employee,"Canoga Park, CA 91304",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-canoga-park-job-canoga-park-ca-us-172656368.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),40c589e001c9e3af3589af210319ac54
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:09:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Assistant Office ManagerSeeking qualified applicant to assist office managerwith day to day operations. Duties will include: employee benefits, payroll, accounts payable, staff scheduling,administrative duties, answering phones,accepting payments, and resolving customer issues.Individual must be motivated, able to multi-task,detail oriented, and available for various shifts (including evenings and Saturdays). Excellent phone and computer skills required. Knowledge of accounting and payroll necessary.Office hours: Monday - Friday 8am to 8pm and Saturday 8am to 3pm.We offer competitive salary, vacation time, and benefits. Please send cover letter, resume,and salary requirements to:CAS CableAttn: Human Resources1525 Dupont Rd.Parkersburg, WV 26101EOEClick Image to View Adprovided by The Parkersburg News & Sentinel Report","CAS Job Application for Assistant Office Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Address 1525 Dupont RdParkersburg, WV 26101",All,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-office-manager-job-parkersburg-wv-us-172753933.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=19,,,d3245882ba54cf9b4e24b9be03260f39
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:12:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking for a new job?  Sedona Staffing Services is currently searching for a motivated ENTRY LEVEL Customer Service Professional to join our TEAM.  Sedona Staffing has been in the Dubuque area since 1993 and is always looking for top talent.  If you're someone who likes to sit in the background and wait for things to happen; this isn't the job for you....HOWEVER, if you love to ""WIN"" and strive for success every day; contact us for more details!This is a full time, 40 hour per week, position, requiring flexibility to work between 8am-7pm Monday-Friday based on company needs.  Qualifications:Exceptional proficiency with Microsoft applicationsPrior customer service experience requiredStrong organizational skillsAbility to create relationships while utilizing your communication skillsStrong sense of pride in accomplishing tasks/dutiesWanting to learn new skills dailyReady and willing to come into work today with the attitude of WINNINGIf this position sounds like a fit; CALL or EMAIL Sedona Staffing today to learn more.  All applicants must complete a series of Prove-IT computer evaluations; to include MS Office (Word/Excel/Outlook) as well as a typing and data entry evaluation. How to Apply:Email - JoeV@careerpros.com -- include why you think you would be a great fitCall - 563.556.3040Stop In - 2065 Holliday Drive, Dubuque IA (Located off the NW Arterial near Asbury Road) Sedona Staffing Services is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Customer Service/Office Management Job in Platteville,Full Time,"Platteville, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-office-management-job-platteville-wi-us-172918757.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=9,10.00 - 12.00 $ /hourBonus structure after probation period TBD,,26e55e9bd56e96047ab45c364531189e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:13:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative Assistant One of our top Houston, TX clients in the Galleria area is seeking an Administrative Assistant to join their team on Temporary to Possible Hire basis. Company Profile:This is an opportunity to join an established company that maintains a small, dynamic team atmosphere.  This investment firm continues to grow and is a multi-million dollar concern, managing the finances of hundreds of investors.Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of Client:Once full-time, the company does offer health benefits.  Casual and relaxed office environment that operates like a family Great hours to allow for an easier commute Administrative Assistant Role with the Company:The Administrative Assistant is a crucial position as the office continues to grow.  Initial, daily duties would include:Travel arrangement/Calendar management Data entryWeekly reportingAssist with special projects General office supportFrom the very beginning, the Administrative Assistant will be assisting with general office duties and work overflow while they learn the business.  As they become more comfortable with the work, they will take on bigger projects and directly support one of the managing partners.Background Profile:3-5 years of Administrative support.Bachelor’s Degree is a plusEXCELLENT office and phone personality. While energetic, candidate should exhibit a warm, welcoming and accommodating demeanorHighly organized, multi-tasker with great attention to detail who is able to stay on taskProficient user of Microsoft Office Suite to include Outlook, Excel, PowerPoint and Word); Windows 7Excellent written communication skills and professional email etiquetteIdeal candidate will be able to work independentlyPlease visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com  Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). ",Part-Time Administrative Assistant  Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-administrative-assistant-job-houston-tx-us-172188790.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=19,13.00 - 15.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,5b4ca59aa1ec10053a263ebb14d64419
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:13:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"High Level Executive Assistant Job in San Francisco, CA Would you enjoy working for a top tier property management company in downtown San Francisco? Do you have strong administration experience and heavy calendaring abilities? Are you a key player who has exceptional follow through skills? If you have experience providing high level managerial support to a CFO, then this is the job for you. A real estate company is hiring a full-time Executive Assistant to start immediately. This long-term contract has the potential to become permanent and the opportunity to join a collaborative team. Please send us your resume for immediate consideration. Job Responsibilities: Support the CFO with travel arrangements, answer phones and heavy scheduling Manage administrative duties, edit documents and coordinate meetings Responsible for event planning, monthly reports and expense reimbursements Handle invoices, create presentations and arrange catering  Qualifications: Minimum 2-4 years executive assistant experience Bachelor’s Degree preferred Excellent written and verbal communication skills Proficient in Microsoft Excel, Word and PowerPoint Property management experience is a plus!  Please submit your resume to Ashley at ashley.wright@ajilon.com with “High Level Executive Assistant” in the subject line. For more opportunities, visit Ajilon Professional Staffing‘s website at www.ajilon.com Thank you for taking the time to explore this opportunity!  ",High Level Executive Assistant Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94111",,http://jobview.monster.com/high-level-executive-assistant-job-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-172583939.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=13,,Administrative/Clerical,753eedf72bb57afa6be0b8401f33b586
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:14:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description: Contract Coordinator Full-time Monday through Friday 8:00am to 5:00pmDept: Billing DepartmentPosition classification: Non-Exempt Reports to: Billing ManagerCompensation $15-$18/hour If you are looking for a career where you are valued and can develop both personally and professionally, you've come to the right place!Just as we ask the people who work for us to invest themselves wholeheartedly in serving our customers, both internally and externally, we invest wholeheartedly in the well-being of our employees. We foster an ongoing exchange of knowledge, providing our employees with the tools and support they need to realize their professional potential, serve our customers' best interests, and uphold our unique values.We are a rapidly growing organization whose culture is built on the concept of teamwork. We are a leading provider of document technology products and services. Our mission is to maximize organizational productivity by delivering effective automated business process and content management solutions that boost efficiency and profitability.Job Summary: Bill and maintain customer service contracts.Duties:• Maintenance Contract Set-upo Includes new contracts for existing equipment and rentals• Maintain Maintenance contractso Includes cancellations, renewals, increases, changes, etc• Maintenance Contract Billing• Scan original maintenance contracts into Laserfiche• Review New Equipment Maintenance Contract Set-up for accuracy• Outbound courtesy call to the customer to ensure understanding of contract billing terms, contact information, promote website for meter entry, etc• Internal and External Maintenance Contract Billing Questions• Maintenance Contract Credit Memos• Customer account file maintenance• Communicate with department and other personnel to resolve customer billing issues in a timely manner• To promote positive relationships with both external and internal customersBehavior requirement: 100% of the time-civility, cooperation and professional behavior.Expectations:• Accurate and timely maintenance contract billing• All maintenance contracts must be billed in the month they are due• Adhere to all contract reporting deadlines• Credit memos processed within 1 day of receipt of approval• Positive, helpful, pleasant, friendly attitude toward both internal and external customersExperience, Education and Training:• Minimum two years experience in a business environment• College degree requiredSkills Required:• Strong sense of accountability and responsibility• Strong knowledge of MS Word, Excel and Outlook applications• Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal• Strong attention to detail• Excellent follow through skills• Ability to multi-task effectively and efficiently• Good organizational skills• Good understanding of the business transaction cycle• Ability to work in a “team oriented” environmentThe Benefits Program at our company is a significant part of our employee's total compensation. We strive to provide a broad range of competitive benefits designed to meet your personal needs and priorities. Our comprehensive benefits package includes: •Choice of medical, dental and vision plans that provide our employees and their families, including domestic partners, with high-quality healthcare•Flexible spending accounts - Set aside pre-tax dollars to cover out-of-pocket expenses related to health or dependent care•Aflac insurance - In the event of death or disability, you can help protect your family against the loss of income with various types of insurance•A generous wealth accumulation program will help you achieve financial security for retirement. We offer a 401(K) Profit Sharing Plan and Free Finance Counseling•Generous vacation, holiday, and sick leave programs - as we believe that taking advantage of time away from work is essential for a well-balanced lifeTo apply for this position please submit your cover letter and resume today!",Contract Coordinator Job in Chico,Full Time,"Chico, CA 95973",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/contract-coordinator-job-chico-ca-us-172234275.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5d68f851b90c4551c1856c96ac8a3f91
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:18:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ultradent, a global name in oral health, is seeking a Director of Demand Planning and S&OP/SIOP to be responsible for all forecasting activities associated with customers and products. The director will manage a team to create and maintain forecast models for their customers, incorporating business intelligence and forecast information gathered from sales, marketing, finance and other sources. As an eligible Ultradent employee, you can expect the following:  Benefits:Medical/Dental & Other Insurances (eligible the first of month after 60 days)Health Savings Account MatchMatching 401KOn-site cafeteria (breakfast & lunch)On-site Fitness CenterEmployee access to discounted Ultradent productsFive days paid between Christmas and New YearsEducation Assistance Job Duties: Develop demand forecasts (operational forecasts) at multiple levels of aggregation for multiple time horizons as part of a demand planning function.Review historical sales trends, research demand drivers, prepare forecast data, develop statistical forecast models, and evaluate forecast results.Coordinate cross-functional research activities to reconcile significant variances and refine the forecast model to reflect updated sales and marketing assumptions.Interact with sales, marketing, and customer finance to understand demand forecast drivers.Assist sales in managing and mitigating unusual demand orders from large customersUtilize a collaborative and consensus approach by working with Sales, Marketing and Customer Finance to obtain and ensure that current and accurate information is used for demand forecasts.Use and maintain the Demand Planning software as the primary forecasting system tool. Collaborate with IT to ensure corporate standards and good integrated systems and processes with other ERP modules.Provide input to the Supply Planning organization in developing inventory strategies on existing items, new products, and product phase-outs.Closely coordinate and communicate customer action plans with supply planning.Communicate monthly with Supply Planning counterpart to Executive Management, summarizing risks, financial impacts, and long-term capacity expansion needs. Job Requirements: Bachelor’s degree in Business or other related field or equivalent experience.Minimum 5-10 years’ experience in Planning and Forecasting field, with progressive increases in responsibility and scope.  Experience managing teams of people.Leadership experience in utilizing supply and demand planning tools and databases.Experience developing and leading continuous improvement activities or projects.Documented skills in developing and improving processes, developing and tracking key performance indicators and developing and analyzing budgets and profit and loss statementsStrong communication skills, attention to details and professionalism. Understanding of Demand Planning and Forecasting best practices.Working knowledge of Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint), SharePoint, Data Analytics tools, and Oracle EBS (or other complex ERP Systems) a plus. Ultradent is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regards to race, color religion, sex, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.  VEVRAA Federal Contractor: For more information please contact us at recruiting@ultradent.com",Director of Demand Planning and S&OP/SIOP Job in Riverton,"Full Time, Employee","Riverton, UT 84095",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-demand-planning-s-op-siop-job-riverton-ut-us-172658342.aspx?mescoid=1101115002005&jobPosition=10,,Administrative/Clerical,82c7d1b25b857051fb7f8b5fa38eb480
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:19:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Linear Technology is seeking an Administrative Assistant in our Product Marketing group in Milpitas, CA. The ideal candidate will have the following requirements:High School or College DegreeClearly spoken/ written EnglishComputer skills (Gmail, Excel)Able to handle multi-line phone systemPersonableResponsibilities include but are not limited to:Daily quote preparation and data entry into Model N.Sales support (samples, data sheet requests)Distribution of tech support calls and emailsTo learn more about Linear Technology or to apply for this opening, please visit our website at www.linear.com/company/careers Job #1242 - Administrative Assistant",Administrative Assistant Job in Milpitas,Full Time Employee,"Milpitas, CA 95035",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-milpitas-ca-us-172960895.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=13,,Administrative/Clerical,7007b569950ab411bf7d0a5d28d76bf5
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:22:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative  Assistant:Client in Irving, TX looking to add an administrative assistant to their credit team on a contract to hire basis.  Company Profile:Company founded in 1982Headquartered in Beloit, WisconsinPrivately held, family-owned businessWon Great Workplace Award for 7 years!Volunteering and charitable support is a vital part of corporate culture.Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of client:401(k) Savings Plan (Guaranteed Yearly Company Match)Company Bonus PlanShort/long Term Disability (Company Provided)Paid Vacations, holidays, and personal daysFlexible Spending AccountsEducation ReimbursementFlexible / Family-Friendly HoursVolunteer: partnering with Habitat for Humanity, after-school mentoring program, delivering Meals on Wheels, and raising for United WayAdministrative Assistant Role:The Administrative Assistant works under the direct guidance of the Credit Analyst. The Administrative Assistant provides a wide range of administrative support by efficiently and effectively executing department/operational procedures and processes to help meet business objectives. Partners closely with other administrative professionals in order to meet the needs of the business. Ability to develop effective working relationships with all client groups, both internal and external.Credit Reference Processing, Credit Reports, Maintain Credit filesEnter Credit information onto internal system, internal and external communication with customers.Administrative Assistant Background Profile:High School diploma or equivalent work experience with a high level of administrative background.1+ years professional environment  Proficiently uses Microsoft Office: Word, Excel, Access, with ability to learn other software as needed.Must have excellent interpersonal and communication skills (verbal, written, and phone).Experience working in business operations, organizations and relationships involved at the field management levels.Please visit us at  https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/irving.html https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Administrative Assistant Job in Irving,"Full Time, Employee","Irving, TX",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-irving-tx-us-172808468.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=2,13.00 - 15.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,462a8071a5db53dcff832463c4d1b5d8
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:27:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Grocery team, you will be responsible for replenishing stock for our customers. The majority of your time will be spent on the sales floor, directly interacting with our customers and ensuring they are able to find the products they need. As a member of our team, you will also be fully trained and able to assist customers in other areas in the store including, but not limited to, the Dairy and Frozen Departments, as well as the Front End service area. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by ensuring products are replenished on the shelves and helping customers locate product. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Be knowledgeable of weekly ad items. Smile and greets customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Replenish product on the shelf, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room. Set up displays on the sales floor. Assist in maintaining back room efficiency by unloading deliveries. Rotate and check code dates on products to ensure customer's safety. Assist in other areas as required. Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Numeric Computation/Reporting Presentation & Verbal Communic Written Communication Takes Direction Work Environment Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Matching Pulling Sorting Standing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Pushing Reading Reaching Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Climbing Grasping Sight or Peripheral Vision Twisting Equipment Used Cardboard Baler Compactor Electric/Manual Jacks Safety Cutter U-Boats",Grocery Clerk (Part Time) - West th St Giant Eagle Job in Frederick,Full Time Employee,"Frederick, MD",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/grocery-clerk-part-time-west-7th-st-giant-eagle-job-frederick-md-us-173007923.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=2,,Administrative/Clerical,165be0b5f6d139de139c8c175215b11d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:29:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well known Company is looking for a Jr. Administrative Assistant who has at least two years experience. Responsibilities will include answering all incoming calls, receiving and sorting all incoming mail, calendaring, setting appointments, and working on various projects. Must be proficient in Word, Excel, and Outlook. Looking for a team player who can work in a fast paced environment. Email resume as a word attachment to Paris Goldfarb. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074509 Job Experience:,, excellent communication skillsYears of Experience Required:",JR. ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT NEEDED! Job in Woodland Hills,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Woodland Hills, CA 91367",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/jr-administrative-assistant-needed!-job-woodland-hills-ca-us-172601566.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d8130a98a7c2e5cdcf7c677859530897
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:30:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for something to do during the day with flexible hours and a great work environment?!? If so, please read on, we can achieve that for you!!!Ajilon Professional Staffing is recruiting for a Order Entry/Customer Service Specialist for a growing, exciting company in Suffolk County.  Responsibilities: Will be entering product numbers into the system. Answering emails from customers.Follow up to customers regarding products.  Requirements: SAP knowledge is needed!Excellent data entry skills with attention to detail and 100% accuracy.  Immediate Opportunity! May start off part time, but can lead to full time in the future. Flexible hours available. APPLY TODAY!!!   ",Order Entry Processor Job in Holbrook,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Holbrook, NY 11741",,http://jobview.monster.com/order-entry-processor-job-holbrook-ny-us-172062373.aspx?mescoid=4300724001001&jobPosition=14,,Administrative/Clerical,f076f0326939a9ceef1237f5c54e2d26
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:30:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Grocery team, you will be responsible for replenishing stock for our customers. The majority of your time will be spent on the sales floor, directly interacting with our customers and ensuring they are able to find the products they need. As a member of our team, you will also be fully trained and able to assist customers in other areas in the store including, but not limited to, the Dairy and Frozen Departments, as well as the Front End service area. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by ensuring products are replenished on the shelves and helping customers locate product. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Be knowledgeable of weekly ad items. Smile and greets customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Replenish product on the shelf, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room. Set up displays on the sales floor. Assist in maintaining back room efficiency by unloading deliveries. Rotate and check code dates on products to ensure customer's safety. Assist in other areas as required. Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 3rd Shift - 10p - 6a (Overnight) Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Matching Sorting Standing Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Pushing Reading Reaching Sight or Peripheral Vision Communication (verbal) Walking Climbing Pulling Twisting Unloading Equipment Used Cardboard Baler Compactor Electric/Manual Jacks Safety Cutter Trash compactor U-Boats Wire Cutter",Overnight Stock Clerk (Full Time) - West Patrick St Giant Eagle Job in Frederick,Full Time Employee,"Frederick, MD",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/overnight-stock-clerk-full-time-west-patrick-st-giant-eagle-job-frederick-md-us-173008597.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=18,,Administrative/Clerical,c51c6322fce6dcb7e4e0e323eb6f434c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:31:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Listed as one of the top companies to work at in Washington and we are looking for a Part Time Receptionist to represent their office. Great office atmosphere!We need someone that has an upbeat personality, lots of energy and great customer service skills. Your responsibilities will include answering phones, screen and direct calls. Take and relay messages. Greet people and direct them to correct destinations. Ensure knowledge of staff movements in and out of the office. General administrative and clerical support. Prepare and distribute correspondence. Receive and sort mail and deliveries. Schedule appointments. Organize meetings, tidy and maintain front office area. This one has the potential to grow into an Escrow Assistant! If you are an outstanding receptionist, please apply today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075548 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Receptionist - Apply today! Job in Seattle,Full Time Employee,"Seattle, WA 98101",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-apply-today!-job-seattle-wa-us-172758348.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9f7efacbb435be7489a01e92bfdb71bf
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:31:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Great firm seeking Administrative Assistant!Administrative responsibilities will include screen and direct a high-volume number of calls; greet persons entering the office; provide general administrative and clerical support; prepare letters and documents; and receive and sort mail and deliveries. This is a full time opportunity offering a competitive starting salary and great overall company benefits! Requirements: Education High School Diploma or equivalent. Bachelors preferred. At least 2 year of previous administrative experience. Must be proficient in MS Word/Excel/Outlook/PowerPoint 2010. Apply for Administrative Assistant opportunity today! Email resume as a Microsoft word attachment to Vivian Latifian for immediate consideration. Call the Downtown Los Angeles Act-1 office and ask for Vivian Latifian. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1076028 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant -Needed Full Time in Downtown L.A. Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90019",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-needed-full-time-in-downtown-l-a-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172921172.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),69e003de715bc8baaf831fd18a96ce29
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:31:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for an Administrative Assistant in Anderson, OH for a temporary oppotunity from now until the end of the year. Summary:Are you an experienced Administrative Assistant looking for work?  If so, this is the opportunity for you!  Our client in the healthcare industry is looking for a temporary Administrative Assistant to help out from now until the end of the year.  The position would be full time, Monday to Friday 8:00am to 5:00pm.  This position is paying $14.00 an hour.  Qualifications: 1-3 years of previous Administrative experienceAbility to handle basic Administrative functions: filing, sending faxes, sorting mail, greeting visitor, organization, and other various duties as assigned. Reliable and dependable Professional demeanor  If you meet the minimum qualifications for this position and are interested, please apply now! For additional opportunities, please visit www.ajilon.com ;",Administrative Assistant job in Anderson,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cincinnati, OH 45255",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-in-anderson-oh-job-cincinnati-oh-us-172993800.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=8,,Administrative/Clerical,ec5bb277aaafda41489eb5dc67572a0f
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:32:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job The details of the position are as follows: Job Title: On-Site Services SpecialistWork Location(s): 2300 RENAISSANCE BLVD, King Of Prussia, PA 19406Duration – Temp 5 MonthsPay Rate - $12.88/hrWork Hours – 9.00 am to 6.00 pm (Mon – Fri)  Qualifications: PC literate, mail processing experience, ability to stand for long periods of time. Responsibilities:  Print, copy, mail processing, fulfillment  Report","Compunnel Software Group Job Application for On-Site Services Specialist | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","The details of the position are as follows: Job Title: On-Site Services SpecialistWork Location(s): 2300 RENAISSANCE BLVD, King Of Prussia, PA 19406Duration – Temp 5 MonthsPay Rate - $12.88/hrWork Hours – 9.00 am to 6.00 pm (Mon – Fri)  Qualifications: PC literate, mail processing experience, ability to stand for long periods of time. Responsibilities:  Print, copy, mail processing, fulfillment ",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/on-site-services-specialist-job-norristown-pa-us-172804933.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,,1695e26d9272e21ffade617dbf253399
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:48:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you’re passionate about working with animals – and giving pet parents exceptional service – Petco is the place for you. At Petco, you can take your skills and passion and build a career that you’ll love with a strong, growing leader in the pet care industry. Working at Petco will open up a world of opportunities for you to pursue your professional goals – the kinds of opportunities only possible with a retail leader with over 1,300 stores covering the entire country and Puerto Rico. At this exciting event, you’ll be able to explore multiple opportunities in our River Forest area Petco store, including: •Guest Experience Specialist•Merchandise operations Leader•Companion Animal Leader•Dog Training Apprentice•Guest Advisor Take the first step! Apply on-line at www.mypetcocareer.com before attending one of the below events.Interviews will take place on Wednesday October 26th from 2pm-6pm and Thursday October 27th from 11am-3pm at the location listed below:    Petco #675 River Forest 7265 W. Lake StreetRiver Forest, IL 60305708-366-7387 As a key member of our team, you’ll work in a fast-paced and fun environment with other great people who share your values. You’ll also enjoy our ""Total Rewards"" package that includes competitive compensation and many attractive benefits: • Medical, Dental and Vision Plans • Flexible Spending Accounts • Paid Time Off (PTO) • 401(k) with Company Match • Employee Discounts $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } }); Report","Petco - SP/BB Job Application for Petco- River Forest -IL Job Fair! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":",Employee,"Address River Forest, Illinois 60305",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/petco-river-forest-il-job-fair!-job-river-forest-il-us-172921651.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=9,,,bba73d0d28c52dca20399edd9cf869ee
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:48:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job DescriptionAt Panda, we all share a common mission: ""Deliver exceptional Asian dining experiences by building an organization where people are inspired to better their lives."" We invest in our people because great people run great operations that will exceed our guests' expectations. Talk to any of our associates and you will experience a culture dedicated to its mission and our five fundamental values- Proactive, Respect/Win-Win, Growth, Great Operations, and Giving.Panda Restaurant Group includes the original Panda Inn fine dining restaurants, Panda Express, our Gourmet Chinese food concept served in a fast casual environment, and Hibachi San, our Japanese grill concept. The family owned and operated company is still run by founders Andrew and Peggy Cherng.Panda offers competitive benefits and rewarding opportunities, from entry-level positions to management. We have restaurant positions available nationwide and support center positions in Rosemead, CA. Come join the nation's largest and fastest growing Asian restaurant company. Job Responsibilities:  Provides support in the development, implementation, and administration of the company’s Operations base pay program.  Assist in compensation analyses in updating the Operations base pay structure. Supports the Operations bonus programs and contributes to enhancing their design.  Participates in preparing presentations on proposed changes to the bonus programs. Assists with the preparation of communications on Operations compensation administration guidelines for distribution to associates to ensure understanding and appreciation of the company’s compensation and pay increase program.  Participates in a variety of HR- and compensation-related assignments.  May conduct Operations turnover analysis and prepare charts and reports as requested.   Qualifications Bachelor’s degree required  Successful completion of annual store training. Skills & Knowledge: Strong knowledge of computer productivity applications (MS Excel, Word, Powerpoint) Strong analytical skills Abilities: Strong attention to detail & high sense of urgency Panda Restaurant Group's culture is strongly guided by our Mission and Values, highlighted on the Panda websites. We recommend all interested candidates become familiar with our Mission and Values, as well as the principals of The Seven Habits of Highly Effective People, by Stephen Covey. Panda Restaurant Group, Inc is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xpandamcx/cjt/slider-1.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xpandamcx/cjt/slider-2.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xpandamcx/cjt/slider-3.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xpandamcx/cjt/slider-4.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",Panda Restaurant Group,"Per Diem, Temporary/Contract/Project","Phone 6267999898 Address rosemead, CA 91770",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/temp-compensation-assistant-job-us-172597678.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=17,,,eaa4efa6cdcb32a8d90b8d0cae06497c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:50:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Overview:   The Administrative Assistant completes a variety of clerical, administrative, and secretarial duties to support line and/or staff management and in some cases a team of professional staff to allow management to focus on department goals and objectives. Job Responsibilities and Accountabilities:  Arrange and make appointment notifications. Answer telephone calls, tactfully handle inquiries, and transfer to appropriate party.  Answer routine mail and follow up with others to ensure that information is coordinated. Assemble and analyze information and prepare reports, manuals, and agendas. Make travel arrangements. Schedule meetings and make meeting arrangements. Process, sort, file, and maintain department expense reports, invoices, receipts, contracts, and/or other internal department documents. Prepare letters, memos, presentations, and materials in final form from rough drafts that may contain technical terminology. Compile minor statistical data.  May format data in reports for management review.  Job Requirements:   Working knowledge of general office procedures required. Previous experience using word processing software at a level to create and format letters, envelopes, and memoranda.  Experience with tables and mail merge functions preferred. Previous experience with spreadsheet software to format the spreadsheet, format columns, move and copy data, create charts and graphs, and create one-step math formulas preferred. Ability to accurately key 40 words per minute. Math skills at a level to complete one step calculations (i.e. addition, subtraction, multiplication, or division). Capability of using PowerPoint software to create presentations including the addition of graphics, sounds, and animation, importing data, and re-configuring graphics preferred.  Why Work for Supervalu?   SUPERVALU Inc. is one of the largest grocery wholesalers and retailers in the U.S. with annual sales of approximately $17 billion. SUPERVALU serves customers across the United States through a network of almost 3,400 stores. Headquartered in Minnesota, SUPERVALU has about 35,000 employees. We know that bright, motivated people are the reason for our success. Because of our employees, we’ve been providing the best service to our customers for more than 135 years. We encourage FRESH thinking, offer an environment of inclusion and support, and set no boundaries on your achievement! A GREAT PLACE TO GROW!   All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status.  SUPERVALU is an EO employer – M/F/Veteran/Disability.  VEVRAA Federal Contractor. ",Administrative Assistant I/II/Sr. - Grocery/Frozen/Dairy Merchandising - Hopkins,Full Time Employee,"Hopkins, MN 55343",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-i-ii-sr-grocery-frozen-dairy-merchandising-hopkins-mn-job-hopkins-mn-us-172996671.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=13,,,2bcd0924bd4cc6c0bc3fc9c6717243c5
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:50:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:AppleOne is one the nation's longest running and most respected staffing firms and we are currently sourcing a Clerical Administrative Assistant who has already had experience doing payroll using QuickBooks. This candidate must obtain a minimum of an Associate's Degree and have a minimum of 2 years experience in a Clerical role. Must be proficient in Word, Outlook, and Excel and will be tested on these skills prior to being offered employment. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074898 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Clerical Admin - Job in Chesapeake,Full Time Employee,"Chesapeake, VA 23320",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/clerical-admin-job-chesapeake-va-us-172667121.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7d71daa1038f8ba381aa17fd79d65fc8
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:51:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"To provide outstanding member service and a flawless execution of the basics; by verifying the accuracy of Visa credit and debit account entries, performing problem resolution, processing card reissues, input account monetary and non-monetary adjustments, monitor and distribute reports.Specific Job DutiesProvide member service by taking member calls on credit/debit/prepaid card accounts, reviewing transactions, explaining products, pulling statement, and making necessary corrective postings, or account adjustments when deemed necessary for account retention.Provide internal service to call center, service center, accounting staff  or collection personnel regarding credit or debit accounts, including research, authorizations, replacement card orders, or other changes to the account status.To distribute and/or review 25-60 daily, weekly or monthly reports of monetary or non-monetary transactions. Process lost/stolen debit card reissues on a daily basis, to include: making decisions to renew/maintain account relationship; set up on Spectrum, Star Station and FDR systems; file maintenance; and, plastic orders (including rush requests).Review member accounts to determine credit availability and process or return convenience checks or make decision for exception processing.Process non-member cash advances through FDR/Evolve system.Research and clear outstanding items on general ledgers or visa reports in a timely manner.Maintain a thorough working knowledge of applicable credit and debit card products, procedures and regulations.Complete required BSA & OFAC training annually.Understand and adhere to BSA & OFAC policies and procedures, including reporting suspicious activity.Assist in any areas as requested by management.Requires the ability to use both hands in a non-repetitive motion up to 8 hours per day.The position requires a minimal lifting of 0-10 lbs.The incumbent sits, stands and walks intermittently.Excellent visual acuity is required for the position.Job Requirements:High School or equivalentSpectrum and FDR systems trainingCustomer Service TrainingOne to two years’ experience in credit and debit card processingOne to two years’ experience in customer service.Demonstrated ability in mathematical and organizational skills.Basic proficiency with MS Excel & Word ​Join us at Provident Credit Union as a Card Services Representative. Discover new challenges in a rewarding atmosphere that helps you grow professionally. Equal Opportunity Employer",Card Services Representative - Temporary Job in Redwood City,"Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Redwood City, CA",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/card-services-representative-temporary-job-redwood-city-ca-us-172851483.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=1,,Administrative/Clerical,ad081a8fb71e03ee2b2d406b46b001e4
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:11:59:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"-Generate reports, correspondence, documents, and memoranda using software programs-Transcription-Data entry-General office (photocopy, fax, file)-Create tables, forms-Gather data and compile reports-Chart and/or administrative filing, purging, locating-R",Bilingual Secretary - $ per hour - Atascadero! Job in Atascadero,Full Time Employee,"Atascadero, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-secretary-16-per-hour-atascadero!-job-atascadero-ca-us-172924814.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=10,,General/Other: Administrative/Clerical,b38ba07989726e5a00bf08cb70549adc
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:00:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client is a global solutions provider for the financial services industry with both domestic and international operations. They specialize in linking legacy banking platforms with modern solutions and are considered one of the leaders in banking and insurance transformation projects across the globe. They are experienced in technical and advisory services and bring innovation and knowledge to many different projects.Senior Operations AdministratorThis is a phenomenal opportunity for a Senior Operations Administrator to join a fun and collaborative team. Do you want to be challenged? Do you possess ambition and passion? Are you looking for a career in an exciting and growing company and working with top professionals in the industry? Then consider joining this team.While reporting to the Director of HR & Operations, you will work on the Immigration of Foreign Workers and assist with financial operations, including some taxes and numerous projects, for our North American operations. Your experience in the consultancy and software sales industry would be a tremendous asset in this role where you can expect to not only contribute and hone your current skill set, but be challenged to grow by applying your thinking and approach to innovation.Responsibilities:Organize and be a point of contact for immigration casesAssist with managing the financial operations of North American entities (Accounts Payable, Accounts Receivable, cash flows, etc.)Work closely with Shared Service Centers throughout the world to ensure efficiencies and collaborationAssist with employee foreign taxesVarious ad hoc projects with varying degrees of complexityProvide excellent internal and external customer serviceAssist with various reporting requirements from external agenciesProvide back up to team members while out of the officeQualifications:Bachelor’s degree from a four-year college or university preferred2-5 years of experience as a Senior Administrator with varying dutiesPreference will be given to candidates with legal assistant experienceMust have knowledge of finance and controlling practicesWilling to take initiative and see task through to completion and / or implementationExcellent knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPointExtraordinary organization skills are absolutely mandatoryOther specialized knowledge and skills:Assertive, high attention to detail, works well under pressure, can solve problems and make decisionsHighly flexible, team player and good sense of humorWorks well in a team and can provide direction when necessaryAbility to speak Spanish a definite assetLocation of work: Your home office; must be willing to travel",Senior Operations Administrator Job in Chicago,Full Time Employee,"Our Client is a global solutions provider for the financial services industry with both domestic and international operations. They specialize in linking legacy banking platforms with modern solutions and are considered one of the leaders in banking and insurance transformation projects across the globe. They are experienced in technical and advisory services and bring innovation and knowledge to many different projects.Senior Operations AdministratorThis is a phenomenal opportunity for a Senior Operations Administrator to join a fun and collaborative team. Do you want to be challenged? Do you possess ambition and passion? Are you looking for a career in an exciting and growing company and working with top professionals in the industry? Then consider joining this team.While reporting to the Director of HR & Operations, you will work on the Immigration of Foreign Workers and assist with financial operations, including some taxes and numerous projects, for our North American operations. Your experience in the consultancy and software sales industry would be a tremendous asset in this role where you can expect to not only contribute and hone your current skill set, but be challenged to grow by applying your thinking and approach to innovation.Responsibilities:Organize and be a point of contact for immigration casesAssist with managing the financial operations of North American entities (Accounts Payable, Accounts Receivable, cash flows, etc.)Work closely with Shared Service Centers throughout the world to ensure efficiencies and collaborationAssist with employee foreign taxesVarious ad hoc projects with varying degrees of complexityProvide excellent internal and external customer serviceAssist with various reporting requirements from external agenciesProvide back up to team members while out of the officeQualifications:Bachelor’s degree from a four-year college or university preferred2-5 years of experience as a Senior Administrator with varying dutiesPreference will be given to candidates with legal assistant experienceMust have knowledge of finance and controlling practicesWilling to take initiative and see task through to completion and / or implementationExcellent knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPointExtraordinary organization skills are absolutely mandatoryOther specialized knowledge and skills:Assertive, high attention to detail, works well under pressure, can solve problems and make decisionsHighly flexible, team player and good sense of humorWorks well in a team and can provide direction when necessaryAbility to speak Spanish a definite assetLocation of work: Your home office; must be willing to travel",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-operations-administrator-job-chicago-il-us-172659524.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,,Administrative SupportOffice ManagementGeneral/Other: Administrative/Clerical,5220d7bb34166764faf8921998a1d2c0
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:06:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary Greet customers in a professional friendly manner to ensure the customer's needs are met while maintaining safety /sanitation standards at all times. Abiding by the Company's Statement of Values and objectives while generating sales growth. Job Responsibilities Provide excellent customer service by being pleasant, greeting customers, attending to their requests and thanking them in a professional, friendly, courteous manner. Meet quality control standards of food service orders through proper food portioning, using fresh ingredients, product presentation and merchandising established by the company. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, etc. Follow daily checklist to ensure safety and sanitation standards/regulations are met. Perform housekeeping duties and maintenance functions as needed to remain compliant with company standards. Check accuracy of prices/ signage of products and services according to the weekly advertisements and other merchandising standards. Adhere to Food Safety/sanitation policies and procedures established by the company. Follow recipes to ensure food consistency. Use suggestive selling techniques, sampling food products daily to customers. Support all company policies as presented in GetGo Handbook regarding safety and security procedures and all other company policies. Follow and complete daily food safety review checklist as required to maintain compliance with periodic Food Service Audit and Steritech inspections. Follow Par Level policies and procedures. Assist customers with using food-ordering kiosks. Meet time requirements for completing customers food orders. Keep work and dining areas clean, stocked and organized. Fill and maintain Grab-n-Go case. Check dates/times for freshness. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Education and Training Desired High school diploma or equivalent plus up to 18 months of additional training Licenses / Certifications Required Food Safety - Experience Required 1 to 3 years Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 1st Shift 2nd Shift Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Business and Financial Acumen Strategic Thinking & Planning Work Environment Cold Prep Rooms Cooler Freezer Fryers/Grease Hot Ovens Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Pushing Grasping Repetitive Motion Unloading Climbing Data Entry Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Matching Operating Equipment Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Sight or Peripheral Vision Sorting Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Weighing Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Floor Blower Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Shrink Wrap Machine Cap Machine Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Texlon Ordering Machine Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Chopper Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Knives Microwave Register",Convnenience Sub Shop Clerk (Part Time) Austintown GetGo Job in Austintown,Full Time Employee,"Austintown, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convnenience-sub-shop-clerk-part-time-austintown-getgo-job-austintown-oh-us-173004051.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=16,,Administrative/Clerical,1e6f0d09e7cbfe4dbe757c422b38d57d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:06:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Jackson Electric Cooperative Staff Administrative Assistant Full-time position with competitive salary and benefit package Primary Responsibilities: General administrative and accounting support Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in Organizational and Professional Communications, Business Administration, or Business Finance or a completed Associate's degree in Business Management, Professional Communication, Organizational Leadership, or Administrative Professional with a minimum of 3-5 years of related experience preferred. Required Skills and Abilities Include: Must have strong knowledge and skills in office procedures, secretarial functions, general accounting functions, recordkeeping, and internal controls; strong organizing, planning, and multi-tasking skills with attention to detail; proficient use of computer software including Microsoft Office programs; excellent verbal, written and interpersonal skills. Must understand the importance of working with the CEO and board of directors; ability to maintain confidentiality is essential. Applications are available at www.jackelec.com or by contacting the office. Please submit your completed JEC application and resume by October 14, 2016, to: Jackson Electric Cooperative Attn: Human Resources P.O. Box 546 N6868 County Road F Black River Falls, WI 54615 715-284-5385 or 800-370-4607 Jackson Electric Cooperative is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Staff Administrative Assistant Job in Black River Falls,Full Time,"Black River Falls, WI 54615",All,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-administrative-assistant-job-black-river-falls-wi-us-172939525.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=16,,,c768d063bdcf9566cbc62534b565681c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:06:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Profile:Our growing client located in North Dallas is seeking an Executive Assistant on a contract to possible hire basis. Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of Client:Employer pays 100% of employees medical insurance; dependent coverage is available at an additional expense to the employee as well as Dental and VisionPTO- Accrual basis401K match up to 6%Expanding operations in Dallas Executive Assistant Profile:The Executive Assistant provides administrative and operational support to the executive team both onsite and remote.Successfully completes critical aspects of deliverables with a hands-on approach, including drafting acknowledgement letters, personal correspondence, and other tasks that facilitate the partner’s ability to communicate with various stakeholdersCompletes a broad variety of administrative tasks for the executives including:Managing calendar of appointmentsCompleting expense reportsComposing and preparing correspondenceArranging detailed travel plans, itineraries, and agendasCompiling documents for travel-related meetingsCommunicates directly and on behalf of the executives, representatives and staff on matters related to the firm’s initiativesWorks closely and effectively with the executives to keep him/her well informed of upcoming commitments and responsibilities, following up appropriatelyEnsures that the company personnel bios are kept updated and responds to requests for materials regarding the executives and the organization in generalPlans and schedules meetings and appointments including agendas, meeting invitations, webinarsReviews and edits investor and company correspondence, reports, and presentationsMaintains discretion and confidentiality in relationships with all the staff, executives and clientsExecutive Assistant Background Profile:High School Diploma or equivalent2-4 years’ experience in professional environment supporting senior level executivesOccasional flexibility to work extended hoursMaintains a professional demeanor and polished appearance on a daily basisStrong organizational skills that reflect the ability to perform and prioritize multiple tasks with excellent attention to detailStrong interpersonal skills and the ability to build relationships with stakeholders, including staff, board members, external executives and clientsDemonstrates advanced written and verbal communication skills with proper grammarExhibit proactive approaches to problem-solving with strong decision-making capabilityHighly resourceful team-player, with the ability to also be extremely effective independentlyProven ability to handle confidential information with discretion, be adaptable to various demands, and demonstrate the highest level of customer/client service and responseDemonstrates ability to achieve high performance goals and meet deadlines in a fast paced environmentExperience an interest in internal and external communications, executive development, and providing high-level customer service internally and externallyProficient in Microsoft Office (Outlook, Access, Word, Excel, and Power Point), Google Docs, Adobe Acrobat, GoTo Webinar and Social Media web platforms.Please visit us at  https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/dallas.html https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Executive Assistant Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-assistant-job-dallas-tx-us-172806424.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=5,17.00 - 24.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,e337bd0b7408115e79d638cf39ecfe10
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:06:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Customer Service Representative Job in Edison, NJ Are you ready to start your career with a company that offers growth, challenge and a commitment to excellence? Our client is currently hiring for a Customer Service Representative Job located in Edison, NJ. The ideal candidate will be able to communicate effectively and professionally with all individuals. This position offers a competitive salary as well as a benefits package.  The Customer Service Representative Job responsibilities include: Meet deadlines to ensure that orders are received on time to maximize salesProvide inbound and outbound customer service phone and email support to customers with questions, issues, or requesting servicesAnswers telephone inquiries for the day to day concerns or issues following standard operating procedures, or redirect calls to inside sales/customer relationship manager, outside sales or technical supportAssess the customer’s needs and direct the caller to the key point of contact with customers promoting positive relationships  Qualifications for the Customer Service Representative Job include: Some college coursework or degree A minimum of 3-5 years of customer service or sales experience is requiredMust be proficient in Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel, Outlook, and PowerPointMust be highly motivated, have a strong work ethic, and an earnest willingness to learn Having experience working with Warehouse Management Software is highly desired  If you have a strong interest in the Customer Service Representative position located in Edison, NJ send an email to nikki.potts@ajilon.com AND apply online at www.ajilon.com   ",Customer Service Rep Job in Edison NJ Job in Edison,Full Time Employee,"Edison, NJ 08837",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-rep-job-in-edison-nj-job-edison-nj-us-172576959.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,,Administrative/Clerical,ae43fc02ac93f488b161960dfdd29712
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:06:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our well establish financial organization is currently in need of an Office Manager!Salary: Up to 65K DOEHours: Full Time - Monday-Friday/ 8:00AM-5:00PMBenefits: Fortune 500 Benefits Package!!! Job Duties Include: ? Administrative duties ? Tenant relations? Lease administration? Maintain property databases and produce reports? Coordinate property maintenance ? Read and understand complex lease and contract terms and make recommendations? Handle sensitive and confidential information Qualified candidate must possess:? A minimum of 5+ years? experience in property management or commercial real estate environment? 5+ years of recent Office Management experience ? Personality will be a KEY component to this positionKey Competencies? Basic Accounts Payable, Basic Accounts Receivable, Intermediate MS Excel.? Keen sense of accuracy and attention to detailWe are moving quickly on this position! Don't wait and apply with your resume today!!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:Bilingual in Mandarin Chinese is a HUGE plus!!!Years of Experience Required:",Office Manager - Canoga Park Job in Canoga Park,Full Time Employee,"Canoga Park, CA 91304",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-canoga-park-job-canoga-park-ca-us-172656384.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e98d0fc332596c57381dd36902bf1b11
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:06:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Excellent opportunity to for an Administrative Assistant to support a team of real-estate professionals and Property Managers! As the Administrative Assistant, you will be responsible for interacting with tenants and clients; reviewing and processing invoices for payments; assisting in the preparation of annual budgets; backing up the Receptionist as needed; preparing and closing contracts; and updating internal documents with tenant and vendor information. The qualified candidate must have 3+ years of relevant experience; strong project management, negotiating, writing, and customer service skills. This is an exciting opportunity to support a fast-paced team!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Find Us on Facebook!Follow Us on Twitter!Company Profile:Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Administrative Assistant to $k - Commercial Real-Estate Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,BostonMA,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-to-44k-commercial-real-estate-job-boston-ma-us-172964010.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=1,"0.00 - 44,000.00 $ /year",Administrative/Clerical,110aebf97671b151bc221fa957086869
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:24:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Inside Sales Position Features:? Independent Work Attitude? Great Environment? Advancement Opportunities? Great PayThe ideal candidate will have preferably two or more years of administrative assistant experience. The ideal candidate will be a self-starter, be familiar with an office setting, customer focused and work in a fast pace environment. The ideal candidate will know how to operate a computer, handle a multi-line phone system, greet customers, work on special projects as needed, use Microsoft Office and work well with others. Bilingual a plus, but not required. If you feel that you meet these requirements and this is great opportunity then apply today!!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075658 Job Experience:,, Commitment, Hard working, Detailed oriented, Microsoft OfficeYears of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant Job in Henderson,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Henderson, NV 89014",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-henderson-nv-us-172840044.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0aab69cf1b888788f9a8561413c2e36e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:25:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job DescriptionAt Panda, we all share a common mission: ""Deliver exceptional Asian dining experiences by building an organization where people are inspired to better their lives."" We invest in our people because great people run great operations that will exceed our guests' expectations. Talk to any of our associates and you will experience a culture dedicated to its mission and our five fundamental values- Proactive, Respect/Win-Win, Growth, Great Operations, and Giving. Panda Restaurant Group includes the original Panda Inn fine dining restaurants, Panda Express, our Gourmet Chinese food concept served in a fast casual environment, and Hibachi San, our Japanese grill concept. The family owned and operated company is still run by founders Andrew and Peggy Cherng. Panda offers competitive benefits and rewarding opportunities, from entry-level positions to management. We have restaurant positions available nationwide and support center positions in Rosemead, CA. Come join the nation's largest and fastest growing Asian restaurant company. Job Descriptions • Monitors project status, budget, and resource utilization.  • Oversees the progress of multiple projects and identifies resources needed to complete projects on time and within budget.  Communicates status of project to project leaders and stakeholders. • Coordinates the plan and schedule for rolling out a new or modified system or product; creates system documentation. • Coordinates the kick-off meeting for each project, communicating purpose of project. • Helps project team establish milestone dates and tracks that milestones are met.  Qualifications Bachelor's degree in Business, IS or related field Minimum three years of experience, preferably in a retail/ hospitality environment . Successful completion of annual store training KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES: Ability to demonstrate and teach Panda’s Mission, Values, and Culture Knowledge and proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite and project server Strong computer/technology skills and highly proficient in Microsoft Office Suite Communication (oral and written), presentation and facilitation skills Financial and project management and analysis skills Critical thinking and analysis skills and demonstrates proactive behavior Time management, prioritization, and organizational skills Ability to solve problems independently Ability to work positively with other departments and Operations (“win/win” Ability to talk and share before a group Ability to embrace change and continuous learning     Panda Restaurant Group’s culture is strongly guided by our Mission and Values, highlighted on the Panda websites.  We recommend all interested candidates become familiar with our Mission and Values, as well as the principles of The Seven Habits of Highly Effective People, by Stephen Covey.   Panda Restaurant Group, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer   Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xpandamcx/cjt/slider-1.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xpandamcx/cjt/slider-2.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xpandamcx/cjt/slider-3.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xpandamcx/cjt/slider-4.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Panda Restaurant Group Job Application for Project Administrator | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Phone 6267999898 Address Rosemead, CA 91770",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/project-administrator-job-rosemead-ca-us-172597596.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=18,,,bee978a8abfbad5bcf67349bfef6adc1
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:12:55:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"DTI is the nationâ€™s largest independent provider of e-discovery, managed document review, facilities management and knowledge process outsourcing. DTI serves the nationâ€™s leading law firms and Fortune 500 corporations through its 26 highly secure service centers located in major cities across the United States. We believe that we have achieved this success by providing our customers the highest level of quality and service. This reputation for quality and performance rests 100% on the efforts of our employees. In order to continue our growth and success, we must constantly look to add high-caliber individuals to our team. If you have a â€œcan doâ€ attitude, together with a â€œclient firstâ€ set of priorities, we guarantee that we have an opportunity for you. Position Description:DTI Global, LLC provides management solutions for Law Firms all over the world- including but not limited to: Data Management, Court Reporting, Accounting and IT Support, and On-Site Legal Administrative Support.This is a full time, permanent position that consists of copy/print/mail and other various office duties in a Law Firm. The ideal candidate has previous experience and good knowledge of copy machine equipment, scanning, and printing, and has also had prior experience with corporate/legal mail responsibilities.Duties include:Mail: Receiving, documenting, sorting, distributing, collecting, plus outgoing itemsReception Duties: Answering calls, redirecting, note taking, etc.Copy Services: Copy/scan/print projectsHospitality: Setup/cleanup kitchens, conference rooms, etc.Facilities: Coordinating and assisting with office moves, furniture rearrangement, etc.Maintain a positive team-player mentalityQualifications:HS Diploma or equivalentComputer literatePrevious Customer Service experience Flexibility in dealing with simultaneous projectsAttention to detailAbility to function with a high level of patience, tact and diplomacy in handling any ""complaint"" situationsAbility to lift or move 40 lbs. or greaterAbility to grasp, lift and/or carry or otherwise move packages on a standard wheeled cart with a load capacity of 100lbsAbility to walk, bend, kneel, stand, and/or sit for an extended period of timeHospitable attitudeWilling to grow within the organization Qualifications:.",Service Specialist â€“ Law Firm /  Job in Denver,"Part Time, Employee","Denver, CO 80202",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/service-specialist-%C3%A2%E2%82%AC%E2%80%9C-law-firm-1921-job-denver-co-us-172678160.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,,Administrative/Clerical,7fdaab85a221fd4463549a18491b1203
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:33:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative Assistant Job in Middlesex County, NJ Our client is hiring for an Administrative Assistant job located in Middlesex County, NJ. We are currently looking for someone who will support managers and employees through a variety of tasks related to organization. This position requires strong verbal and communication skills and a high level of motivation. The administrative assistant job is a great opportunity for an individual who is looking to learn and grow within a successful organization. This position offers a competitive salary of $40-45. The Administrative Assistant Job Responsibilities include: Answer, screen, and forward incoming telephone calls while providing basic information as neededUpdate appointment calendars and schedule meetings/appointmentsMaintain customer and employee confidence and protect operations by keeping information confidential.Assist with various other administrative assignments as they arise including mailings, faxing, filing, copying and calendar management  Qualifications: Must have Bachelor’s Degree 3+ years of administrative experienceMust be proficient in Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel, Outlook, and PowerPointExtremely proactive, experience working in a stressful and fast-paced environmentExceptional proofreading and editing skills as well as effective verbal and written communication skillsAbility to prioritize tasks and work independently as well as collaborate in a team environment.  If you have a strong interest in the Administrative Assistant job located in Middlesex County, NJ send an email to nikki.potts@ajilon.com AND apply online at www.ajilon.com. ;  ",Administrative Assistant Job in Edison,Full Time Employee,"Edison, NJ 08837",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-in-edison-nj-job-edison-nj-us-172577217.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=19,,Administrative/Clerical,137a20b3175b6a6bac5dd5a05e80b80e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:38:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Superior Group is looking for Customer Service/Data Entry (Third Party Resource Specialist) for our Client located in Irving, TX.Researches and verifies eligibility information via online lookups to carrier eligibility websites or by phone with various carriers and updates the state MMIS system. Answers incoming calls from providers, Medicaid recipients, and other entities in relation to private/commercial insurance. Maintains an accuracy of 99% or above on all work activities per contractual obligation with state. Performs other duties as assigned. Knowledge of state Medicaid systems.Ability to be careful and thorough. Ability to build relationships both in person and over the phone. Ability to navigate various websites. Average manual dexterity in use of a PC, phone, sorting, filing and other office machines. Working knowledge of HIPAA privacy and security rules. Ability to organize well. Ability to perform well in team environment. Ability to work independently to meet objectives. Ability to meet deadlines. Develops effective working relationships with internal and external clients. Meets attendance guidelines. Adheres to corporate and office policies. Proactively identify areas of improvements within daily work activities Gain general understanding of Client and office operations Required Skills / Qualifications:High School Diploma Minimum of 1 years’ experience in insurance verifications. Minimum of 2 years’ experience Customers call center environment. Preferred Skills / Qualifications:Associate’s degree.Ability to communicate both verbally and in writing, fluently in English. Ability to work proficiently with company software used on the project (i.e. Microsoft Word, Excel, Image Now, etc.). Go Beyond. EEO Employer - Minorities / Females / Disabled / Veterans / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity.",Customer Service/Data Entry (Third Party Resource Specialist) Job in Irving,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Irving, TX 75038",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-data-entry-third-party-resource-specialist-job-irving-tx-us-172749525.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=14,,Administrative/Clerical,640bc522193b867b51917d697c43b4d0
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:39:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ajilon Professional Staffing currently has a Part time Legal Administrative Assistant job located in Princeton, NJ. The ideal candidate is required to have 2-3 years of experience in a fast pace environment. This person will provide secretarial and administrative support to a department, management team, and/or executive.  Responsibilities/Qualifications for the Part time Legal Administrative Assistant job include: • 1-3 years of relevant experience in an office environment.• Answer and screen calls in a timely manner.• Schedule appointments, maintain calendars, and make travel arrangements.• Coordinating office shipments through UPS and FedEx  • Knowledge of Microsoft office including Word and Excel. If interested in our Legal Administrative Assistant job located in Princeton, NJ, please apply today or email your resume to Chelsea.Stropoli@ajilon.com To view our other office and administrative openings, please visit our website at www.ajilon.com.   ;",Part time Legal Administrative Assistant job in Princeton,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Princeton, NJ 08540",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-legal-administrative-assistant-job-in-princeton-nj-job-princeton-nj-us-172433940.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=17,,Administrative/Clerical,4dcefdcb83bbac6b9b526681527371d7
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:44:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have an exciting opportunity for a Experienced Front Desk Medical Receptionist at our Physical Therapy Clinic! We are currently seeking a experienced medical receptionist for an Outpatient physical therapy clinic located in Middleburg, VA. We are looking for a strong, experienced, dependable, responsible, and multi-tasked individual who can keep the front office running smoothly! WE DO REQUIRE 1 SOLID YEAR OF MEDICAL RECEPTIONIST EXPERIENCE! Job Duties:•Greet patients•Answer phones•Electronic Scheduling•Data Entry•Verify current personal and financial information•Book appointments•Verify insurance benefits•Charge tickets•Collecting money over the counter•Faxing and Filing and perform any other duties assignedJob Requirements:• Must have 2+years of previous knowledge in a medical front office. If you do not have medical receptionist experience, please do not apply, we require medical receptionist exp.• Excellent telephone skills • Must be proficient in Word and Excel. • Previous experience with Medical Manager, Medisoft or other medical software preferred. • Team player attitude, energetic, with a focus on excellent customer service.• Be flexible with your hours.• Attention to detail• Time Management skills• Be Organized Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to stand and sit. The employee is frequently required to be mobile. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 30 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus.We offer a competitive total compensation package including hourly wage as well as a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, disability, life and a 401(k) plan, in addition to other outstanding benefits such as Paid Time Off. A valid driver's license is required and any employment offers are contingent upon a clear background check.Please NO Agency calls.Please apply online to be considered with salary history. We do look for stable past work history. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer - M/F/D/V PI95462114",Medical Front Office Receptionist Job in Middleburg,Full Time,"Middleburg, VA 20117",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-front-office-receptionist-job-middleburg-va-us-172905847.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=1,Hourly Wage,,dfe6e53f48492a2937c3b399e1c27940
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:45:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Immediate need for an experienced Administrative Assistant to work in a hospital setting. 2+ years experience as an Admin Assistant required, however no medical experience is required. Location: Beverly Hills Hours: Mon-Fri regular business hours Primary Duties include: -answering heavy phones-scheduling meetings/calendar for supervisor in Outlook -writing correspondence in Word -creating reports in Excel -coordinating special projects/events Prior Experience:-busy office environment-2+ years of admin experience Requirements:-High School Diploma (some college preferred) -ability to multi-task-strong communication skills We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,,, Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)Typing 30 WPM+Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - $/hr Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Job Description:Immediate need for an experienced Administrative Assistant to work in a hospital setting. 2+ years experience as an Admin Assistant required, however no medical experience is required. Location: Beverly Hills Hours: Mon-Fri regular business hours Primary Duties include: -answering heavy phones-scheduling meetings/calendar for supervisor in Outlook -writing correspondence in Word -creating reports in Excel -coordinating special projects/events Prior Experience:-busy office environment-2+ years of admin experience Requirements:-High School Diploma (some college preferred) -ability to multi-task-strong communication skills We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,,, Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)Typing 30 WPM+Years of Experience Required:",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-15-hr-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172926025.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a016f7b25c38f22586b3676a093f604a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:58:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This is an excellent opportunity to showcase your hospitality and/or superb customer service skills as a Showroom Coordinator. This very well established and prestigious firm works with the leaders in design, architecture and construction. Full training will prepare you to handle all walk in traffic, answer phones, track orders, coordinate meetings, set up appointments, do inventory, and some merchandising all with an emphasis on customer service. This is a terrific opportunity to get your foot in the door and learn the business from the ground up. Your ability to relate to exterior and interior design products, along with how comfortable you are working with an elite group of customers will help qualify you. While this is an entry level position, we are looking for prior hospitality or customer service skills, a positive attitude and a desire to work in a professional showroom environment. On a bus line and free parking. Interviewing this week so contact us ASAP and please include a short blurb or cover letter. No direct experience needed. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075292 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Showroom Coordinator to $ - Entry Level Job in Seattle,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Seattle, WA 98161",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/showroom-coordinator-to-15-entry-level-job-seattle-wa-us-172749713.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),75b48e3944ea102c20888ffff6b322e8
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:58:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"John L Scott, a National Leader in Real Estate, is seeking an Office Administrator to provide support to Management, Staff and Real Estate Brokers within our Poulsbo, Washington location. This role is responsible for making sure the office runs smoothly on a daily basis; this includes everything from operational processes, technical challenges, managing the front desk and implementing new programs and tools provided by John L Scott’s Service Center. This position works closely with the Branch Manager to assure that our clients and broker’s needs are met, as customer service is our top priority. This position requires exceptional organizational skills, the ability to multitask, a communication style that is tactful and professional and a passion to provide outstanding service to internal staff as well as our real estate brokers. About UsJohn L. Scott Real Estate was founded in 1931 in downtown Seattle, Washington. Through the years, we have grown to become one of the most productive real estate brokerage companies in the nation. That’s because we are a company that prides itself on supporting each individual sales associate and the relationship with their clients. We do this through comprehensive marketing programs and services, an award winning website, extensive business development programs, and superior residential brokerage services. We are passionate about our company, community and working together to achieve common goals!Responsibilities include but not limited to:• Administer policies and procedures• May manage up to four staff members• Carry out administrative activities• Coordinate and plan for office services• Delegate work to office support staff• Ensure deadlines are met and procedures are followed• Establish work priorities• Oversee and coordinate office administrative procedures• Review, evaluate and implement new procedures• Implements and promotes John L. Scott programs and tools• Maintaining fully operational, visually appealing professional facilityQualifications & Skills:• Supervisory/Management experience• College degree or equivalent work experience• Microsoft Office intermediate/advanced skills• Sales and/or Real Estate experience helpful• Social Media Experience• Tech Savvy• Adapt to a variety of situations• Great attention to detail• Shows initiative• Solves problems effectively• Well organized• Works well independently• Social Media• Android/iOS• MS Office Outlook Suite, Windows and MacEducation and Experience:• 2 years experience working in an office administrative or office management role • 2 years supervisory experience• High school graduate • Knowledge or experience in Real Estate industry a plusCompensation:• Based on related experience • Eligible for benefits, including medical, dental and vision",Office Administrator Job in Poulsbo,Full Time,"Poulsbo, WA 98370",All,http://jobview.monster.com/office-administrator-job-poulsbo-wa-us-172917838.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f3375bb574e408600f7c2b5cd5affe7d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:58:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative AssistantGrowing company in the downtown Austin area is looking to add an Administrative Assistant to the Operations Manager to their team on a Direct Hire Basis.Company Profile:This company is the second largest supplier of Sports lighting systems in the world.. They have been in business for over 16 years and offers a great company culture.Features and Benefits:100% paid employee Medical/Dental/Life planPTO401KLaid back and casual environmentClose knit groupAdministrative Assistant Role:The Administrative Assistant will include daily customer contact to collect: Equipment RequirementsCredit InformationApplicable data to perform an accurate quote The Administrative Assistant will perform data entry of details into a project fileAbility to be the gatekeeper for the Operations Manager is essential to the Administrative Assistant roleA variety of other administrative tasks may develop as growth continues and responsibilities increase. Background Profile:2-5 years experience in Administrative SupportSupporting a Manager or Director level preferredWord, Excel, PowerPoint, KeynoteHigh level verbal and written communication abilityAbility to adapt to a fast paced work environmentUpbeat and personable personalityHigh attention to detail is a mustAbility to prioritize and handle multiple tasks for Operations manager, sales team, and for the production and logistics teamPlease visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com  Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Administrative Assistant Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-austin-tx-us-172960818.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,"31,200.00+ /year",Administrative/Clerical,510d467999d320861abadd8d35b89ae8
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:58:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Lewis Rice LLC, a large downtown St. Louis law firm, has an opening for a full-time Service Center Clerk.  The Service Center Clerk will work with attorneys and legal support staff in an efficient and professional manner to perform general office work. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to, copy work, faxing, filing, preparing outgoing mail, running errands in immediate downtown area, and lifting boxes/assisting with office moves. Requirements for this position include basic computer knowledge (including Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel, Internet and database knowledge), strong organizational skills, attention to detail, flexibility, time management skills, a strong customer service attitude and the ability to lift up to 50 pounds. Previous experience in a professional office environment preferred. Finally, successful candidates will be willing to assist other team members on long-term projects or urgent deadlines. This position requires a 40 hour work week, 8:00 a.m.-5:00 p.m., Tuesday-Saturday. Occasional overtime may be required. The salary for this position is $12.50 an hour in addition to an excellent comprehensive benefits package including major medical plans, 401(k) plan and paid parking. ",Service Center Clerk Job in Saint Louis,Full Time Employee,"Saint Louis, MO 63101",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/service-center-clerk-job-saint-louis-mo-us-172997003.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=11,"0.00 - 26,000.00 $ /year",Administrative/Clerical,a7687debc316bba5df00cf67d5cdc47a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:58:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Superior Group is looking for Document Control Clerk for our Client located in Overland Park, KS.Ability to work independently with minimal direct supervision Ability to learn utilization of the e-versatile software Demonstrate an innovative, positive attitude, with creativity and flexibility Uses databases/computer systems to compile and upload files Talking/verbal communication is essential during a significant period of the work day in order to collect and disseminate data/information or when providing training. Standing and walking are also required on a regular basis due to the expansive areas of the facility covered on a daily basis. Some duties require working with equipment that may involve manual finger dexterity, repetitive motion or lifting (up to 35 pounds). Ability to create documents, spreadsheets, and database applications using many different types of computer software. Personal Computer/Software, telephone, data collectors, copy machine, fax machine Work functions are indoors. Required Skills / Qualifications:High school or GED.Minimum of 2 years’ experience as Document Control ClerkPreferred Skills / Qualifications:Excellent time management, organization and resource utilization skills Verbal and written communication skills are the primary means for accomplishing the objectives of this position. Incumbents must use varying degrees of analyzing, reasoning, problem-solving, and evaluation skills on a regular basis to accurately capture and data and information. Math comprehension skills are also necessary in working with a significant amount of data. Minimum of 2 years’ experience SharePoint and Access DB. Go Beyond. EEO Employer - Minorities / Females / Disabled / Veterans / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity.",Document Control Clerk Job in Overland Park,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Overland Park, KS 66214",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/document-control-clerk-job-overland-park-ks-us-173015517.aspx?mescoid=1500148001001&jobPosition=9,,Administrative/Clerical,4a8fd6d68b8ece51f2c3a58de4e84a86
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:58:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our WLA client is a well-established professional services firm seeking an administrative assistant to join their team. They are looking for a detail oriented professional with experience in a support role. This position requires a self-motivated individual with a positive and flexible attitude looking to be part of a team and make a contribution in this challenging but rewarding role. Ideally, the right professional will possess a minimum of 4+ years as an administrative assistant supporting a senior level professional. This person will also need a working understanding of Microsoft Word, PowerPoint and Outlook and must be comfortable communicating across all levels of an organization. Experience booking all aspects of travel is a plus. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074616 Job Experience:,, Word, PowerPoint, Excel, OutlookYears of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant in WLA - Positive & Flexible Attitude Needed! Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90034",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-in-wla-positive-flexible-attitude-needed!-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172603927.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),69231534050230c4f37c22d1e37cf11b
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:58:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Grocery team, you will be responsible for replenishing stock for our customers. The majority of your time will be spent on the sales floor, directly interacting with our customers and ensuring they are able to find the products they need. As a member of our team, you will also be fully trained and able to assist customers in other areas in the store including, but not limited to, the Dairy and Frozen Departments, as well as the Front End service area. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by ensuring products are replenished on the shelves and helping customers locate product. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Be knowledgeable of weekly ad items. Smiles and greets customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Replenish product on the shelf, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room. Set up displays on the sales floor. Assist in maintaining back room efficiency by unloading deliveries. Rotate and check code dates on products to ensure customers safety. Assist in other areas as required. Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 16 years of age Shift 3rd Shift - 10p - 6a (Overnight) Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Numeric Computation/Reporting Presentation & Verbal Communic Written Communication Takes Direction Work Environment Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Matching Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Sight or Peripheral Vision Sorting Standing Twisting Communication (verbal) Unloading Walking Equipment Used Cardboard Baler Compactor Electric/Manual Jacks Safety Cutter Trash compactor U-Boats",Overnight Stock Clerk-(Part-Time)-Canfield Giant Eagle Job in Canfield,Full Time Employee,"Canfield, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/overnight-stock-clerk-part-time-canfield-giant-eagle-job-canfield-oh-us-173008651.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=16,,Administrative/Clerical,4f4cf8bc33d35ca113948e05e04b2c6c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:58:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requirements:License/Certification/Education: Requires a B.S./B.A. Degree w/3-5 year’s experience and must meet CLIA requirements.Job Description: Oversees the operations and administration of several departments within a LEVEL III laboratory environment.  Education/Experience must meet CLIA requirements. Ability to relate professionally with people, analytical abilities, compose letters/memorandum, coordinate events, motivate others, organizational skills, research information, time management, train employees, written and verbal communications, supervisory skills.",Lab Manager Job in Haymarket,Full Time Employee,"Haymarket, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/lab-manager-job-haymarket-va-us-172927839.aspx?mescoid=1100048001001&jobPosition=18,,Administrative/Clerical,b64a69319d00122dd41dfb5e1c7e8ebe
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:59:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsWe are a solutions-driven property management company, managing a portfolio of commercial real estate properties (office).Responsibilities• Assisting with all aspects of administrative management• Scheduling and coordinating meetings, interviews, events and other similar activities• Sending out and receiving mail and packages• Preparing business correspondence• Sending faxes• Managing Files• Research and the identification of key data sources• Performing multifaceted general office support• Preparing meeting minutes, meeting notes and internal support materials• Sending and receiving forms for the company• All Day-to-day operation matters• Provide excellent customer service to all clients and office staff• Exhibits enthusiasm, courtesy, adaptability, flexibility, and spirit of cooperation in the work environment• Place monthly office orders for supplies; including: kitchen supplies, office supplies, monthly coffee order and employee supply requests. While maintaining monthly budgets• Works with Human Resources to help coordinate and execute regular office events; such as monthly birthday celebrations, office potlucks and seasonal events• Arranges corporate travel and meetings (when needed); including: booking airfare, transportation and lodging and any possible meeting accommodations during travelEducation• High School Diploma (or equivalent)• Post Secondary EducationQualifications• Human Resource experience preferred• Spanish is a plusSkills• Customer service oriented - Approach to work• Must have the ability to communicate accurately and clearly both orally and in writing• Knowledge of computers; specifically, experience in Microsoft Office is preferable• Must have superior organizational skills and accuracy• Excellent problem solving and people skills also required• Associated degree preferred• Two year of administrative experience• Ability to work independently with good judgment and professionalism, along with managing multiple projects in a timely manner• Provide excellent customer service to internal and external customers. Maintain confidentiality, accuracy, dependability, and initiativeCompensation$30,500 - 34,000 per yearPosition TypeFull-TimeBenefitsThis position offers an excellent compensation and benefits package, including comprehensive medical/dental, 401(k) with a company match.",Administrative Assistant Job in Hallandale Beach,Full Time,"Hallandale Beach, FL 33009",All,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-hallandale-beach-fl-us-172993932.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b961255f39b08189c6aeaddda4d9f190
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:59:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job DescriptionThe Supervising Operations Associate is a member of the on-site Williams Lea team delivering exceptional customer service at our client locations. Responsibilities include leading a team in mail distribution, copy services, hospitality and conference room set-up, reception assistance and other general office duties as needed. Job Responsibilities:Process high volumes of incoming and outgoing mail. Deliver mail and packages throughout the client location, following applicable distribution procedures.Complete large numbers of reprographics requests according to job ticket instructions.Bind, cut, and/or assemble reprographics jobs as necessary.Load copiers with paper and toner as needed.Set-up conference rooms including audio/visual equipment, furniture configuration, and food/beverages as needed.Assist with reception coverage, including managing multiple phone lines and visitor check-in.Coordinate workflow within the team, including prioritizing jobs and delegating duties to associates.Monitor work flow to ensure jobs are completed efficiently, accurately and within deadlines.Assess incoming requests selecting the best equipment and resources for successful completion.Handle sensitive and/or confidential documents and information.Train new employees on policies and procedures.Communicate with manager and client on job or deadline issues.RequirementsJob Requirements:High school diploma or equivalent. Minimum of two years office service experience, preferably in a legal, banking or large corporate environment.Understanding of postal equipment, including standard shipping software.Awareness of postal rules, with the ability to explain relevant regulations to clients.Knowledge of reprographics equipment, including various models for color and black/white copies.Experience binding, collating, cutting and assembling reprographics jobs.Demonstrated hospitality and reception experience.Ability to lead and direct employees. Ability to make independent decisions and use problem-solving skills.Ability to work in a fast-paced team environment.Attention to detail with emphasis on accuracy and quality.Ability to prioritize work to balance multiple projects and deadlines.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Exceptional customer service skills. Intermediate computer skills required. Must be able to lift up to 50 lbs. on a regular basis.Must be able to work standing up all or most of the time. Williams Lea offers an exciting and supportive business environment. We develop our people and reward their contribution.  We work with openness and integrity. We are an equal opportunity employer.  We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform preemployment substance abuse testing. WLRSR Report","Williams Lea Job Application for Supervising Operations Associate - Office Services | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Address Washington, DC 20001",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/supervising-operations-associate-office-services-job-washington-dc-us-172007105.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,,3e604bb12f9b57bdebdff9910df3dc1b
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:59:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"The nation's leading administrator of long term care insurance services is looking for YOU.  This is your opportunity to join a company with a culture that promotes respect for people, integrity, learning and initiative. WE ARE THE KIND OF EMPLOYER YOU DESERVE. LTCG is a leading provider of business process outsourcing for the insurance industry, managing over 1.3 million long-term care policies for the nation's largest insurers. We also provide clients with unique risk management insight built upon our proprietary long term care databases. This position is responsible for gathering and reviewing requirements for the purpose of determining initial and ongoing claimant and provider eligibility. RESPONSIBILITIES1. Assess claimant eligibility by reviewing medical records from all current providers and conducting phone assessments with the claimant or legal representative. In the event of noted inconsistencies in the claimant eligibility, coordinate a benefit eligibility assessment in order to make a final determination.2. In conjunction with plan language upon initial assessment and ongoing recertification, determine legitimacy and eligibility of service providers by requesting and reviewing provider licensing credentials, state-specific regulations, internet searches and phone assessments with the servicing provider.3. Effectively communicate, verbal and written, all aspects of the claim benefit determination process.4. Assist claimants with modifications to their current care plan, including changes in care needs as well as changes in provider. 5. Monitor daily, weekly and monthly reports to ensure claims are handled timely and appropriately.6. Attend case conferences, internally and with the client, to present claims recommendations.7. Meet quality and production metrics as established and communicated by the department.8. Reviews Care Coordinator decision recommendations on tax qualified policies.9. Other duties as assigned.  Minimum Qualifications* RN Nursing or Social Work license.* 3 years work experience with older adult population.* Intermediate level experience with Microsoft Office products.* Required to uphold the principles of compliance as outlined in the Code of Conduct, Employee Handbook and related policies and procedures. Supports and participates in the mandatory Corporate Compliance Program training initiative on an annual or more frequent basis, as required.Preferred Qualifications* Care planning experience preferred.* Experience with insurance contract interpretation preferred.* Excellent verbal and written communication skills.* Lead Level: minimum of one year experience with Long Term Care Insurance Care ManagementEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Claims-Care Manager (RN or LSW) Woodbury or Eden Prairie Job in Woodbury,"Full Time, Employee","Woodbury, MN 55125",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-care-manager-rn-or-lsw-woodbury-or-eden-prairie-job-woodbury-mn-us-173002024.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=7,,Administrative/Clerical,37a0f0b265e52a5ce00c9ae0d35be3e4
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:13:59:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have a great opportunity for a Office Administrator in Denver, CO on a contract to possible hire basis.  Friendly office environment and excellent opportunity for growth - come join their team! Company Profile:International Architectual Firm - Established 1961Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of Client:Medical, Dental & VisionPaid Parking 15 PTO Days10 Paid Holidays  401kStock Options STD/LTD Friendly office environment Opportunity for Growth!  Office Administrator Role:The Office Administrator is an essential role as you are the face and first impression of the company.  Daily duties would include: Answering incoming calls and directing them to the appropriate person Greet visitors with a friendly and professional attitude Review new contracts before passing on to managementPrepare, copy, edit, and proofread various documents and proposals Mail distribution Ordering office suppliesCalendar management – schedule and prepare conference rooms for meetingsData Entry – expense reports, contractor punch lists, project fact sheets, etc. Travel Arrangements – Domestic Filing, scanning and ordering of prints from various construction site projectsOther duties as assigned Office Administrator Profile:HS Diploma Required 1-3 years office support experience Highly organized and self-motivated work ethic  Proficiency in MS Office (Excel, Word, Outlook)Exposure to InDesign and Photoshop is a plus Comfortable in a fast-paced environment and ability to meet deadlinesExcellent written and verbal communication skills is a must Ability to learn new tasks quickly Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com  Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). ",Office Administrator Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/office-administrator-job-denver-co-us-172960828.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=14,15.00 - 18.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,e176ee6e23960bd708db47e9a8aafeee
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:14:26:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Temporary Front Desk Broker Services RepresentativeJohn L Scott a National Leader in Real Estate is seeking a Temporary Front Desk Broker Services Representative (BSR) for the next 30 plus days to assist during this busy period. The BSR provides support to a large busy real estate office, supporting Staff and Real Estate Brokers within our Puyallup location. This role is instrumental in creating an atmosphere of customer service while maintaining the phones and greeting guests. In addition, the BSR will support the office in administrative tasks, provide technical assistance and manage the front desk. This is truly an important role as John L Scott is known for the excellent service we provide; the BSR is a critical part of this mission. John L. Scott Real Estate was founded in 1931 in downtown Seattle, Washington. Through the years, we have grown to become one of the most productive real estate brokerage companies in the nation. That’s because we are a company that prides itself on supporting each individual sales associate and the relationship with their clients. We do this through comprehensive marketing programs and services, an award winning website, extensive business development programs, and superior residential brokerage services. We are passionate about our company, community and working together to achieve common goals!Responsibilities include but not limited to:• Greet and direct guests and employees to appropriate areas• Perform administrative tasks such as answering phones & responding to emails• Provide friendly and helpful service to brokers and clients• Assist brokers with day-to-day technical support• Maintain a trusting and team-oriented relationship with the entire branch support team• Provide a range of Broker Services: listing, transaction, UCR and marketing services. Includes all tasks on the Broker Services Menu of Services• Team with other office staff to complete work• Perform other related duties as assigned by Office Leader & Office Administrator• Assist with projects as assignedQualifications:• Ability to work a 40 hours week during business hours • Strong communication, interpersonal and organizational skills• Computer skills including an ability & willingness to learn new applications as required• A passion for the customer service• Enjoys being part of a team• Standard office skills -- computers, multi-line phones, copiers, etc.• The ability to understand the Company culture in client/broker/management relationships• A professional appearance and demeanor• Highly organized• Ability to multi-task and prioritize an ever-changing workload• Maintain confidentiality, integrity, professionalism• Exercise good judgment and maintain composure under pressure Experience and Education:• One to two years customer service experience• Administrative experience • BA or AA degree preferred• Technology efficient in PowerPoint, Excel and wordCompensation:Based on related experience",Front Desk Broker Services Representative Job in Puyallup,Full Time,"Puyallup, WA 98372",All,http://jobview.monster.com/front-desk-broker-services-representative-job-puyallup-wa-us-172959845.aspx?mescoid=4100674001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6dbf88703d4d5ccfeafa7cf3febd591f
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:14:36:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"You have a proven track record of success but you're looking for more. More responsibility. More challenges.At Wells Fargo you'll find that opportunity. You'll join a team of people who are intelligent, talented and share your values. You will enjoy a diverse career as you learn and grow your capabilities across our multiple lines of business. Our supportive environment can help you make a difference within the company and the communities we serve.Wells Fargo & Company (NYSE: WFC) is a diversified, community-based financial services company with $1.8 trillion in assets. Founded in 1852 and headquartered in San Francisco, Wells Fargo provides banking, insurance, investments, mortgage, and consumer and commercial finance through 8,700 locations, 13,000 ATMs, the internet (wellsfargo.com) and mobile banking, and has offices in 36 countries to support customers who conduct business in the global economy. With approximately 265,000 team members, Wells Fargo serves one in three households in the United States. Wells Fargo & Company was ranked No. 30 on Fortune's 2015 rankings of America's largest corporations. Wells Fargo's vision is to satisfy our customers' financial needs and help them succeed financially. Wells Fargo perspectives are also available at Wells Fargo Blogs and Wells Fargo Stories .Corporate Communications manages external and executive communications, including media relations and public relations. The group also sets internal communication strategy and produces enterprise-wide and line of business-specific communications to reach our valued team members.The Consumer Lending Group (CLG) and Wealth & Investment Management (WIM) Corporate Communications team is comprised of 80 individuals geographically dispersed throughout the United States. With the leader based in San Francisco, the Executive Assistant will help coordinate communication and activities with the team, its clients and its stakeholders.This position will perform a variety of administrative duties in support of the senior vice president who is the head of communications for two of Wells Fargo's principal business groups: the Consumer Lending Group (CLG) and Wealth & Investment Management (WIM).General duties include:- Using Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint to compose complex and/or confidential correspondence and presentations.- Provide support and facilitate larger projects managed by others and may manage less complex projects- Act as an information source on group and company policies.Specific duties include:- Ensure leader is prepared for meetings and presentations several weeks out including daily update of full calendar and materials needed for following day.- Manage busy Executive calendar and coordinate Executive's interface with internal clients and team members; proactively anticipate prep needed for meetings. !!-- -->- Handle a high volume of phone calls and correspondence directed to the Executive from customers, vendors, media, internal executives and others and/or selectively refer callers.- Coordinate and complete travel arrangements.- Handle the most sensitive customer/internal executive and team member issues and all personal/confidential company materials with sensitivity and discretion.- Review correspondence, reports, memos and presentations; responsible for proofreading, editing and quality control; some composition of correspondence also required.- Prepare PowerPoint presentations and other visual elements of communications plans and strategy memos.- Track communications team activities and assist with meeting minutes from team meetings and activity reports to clients.- !!-- -->Work with leader to ensure staff management obligations are met (performance reviews, calendaring, process, input, budget preparation)- Manage meetings and events to include in-person and remotely-managed meetings. !!-- -->- Participate with Operations Manager and project team to develop, coordinate and manage Team Video Conferences and Offsite meetings.- Confirm validity of General Ledger 31 monthly reports.- Process IC Card expense reports and accounts payable invoices in a timely manner.- Serve as HR administration proxy to include Staff Management, Comp Express, Online Recruiting, annual Focal Review and PTO tracking.- Function as back-up to other administrative assistants in CLG/WIM Communications and Corporate Communications as needed.- In addition to serving as Executive to the Head of the Consumer Lending Group (CLG) and Wealth & Investment Management (WIM) Communications, this position will also serve as a Floor Resource on the Corporate Communications floor in the San Francisco headquarters, which is comprised of communicators from other divisions, and two distinct groups Investor Relations and Historical Services.- !!-- -->This position will not be an Executive Assistant to other communicators outside of CLG/WIM, but the person will work with other Communications Executive Assistants to assist with the following:- Establish and implement office procedures and controls- Sign for packages and mail on the floor- Order supplies; hardware and software upgrades for corporate communicators- Track requests for IT assistance for corporate communicators- Organize cross-communicator meetings/forums when all communicators need to participate in conferenceRequired Qualifications- 5+ years of administrative support experienceDesired Qualifications- Experience supporting senior level leaders/executives- Highly refined and professional verbal and written communications- Ability to communicate confidentially and professionally- Ability to handle confidential material in a professional manner- Advanced Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint, and Access) skills- Basic Microsoft Visio skills- Ability to manage changing travel itineraries, accurately manage expense reimbursement, manage a busy calendar and appointments flawlessly- Ability to prioritize work, meet deadlines, achieve goals, and work under pressure in a dynamic and complex environment- Ability to maintain professional etiquette under pressure- Ability to take initiative and work independently with minimal supervision in a structured environment- Ability to work effectively in a team environment and across all organizational levels, where flexibility, collaboration, and adaptability are important- Ability to exercise independent judgment and creative problem solving techniques- Strong organizational, multi-tasking, and prioritizing skills- Strong attention to detail and accuracy skills- Ability to research and report on a variety of issues using problem solving skills- Ability to determine and report priorities/metrics to senior management- Strong project management skills- Solid decision making skills- Ability to grasp complex business issues quickly, recommend solutions, and drive for resolutions- A BS/BA degree or higherAll offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Insurance Act.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V.© 2013 Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. All rights reserved. Member FDIC.",Executive Assistant  Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-assistant-1-job-san-francisco-ca-us-172999731.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4b520c49775c9653c136525ef2cc56ba
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:08:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Receptionist Position Features? Fun Work Environment? Opportunity For Advancement? Free Lunch Fridays? Great Pay to $40KAbout the JobAre you looking for a chance to join a Dynamic Fortune 500 company with great pay, a Monday through Friday schedule, free lunch on Fridays, and a fun work environment? If so, this could be the position for you! A successful company in Newport Beach is seeking an outgoing Receptionist to support a busy front desk. This is a Dynamic workplace, and the right candidate will provide administrative support by answering phone calls, organizing and maintaining files, and providing exceptional customer service. This Receptionist Position Features:? Opportunity for advancement ? Fun work environment? Excellent Work Life Balance? Free lunch FridaysSkills/ Responsibilities:? Answering telephones and giving information to callers? Working on Microsoft Office Daily? Typing at 45 WPM or better? Completing forms in accordance to company procedures? Providing exceptional customer serviceEducation/Qualifications:AA Business Administration preferred. One year of similar experience in receptionist/customer service experience required. Knowledge of Microsoft Office is strongly preferred. Bilingual Spanish preferred.If you are interested in this Dynamic and Exciting opportunity, please apply immediately. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075828 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Receptionist - Up to $k Job in Newport Beach,Full Time Employee,"Newport Beach, CA 92658",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-up-to-40k-job-newport-beach-ca-us-172849880.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4c0a1571f4c3a5b60a15e039d3ceb3d6
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:11:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Convenience Sub Shop Clerk (Part Time) - Ebensburg GetGo Job in Ebensburg,Full Time Employee,"Ebensburg, PA",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convenience-sub-shop-clerk-part-time-ebensburg-getgo-job-ebensburg-pa-us-173003893.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=19,,Administrative/Clerical,67ecbbd755a6ce7656f624e5b580ef19
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:35:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Library Public Services Assistant I City of Mount Vernon - Mount Vernon, WA 98273 Posted: 9/28/2016 - Expires: 10/7/2016 Job ID: 172958306",Library Public Services Assistant I Job in Mount Vernon,Job Type Part Time Employee,"Mount Vernon, WA 98273",,http://jobview.monster.com/library-public-services-assistant-i-job-mount-vernon-wa-us-172958306.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=5,11.91 - 14.49 $ /hour,Education Level Associate Degree,9842896b42748c80b827ebdaa3657d09
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:35:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative AssistantAre you an experienced Administrative Assistant looking to get to work quickly? We have a contract to possible hire opportunity available with our client located in West Houston, TX with a fantastic company.Company Profile:Rapidly growing privately held auto brokerage and transportation company that has been in business since 2002.Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of Client:Small office environmentCasual dress code. Jeans and company provided shirt.Work hours are 9:00 am to 6:00 pm Monday through FridayNo health benefits at this timePaid vacation after 1 year of serviceThe Administrative Assistant Role:Will enter and create daily invoices and produce statements in ExcelFax or email out weekly A/R statementsMatch invoices to paid invoicesInput paymentsFile paid invoicesLight office cleaningStock the refrigerator with waterAct as backup for answering incoming phone callsAssist with special projectsBackground Profile:Must be highly focused, detail oriented and career minded1+ year of experience as an Administrative AssistantPrevious experience with invoicesStrong Excel skillsHigh school diploma Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/n.-west-houston.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html",Administrative Assistant Job in Stafford,"Full Time, Employee","Stafford, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-stafford-tx-us-172657527.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=14,11.00 - 12.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,ce02c2527042e3110631818f1c9f3d09
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:35:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"O’Reilly Automotive Inc. has provided high-quality auto parts availability and excellent customer service since 1957. Today, as a Fortune 500 company, we are determined to be the leader in the auto parts industry through serving both retail and professional customers. We rely on exceptional team members to support our success and growth every day. We are seeking a true road warrior Store Installation Project Coordinator will assist with the installation of fixtures and product for new, relocated and renovated stores. This position will provide retail store setup support for crews at the project site, and coordinate with the Project Supervisor during the entire installation process to meet daily goals. This role will work with the Supervisor and Administrators to complete each project within the scheduled time allotted. This is a full-time opportunity; Monday-Friday, 8 a.m.-5 p.m., as needed on weekends.Essential Job Functions Extensive travel required; road warrior position Manage the inventory for each new store and make sure it is accurate once installation is completed Work in a professional manner with representatives from other companies that are performing a service for O’Reilly: electrician, phones, alarm, general contractor, vendors etc Ensure that the O’Reilly Store Installations procedures are completed consistentlyAllocate job tasks to each team member according to their abilitiesManage the attendance sheets for all team members and outside retail groupsEnsure the Store Installation Checklist is complete and returned at the close of each project Manage Comdata account used for team member per diem and any miscellaneous expenses Understanding of store layouts provided by the corporate officeSkills/QualificationsCurrent or former Assistant/Store ManagerDriving record must meet the standards set in the company's 14/18 point record systemMust have personal vehicle for transportation to and from store projectWilling to work weekends if neededAble to work on scaffold or ladders to install O'Reilly decor Stay connected with O'Reilly Careers: Facebook: O'Reilly Auto Parts Careers Twitter: @OReillyCareers LinkedIn: O'Reilly Auto Parts Instagram: O'Reilly_CareersO'Reilly Auto Parts is an equal opportunity employer. It is the policy of the Company to treat all applicants for employment and all team members in a manner that does not discriminate against them because of their race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, pregnancy, age, military obligation, or disability.",Store Installation Project Coordinator - Seattle Area Job in Seattle,Full Time Employee,"Seattle, WA",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/store-installation-project-coordinator-seattle-area-job-seattle-wa-us-172002249.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,,Administrative/Clerical,f3295f420af783e6145e427b0208c280
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:36:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsible for providing high-level administrative and managerial support to the Vice President of Computing and Digital Initiatives, including interacting and communicating with staff and Executives.Major Job Responsibilities: Provides administrative support to the VP of Computing and Digital Initiatives, including maintaining appointment schedule by planning and scheduling meetings, conferences, teleconferences and travel.Collects and prepares information for use in discussions/meetings with executive staff, visiting dignitaries, trustees and external partners.Assists in the development and delivery of reports, presentations, and official correspondence.Manages special projects on behalf of the VP of Computing and Digital Initiatives, monitors progress and apprises appropriate individuals of progress toward established goals.Assists in other activities as assigned, including representing the organization at functions as needed. Bachelor's degree Minimum 7 years related experience in an administrative support roleAdvanced computer skills and demonstrated experience with office software applications, including presentation software such as PowerPoint, Prezi, Keynote, etc. Proficient in social media, cloud services and digital technologyStrong written and oral communication skillsExcellent organization and prioritization skillsAbility to maintain a high level of confidentiality and sensitivity to all responsibilitiesAbility to develop and maintain effective working relationships with individuals at all levels of the organization as well as external contactsPI95463660Apply Here",Executive Assistant Job in Los Angeles,"Full Time, Employee","Los Angeles, CA 90049",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-assistant-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172919429.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=6,,Administrative/Clerical,80d0b6e7b326f6f883b40bc922810c14
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:37:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"DTI is the nationâ€™s largest independent provider of e-discovery, managed document review, facilities management and knowledge process outsourcing. DTI serves the nationâ€™s leading law firms and Fortune 500 corporations through its 26 highly secure service centers located in major cities across the United States. We believe that we have achieved this success by providing our customers the highest level of quality and service. This reputation for quality and performance rests 100% on the efforts of our employees. In order to continue our growth and success, we must constantly look to add high-caliber individuals to our team. If you have a â€œcan doâ€ attitude, together with a â€œclient firstâ€ set of priorities, we guarantee that we have an opportunity for you. Position Description:DTI is seeking candidates for the position of Receptionist - Law FirmResponsibilities and Essential Functions:Monitor and listen to clients to understand inquiries and requests in order to provide accurate information about the facilities and services with prompt assistancePerform basic mathematical calculations using a calculator/computer to accurately figure production time and labor time associated with any copy, print, scan or production requestsFollow established guidelines and procedures for receiving, documenting, organizing and mailing out client packages (i.e. parcel deliveries, messenger services, etc.)Ensure accurate tracking, monitoring and recording of all charges, overtime, logs and entries throughout his/her shiftAnswering telephone inquiries, loading/unloading parcels, delivering of parcels, copying, and faxing and guest requestsDue to the cyclical nature of the industry team members may be required to work varying schedules to reflect the business needs of the firmWork closely with the client's staff to ensure seamless day-to-day operations as the first line of contact with the client's visitorsAnswer incoming telephone calls and direct call traffic to the proper personTake accurate and complete messages for those employees who may be unavailableGreet and announce visitors in a friendly and business-like mannerMaintain neatness and organization of reception desk and front closet areas with various administrative duties as outlined by the Site ManagerRequired Characteristics and Credentials:High School Diploma or equivalentWillingness and ability to learn new skillsBe personable, articulate, knowledgeable and professional in presenting oneself in a professional settingAbility to learn skills quicklyFlexibility in dealing with simultaneous projectsAttention to detailAbility to function with a high level of patience, tact and diplomacy in handling any complaints and situationsAbility to lift or move 40 lbs. or greater Previous experience in a client service oriented field preferredMinimum of 1 year professional level work experience Qualifications:         ",Receptionist-Law Firm /  Job in Minneapolis,"Full Time, Employee","Minneapolis, MN 55401",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-law-firm-1986-job-minneapolis-mn-us-172678166.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=5,,Administrative/Clerical,78ac2036545eda62b0ed80a55808f84e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:38:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Vista Equity Partners is a leading private equity firm focused on investing in software and technology-enabled businesses.  With over $26 billion in cumulative capital commitments, Vista seeks to partner with world-class management teams looking to reach their full potential. We understand the software business model and have developed specific operational improvements (the ""Vista SOPs"") to create value, and we combine this operational capability and understanding with a unique, long-term perspective. This combination encourages optimal business decisions, enables the pursuit of operational excellence, and drives maximum value creation for all shareholders.   Position Summary   The Executive Legal Assistant will be responsible for providing high-level, legal and administrative support to Vista’s legal and compliance department, including senior level executives within that group:  Including, but not limited to, managing their schedule, meetings and travel.  This position requires that you are highly organized, can juggle many tasks at once, are not easily overwhelmed, and are comfortable interfacing with all levels of internal management and staff as well as outside clients, vendors and candidates in a fast paced environment.  The Executive Legal Assistant maintains and protects highly confidential corporate information, is the first point of contact in person and on calls for executives from internal departments and external clients, and works independently with minimal supervision or direction.    Essential Duties and Responsibilities   Manage and coordinate schedule of meetings, events, and travel for executives supported and, when necessary, members of their team.  Ensure supported executives are prepared with all materials and information for meeting, events, and travel. Compile materials for reports and/or presentations. Generate reports in Excel and Power Point. Prepare expense reports. Set up appointments and manage executive calendars. Provide assistance with corporate compliance and governance matters, including completing and filing government filings. Organize signature pages. Contract administration.   Minimum 3 years’ proven experience supporting multiple senior level executives (VP level and above) within a private equity, investment banking, law firm or professional services organization. Minimum overall 5 years’ experience in an Executive Assistant or Legal Assistant position within a fast-paced professional environment. Strong attention to detail, follow-up and excellent organizational skills. Ability to treat sensitive/confidential information with appropriate discretion. Strong sense of urgency, adaptability, flexibility and resourcefulness. The ability to function professionally under pressure, while managing multiple concurrent projects and deadlines. Proven competencies in software applications and programs, particularly Microsoft Office, including Excel, Word, Power Point, and Outlook.  Excellent word processing and file management skills. Good working knowledge of office equipment and procedures including computers, photocopiers, printers, fax machines, mailing equipment, telephone systems, filing systems, etc. Must possess personal tact, discretion and good judgment. Excellent interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills. Occasional afterhours work is necessary. Bachelor’s degree preferred.",Legal Assistant Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA 94111",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/legal-assistant-job-san-francisco-ca-us-172922640.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=1,,Administrative/Clerical,dd46df42316e6551f511a6b728c0a4e6
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:39:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well known company has an immediate opening for an Administrative Assistant who has at least three years experience. Must be proficient in Word, Excel, and Outlook! Must have excellent communication skills and be able to multi-task in a fast paced environment. Looking for someone who is a team player. Great working environment. Email resume as a word attachment to Paris Goldfarb. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074515 Job Experience:,,Years of Experience Required:",ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT NEEDED ASAP! Job in Los Angeles,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Los Angeles, CA 90071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-needed-asap!-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172601560.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1911c3bf3b9b0993f5a7e265c7367b36
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:39:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tax Administrative Assistant Job in Edison, NJ Our client is currently seeking an experienced Tax Administrative Assistant to join their team. The ideal candidate will have at least 2 years of experience as an Administrative Assistant for an accounting firm. This position offers a competitive salary + benefits! Tax Administrative Assistant Job Responsibilities include: Prepare departmental monthly budget to actual analysis, and account reconciliations Maintain and update filing, office supply inventory, mailing, and database systemsWork closely with tax leadership to support all aspects of the tax department, its principals, clients and staffInteract with clients in an efficient, courteous, and professional mannerManage incoming and outgoing phone and email communications with clients & IRS AgentsPerform administrative support tasks as requested by management  Tax Administrative Assistant Job Qualifications include: Bachelor’s Degree required2-3 years of Administrative experience for an Accounting firmMust be proficient in MS Office (Word, Excel, Outlook)Experience with GoSystems and GoFileRoom preferredExcellent oral and written communication skills  If you are qualified and interested in the Tax Administrative Assistant job located in Edison, NJ please send an email to Nikki.potts@ajilon.com AND apply online at www.ajilon.com   ",Tax Administrative Assistant Job in Edison,Full Time Employee,"Edison, NJ 08817",,http://jobview.monster.com/tax-administrative-assistant-job-in-edison-nj-job-edison-nj-us-172916259.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,,Administrative/Clerical,d9e9b9b353e2428f6e80307459ffa906
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:45:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"        Summary: Responsible for the general clerical functions, upkeep of the office and all mail room and copy room activities. Distributes incoming and outgoing mail to departments. Performs general clerical functions,. Complete both scheduled and ad-hoc outgoing mailings and packet requests to ensure deadlines are met. Communicate any issues to management. Postmarking mixed mail of a variety of classes on meter machines. Responsible for departments outgoing mail and packages, ensuring that the best carrier has been selected for the desired shipping time and for the lowest rate. Responsible for picking up and delivering all MVP mail to and from the Post Office, as well as delivery of internal mail runs. Opens mail utilizing an automatic mail opener. Assists in the mailing of internal and outgoing mail between all MVP locations. Makes occasional, unscheduled trips and special hand-deliveries in order to accommodate top priority mail. Enters any USPS returned mail into the Returned Mail application. Support Materials Management support and primary backup of Sr. Materials Management and Mailroom Specialist. Performs other duties as assigned. POSITION QUALIFICATIONS Minimum Education: High School Diploma or GED Minimum Experience: Previous experience in mail center Required Skills: • Possession of a currently valid NYS driver's license • Ability to lift up to 60 lbs • Ability to work independently, as well as in a team environment • Strong interpersonal and communication skills • Excellent organizational skills, with attention to detail • Strong customer service skills required. Preferred Skills: • Must possess intermediate-advanced computer skills to utilize MS Word, Excel and Outlook         ",Mail room and Materials Specialist Job in Rochester,Full Time Employee,"Rochester, NY 14603",,http://jobview.monster.com/mail-room-materials-specialist-job-rochester-ny-us-172240290.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=2,,Administrative/Clerical,9f8ce2993a2ee36b8639b95bf16a0dc0
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:45:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job CAPE FEAR COMMUNITY COLLEGECape Fear Community College has the following employment opportunity available: Secretary, Financial AidTo view the full job description for positions at CFCC and to apply online, visit http://cfcc.edu/jobs and click on ""Employment Opportunities."" Applications for the position listed above must be received by 10/3/16. Cape Fear Community College, 411 North Front Street, Wilmington, NC 28401. (910) 362-7312. EOE. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } }); Report",Cape Fear Community College Job Application for Secretary,"Full Time, Employee",Phone (910) 362-7312,Education,http://jobview.monster.com/secretary-financial-aid-job-wilmington-nc-us-172764496.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=17,,,87641d8ab421aa27999bb8b1cb01e48a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:45:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Program Administrator Job in San Francisco, CA Do you have a strong administration background? Do you want to work for a company that supports education? Do you thrive in a fast-paced work environment? If you have data entry experience and who takes initiative, then we have the job for you. An educational institute is hiring a full-time Program Administrator in San Francisco, California. This four week contract offers public transportation options and gives you the opportunity to work with a passionate team. Qualified candidates should submit a resume for immediate consideration  Job Responsibilities: Responsible for data entry of registrations in a timely manner Answer phones and distribute messages to the appropriate parties General administrative duties, such as filing and editing documents Respond to inquiries in a professional manner at all times  Qualifications: Minimum 1-2 years administration experience Bachelor’s Degree strongly preferred Proficient in Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint Very detail oriented, highly accountable and professional  Please apply below, and submit your resume to Ariane at ariane.wesemael@ajilon.com with “Program Administrator"" in the subject line. For more opportunities, visit Ajilon Professional Staffing‘s website at www.ajilon.com Thank you  ",Program Administrator Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94103",,http://jobview.monster.com/program-administrator-job-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-172850767.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=11,,Administrative/Clerical,8d0cdcc3b67f74a4974e190ced6b34ec
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:45:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Responsibilities 1) Responds to all open scheduling customer follow-up requests and provides proper resolution. 2) Analyzes current-month technician work schedules for optimal placement of work orders. 3) Performs outbound calls to schedule work orders with customers. 4) Update Mission with clear/concise notes indicating details of conversation with customer in response to their request. 5) Regularly work and communicate with technicians, managers, and planners to ensure proper scheduling. Education and Experience Requirements • High School Diploma or General Education Degree (GED); or three to six months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Skill in providing superior customer service • Skill in written and verbal communications • Skill in attention to detail • Skill in maintaining time management and organizational skills • Skill in being flexible with work priorities • Ability to multi-task and work in a fast-paced environment • Skill/knowledge with Microsoft Office applications (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint) Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability Apply Now",Customer Follow-up Request Specialist Job in Pleasanton,"Full Time, Employee","Pleasanton, CA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-follow-up-request-specialist-job-pleasanton-ca-us-172850963.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=3,,Administrative/Clerical,e4de550452f02bd432c79fc564f1fbdf
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:46:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well-Known Entertainment company looking to hire an Administrative Assistant w/Entertainment background JOB DUTIES: Screen incoming calls, correspondence, interoffice materials. Determine the priority and respond appropriately Manage calendars.Coordinate travel, meetings and special events including scheduling, agenda creation, logistics and catering. Create and modify/format documents electronically including agreements, letters, memos, presentations (Power Point), spreadsheets (Excel), and other related documents (may be of a highly confidential/critical nature). Track and follow up on various action items to ensure schedules and due dates are met. Work closely with the department?s Executive Assistant to assist in department projects and events as needed. Build strong working relationships with coworkers, customers (internal and external), and company management. JOB REQUIREMENTS: Minimum of 2 years experience as an Administrative Assistant in the ENTERTAINMENT INDUSTRY! High School diploma, or equivalent, AS, or BS is preferred. Strong skills in Word, Outlook. Excel, Power Point and other specialized computer programs. Proficiency in Google Mail and Calendar platform. Strong organizational, analytical and interpersonal skills. Strong attention to detail and high level of accountability. Expert level written and verbal communication skills. Demonstrated ability to exercise discretion and judgment in dealing with a range of internal and external executives, organizations and confidential data.Proven experience in working in a fast paced environment, sometimes under pressure, remaining flexible, proactive, resourceful and efficient. Apply for this great position as a Administrative Assistant today! Email resume as a Microsoft Word attachment to Azuri Ross for immediate consideration. Call the Downtown Los Angeles Act-1 office and ask for Azuri Ross. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074516 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant w/Entertainment Background Job in Universal City,Full Time Employee,"Universal City, CA 91608",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-w-entertainment-background-job-universal-city-ca-us-172601555.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),910dbdadfe8bac00020c189a7ca553b7
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:47:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Attention Job Seekers, We have a Direct Hire Positions (2 Openings) for our Client based in Denver, CO Mentioned below is the Job Details.Shifts:  06:00 PM to 10:00 PM             Hourly Rate: $11.00/hr on W2 (without benefits)           Job Title: Metering Clerk Job Description:·         Contacting customer via phone, fax and e-mail to collect the number of copies customers have made on their machines each month.  ·         Meter read and entering into system for billing.·         Reviewing invoices for correct meter read billing·         Field calls from customers in regards to their meter reading billingJob Requirement: Clear Criminal Background (atleast for last 7 years)Clear Drug TestFresher's and College Pass-out's can apply Interested applicants can share their resume copy Hanish.manna@intigrow.com or call me at 678 666 4369 for any questions. Thanks & Regards, Report","intiGrow Job Application for Mail Clerk | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Phone 678-666-4369,,http://jobview.monster.com/mail-clerk-job-denver-co-us-171912610.aspx?mescoid=4300757001001&jobPosition=8,,,df67c8719e7014b54f8a80220b14504c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:49:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Receptionist opportunity in Sacramento for a professional individual with excellent verbal and written communication skills.Person in this position will attend to visitors and deal with inquiries on the phone and face-to-face. Supply information regarding the organization in a positive manner to the general public, clients and customers and help maintain the workflow of the office.Responsibilities: ?Answer telephone, screen and direct calls?Provide information to callers?Direct visitors to the correct destination?Deal with queries from the public and customers?Ensures knowledge of staff movements in and out of the organization.?General administrative and clerical support?Prepare letters and documents?Receive and sort mail and deliveries?Assist with appointment scheduling?Assist with maintaining appointment diary either manually or electronically?Organize meetings in conference room and maintain it in an orderly and clean fashion.?Assist with special projectsExperience:Must possess a high school diploma and have knowledge of administrative and clerical procedures. Knowledge of computers and relevant software applications is a must. Must have knowledge of customer service principles and practices and strong typing skills.Interested candidate please submit resume for immediate consideration. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075447 Job Experience:Outlook, Word, ExcelYears of Experience Required:",Receptionist Job in Sacramento,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Sacramento, CA 95864",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-job-sacramento-ca-us-172751466.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),69453c46ce974c9dddac40f8d5ae196f
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:50:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"**Subcontracts Administrator 4****Requisition ID: 16022617****Location\(s\): United States\-Virginia\-Herndon****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: No relocation assistance available****Travel: Yes, 25 % of the Time**Join a diverse workforce engaged in supporting large and challenging national defense programs that secure our nation and its allies\. We are seeking a highly motivated individual to act as an advisor and subject matter expert for subcontracting actions on a wide range of fairly complex contractual and business issues to include management of all subcontract types\. The successful candidate will possess a solid understanding of government contracting regulations and be prepared to perform with moderate supervision as part of a subcontracts team on large domestic and international proposal efforts that may require developing solutions to fairly complex problems\. The position will be based in Herndon Virginia with occasional travel as required to meet Business Unit needs\.Responsibilities will encompass the full range of the subcontract acquisition process including participation in strategic sourcing decisions, international subcontracting, teaming agreement generation and execution, preparing requests for proposals consistent with customer solicitations, federal statutes and regulations and enterprise policies and procedures, evaluating proposal submissions, identifying risk and mitigation strategies, developing negotiation plans and negotiating, and preparing subcontract files in compliance with Northrop Grumman values, policies, procedures, and practices\. The ability to collaborate with program management and other multi\-functional teams is required\. Successful candidate must be able to multi\-task, make decisions in a timely manner, display strong interpersonal skills, have a general knowledge of FAR/DFARS and associated Federal Contracting regulations and be capable of working in a fast paced environment\.Basic Qualifications:\*Candidate’s minimum education/experience qualifications: BS/BA degree with 10years of progressive subcontracts/procurement experience or MS/MA with 8 years;will consider additional 4 years of related experience in lieu of a degree\.\*Understanding of procurement policies, procedures, and regulations is essential\.\*The ability to work well in team environments is required\.\*Candidate must have strong organizational skills, as well as very good oral and writtencommunications\.\*Ability to work with minimal supervision and apply sound judgment to problemsolving required\.Preferred Qualifications:MBA and/or CPCM desirable\. Experience with international subcontracting and SAP Procurement & Accounting System is highly desirable\.Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Subcontracts Administrator 4_**Location:** _Virginia\-Herndon_**Requisition ID:** _16022617_",Subcontracts Administrator  Job in Herndon,Full Time Employee,"**Subcontracts Administrator 4****Requisition ID: 16022617****Location\(s\): United States\-Virginia\-Herndon****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: No relocation assistance available****Travel: Yes, 25 % of the Time**Join a diverse workforce engaged in supporting large and challenging national defense programs that secure our nation and its allies\. We are seeking a highly motivated individual to act as an advisor and subject matter expert for subcontracting actions on a wide range of fairly complex contractual and business issues to include management of all subcontract types\. The successful candidate will possess a solid understanding of government contracting regulations and be prepared to perform with moderate supervision as part of a subcontracts team on large domestic and international proposal efforts that may require developing solutions to fairly complex problems\. The position will be based in Herndon Virginia with occasional travel as required to meet Business Unit needs\.Responsibilities will encompass the full range of the subcontract acquisition process including participation in strategic sourcing decisions, international subcontracting, teaming agreement generation and execution, preparing requests for proposals consistent with customer solicitations, federal statutes and regulations and enterprise policies and procedures, evaluating proposal submissions, identifying risk and mitigation strategies, developing negotiation plans and negotiating, and preparing subcontract files in compliance with Northrop Grumman values, policies, procedures, and practices\. The ability to collaborate with program management and other multi\-functional teams is required\. Successful candidate must be able to multi\-task, make decisions in a timely manner, display strong interpersonal skills, have a general knowledge of FAR/DFARS and associated Federal Contracting regulations and be capable of working in a fast paced environment\.Basic Qualifications:\*Candidate’s minimum education/experience qualifications: BS/BA degree with 10years of progressive subcontracts/procurement experience or MS/MA with 8 years;will consider additional 4 years of related experience in lieu of a degree\.\*Understanding of procurement policies, procedures, and regulations is essential\.\*The ability to work well in team environments is required\.\*Candidate must have strong organizational skills, as well as very good oral and writtencommunications\.\*Ability to work with minimal supervision and apply sound judgment to problemsolving required\.Preferred Qualifications:MBA and/or CPCM desirable\. Experience with international subcontracting and SAP Procurement & Accounting System is highly desirable\.Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Subcontracts Administrator 4_**Location:** _Virginia\-Herndon_**Requisition ID:** _16022617_",,http://jobview.monster.com/subcontracts-administrator-4-job-herndon-va-us-172933751.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,,Administrative/Clerical,7e30b818fd3865ca7e0fb3f7288fa58f
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:50:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative Assistant A growing, innovative and growing company with a dynamic culture is looking for an Administrative Assistant to join their corporate office in Dallas, TX on a Contract to Possible Hire Basis. Company ProfileFirm founded in 2001 and has 500 employees Headquartered in Dallas, TXWon Stevie Award for Sales & Customer Service 2015 Quarterly events (Volunteering, scavenger hunts)Features and Benefits while On ContractLook beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of Client Full medical coverage for employee and dependents401 (k) match 4% Causal Fridays Paid Time Off (PTO): Three (3) weeks annually – pro-rated the first yearDiscretionary incentivesCharitable contribution match Continuing education reimbursementContinuing Education ReimbursementAdministrative Assistant RoleThe Administrative Assistant position assists the Customer Service Team, Human Resources and any additional support teams with administrative duties. The administrative assistant must be a self-starter, have strong attention to detail, be able to work as part of a team and willing to assist with all of the day-to-day operations inherent to a rapidly growing organization.Manages the front reception desk during specific hours by greeting visitors/guests, receiving and signing for deliveries in a professional and friendly mannerCustomer Mail-outs, Customer Brochures and invoices Certificates of Membership Customer Brochures Handling facilities management requests Assists the Human Resources team with the scanning and filing of documents Creates, proofs, revises and edits documents as needed Support and participate in the organization’s Continual Education Program Comply with Policy and Procedures as well as meeting objectives Manages various projects as designated Administrative Assistant Background ProfileAssociates degree, or above, preferred but not required 3+ years of experience with administrative duties preferred Proficient computer skills not limited to, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Internet and e-mail applications Ability to handle the demands of a busy and professional organization Solid verbal and written communication skills Strong organizational skills and ability to multi-task Ability to manage priorities and report to multiple managers Demonstrated personal initiative and attention to detailDesire to assume increasing levels of responsibility Must be able to work well in a fast-paced environment Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com  Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). ",Administrative Assistant Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-dallas-tx-us-172960788.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=16,18.00 - 22.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,02f87515b55303349bfd970faf86a75e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:51:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Deli team, your primary responsibility will be servicing the customers by filling their orders and ensuring they have the freshest products available. As a member of our team, you will also be fully trained and able to assist customers in other areas in the store including, but not limited to, the Prepared Foods and Meat Departments. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by greeting customers in the department and ensuring their orders are filled to meet their expectations. Deli team members are also expected to make suggestions to our customers to enhance their shopping experience. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Smiles and greets customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Replenish product in the deli cases, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed. Accurately record and assist in preparation of deli special orders to ensure the customer is delighted with the finished product. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room. Assist in maintaining deli cooler efficiency by unloading deliveries. Rotate and check code dates on products to ensure customers safety. Assist in other areas as required. Responsible for controlling some expense within a department. Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $1 - $100k Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Education and Training Desired High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Matching Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Twisting Communication (verbal) Unloading Walking Weighing Equipment Used Bizzerba slicer Cardboard Baler Compactor Knives Pressure Hose Safety Cutter Scale Labeler Shrink Wrapper Slicer U-Boats",Deli Clerk (Part-time) - Jamestown Giant Eagle Job in Warren,Full Time Employee,"Warren, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/deli-clerk-part-time-jamestown-giant-eagle-job-warren-oh-us-173007387.aspx?mescoid=3500612001001&jobPosition=3,,Administrative/Clerical,06f5d7ad03bad904cd64997d9eba25df
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:51:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Department Data Control Schedule Full time (40 hours or more per week) Shift 1st Hours Monday - Friday 8:00 am - 5:00 pm Job Details Multiple Openings~    Job Summary:      Responsible for processing all incoming medical and/or dental service documentation according to contract requirements and customer specifications.  Receive and thoroughly review documentation for errors, identify missing components and complete data entry. Ensure program policies and customer designated guidelines are adhered to while processing the documentation under time-sensitive deadlines.    Qualifications:    High school diploma or equivalent required, post high school education preferred.   A minimum of 1 year of related work experience required. Equivalent combination of education, experience and/or applicable military experience will be considered. Intermediate computer skills including Microsoft Office programs and electronic file/database management experience required.  Strong keyboarding skills required.  Data entry and customer service experience preferred.  Experience with medical or dental documentation and terminology preferred.  Medical or dental transcription experience preferred.  Applicable military experience will be considered. Must possess the ability to perform detailed work with a high degree of accuracy; strong analytical thinking, multi-tasking, organizational and time management skills; excellent verbal and written communication skills; ability to work independently as well as with a team; and must be able to problem solve and propose solutions in a fast paced environment.  Must also demonstrate an appropriate level of assertiveness in performing work responsibilities and willingness to work special projects as directed.   National Career Readiness Certificate preferred.   Applications will be accepted until 5pm CT on Friday, October 7th, 2016   Please Note: In order to be considered for this position, you must receive favorable adjudication of a NACI level background investigation submitted by the VA Security and investigations Center (SIC). Additionally, you must maintain U.S. citizenship or Alien Registration that authorizes you to work in the U.S. and be able to read, write, speak and understand the English language.   Please Note : In order to be considered for this position, you must be able to obtain an SF86 Position of Trust which is only available to U.S. Citizens.  *MON* LHI is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.   Apply External Candidates apply here Apply later Current employees apply here Search Results Return to Search Results New Search",Records Mgmt Specialist I Job in La Crosse,,"La Crosse, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/records-mgmt-specialist-i-job-la-crosse-wi-us-172961198.aspx?mescoid=4300728001001&jobPosition=12,,,d1d73a1e641d06e38fc2f7cf73f0f454
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:51:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position:      Data Collection Terminals Repair TechLocation:     Jacksonville, FLDuration:     6 Months Contract Short Description: Maintains, analyzes, troubleshoots, and repairs DATA COLLECTION TERMINALS hardware . May require an associate's degree or its equivalent and 0-3 years of experience in the field or in a related area. Complete Description: Maintains, analyzes, troubleshoots, and repairs  DATA COLLECTION TERMINALS,  hardware and computer peripherals. Documents, maintains, upgrades or replaces hardware . . May require an associate's degree or its equivalent and 0-3 years of experience in the field or in a related area. Has knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, and procedures within a particular field. Relies on instructions and pre-established guidelines to perform the functions of the job. Works under immediate supervision. Primary job functions do not typically require exercising independent judgment. Typically reports to a project leader or manager. Job work volume may require to work additional overtime as needed Please reply the email with you updated resume in WORD format, contact number and preferred time and date. Thanks, Aldo SmithIT Resource SpecialistASK Staffing, Inc. | Global Delivery CenterDirect: 678-203-2367Email: aldos@askstaffing.com ",Data Collection Terminals Repair Tech Job in Jacksonville  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Jacksonville 32256,Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/data-collection-terminals-repair-tech-job-jacksonville-fl-us-172838356.aspx?mescoid=4300720001001&jobPosition=1,,Administrative/Clerical,aab46c6b0d6a27d60c42e5307e4c1664
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:52:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position OverviewWharton-Smith, Inc., a highly regarded General Contractor based in Central Florida, is seeking qualified candidates for a Project Assistant position at our construction project site located at 22601 Airport Road, Punta Gorda, FL 33982 Apply today (choose 1 form only)On-line or E-mail only to jobs@whartonsmith.comNo Phone Calls Please! EOE-M/F/Vet/Disabled-Drug-Free Workplace, E-verifyPrimary ResponsibilitiesSupport the project team to include the Project Manager, Project Engineer, and Superintendent.Utilize Contract Manager Software to generate and track subcontracts, purchase orders and bonds, and other project management functions as required.Maintain project documents within the Contract Manager Software, standardized filing system, and server.Gather and assemble supporting documents for project manuals such as O&M's.Manage project requirements such as Owner Direct Purchase Orders and invoice processing.Reception for all visitors, answer phones and order office supplies. Specific Preferences/Requirements:Strong organizational skills with the ability to prioritize responsibilities with limited supervision.Capable of working in a fast-paced atmosphere, with the ability to assist the project team in directing the flow of office procedures for timely distribution and coordination.Detail-oriented, self-motivated, and be willing to work in a construction environment.Extensive use of Microsoft Word and Excel is required.Knowledge of general office procedures, and excellent oral and written communication skills.Must have the ability to comply with applicable department policies, procedures, rules and regulations, and resolve problems.Proficient in copying/moving files and creating directories in a Windows environment.Knowledge of and ability to access and perform routine functions on the Internet.Attention to detail and math skills are also essential.Knowledge of Contract Manager Software is a plus.PI95473548Apply Here",Construction Project Assistant Job in Punta Gorda,Full Time Employee,"Punta Gorda, FL 33982",Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-assistant-job-punta-gorda-fl-us-172966299.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=14,,Administrative/Clerical,9ac0d054ef114924df830e457dd959fd
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:52:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 3rd Shift - 10p - 6a (Overnight) Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Overnight Convenience Sub Shop Clerk (PT) Beechwood & State GetGo Job in Alliance,Full Time Employee,"Alliance, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/overnight-convenience-sub-shop-clerk-pt-beechwood-state-getgo-job-alliance-oh-us-173008525.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=19,,Administrative/Clerical,70678b5fe0f684e4628f33c3c634725e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:52:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Location The Mental Health Specialist position is located in Indianapolis, Indiana Job Duties The Mental Health Specialist provides psychiatric clinical intervention services for patients and families; also administers direct and indirect patient care. ExperienceOne year of Behavioral Health experience is required for this positionEducation Bachelor's Degree required   Skills Oral communication skills to discuss patient care needs Written communication skills as necessary for documentation Computer skills for documentation and work related purposes Demonstrates a learning attitude toward solving problems Demonstrates ability to respectfully address interpersonal conflicts Takes initiative to help others Demonstrates accountability for own actions Demonstrates openness to change and new learning Demonstrates customer service skills to provide exceptional patient and family experiences Keywords Mental health, behavioral care, patient care, psych Ranked among the nation's most integrated healthcare systems, Community Health Network is Central Indiana's leader in providing convenient access to exceptional healthcare services, where and when patients need them – in hospitals, health pavilions and doctor's offices, as well as workplaces, schools and homes. Exceptional care, simply delivered. Community is a non-profit health system that is deeply committed to the communities we serve with more than 200 sites of care and affiliates throughout Central Indiana. Guided by our PRIIDE Values – Patients First, Relationships, Integrity, Innovation, Dedication and Excellence – our team of caregivers is committed to providing an exceptional experience with every life we touch.",Mental Health Specialist Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46201",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/mental-health-specialist-job-indianapolis-in-us-172964702.aspx?mescoid=2100312001001&jobPosition=19,,Administrative/Clerical,20520e36b540bf291b51818afc6402b5
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:52:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tower Hill Insurance Group is searching for an administrative professionalto join our Claims team in Gainesville!Having been in insurance for the past 44 years we know that the claims process can be an incredibly stressful time. Fortunately for our insureds, we have taken our many years of experience and developed an amazing team of compassionate people who diligently work to help them to get their lives back on track. Our claims team has dedicated themselves to bringing the highest possible level of customer service to every claim, a quality that has always set us apart for our insureds, and always will. As we continue to grow and expand, the number of families that place their trust in us will only grow larger with us. This presents us with a question: how can we ensure that we continue to provide the same exceptional service as we continue to grow? That’s where you come in.This job is probably for you if:You have strong time management, multi-tasking, and problem-solving skills.You have good verbal and written communication skills.You are exceptionally meticulous, and highly organized.You are highly proficient in MS Office.You prefer a scheduled, dynamic, team-work driven work environment. You are highly adaptable and dependable.You have a background in administration and/or clerical work.1-3 years is ideal.Prior experience or exposure to claims handling, data processing, document indexing, or general accounting is even better!Our Claims team plays one of the most impactful roles in Tower Hill’s ability to honor our promise to our insureds. Their compassion, thoroughness, and service to our customers in their times of need are what have made us one of Florida’s top home insurers over the years. The Claims Administrator position plays an important part in making sure that everything in Claims goes smoothly from day to day, which in turn ensures that claims are handled swiftly and correctly, and our promise is kept. Whether by filing, mailing, assembling policies, coordinating supplies & access, or prepping claims files for our vendors, their support is a critical and irreplaceable part of the Claims process at Tower Hill. At Tower Hill we value hard work, innovation, and superior customer service above all else and we know that it is our job to reward that hard work. When you join our team you can expect:A competitive starting salary with annual merit reviews and possible increases and bonus opportunities. A company matched 401(k) plan. Nearly three weeks of PTO (plus holidays).Medical, Dental, Life, and Disability insurance, as well as Flexible Spending Accounts.Business casual dress.Access to on-site fitness center and gymnasium with regulation-sized basketball/volleyball court.Subsidized lunches from Gainesville’s myriad of exceptional caterers and delicious restaurants. Perhaps this position is not for you or you know someone else that you think would be a perfect fit for Tower Hill. If so, visit www.thig.com/careers for information on this and other openings, total compensation, our company history, and more!Tower Hill Insurance Group, LLC is an equal opportunity employer.",Claims Administrator Job in Gainesville,Full Time Employee,"Gainesville, FL 32605",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-administrator-job-gainesville-fl-us-171996822.aspx?mescoid=4300756001001&jobPosition=16,,Administrative/Clerical,3565f8362dd3c267bb3505177e821bef
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:52:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job   Full time M-F Medical Assistant/Receptionist position available in a very busy neurology office. Candidates must possess excellent phone and computer skills. Compassion towards patient care, professionalism, and strong work ethic mandatory. Bilingual applicant preferred but not mandatory. At least 1 year experience in a medical office is preferred. Salary based on experience including benefits plus retirement plan. Specific ResponsibilitiesWelcomes and greets patients to the department in a manner that is helpful and friendly; determines purpose of visit and direct patients to appropriate person or department.Assist patients to complete all necessary forms and documentation including medical insurance.Answers the phone while maintaining a polite, consistent phone manner using proper telephone etiquette. (Heavy call volume) Receive and convey messages in writing, verbal and electronically as well as transfer calls as needed. When scheduling appointments, carefully screens patients for new address, new patients visit or update registration and informs patient or information that must be presented at time of visit. Schedule tests, scans and outside appointments for patients.Checking patients in/out for their office appointments. Facilitates patient flow by notifying there provider of patients’ arrival, being aware of delays, and communicating with patients and clinical staff.Obtain external medical reports as required by medical professionals.Maintains patient waiting areas, office files, and front desk areas in a manner that is organized and neat. Informs patients of any existing balance noted in computer and request patients be prepared for any payment due at time of visit.Calls patients to confirm upcoming appointmentsVerifies method of payment for service. Collect co-pays and payments.Fax, scan, and file documents.Open, stamp appropriately and distribute incoming mail.Exercises problem-solving and conflict resolution skills when handling patient complaints; refers patient complaints to appropriate designated personnel as needed.Certified MAObtain medication authorizationsRecord patients’ medical history, vital statistics and information such as test results in medical records.Interview patients to obtain medical information and measure their vital signs, weight, and height.Prepare treatments rooms for patients examinations, keeping the rooms neat and clean.Show patients to examination rooms and prepare them for the physician. Performs other duties as may be required.QualificationUnderstands the importance of maintaining confidentiality; able to maintain confidentiality under HIPAA standards. Intermediate to advanced phone skills; able to effectively relate via the telephone and in-person to serve the needs of clinic patients in a manner that is efficient and productive. Must be highly flexible; able to accommodate changing needs of the department.Well developed verbal and written communication skills. Additional language abilities desirable. (Spanish speaking a plus)Ability to communicate with a diverse range of people.Ability to work well under pressure with minimal supervision. Proven flexibility and willingness to handle a variety of tasks. Basic to intermediate computer knowledge and skills.        Please email resume to pssde@aol.com or call 361-8530867 Report","Corpus Christi Job Application for Medical Receptionist/Medical Assistant | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Phone 3618530867 Address 3301 S ALAMEDA STCORPUS CHRISTI, TX 78411",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-receptionist-medical-assistant-job-corpus-christi-tx-us-172851664.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=20,,,e93bcdb678c6387953a2ca90cc54e588
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:52:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Irving Materials Inc. is hiring a Full Time Receptionist at our Corporate office in Greenfield. Duties include: answering multi-line phone system, greeting lobby visitors, manage incoming mail and other clerical duties as assigned. This position offers excellent benefits including: health, dental, vision, short term disability and 401k. Apply online at www.irvmat.com No phone calls please. Irving Materials Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Irving Materials Inc. is hiring a Full Time... Job in  function wrap(EL,,46140,All,http://jobview.monster.com/irving-materials-inc-is-hiring-a-full-time-job-greenfield-in-us-172919169.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=7,,,e1165494ecf0100993dc72b43e58d976
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:52:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Large growing, Kern County Business in need of a well organized, detail oriented, professional Administrative Assistant. Qualified individuals will need to possess excellent communication skills, an ability to multi-task on several projects at a time while utilizing strong time management skills. Successful applicants will need to be able to stay on task and complete their work successfully with little or no supervision. A ""go getter"", ""can do"" attitude is a huge plus. Responsibilities will include scheduling and calendar management, database management, research on different projects for staff members as needed, answering phones and routing them to correct extensions, and maintaining paper/electronic files. Will also be assisting with some account payable duties on a very basic level. -Must have a working knowledge of Microsoft Office with a strong focus in Excel, Word, and Outlook -Must have experience with general office equipment which includes both faxing and scanning documents. -Typing speed of at least 45 WPM. -Four year degree -2-5 years experience is expected for all qualified candidates. If you are a driven individual who feels most comfortable in a fast paced work environment with a large number of projects needing your attention, this is the job for you. Competitive salary and benefits. Experienced Professionals PLEASE APPLY. Submit resumes to David Allen. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1075433 Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - Golden Opportunity! Job in Bakersfield,Full Time Employee,"Bakersfield, CA 93309",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-golden-opportunity!-job-bakersfield-ca-us-172751548.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c0e8fe1a241e0769c1d19d0adc1958fe
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:53:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well known Company is looking for a Bilingual Spanish Administrative Assistant who has at least two years experience. Responsibilities will include answering all incoming calls, receiving and sorting all incoming mail, calendaring, spreadsheets, and working on various projects. Must be proficient in Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook. Looking for a team player who can work in a fast paced environment. Email resume as a word attachment to Paris Goldfarb. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074529 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",BILINGUAL SPANISH ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT NEEDED! Job in Los Angeles,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Los Angeles, CA 90071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-spanish-administrative-assistant-needed!-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172601547.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c74537e2d5e29367a58f31f54aea0b27
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:54:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is a growing Investment firm in downtown Boston looking to hire an eager candidate to join their client support team. In this role you will be responsible for answering the phones, ordering office supplies, opening new client accounts, processing trades, reconciling daily transactions, taking client calls, responding to client requests and preparing quarterly reports. The ideal candidate will have experience working with brokers, stock trading and custodial accounts with a strong interest in client service. A major key to this role is a flexible attitude and the willingness to pitch in and work on a small team. Industry specific software experience is a plus! If you are looking for a long term home, this role is for you! This client offers an exceptional benefits package as well!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Find Us on Facebook!Follow Us on Twitter!Company Profile:Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Client Services Administrator to K! Downtown Boston! Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,BostonMA,Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/client-services-administrator-to-65k!-downtown-boston!-job-boston-ma-us-172947675.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=5,"0.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Administrative/Clerical,50f16c88de4b9368d174c6c6711ba007
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:54:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Looking for growth and competitive pay? We are currently in need of an experienced Administrative Assistant. Bilingual Spanish is a PLUS! APPLY NOW!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075358 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant up to k - Job in Monterey Park,Full Time Employee,"Monterey Park, CA 91754",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-up-to-45k-job-monterey-park-ca-us-172749708.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4327829c79c8035db32401e044505f34
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:54:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking a full-time Executive Administrative Assistant to provide exceptional day-to-day and diversified administrative support directly to the five shareholders of the firm and to act as liason between the shareholders and their contacts, both internally and externally. Job Requirements:-          Bachelors degree is a plus -          3+ years of experience at the executive level-          Exhibit a professional and pleasant demeanor and appearance -          Able to efficiently and effectively multi-task -          Able to maintain strict confidence of sensitive information-          Excellent written and verbal communication skills-          Strong time management skills and effectively handle conflicting demands-          Proficient with Microsoft Suite including Word and Excel-          Handle sensitive information in a confidential manner-          Effective interpersonal skills-          Attention to detail and quality-          Proficiency with automated calendar management tools-          Demonstrate a solid work ethicDuties-          Membership renewals -          CPE (Continued Professional Education) coordinator for the shareholders and for the firm-          Appointments and scheduling-          Go-To-Person  for those needing access to the shareholders-          Coordinate and manage meetings, events and travel arrangements-          Anticipate and proactively handle certain administrative tasks.-          Develop a strong knowledge of the firm’s structure, policies, procedures, client base and external business relationships.-          Monitor key dates and proactively bring them to the forefront ahead of time-          Prepare, gather and organize materials, files, packets and presentations for shareholder meetings and organize the logistics of such meetings-          Type and distribute notes from executive meetings as requested-          Maintain a record of meeting decisions and monitor action items-          Update and maintain database of key contacts-          Advocate for the firm and protect the integrity of the firm at all times  We are proud to offer a competitive compensation package.  We pay hourly plus time and a half for overtime, as well as performance incentives for all staff levels, including managers.  Our staff members enjoy the use of advanced technology in a team oriented and comfortable office environment.  Ridout, Barrett & Co., PC is an Equal Opportunity Employer.“Voted SABJ Best Places to Work 2016.""",Executive Administrative Assistant Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78216",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-administrative-assistant-job-san-antonio-tx-us-172845285.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=13,,Administrative/Clerical,3e6ee4c35be9ff834fd51dfc357c715f
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:15:59:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Regus is the world’s leading provider of professional workplaces on demand. Vision To lead the flexible workplace revolution. Purpose The Customer Service Representative (CSR) in conjunction with the rest of the centre team plays a key role in delivering an exceptional professional and friendly service to all business centre customer, visitors and prospective clients. The CSR is an extension of our clients business ensuring that they are able to concentrate on their work, while we manage their office needs Key Areas of Responsibility  - First point of contact for new and existing customers and visitors therefore providing an exceptional impression and service  - Responsible for the day to day running of the centre and providing services including:  - Managing switchboards; handling calls of various internal /external clients as well as various Regus areas of business  - Managing meeting room booking system  - Preparing offices for move-in/ move-outs  - Responsible for maintaining and troubleshooting basic IT and telecom technical issues, set up and queries  - Resetting Meeting Rooms to accommodate bookings  - Administrative tasks- delivering their mail, answering their phones, sending their packages, ordering their office supplies,  - Procurement  - Demonstrate ownership of the centre to ensure the centre is ‘show ready’ at all times-  - Ensure continual upkeep and standards of business centre to include offices, meeting rooms and communal areas  - Contributes to the overall revenue of the centre by identifying opportunities to promote Regus products and services  - Duties may vary depending on centre needsKey Skills and Experience & Competencies Key Skills  - Exceptional Customer Service skills, including the ability to remain flexible and calm in high pressure or continually changing situations  - Effective and professional communication skills in both local language and English (written and oral)  - Solid organisational skills, including the ability to prioritise and multi task in a demanding environment  - Working knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite, including Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook and the ability to understand further programmes to assist in the day to day centre operations  - Ability to operate basic office equipmentCompetencies  - Ability to build and maintain strong working relationships  - Embraces Change  - Takes Ownership and uses initiative  - Good Communicator  - Team Player  - ResilientKey Relationships  - New and existing customers (In-house clients, Meeting Room Clients, Virtual Office Clients)  - Centre team  - Line manager",Customer Service Representative - PT - US Job in Charlotte,Full Time,"Charlotte, NC 28201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-pt-us-job-charlotte-nc-us-172644389.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9b2c552af920a091f40ef724645898c3
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:00:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well known company has an immediate opening for an Administrative Assistant to support the VP. Looking for someone who has at least four years experience.You will be responsible for answering phones, calendaring, spreadsheets, and assisting with special projects. Must be proficient in Word, Excel, and Outlook! Must have excellent communication skills and be able to multi-task in a fast paced environment. Great working environment. Email resume as a word attachment to Paris Goldfarb. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074527 Job Experience:,,, Word, Excel, OutlookYears of Experience Required:",ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT NEEDED ASAP! Job in Los Angeles,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Los Angeles, CA 90071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-needed-asap!-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172601561.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b6e0b5f67593015824963ac4d60d4a28
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:05:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Wharton-Smith, Inc is looking for a full-time clerical assistant to work in the Tampa Regional Office. Candidates must be local to the Tampa area. ""EOE-M/F/D/V-Drug-Free Workplace” Apply today: (Choose 1 form only)On-line or E-mail to jobs@whartonsmith.com No Phone Calls Please! Overall duties as assigned by the Office Manager including but not limited to: General administrative tasks, answering phones, working with computers, filing, sending packages, updating data, project research, placing and tracking orders, coordinating meetings, gathering information for routine manuals including O&M's, and other special requests.Local Candidates Only - No relocation compensationMinimum of one year of general office experienceSome knowledge of construction terminolgyWorking knowledge of Microsoft OfficeStrong organizational skills with ability to prioritizeAbility to work independently with little supervisionExcellent oral and written communication skills PI95050843Apply Here",Clerical Assistant Job in Tampa,Full Time Employee,"Tampa, FL 33607",Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/clerical-assistant-job-tampa-fl-us-170799081.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=20,,Administrative/Clerical,3355ab115964e08a4f6c65a02cddda58
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:05:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Immediate need for an experienced Administrative Assistant to work in a hospital setting. 2+ years experience as an Admin Assistant required, however no medical experience is required. Location: Beverly Hills Hours: Mon-Fri regular business hours Primary Duties include: -answering heavy phones-scheduling meetings/calendar for supervisor in Outlook -writing correspondence in Word -creating reports in Excel -coordinating special projects/events Prior Experience:-busy office environment-2+ years of admin experience Requirements:-High School Diploma (some college preferred) -ability to multi-task-strong communication skills We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,,, Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)Typing 30 WPM+Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - $/hr Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Job Description:Immediate need for an experienced Administrative Assistant to work in a hospital setting. 2+ years experience as an Admin Assistant required, however no medical experience is required. Location: Beverly Hills Hours: Mon-Fri regular business hours Primary Duties include: -answering heavy phones-scheduling meetings/calendar for supervisor in Outlook -writing correspondence in Word -creating reports in Excel -coordinating special projects/events Prior Experience:-busy office environment-2+ years of admin experience Requirements:-High School Diploma (some college preferred) -ability to multi-task-strong communication skills We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,,, Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)Typing 30 WPM+Years of Experience Required:",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-15-hr-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172925880.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d295b63685353754851494c8d038865c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:05:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"To provide timely and accurate administrative support services for our managers in order to enhance the quality of the overall service we provide to our clients and employees. * Assist managers with pre-employment processing of employees to include ensuring proper completion of paperwork and pre-employment background checks. Essential Functions: * Initiate first level of payroll and HR processing procedures. * Maintain employee files. * Understand and create spreadsheets for financial reports. * Process invoices for payment. * Process payroll bi-weekly, gather and tabulate time records for employees daily. * General data entry duties and office administration such as answering phone, filing, copying, etc. * Provide excellent service to client and employees. * Maintain administrative records and documents pertaining to the account. * Record minutes of meetings. * Greet and help walk-in visitors in a professional manner. * Prepare reports as assigned by Management. * Handle other duties as assigned by Management. Requirements: * High school diploma required and Associate's degree or higher preferred. Three years successful office administration experience. * High energy level and enthusiastic. * Proficient in Microsoft Office. * Flexible hours. * Experience with hourly time record-keeping procedures. * Experience processing new employees. * Strong organizational skills. * Excellent interpersonal skills. * Ability to work in a team environment. * Sense of urgency to complete tasks and meet deadlines; self-directed. * Ability to handle confidential information. * Ability to handle multi-faceted jobs with completing normal duties A criminal background check, results of which are not necessarily a bar to employment, and a drug screen are required. *MSJA",Administrative Assistant Job in San Diego,"Full Time, Employee","San Diego, CA 92116",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-san-diego-ca-us-172973224.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=17,,Administrative/Clerical,c33ca7e2adfe358e5505b63259f02423
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:05:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential Job Duties: *Please note this position is located in Greensboro, NC.* This position serves as administrative support for the Director of Standards and Regulatory Services, Director of Lean Healthcare, Government & Non-profit Services and the Assistant Director of Health and Safety Services. This position is the primary point of contact for the Directors with responsibilities for collecting, analyzing and preparing information and data for use in meetings, special projects, contract proposals and client interactions. Additionally, the position serves as program liaison to IES's Improvement Specialists and the programs they manage.Other Work/Responsibilities: This position will be responsible for providing administrative support by answering calls, managing calendars, coordinating conference calls, preparing meetings, generating purchase requisitions, handling travel arrangements, assisting with course registration and preparation, generating certificates of completion for courses and coordinating shipping activities. Other duties as assigned.Minimum Experience/Education: High School Diploma or equivalency and one year of related office experience; or equivalent combination of training and experience. Departmental Required Skills: • Excellent communication skills; oral and written • Demonstrated strong organizational skills • Familiar with email and calendar systems • Knowledge of and ability to use Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint (or similar) • Ability to travel to off-site facilities, as needed • Ability to delegate tasks and multi-task • Office support experience and ability to solve problems • Ability to deal with last-minute changes within the supported programs • Independently able to support the functions of the unit with/without the Directors • Strong attention to detailPreferred Experience, Skills, Training/Education: • At least five years of administrative assistant experience • Associate degree preferred • Experience reporting to multiple DirectorsNecessary Licenses or Certifications: N/AAbout the Department/Unit: The Industry Expansion Solutions (IES) is a major component of the State's economic development operation. IES transfers engineering, science, knowledge and technology to North Carolina industry, business and public agencies for the enhancement of quality, productivity, worker safety and environmental protection. This is accomplished by utilizing professional education and technical assistance that meet the needs of business, industry and healthcare professional. Advocating the use of engineering, science and technology through best practices promotes corporate growth and the creation of quality products and services.AA/EEO: NC State University is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, gender identity, age, sexual orientation, genetic information, status as an individual with a disability, or status as a protected veteran. Individuals with disabilities requiring disability-related accommodations in the application and interview process, please call 919-515-3148. Final candidates are subject to criminal & sex offender background checks. Some vacancies also require credit or motor vehicle checks. If highest degree is from an institution outside of the U.S., final candidates are required to have their degree verified at ""www.wes.org"":http//wes.org. Degree must be obtained prior to start date. NC State University participates in E-Verify. Federal law requires all employers to verify the identity and employment eligibility of all persons hired to work in the United States. To apply, please go to https://jobs.ncsu.edu/postings/68177",Administrative Support Specialist Job in Greensboro,Full Time,"Greensboro, NC",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-support-specialist-job-greensboro-nc-us-172758078.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=8,,,d3e876aadbccf6e75bee91c11c59957a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:06:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Convenience Clerk (Part Time) - Howland GetGo Job in Warren,Full Time Employee,"Warren, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convenience-clerk-part-time-howland-getgo-job-warren-oh-us-173007093.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=9,,Administrative/Clerical,12d01a184ab4bd68393123381c2471c4
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:12:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Executive Assistant job – King of Prussia, PA   If you are an executive assistant who is looking for a new challenge, Ajilon Professional Staffing is currently hiring for an Executive Assistant job near King of Prussia, PA. The candidate must have a minimum of 2 years of experience as an executive assistant or related job function.  The main responsibilities would include scheduling appointments/meetings, time management, reporting, and arranging the travel arrangements for executives. It is preferred that the candidate for this job have strong written and verbal communication skills. If interested, please apply now!  Salary: $20-$30 an hour  Responsibilities:  • Management of the calendars for executives • Plan travel arrangements • Processing expense reports • Maintenance reporting • Other reporting as needed and requested by management • Professional communication with high level professionals and executives • Other tasks as assigned Qualifications for this position include:  • A minimum of 2-3 years of experience as an executive assistant or related field • Advanced skills in Excel, Microsoft Word, and Outlook • Strong communication skills • Interpersonal skills• Time management skills • Organizational skills • Strong Professional skills • Bachelor’s Degree preferred  If you are interested in this Executive Assistant job in King of Prussia, PA or other jobs available through Ajilon, please click “apply” below or visit our website www.ajilon.com  ;",Executive Assistant job in King of Prussia,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"King Of Prussia, PA 19406",,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-assistant-job-in-king-of-prussia-pa-job-king-of-prussia-pa-us-172253813.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=10,,Administrative/Clerical,1a92924b371c5bfa410d19fc8832d79a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:12:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative Assistant/Int KEY RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES: Primary responsibilities are to support the business unit of Individual Advisory Services operational day to day duties. All tasks, responsibilities and assignments must be completed with the highest level of quality following regulatory procedures (FINRA). Candidates will be working closely with both internal and external clients, so teamwork is a must. The ideal candidate should have an exceptional level of customer service and problem solving skills, the ability to manage change and excellent communication skills. Duties may include: Greeting clients and manage reception area answer phones and route calls provide general information to clients refer questions and issues to appropriate staff or department for further information and problem resolution. Schedule and communicate in-office appointments for client meetings as well as follow-up calls and confirmations As an Associated Person, process clients forms and checks process mail and incoming correspondence maintain various files, logs and tracking systems in accordance with FINRA regulations Create internal/external correspondence using Microsoft Office products (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, etc.) as well as create correspondence and/or log activities in client management system (Siebel) Compile client data and research May communicate with institutional administrators and act as liaison with consultants Make routine travel arrangements and complete expense reports Order and maintain office supplies and marketing materials Schedule and set-up internal meetings/conference calls/catering as required May act as liaison for office facilities and maintenance issues May act as liaison for vendors and ensure payment of office-related invoices Assist teammates cover other duties during vacations QUALIFICATIONS: High school diploma required, college degree preferred 3-5 years related experience required Proficiency in Outlook, Word and Excel required Desired skills: Able to multi-task and produce in a fast paced, team oriented environment Excellent oral and written communication skillsExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Administrative Assistant/Int Job in Tigard,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Administrative Assistant/Int,"Tigard, OR",http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-int-job-tigard-or-us-173012330.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=17,,Administrative/Clerical,20bcf740e7b46a1c566f1ee6260423c3
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:12:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well known Finance Company is looking for a Receptionist/Administrative Assistant who has at least two years experience. Responsibilities will include answering all incoming calls, receiving and sorting all incoming mail, calendaring, spreadsheets, and working on various projects. Must be proficient in Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook. Looking for a team player who can work in a fast paced environment. Email resume as a word attachment to Paris Goldfarb. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074510 Job Experience:,, excellent communication skillsYears of Experience Required:",RECEPTIONIST/ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT NEEDED! Job in Beverly Hills,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Beverly Hills, CA 90212",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-administrative-assistant-needed!-job-beverly-hills-ca-us-172601567.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),68d2e9dad7b610813b511055e6a308dc
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:12:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Medical secretary needed for a fast-paced, familypractice office. Candidate must be able to work 4 to 5 days a week, including one evening. Must be able to use EMR; have adept computer and communications skills; be a team player. Competitive pay and benefits. Please send resume with 3 references to medicalcandidate@gmail.com This job listing brought to you by The Cumberland Times News Report","CHAPMAN & ASSOCIATES Job Application for Medical Secretary | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Address 21502,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-secretary-job-cumberland-md-us-172976190.aspx?mescoid=4300748001001&jobPosition=15,,,5303c1fdf0a003856040009541ca179c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:13:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:We are interviewing immediately for a unique opportunity in the non-profit sector!This position will include administrative as well as client support work in a non-profit company that is working towards making a big difference in the world one step at a time! Professionalism is key as you will be communicating with donors via phone, email, and in person. Ideal requirements are:5-7 years of previous office experienceTech savvy!Typing at least 60wpmData entry both alpha and numericProfessional attireStrong initiative and detail orientedAbility to proof documents for accuracy, and make edits as necessary**4 year degree preferredPrevious use of Adobe programs highly desirable!#Growth#Challenge#Motivated#FootInDoor#Loveyourjob#MovingUp#Opportunity# We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074483 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant/Client Support - Job in San Diego,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92121",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-client-support-job-san-diego-ca-us-172601527.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8fecf5caff805a1e0e4bfcdba18fb1cf
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:13:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Position : Safety Data CoordinatorLocation: San Ramon, CA/SFO, CA (work location in San Ramon or San Francisco as it will be somewhat dependent on availability of office space)Duration: 6 months+ Contract Position Summary and Responsibilities The Safety Data Coordinator (SDC) works with various stakeholders within SHEL and across the Lines of Business to providing accurate safety statistics and OSHA recodkeeping, and motor vehicle incident (MVI) and near hit classification within specific quality and timeliness parameters.SDCs also provide critical process control functions to the incident management process through running and evaluating reports, establishing and maintaining tracking systems, one-on-one follow-up.The final component of the SDC job is responding to ad hoc requests for information related to specific incidents.SDCs function as a team, documenting processes, providing back-up and quality review for each other.Reporting Relationship The Safety Data Coordinator will report directly to the Manager, Benchmarking & Analytics Minimum Qualifications: Exceptional communication skills and customer focus Production of periodic reports (monthly, quarterly, etc.) Intermediate skills with the Microsoft Office suite products, e.g., excel, powerpoint, outlook Familiarity with SAP screens, data entry and workflow Desired Qualifications: Experience working with OSHA recordkeeping regulations. Experience in the utility, insurance or safety-related industry Bachelor&rsquo;s degree in related field Responsibilities Use SAP to coordinate and perform incident management tasks related to injuries, Motor Vehicle Incidents (MVIs), and Near Hit incidents (NHs) Assign and maintain OSHA-recordkeeping categories to individual injury records (recordable vs not recordable) based on medical treatment information Assign and maintain MVI classification information such as preventable vs non-preventable and serious vs minor Assign and maintain NH classification information such as action level and category information Research individual incident information using SAP search functionality Utilize SAP&rsquo;s Business warehouse (BW) and Business Objects (BOBJ) tools to extract incident data and format that data using standard excel graphical, filters and pivot table functionality Run reports from various systems, compare them with control values and identify appropriate control activities to take Organize and maintain records in support of asbestos- and respirator-related testing. Provide coverage and response for a safety-related inquiry email box for miscellaneous incident and macro-level requests Report","Finezi Job Application for Safety Data Analyst / Safety Data Coordinator | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Position : Safety Data CoordinatorLocation: San Ramon, CA/SFO, CA (work location in San Ramon or San Francisco as it will be somewhat dependent on availability of office space)Duration: 6 months+ Contract Position Summary and Responsibilities The Safety Data Coordinator (SDC) works with various stakeholders within SHEL and across the Lines of Business to providing accurate safety statistics and OSHA recodkeeping, and motor vehicle incident (MVI) and near hit classification within specific quality and timeliness parameters.SDCs also provide critical process control functions to the incident management process through running and evaluating reports, establishing and maintaining tracking systems, one-on-one follow-up.The final component of the SDC job is responding to ad hoc requests for information related to specific incidents.SDCs function as a team, documenting processes, providing back-up and quality review for each other.Reporting Relationship The Safety Data Coordinator will report directly to the Manager, Benchmarking & Analytics Minimum Qualifications: Exceptional communication skills and customer focus Production of periodic reports (monthly, quarterly, etc.) Intermediate skills with the Microsoft Office suite products, e.g., excel, powerpoint, outlook Familiarity with SAP screens, data entry and workflow Desired Qualifications: Experience working with OSHA recordkeeping regulations. Experience in the utility, insurance or safety-related industry Bachelor&rsquo;s degree in related field Responsibilities Use SAP to coordinate and perform incident management tasks related to injuries, Motor Vehicle Incidents (MVIs), and Near Hit incidents (NHs) Assign and maintain OSHA-recordkeeping categories to individual injury records (recordable vs not recordable) based on medical treatment information Assign and maintain MVI classification information such as preventable vs non-preventable and serious vs minor Assign and maintain NH classification information such as action level and category information Research individual incident information using SAP search functionality Utilize SAP&rsquo;s Business warehouse (BW) and Business Objects (BOBJ) tools to extract incident data and format that data using standard excel graphical, filters and pivot table functionality Run reports from various systems, compare them with control values and identify appropriate control activities to take Organize and maintain records in support of asbestos- and respirator-related testing. Provide coverage and response for a safety-related inquiry email box for miscellaneous incident and macro-level requests",,http://jobview.monster.com/safety-data-analyst-safety-data-coordinator-job-san-ramon-ca-us-172749520.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=15,,,9c258db67137236cf62729afe9f846d0
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:13:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:A highly regarded Property Management company in West Los Angeles is actively seeking an Administrative Assistant. The Administrative Assistant will act as a liaison between different departments, maintain office supply inventory, answer tenant inquiries, coordinate and track maintenance requests, and assist Property Manager as needed. Strong organization skills, a can do attitude, and great communication skills are desired. This is a great opportunity for someone looking to build a career in real estate/property management! To apply for this great opportunity as an Administrative Assistant submit your resume as a Word document and contact Yami Rodriguez at the Act-1 Los Angeles. Responsibilities: ?Answer phone calls and direct as necessary. ?Organize and schedule meetings and appointments ?Maintain contact lists ?Produce and distribute correspondence memos, letters, faxes and forms ?Assist in the preparation of regularly scheduled reports ?Develop and maintain a filing system ?Order office supplies ?Coordinate inspections, and follow up on the completion of repairs. ?Schedule, coordinate & attend leasing process. ?Input all client information into client database system. ?Schedule 30 Day, 90 Day & 120 Day client customer service follow up calls. Requirements: ?Proven administrative or assistant experience ?Knowledge of office management systems and procedures ?Excellent time management skills and ability to multi-task and prioritize work ?Attention to detail and problem solving skills ?Excellent written and verbal communication skills ?Strong organizational and planning skills ?Proficiency in MS Office ?Knowledge of Real Estate and/or Property Management We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1075314 Job Experience:?High School diploma required, Bachelor's in Business preferred ?Minimum 1 year of administrative or general office experience requiredYears of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant Opportunity in Property Management! Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-opportunity-in-property-management!-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172749764.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1f05f247cd88d6944a7de52912a4a74e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:15:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Purchasing Administrative AssistantAre you an experience Purchasing Administrative Assistant looking for a contract opportunity in Nashville, TN? We have a great opportunity for you!Company Profile:The largest independent office furniture dealer in Middle TennesseeCompany started in 1980Offers a wide range of office furniture solutions and servicesFeatures and Benefits:Medical and Dental insurance plans available after 90 day so of employment with the client401K - 3% company match after one yearStable environment2 weeks of vacation after 1 year + 3 sick days per yearCasual work environment - Jeans are okThe Purchasing Specialist Job Responsibilities:      The purchasing/administrative assistant will be responsible for a wide array of duties involving administrative and purchasing support. They are going through a software implementation, and are needing additional assistance. Primary responsibilities will include:Receiving orders/tickets and analyze reports for ordersCollaborate with project managersManage ‘work in progress’ orders and work with various departments to ensure orders are being filledManage aging report for past due invoices including contact customers regarding billing discrepancies and filing invoicesCommunicate with customer regarding ordersVerify and work with inventory departmentCode inventory items in system to ensure accuracyData entry into system for product informationGenerate and manage purchase ordersCollaborate with vendors regarding shipment and deliveriesCollaborate with accounting department regarding accounts payables and related informationManage and create excel spreadsheetsEnsure warehouse has received all current orders This position will involve someone who can multi-task, has excellent customer service skills, and has experience managing and generating purchase orders. Someone who has experience collaborating with various departments to ensure a smooth running process is important.The Purchasing Specialist Job Skills:Must be detail-oriented and review work thoroughlyMust be extremely organized and efficientMust have strong time-management skillsMust be able to manage multiple tasks and jobs simultaneouslyMust be able to work in a fast-paced environment Must possess strong communication skills, both written and oralMust be proficient in Microsoft Office, Microsoft Excel and Outlook2 years purchasing experience is preferred, a background in Accounts Payable would also be consideredHigh School Diploma or GEDPrevious experience with Sage would be very helpful, because that is the software that they are implementing. Please visit us at  https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/nashville.html ",Purchasing Specialist Job in Nashville,"Full Time, Employee","Nashville, TN",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/purchasing-specialist-job-nashville-tn-us-172805728.aspx?mescoid=1300068001001&jobPosition=8,14.00 - 16.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,62bc3d345089646cb4ea40c1e3f88860
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:15:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:Union National Insurance, with a district office in Shreveport, LA is in need of a talented office clerk/administrator looking to contribute to our dedicated team. Our team members efficiently and accurately process various administrative duties in accordance to company and industry standards and within adherence to contract provisions and legal requirements.This is a part time position, 20 hours, Monday Thursday and Friday between 8:00 - 4:30. We offer a salary that starts at $8.75 hourly.Our ideal candidate will enjoy multi-tasking and working with a dedicated team with a strong customer service focus. The position includes handling money, computer tasks and phone responsibilities. If you like variety, learning on the job and completing valued clerical office work, please apply today.Responsibilities:• Perform required computer transactions, reports, and process payments.• Balance and prepare bank deposits.• Receive, verify and process agent deposits.• Upload and download handheld computers.• Communicate via written correspondence and/or telephone.• Successfully resolve customer inquiries and complaints.• Maintain standard filing system for the district office.Position Qualifications:• High School diploma or equivalent.• 1+ years of office experience.• Good organizational, time management and customer service skills.• Working knowledge of Microsoft Outlook, Word and Excel is required.• Must be proficient with 10 key calculator.• Basic bookkeeping knowledge is preferred.Apply online link: http://bit.ly/asstadmin4102 Kemper at a glanceWith $8 billion in assets, Kemper is one of the nation's leading insurers. The Kemper family of companies specializes in home, auto, life, health and valuables insurance products for individuals, families and businesses.Kemper’s underwriting companies* are rated A- (Excellent) by A.M. Best Company, the leading insurance industry rating authority. Kemper services six million policies and ranks among the top 25 personal lines property and casualty writers.*Alliance United Insurance Company is not rated.We value diversity and strive to be an employer of choice.An Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V ~CB~ ~M~",Part Time Administrative Assistant Job in Shreveport,Full Time Employee,"Shreveport, LA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-administrative-assistant-job-shreveport-la-us-172927740.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=19,,Administrative/Clerical,39a74ce120c81023de92942f2fa53eb3
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:15:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p 3rd Shift - 10p - 6a (Overnight) Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Convenience Sub Shop Clerk (Part Time) - Brookville GetGo Job in Brookville,Full Time Employee,"Brookville, PA",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convenience-sub-shop-clerk-part-time-brookville-getgo-job-brookville-pa-us-173007114.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=8,,Administrative/Clerical,ca6d1885ee2e551a4d8efd0dcfd14e56
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:15:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:A leading and very well-known financial institution is currently seeking receptionists for their San Jose, Palo Alto, and San Francisco Locations. The ideal candidate for this role would be someone who can work in a fast paced environment, is extremely comfortable answering phones and greeting visitors, and is very efficient at performing clerical and data entry assignments. Must have strong written and verbal communication skills, be customer service oriented and attentive to detail. Strong organizational skills are also a plus as this role requires a good amount of multi-tasking. Candidate must know how to operate basic office equipment and be comfortable performing routine tasks such as sorting through and distributing mail as well as processing word documents. These positions are likely to fill very quickly, so if you are a self-starter and would like to get started on this exciting opportunity, apply for this position today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075379 Job Experience:,, 2+ years working a receptionist, data entry, or clerical role is highly preferred; high school diploma, customer service experience, ability to work a switchboard, knowledge of computers and relevant software applicationsYears of Experience Required:",Receptionist needed - up to $k Job in San Jose,Full Time Employee,"Job Description:A leading and very well-known financial institution is currently seeking receptionists for their San Jose, Palo Alto, and San Francisco Locations. The ideal candidate for this role would be someone who can work in a fast paced environment, is extremely comfortable answering phones and greeting visitors, and is very efficient at performing clerical and data entry assignments. Must have strong written and verbal communication skills, be customer service oriented and attentive to detail. Strong organizational skills are also a plus as this role requires a good amount of multi-tasking. Candidate must know how to operate basic office equipment and be comfortable performing routine tasks such as sorting through and distributing mail as well as processing word documents. These positions are likely to fill very quickly, so if you are a self-starter and would like to get started on this exciting opportunity, apply for this position today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075379 Job Experience:,, 2+ years working a receptionist, data entry, or clerical role is highly preferred; high school diploma, customer service experience, ability to work a switchboard, knowledge of computers and relevant software applicationsYears of Experience Required:",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-needed-up-to-34k-job-san-jose-ca-us-172751495.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5cf4489059f6fd56b3964cb674d3e14d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:15:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsStar Management is an established leader in the Manufactured Housing Industry. We operate thousands of homesites with locations in California, Nevada and Utah. With over 50 years of stability and experience, we are looking for energetic individuals to join our team.We presently have an opening for Regional Property Manager to manage several southern California communities and to work out of our corporate office in Santa Ana, CA.Responsibilities• Supervise on-site staff• Arrange service contracts with outside vendors• Conduct property inspections• Respond to resident complaints• Hire on-site staff & maintenance workers• Ensure resident compliance with rules and regulations• Facilitate efficient turnover of rental units• Coordinate advertising for available units• Review rental applications• Monitor performance to budget• Handle property emergencies• Reconcile rent rolls• Prepare and serve pay or quit notices• Attend eviction trials• Ensure compliance with local, state and federal laws• Develop scope of capital improvement projects and home rehabs• Obtain bids for capital improvements and home rehabs• Oversee vendors performing capital improvements and home rehabs• Assist in property budget preparationEducation• Bachelor's Degree, field related to real estate• Courses in property management completedQualifications• Certified Property Manager (CPM) a plus• CA Real Estate License• HCD Mobilehome Salesperson License - desired• Mobilehome Residency Law• Fair Housing Practices• Landlord Tenant Law• WMA MCM• California Drivers License• Must be bondableSkills• Intermediate computer skills• Excellent written & verbal communication skills• Excellent multitasker• Good negotiation skills • Supervises others effectively• Well organized• Team player• Detail oriented• Construction experience• Residential property management experience• Leasing• Rent ControlCompensation$70,000 to $80,000 + bonusPosition TypeFull-TimeBenefits2 Weeks paid vacation per year1 Week sick leave per yearInsurance - medical, dental & vision 90% employer paid401k plan availableCompany provided vehicle, iPhone, laptop or iPadFull kitchen on premisesBusiness casual atmosphere",Regional Property Manager Job in Santa Ana,Full Time,"Santa Ana, CA 92701",All,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-property-manager-job-santa-ana-ca-us-172180262.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8bf5f983f1f3a22affbd57b8f7acf5c7
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:19:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"DTI is the nationâ€™s largest independent provider of e-discovery, managed document review, facilities management and knowledge process outsourcing. DTI serves the nationâ€™s leading law firms and Fortune 500 corporations through its 26 highly secure service centers located in major cities across the United States. We believe that we have achieved this success by providing our customers the highest level of quality and service. This reputation for quality and performance rests 100% on the efforts of our employees. In order to continue our growth and success, we must constantly look to add high-caliber individuals to our team. If you have a â€œcan doâ€ attitude, together with a â€œclient firstâ€ set of priorities, we guarantee that we have an opportunity for you. Position Description:DTI is currently seeking a Copy/Mail Clerk to work onsite at a Law Firm. Requirements:Seeking customer focused service personnel to provide office support service duties including: Copy, Scanning, Binding, Faxing, Equipment maintenance, Mail and Shipping. Duties may also include, but are not limited to Copy, Scanning, Binding, Faxing, Equipment maintenance, Mail and Shipping, and other administrative office dutiesProvide support for miscellaneous requests and flex services with a ""can do"" attitude and philosophyMaintain a positive team-player mentalityAccurately communicate with client staff and DTI team members regarding commitments, deadlines, challenges, requests, etc High School Diploma or equivalentMinimum of 1 year professional level work experience preferred, but not required with strong customer service backgroundWillingness and ability to learn new skillsBe personable, articulate, knowledgeable and professional in presenting oneself in a professional settingFlexibility in dealing with simultaneous projectsAttention to detailAbility to function with a high level of patience, tact and diplomacy in handling any ""complaint"" situationsHigh integrity, be professional with strong customer service focus with good verbal, written and interpersonal communication skillsAble to walk and stand for extended periods of time and able to lift up to 50 poundsQualifications:High School Diploma or equivalentMinimum of 1 year professional level work experienceWillingness and ability to learn new skillsBe personable, articulate, knowledgeable and professional in presenting oneself in a professional settingFlexibility in dealing with simultaneous projectsAttention to detailAbility to function with a high level of patience, tact and diplomacy in handling any ""complaint"" situationsHigh integrity, be professional with strong customer service focus with good verbal, written and interpersonal communication skillsAble to walk and stand for extended periods of time and able to lift up to 50 pounds Experience is preferred, but not required with strong customer service background",Mail/Copy Operator /  Job in Washington,"Full Time, Employee","Washington, DC 20004",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/mail-copy-operator-2097-job-washington-dc-us-172678187.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=4,,Administrative/Clerical,3702979d49cd457a3f0512c38992eade
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:19:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Grocery team, you will be responsible for replenishing stock for our customers. The majority of your time will be spent on the sales floor, directly interacting with our customers and ensuring they are able to find the products they need. As a member of our team, you will also be fully trained and able to assist customers in other areas in the store including, but not limited to, the Dairy and Frozen Departments, as well as the Front End service area. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by ensuring products are replenished on the shelves and helping customers locate product. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Be knowledgeable of weekly ad items. Smile and greets customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Replenish product on the shelf, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room. Set up displays on the sales floor. Assist in maintaining back room efficiency by unloading deliveries. Rotate and check code dates on products to ensure customer's safety. Assist in other areas as required. Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Numeric Computation/Reporting Presentation & Verbal Communic Written Communication Takes Direction Work Environment Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Matching Pulling Sorting Standing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Pushing Reading Reaching Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Climbing Grasping Sight or Peripheral Vision Twisting Equipment Used Cardboard Baler Compactor Electric/Manual Jacks Safety Cutter U-Boats",Stock Clerk (Part Time) Middlefield Giant Eagle Job in Middlefield,Full Time Employee,"Middlefield, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/stock-clerk-part-time-middlefield-giant-eagle-job-middlefield-oh-us-173009699.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=13,,Administrative/Clerical,07f1d4b9b536215e2e58766148a38570
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:19:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provides operational and sales support to the EAS sales teams and leadership. Support globally consistent data collection and reporting practices for a consistent managerial approach in all regions. Provide front line support to the sales teams to resolve inquiries and support sales effectiveness. • Support departmental data and reporting needs including, but not limited to:o Collecting data needed to support analysis of business performance, sales team activity, growth and strategy planning, etc by Operations Manager and GVPo Prepare reoccurring and adhoc performance reporting and analysis for EAS Leadership• Utilize Dashboards and technology or Excel based databases to extract data, build reporting, and identify trends to support business management and decision making• Consistently and accurately report against business unit Key Performance Indicators and financial metrics• Assist in monthly territory reconciliations and fielding account/territory alignment inquiries from sales team• Provide front line support to the sales teams• Assist in handling EAS inquiries regarding performance crediting issues and working with CHD to resolve• Prepare ticket reports for ERS teamRequirements:• Bachelor's Degree in Business, preferably in Finance• 1-3 years overall business experience preferred• Advanced Microsoft office skills, especially Excel & PowerPoint• Familiarity with basic business measurements• Strong organizational skills and attention to detail• Ability to work effectively on multiple projects at the same time• Demonstrated ability to work independently and with little direction• Experience and aptitude to work in databases• Demonstrate strong problem solving skills• High sense of urgency• Solution Oriented• Ability to quickly adapt to change• Possess excellent interpersonal skills• Strong Oral & Written Communication Skills• Ability to business presentations and reports for executive level• Comprehensive knowledge of Client's internal systems and reporting.TCM is an EEO/Vets/Disabled Employer.",Reporting Specialist Job in Miromar Lakes,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project","Miromar Lakes, FL 33913",,http://jobview.monster.com/reporting-specialist-job-miromar-lakes-fl-us-172645688.aspx?mescoid=4300761001001&jobPosition=17,,Entry Level,9f28ab9b636bbf40841c95f397df140e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:30:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Exciting opportunity for a Experienced Front Office Medical Receptionist We are currently seeking a experienced medical receptionist for an Outpatient physical therapy clinic located in Royal Palm Beach, FL. We are looking for a strong, experienced, dependable, responsible, and multi-tasked individual who can keep the front office running smoothly! WE DO REQUIRE MEDICAL RECEPTIONIST EXPERIENCE! Job Duties:•Greet patients•Answer phones•Electronic Scheduling•Data Entry•Verify current personal and financial information•Book appointments•Verify insurance benefits•Charge tickets•Collecting money over the counter•Faxing and Filing and perform any other duties assignedJob Requirements:• Must have 2+years of previous knowledge in a medical front office. If you do not have medical receptionist experience, please do not apply, we require medical receptionist exp.• Excellent telephone skills • Must be proficient in Word and Excel. • Previous experience with Medical Manager, Medisoft or other medical software preferred. • Team player attitude, energetic, with a focus on excellent customer service.• Be flexible with your hours.• Attention to detail• Time Management skills• Be Organized Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to stand and sit. The employee is frequently required to be mobile. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 30 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus.We offer a competitive total compensation package including hourly wage as well as a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, disability, life and a 401(k) plan, in addition to other outstanding benefits such as Paid Time Off. A valid driver's license is required and any employment offers are contingent upon a clear background check.Please apply online to be considered with salary history. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer - M/F/D/V PI95491062",Medical Front Desk Receptionist Job in Royal Palm Beach,Full Time,"Royal Palm Beach, FL 33411",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-front-desk-receptionist-job-royal-palm-beach-fl-us-172993413.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=9,Hourly Wage,,7213d45e274fc457944ac7db254c7787
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:31:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hot South Austin Architectural firm is looking for a Part-Time Receptionist on a contract to possible hire basis. Company Profile:Innovative Architectural and Engineering firm that was founded in 1983 that prides itself on integrity and customer service.Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insuranceBenefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of Client:Laid back atmosphereClose knit groupCompany that gives back to the communityOffice events that provide team-buildingPart-Time Receptionist Role:As the Part-Time Receptionist, you will be answering phones and transferring calls in a busy environmentGreet guests enthusiastically, but professionallyThe Part-Time Receptionist will order supplies and keep up the appearance of the office.Receive and distribute mailConstruct and develop documents/presentationsThe Part-Time Receptionist will also set up conference rooms, that will be audio visual readyBack up the project manager as neededBackground Profile:Must have 2-3 years experience as a Receptionist in a professional setting; preferably in an Architectural or Engineering firmSome college preferredStrong work ethicProficiency in Microsoft OfficeProficiency in Web ExPlease visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/austin.htmlEqual Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Part-Time Receptionist Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",Architectural and Design Services,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-receptionist-job-austin-tx-us-172838074.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=2,13.00 - 14.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,5f2158dca5e8be917e75052570d50f4c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:32:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"CHENEGA SUPPORT SERVICES, LLC Company Job Title:Project Administrator III Clearance:BackgroundLocation:San Antonio TXReports To:Program ManagerFLSA Status:Non-Exempt, Full Time, HourlyPrepared Date:09-26-2016Approved Date: 09-26-2016 Executive Order 13495, The Non Displacement of Qualified Workers Under Service Contracts provide first right of refusal to incumbents on contracts. If the position is accepted by the incumbent on the job, other application/resume of non-incumbents will not be reviewed. Summary: The Project Administrator is responsible for planning and coordinating project schedules, budgeting, and administrative tasks; supports the project staff by facilitating project logistics such as meetings, conference rooms, conference calls, etc, takes meeting minutes and action items during meetings and performs basic follow-up. Assists in development of presentations, familiar with a variety of the field's concepts, practices, and procedures, relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals, and performs a variety of tasks. Works closely with project team and Government clients to coordinate/schedule site visits. Scheduling and making travel arrangements a major plus. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: (Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position)· Works independently on assigned tasks· Assists project managers in conduct of their assigned projects· Has full responsibility for assigned tasks in support of projects· Performs project work under direct supervision, and input from project managers· Supports projects, with some lower-tier lead responsibilities· Applying basic project management skills, abilities, and techniques to support work· Administering and maintaining records for project budgets, and activities· Contributes to periodic evaluations of projects,· Assists the lead Project Administrator with development, designing, implementing, and producing procedures for all aspects of project maintenance of records and documents.Non-Essential Duties:· Other duties as assigned Supervisory Responsibilities:· None Minimum Qualifications:(To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.) Bachelor's degree in business, education, or a related field and 5 years' experience or 10 years equivalent combination of education and work experience.Enthusiastic and customer focused team player.Competence in project management and financial planning. Ability to make decisions and work somewhat independently. Good interpersonal, conflict resolution, communications, and teaming skills.Ability to work with others (especially in support mode).Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: · Effective interpersonal skills (e.g., ability to work as part of a team, communicate effectively, work/interact effectively and amicably with people from diverse backgrounds and cultures and with diverse personal attributes).· Effective communication skills (i.e., ability to present ideas effectively in formal and informal situations and convey thoughts clearly and concisely, both orally and in writing).· Strong planning, organizational, and time management skills (i.e., ability to effectively plan, organize, and prioritize work, and to control and follow up to assure work completion).· Computer skills in electronics file management, MS outlook etc. Diversity:· Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; Educates others on the value of diversity; Promotes a harassment-free environment; Builds a diverse workforce. Ethics:· Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; Inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values. Physical Demands:· The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.· While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision. Work Environment:· The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.· The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.· During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise. Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Native preference under PL 93-638. We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.",Project Administrator III Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-administrator-iii-job-san-antonio-tx-us-173002322.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=4,,,4c9ff4503cda56814ef3ca55cf9ad7ad
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:50:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job *TOP JOB*The Health Plan is seeking a qualified, self- motivated individual to join our team in the St. Clairsville/Wheeling office as Director of Benefit Services. This individual will assist the VP of Benefit Services in developing new processes and procedures, new products and ongoing administrative services. Candidate must possess college degree and experience in the self-funded health care industry. Individual must have at least ten years' working in sales and account management and previous management and staffing experience. Candidate must have previous involvement working directly with clients; ability to define problems, gather and analyze data, establish facts and draw valid conclusions and knowledge of stop loss reinsurance. Individual must be proficient in Microsoft Office with emphasis in PowerPoint and Excel.The Health Plan offers a great work environment, a competitive compensation and benefit package. Interested candidates should visit our website healthplan.org under careers and submit an online application or resume toHuman ResourcesThe Health Plan52160 National Rd EastSt. Clairsville, OH 43950 or email: HR@healthplan.orgThe Health Plan is anEO employer - Veterans/Disabledand other protected categories.provided by The Intelligencer and Wheeling News-Register Report","The Health Plan Upper Job Application for The Health Plan Director Of Benefit Services | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Address Ohio Valley. Attn Carla B.52160 National Rd EastSaint Clairsville, OH 43950",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/the-health-plan-director-of-benefit-services-job-saint-clairsville-oh-us-172692229.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=4,,,e888a7f985948c4acff9db1755bbf187
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:50:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Outstanding opportunity to join this national firm as a key Sales Support Specialist. This firm is known for their stability and tenure and is looking for that team player who is looking for that long term situation. Formalized training will prepare you to support the sales team in Seattle. This is a varied job where you will be doing admin, running proposals, doing research, answering questions, and whatever else can make the office be a better producer. Your prior experience using your computer skills and your strong customer service aptitude may be the key ingredients to being considered. This is a great chance to utilize your full set of skills including your ability to make decisions, learn quickly, problem solving, creativity, strategic agility, organizational, planning, and communicating with the staff, corporate headquarters, and the customer.Interviewing now and looking to start someone asap. If you have solid admin/customer service skills, good references, and are ready to make a change, contact us today! Any experience in the insurance industry is a plus. Apply today and please attach a short cover letter with your resume telling us just how great you would be in this position. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075552 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Sales Support Specialist to $K - Job in Seattle,Full Time Employee,"Seattle, WA 98101",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-support-specialist-to-45k-job-seattle-wa-us-172758385.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fdd7026462e27b863cf79499f70c3fc6
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:51:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"2014 Pillar Award winner - Multifamily Development Firm of the Year! At NRP Group, we successfully develop, build, own, manage and have partnered in numerous projects in multifamily, senior housing, single-family infill, and commercial and retail sites. From high-density urban infill sites to more suburban settings, our focus is to make every building we develop, construct and/or manage a true reflection of the special needs and desires of our customers and residents, with a commitment to excellence from concept to completion. In fact, we developed nearly 17,000 single-family and multi-family homes and apartments in the past 16 years with our eye on more to come.We develop, construct, and operate high quality market-rate and affordable rental properties. We are a dynamic and growing company that works in conjunction with many financial institutions, partners, and non-profit organizations to pursue the development and financing of real estate properties. Currently, The NRP Group has assets and operations in Ohio, Texas, Louisiana, North Carolina, Virginia, Arizona, New Mexico, Michigan, and Indiana.Azure Pointe a 140 unit LIHTC community is currently seeking a Part-Time Leasing Specialist. This position will assist site management and be responsible for: ensuring a professional leasing atmosphere; developing and maintaining all elements of the community marketing and outreach plan; maintaining occupancy levels, collections and delinquencies; ensuring positive tenant relations; and complying with related reporting requirements. Ideal candidate will have:• Strong property operations knowledge with at least two (2) plus years’ experience.• Knowledge/experience in Low Income Housing Tax Credit (LIHTC), Section 42, or other affordable housing programs preferred. • Proficiency with entering data into YARDI (or similar) software.• Solid MS Office skills (Word, Outlook, Excel).• A positive attitude and willingness to be a team player. • Eagerness to learn and develop professionally. • Ability to take direction and listen. • A passion for helping and assisting people. •I ndustry certifications or credentials such as ARM, CPM, COS, or HCCP a plus.• Hold a valid driver's license.We offer a competitive pay rate plus bonus opportunities and a benefit package that includes: medical, dental, prescription, life and disability insurance, paid time off, and 401(k) retirement plan. Qualified candidates, please apply now. You will be required to pass a criminal background and drug test.",Part Time Leasing Specialist - Azure Pointe Job in Beaumont,"Part Time, Employee","Beaumont, TX 77706",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-leasing-specialist-azure-pointe-job-beaumont-tx-us-170415195.aspx?mescoid=4100687001001&jobPosition=16,,Administrative/Clerical,8f3fbd6f326e1c03227ec92113e83548
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:51:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description North Pacific Paper Corporation (NORPAC), is located in Longview Washington and is a joint venture between Weyerhaeuser Company and Nippon Paper of Japan. NORPAC is a printing paper manufacturer and currently has a need for Journey-level Mechanics in its highly regarded team-based multi-craft maintenance department. Hourly wage starts at $33.33 with increase (typically at 6 months), to $38.32 with competitive benefit package. Interested candidates must provide a cover letter and resume. Qualifications General requirements for the position include demonstrated ability to work safely and comply with safety procedures, excellent team and communication skills, the ability to work without direct supervision, strong interest in learning other crafts, basic computer skills, and a willingness to work in a hot, humid and noisy environment.For this position you must have a journey-level rating or equivalent millwright or mechanical experience plus at least two years of experience working in a continuous process industry in a maintenance role. Previous work experience working in a paper or pulp mill maintenance is a plus, but is not required.Must have multi-craft experience which includes knowledge/skills in most of the following: lubrication, welding, basic electrical, hydraulics, print reading, bearing assembly and mounting, precision assembly and fitting, rigging, shop fabrication, layout and alignment, troubleshooting and machine shop. About Our Cellulose Fibers Business Our customers are expanding all over the globe, and we’re growing with them. We’re a leader in manufacturing fluff pulp for absorbent products, but that’s not all. We also seek new markets for using cellulose fibers in unique and unexpected ways, such as textiles and plastics. This team operates with excellence while pushing for creative solutions to meet tomorrow’s needs.About WeyerhaeuserWe grow trees and make forest products that improve lives in fundamental ways. Our wood products are used to build homes, where families are sheltered and raised. Our cellulose fibers are used to make diapers and other hygiene products that keep people clean and healthy. We innovate to use trees in products you may not expect, such as fabric, plastics and energy. At Weyerhaeuser, we’re working together to be the world’s premier timber, land, and forest products company.Weyerhaeuser is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to taking affirmative action to employ and advance in employment women, minorities, qualified individuals with disabilities and protected veterans. *M",Journey Level Maintenance Technician Job in Longview,Full Time Employee,"Longview, WA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/journey-level-maintenance-technician-job-longview-wa-us-168471542.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,0d6a1ab57f5eacade989f50b4d83ac10
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:52:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Position Summary: Responsible for the daily/weekly maintaining of pallet tracking (where applicable), audit of driver logs and trip reports, log and driver file DOT requirements tracking. Liaison for internal customer support. Track all return goods as directed by the customer for close out of returns from the private fleet. Major Responsibilities: Job responsibilities may include: -Various office and administrative duties, which may include handling accounts payable/receivable and collections, payroll, fuel reconciliation, office supplies, billing, maintaining database and miscellaneous reporting -Audit of logs and trip reports and other DOT reporting, maintain of files, customer service interaction, resolution of driver equipment requests and pallet tracking. Maintenance and distribution of route books, daily interface with drivers, assist with driver coverage of vacation and overflow freight -Involve Safety team as required by location -Prioritize workload and have flexibility to adjust based on position requirements -Ability to maintain confidentiality is essential -Other projects and tasks assigned by supervisor -Will be required to take calls from drivers as needed on a weekly basis Qualifications -2 years of general office experience required -1+ year of Transportation/DOT experience - highly desired -1 year of customer service experience required -High School diploma or equivalent required -Advanced computer skills including Microsoft Word, Excel, Outlook and PowerPoint required -AS400 experience preferred -Willingness to travel as necessary, work the required schedule, work at the specific location required, complete Penske employment application, submit to a background investigation (to include past employment, education, and criminal history) and drug screening. Physical Requirements: -The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an associate to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. -The associate must regularly lift and /or move up to 25/lbs12kg, frequently lift and/or move up to 50lbs/ 23kg and occasionally lift and/or move up to 100lbs/45kg. -Specific vision abilities required by this job include Close vision, Distance vision, Peripheral vision, Depth perception and Ability to adjust focus. -While performing the duties of this Job, the associate is regularly required to stand; walk; sit and talk or hear. The associate is frequently required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. Penske is an Equal Opportunity Employer, including individuals with disabilities and protected veterans. Penske Logistics is a wholly owned subsidiary of Penske Truck Leasing. With operations in North America, South America, Europe and Asia, Penske Logistics provides supply chain management and logistics services to leading companies around the world. Penske Logistics delivers value through its design, planning and execution in transportation, warehousing and freight management. Visit www.PenskeLogistics.com to learn more.",Dispatching Clerk Job in Enid,,"Enid, OK 73701",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/dispatching-clerk-job-enid-ok-us-168326203.aspx?mescoid=4300733001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1574b07fde9178cc195e919256711a18
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:16:55:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTION:United Rentals, the largest equipment rental company in the world, is offering an excellent opportunity for a CDL-A Driver ready to grow their career with the leading company in the industry. To continue our tremendous success and unparalleled growth, we are searching for qualified individuals to assist in meeting trench safety needs of our customers by delivering equipment in a safe, timely, efficient, and courteous manner. Responsibilities will include dropping off and picking up equipment for customers, operating heavy construction equipment such as manual transmission semi-trucks and trailers (""rollbacks"" or dovetails"")consistent with DOT classification CDL-A, maintaining a driver log and suggesting additional equipment and supplies as customers may need. Drivers must also be able to operate boom trucks and cranes in accordance with manufacturer specifications.REQUIREMENTS:Superior customer service remains the backbone of United Rentals, therefore your willingness and ability to provide this to each customer makes you a top-notch candidate. To be qualified for this position, the ideal candidate should have basic knowledge of trench safety construction equipment and safe driving procedures, maintain a clean driving record, and should possess a diligent attention to safety. Further knowledge should include GVW's, state height and weight regulations, winch operations, HAZMAT transport and OSHA familiarity training. A valid Class A CDL driver's license is required and a high school diploma or equivalent is preferred. United Rentals, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer of women, minorities, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.",CDL A Driver Job in Manassas,Full Time Employee,"Manassas, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/cdl-a-driver-job-manassas-va-us-168339600.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=12,,Logistics/Transportation,d1cc67122dc8e34f89065620ce19b874
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:02:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description The DIRECTV Installer is responsible for providing excellent customer service through installing, troubleshooting, maintaining, and upgrading satellite television systems and equipment. ESSENTIAL DUTIES: Installs and programs equipment Troubleshoots, diagnoses, repairs, replaces, and upgrades components Checks satellite TV systems for correct functionality and optimal performance Maintains accurate installation, service, and inventory records Ensures adequate supply levels by inventorying stock and communicating needs to warehouse Treats customers with respect, courtesy, and professionalism at all times Coordinates schedules with customers Listens to descriptions of problems, answering questions, and resolving issues Communicates the wiring plan and equipment lay-out with customer prior to the installation Educates customers by conveying verbal information clearly and concisely Follows industry codes, regulations, and standards Adheres to policies and procedures while working autonomously Maintains a safe work environment by following safe practices and adhering to safety policies, including practicing safe driving techniques Acquires and applies information needed for prompt decision making Refers to and interprets schematics, manuals, and manufacturer's instructions Updates and improves job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities, reading technical publications, and participating in on-going technical training Supports co-workers and builds positive working relationships with all team members Meets or exceeds performance goals and quality standards Meets or exceeds productivity standards by prioritizing tasks and working efficiently Other duties as assigned EXPERIENCE/QUALIFICATIONS*: Must meet DIRECTV state-specific minimum age requirement High school diploma or equivalent required Must possess a valid driver’s license in the primary state of residence Must be able to speak clearly, concisely, and to communicate effectively in a courteous and professional manner Solid written communication skills required Must be able to work full time, up to and including six days a week; which may include nights, weekends, and holidays, as required Must meet company hiring criteria for pre-employment screening, including drug test, criminal background check, fitness for duty, and MVR check Must be able to obtain all necessary certifications, including SBCA, Service, SWiM, and Ka/Ku, as required Must be able to expect and embrace change Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and inventory software systems preferred SBCA and/or other industry certifications preferred Six months experience in telecommunications, electrical, construction, or related field preferred Working knowledge of handheld electronics, including smart phones, ipads, etc., preferred PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS*: Must be able to lift up to 75 pounds and climb ladders up to 40 feet in length Must be able to work in tight spaces, including attics and crawl spaces Must be able to work outside in extreme weather conditions, including precipitation and temperature variations Must be able to stand for extended periods of time An essential duty of the position of Technician is to install satellite dishes with the use of a ladder on customers' homes. The ladders used by DIRECTV have been rated by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) to hold a maximum total weight (including tool belt and equipment) of 375 lbs. To allow for the weight of equipment an individual’s weight cannot exceed 325 lbs. DIRECTV employees are committed, dependable, professional and accountable. We value integrity, honesty and respect for others. We have high standards for how our employees conduct themselves at work and in the communities we support. Come join our team as we Entertain the Future Job Installation Technician",Satellite Installation Technician Job in Moberly,,"Moberly, MO",,http://jobview.monster.com/satellite-installation-technician-job-moberly-mo-us-168073763.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=13,,,5433248524eb3f7242fad195c0b4d3ad
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:17:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you're a strong Commercial Truck Driver looking for a stable and growing company that will value your service, appreciate your contributions to the team, and compensate you well for your skills and talent, consider L.A. Lift Services. As the sole Class A driver for our company, you will be responsible for hauling forklifts and equipment in the Los Angeles, Orange County, Riverside, and San Bernardino areas. At L.A. Lift Services you'll enjoy driving a brand new truck, a family-oriented culture and opportunities for advancement. To be a strong fit for the role of Commercial Truck Driver, you will have:A valid Class A Commercial Driver's License3+ years of professional experience as a Class A driverSolid customer service skills and the ability to interact directly with clientsA clean driving record and current medical card Open for over 20 years, L.A. Lift Services is a reputable, high-quality, efficient, and reliable full-service forklift dealership. We supply and support higher quality maintenance & repair services, rental equipment, new/used forklifts, parts, attachments, scissor and boom lift equipment, pallet racking, and other material handling equipment. We aim to be partners to our customers, and to become their “equipment specialists for life,” and we have continued to earn business from many of the same customers since our beginning. EOE/AA/M/F/Vets/Disabled",Commercial Truck Driver Job in Vernon,Full Time,"Vernon, CA 90058",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-truck-driver-job-vernon-ca-us-168410062.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f877b414109123f337424d2208c76c9b
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:18:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:quot;-//W3C//DTD XHTML 1.0 Transitional//EN"" ""http://www.w3.org/TR/xhtml1/DTD/xhtml1-transitional.dtd""> <br /> <br /> <br /> With more of goods being transported across North America now than ever before, it's understandable that sometimes the ""hearts"" of these class 7 and 8 trucks are bound to break down. Diesel Engine Mechanics are required and will be given ongoing training at an established shop in Newark. Those with the ability, experience and/or training to effectively Troubleshoot, Diagnose, Repair and Rebuild diesel engines from Cummins, Caterpillar, Paccar, Detroit Diesel, Maxxforce or other manufacturers will be given preference. A valid CDL is preferred, though not require if the new hire is able to get one shortly after starting. Applicants from out of state are encouraged to apply as well.  Compensation:$20.00 - $30.00/hour, including a solid benefits package, 401K, ongoing training and a bonus offered after 90 days of probation.Shifts:Afternoons, 3:30pm - 12:00am (Monday to Friday).We encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Diesel Engine Mechanic Job in Newark,Full Time Employee,"Newark, NJ",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/diesel-engine-mechanic-job-newark-nj-us-166926268.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=1,,,18d337e1e586b0746d641e61abb730ce
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:49:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY OF JOB RESPONSABILITIES  1.   Installs, operates, maintains, and checks all types of mechanical equipment as directed.2.   Changes shifts and days off as necessary when directed.3.   Uses safe working practices and reports all hazardous conditions at all times.4.   Inspects machines, takes any required test, and completes “all” reports and paper work as required for company record.                               5.   Machine parts using lathe and mill when necessary due to breakdown, or as directed by supervision.6.   Read and make proper installations of semi-complex electrical circuits from wiring diagrams .7.   Must possess industrial maintenance tool per department list (Required).8.   Perform PM and repair work in accordance with A. I. B. and G. M. P. principals9.   Dismantles, repairs, and re-assembles gearboxes, fans, conveyors, blowers, compressors, pump, valves, and all allied mechanical equipment when directed or when directly related to electrical trouble shooting.10.     Dismantles, repairs, and re-assembles electrical motors, relays, timers, and all allied electrical equipment.11.     Possess functional working knowledge of hydraulic systems, air systems, and be able to read semi-complex diagrams and trouble shoot working systems (Required).12.     Installs and repairs electrical conduit, cables, piping, tubing (including all necessary connections), controls, and grounding as directed.13.     Possess functional working knowledge of dust and fume collectors and performs necessary repairs on these items as directed (Required).14.     Operates mobile lift truck and hoisting equipment in the performance of maintenance work. Must have forklift operator’s license.15.     Help maintain spare parts inventory for plant as directed by checking out parts form parts room, using parts ordering procedure.16.     Possess functional working knowledge of Flour and Corn lines, and flour system within 6 months from the Date of employment.17.     Help maintain shop areas and parts room clean and orderly.18.     Must adhere to and obey all plant safety rules and regulations and wear all personal            protective equipment as directed.19.     Comply with all Food Safety and Quality Programs.   EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCEHigh School Diploma, GED or equivalent required. Some college preferred.3 years of Industrial Maintenance/Electrical experience required. *Any equivalent combination of related education and/or experience may be considered for the above” KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIESü  Must be able of reading and understanding the basic and semi-complex electrical and mechanical     blueprints, use simple shop math, and possess knowledge of company, local, state, and federalelectrical codes ü  Mechanical Certificate ü  Bilingual (English and Spanish)ü  Functional Ability to change prioritiesü  Functional Knowledge in areas such as: Electricity, Welding, PLC, Mechanical, etc.ü  Possess a Functional working knowledge of the following equipment (Required):o   Mig/Tig welding equipment.o   Arc welding equipment.o   Gas cutting equipment and plasma cutting equipment.o   Power tools such as drill presses, cut off saws, lathes, mills, and portable table tools.o   Electrical test equipment such as voltmeter, ohmmeter, magyar, ampmeter, etc.ü      Possess functional knowledge of lubricants for all types of machines and performs necessary lubrication of production machines as directed (Required).ü  Be able to stand, walk, climb, flexible  while working with equipment  and lift over 30 pounds ",Maintenance Mechanic Job in Mountain Top,Full Time,"Mountain Top, PA 18707",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-mechanic-job-mountain-top-pa-us-165084997.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,22.47 - 422.47 $ /hour,Entry Level,01e091dcd8c5a432a8494d342bbc69d6
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:50:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description The DIRECTV Installer is responsible for providing excellent customer service through installing, troubleshooting, maintaining, and upgrading satellite television systems and equipment. ESSENTIAL DUTIES: Installs and programs equipment Troubleshoots, diagnoses, repairs, replaces, and upgrades components Checks satellite TV systems for correct functionality and optimal performance Maintains accurate installation, service, and inventory records Ensures adequate supply levels by inventorying stock and communicating needs to warehouse Treats customers with respect, courtesy, and professionalism at all times Coordinates schedules with customers Listens to descriptions of problems, answering questions, and resolving issues Communicates the wiring plan and equipment lay-out with customer prior to the installation Educates customers by conveying verbal information clearly and concisely Follows industry codes, regulations, and standards Adheres to policies and procedures while working autonomously Maintains a safe work environment by following safe practices and adhering to safety policies, including practicing safe driving techniques Acquires and applies information needed for prompt decision making Refers to and interprets schematics, manuals, and manufacturer's instructions Updates and improves job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities, reading technical publications, and participating in on-going technical training Supports co-workers and builds positive working relationships with all team members Meets or exceeds performance goals and quality standards Meets or exceeds productivity standards by prioritizing tasks and working efficiently Other duties as assigned EXPERIENCE/QUALIFICATIONS*: Must meet DIRECTV state-specific minimum age requirement High school diploma or equivalent required Must possess a valid driver’s license in the primary state of residence Must be able to speak clearly, concisely, and to communicate effectively in a courteous and professional manner Solid written communication skills required Must be able to work full time, up to and including six days a week; which may include nights, weekends, and holidays, as required Must meet company hiring criteria for pre-employment screening, including drug test, criminal background check, fitness for duty, and MVR check Must be able to obtain all necessary certifications, including SBCA, Service, SWiM, and Ka/Ku, as required Must be able to expect and embrace change Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and inventory software systems preferred SBCA and/or other industry certifications preferred Six months experience in telecommunications, electrical, construction, or related field preferred Working knowledge of handheld electronics, including smart phones, ipads, etc., preferred PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS*: Must be able to lift up to 75 pounds and climb ladders up to 40 feet in length Must be able to work in tight spaces, including attics and crawl spaces Must be able to work outside in extreme weather conditions, including precipitation and temperature variations Must be able to stand for extended periods of time An essential duty of the position of Technician is to install satellite dishes with the use of a ladder on customers' homes. The ladders used by DIRECTV have been rated by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) to hold a maximum total weight (including tool belt and equipment) of 375 lbs. To allow for the weight of equipment an individual’s weight cannot exceed 325 lbs. DIRECTV employees are committed, dependable, professional and accountable. We value integrity, honesty and respect for others. We have high standards for how our employees conduct themselves at work and in the communities we support. Come join our team as we Entertain the Future. Job Installation Technician",Satellite Installation Technician Job in Marshalltown,,"Marshalltown, IA",,http://jobview.monster.com/satellite-installation-technician-job-marshalltown-ia-us-167707788.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=5,,,86121159c293fa98d62978b7017cabca
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:51:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC ... Service Tech / Mechanic / Installer / SheetmetalCompany: Air Conditioning Service, Inc.Location: Oklahoma City, OK 73115Positions: Installer; Technician (Ammonia Refrigeration); Technician (Boilers); Technician (Chillers); Technician (Commercial Cooking Equipment); Technician (Commercial Refrigeration); Technician (DDC); Technician (Geothermal); Technician (HVAC/R)Industry: Commercial/Industrial; Manufacturing (including Sheet Metal Shops); Residential/Light Commercial-------------------Shell Kincheloe .. Cell Phone 405-613-7712 sk@acserviceok.com Richard Acebo ... Cell 405-613-7713 ra@thekoolguys.com Office Phone .... 405-677-5665",HVAC ... Service Tech / Mechanic / Installer / Sheetmetal Job in Oklahoma City  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Oklahoma City 73115,All,http://jobview.monster.com/hvac-service-tech-mechanic-installer-sheetmetal-job-oklahoma-city-ok-us-168514439.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4d96e3fade3f33abd015f30c90641bb5
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:55:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A CDL DRIVER POSITION THAT PROVIDES WORK-LIFE BALANCE?  POOLCORP ALLOWS YOU TO BE HOME ON NIGHTS AND WEEKENDS!Learn about our Driver positions from POOLCORP employees.  ClickHERE.RESPONSIBILITIES:Prepares truck for operation by assisting in and overseeing the loading of trucks, securing of items and verifying the accuracy of shipping papers.Drives truck with capacity of more than 3 tons, to transport materials to and from customer locations and job sites.Delivers orders via the most effective route to ensure complete orders are delivered according to established time frames and customers’ needs.Loads and unloads the delivery truck, ensuring that all loads are properly secured and braced and all hazardous material loads are properly segregated.Accurately documents delivery, prepares receipts of orders by customers and reports any discrepancies to the company.Collects payment for goods delivered and records transactions on proper paperwork. Obtains customer signature on receipt for pickup or delivery.Records sales or deliveries information on daily sales or delivery record.Increases job knowledge and product knowledge on an ongoing basis.Informs customers of new products and services that can increase customer satisfaction and sales.Maintains truck log, according to state and federal regulations and complies with all applicable Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations (FMCSR), including the company’s drug and alcohol testing program.Maintains telephone or radio contact with supervisor to receive daily instructions.Inspects truck equipment and supplies such as tires, lights, brakes, gas, oil, and water on a daily basis. Alerts management of necessary or required maintenance/repairs needed on the delivery vehicle in a prompt manner. Completes daily post-trip vehicle inspection report.Performs warehouse duties as needed.Other job duties as assigned.REQUIREMENTS:A valid Class B commercial driver's license with HAZMAT endorsement.Be at least 21 years of age.Ability to maneuver heavy objects, some weighing up to 100 pounds.A current MVR indicating no more than 3 violations in the past 3 years.Good communication skills, both written and verbal.Ability to follow and carry out instructions with minimal supervision.Willingness and ability to load trucks at the warehouse and unload at customer locations and job sites.A positive customer service attitude.Familiarity with PCs and other material handling equipment (preferred).Experience driving either a straight truck or a tractor trailer.Moffet, Skelly or Air Brake experience a plus!POOLCORP is a drug-free company and an EOE, M/F/V/D.",CDL DRIVER Job in Santa Rosa,Full Time,"Santa Rosa, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/cdl-driver-job-santa-rosa-ca-us-168335027.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=13,,,78aed4950c2720619de98524793afa3b
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:55:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Nationally recognized producer of advanced plastic polymer storage bins is looking for a technically strong Maintenance Technician. In addition to operating three extremely efficient manufacturing facilities in the United States, with some of the largest high-pressure injection molding presses in North America, this organization has manufacturing facilities, design teams, and a global direct sales force operating in key markets worldwide.Responsibilities for the Maintenance TechnicianPerforms basic repair on Plant manufacturing equipment as requiredBasic repair techniques for Injection molding machines related to the industryDocumentation control as required for Maintenance tasks and preventative maintenanceRequirements for the Maintenance TechnicianMechanical aptitude for hands on repair and P.M. is a requirementStamp hydraulic controls experienceStrong background with injection moldingBenefits for the Maintenance TechnicianExcellent salary and benefits packageThis Job is located in Fairfield, CA -> United States",Maintenance Technician - Injection Molding/Stamp hydraulic controls /maintenance Job in Fairfield,Full Time Employee,"Fairfield, CA 94535",,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-technician-injection-molding-stamp-hydraulic-controls-maintenance-job-fairfield-ca-us-167896010.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=10,"41,600.00 - 52,000.00 $ /year",,e50722605d6b04e4227cae9ede76ee41
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:55:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description We're currently seeking Satellite Installation Technicians to join our DIRECTV technician teams in one of the following areas: Santa Rosa/Napa/Petaluma/Fort Bragg/Ukiah/Sonoma/Novato, CA. As a DIRECTV Satellite Technician, you will be responsible for providing our customers excellent service through installing, troubleshooting, and upgrading satellite TV systems. You’re probably not here to read about DIRECTV’s Fortune 500 ranking, annual revenue or latest products and services. Those things matter, of course, and you can get the details at www.directv.com. More important is what a career with DIRECTV can do for you. Here, product innovators, technology mavens, customer service champions, master technicians and business leaders of tomorrow find their home. We seek the brightest minds in an evolving workplace. The A-listers of our industry. The quarterbacks of the next generation. And those who get drafted to the team will walk a red carpet of rewards. After all, you’ll help us transform what TV means to the world. And in turn, we want you to imagine who you can become with the support of DIRECTV. Sure, we win awards, give back to our communities and delight our millions of customers worldwide. But right now, we’re asking you to join us. Grow your career. Grow your network. Grow with DIRECTV. And ENTERTAIN YOUR FUTURE®. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include: Preparing for installations by reviewing installation orders, gathering equipment, supplies and tools and coordinating schedules with customers. Planning installations by evaluating location, locating access and laying-out equipment and wiring plan. Establishing satellite TV systems by installing equipment, running and pulling cable, programming and calibrating equipment while adhering to codes, regulations and standards. Verifying satellite TV systems for correct functionality and optimal performance by testing equipment and connections and identifying and correcting any issues. Maintaining accurate records through documenting installations, services and repairs. Maintaining and improving service and rapport with customers through listening to their descriptions of problems, answering questions and resolving issues through diagnosing, troubleshooting, repairing, replacing and/or upgrading components. Referring to schematics, manuals and manufacturer's instructions as needed. Maintaining a safe work environment by following safe practices and adhering to safety policies. Ensuring adequate supply levels by inventorying stock, placing and verifying orders. Updating and improving job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities and reading technical publications. Enhancing the organization's reputation through personal accountability for accomplishing new and different requests and always striving to add value. Other duties as assigned. Qualifications Must meet DIRECTV state-specific minimum age requirement. High school diploma or equivalent required. Must possess a valid driver's license in the primary state of residence. Must be able to speak clearly, concisely, and to communicate effectively in a courteous and professional manner. Solid written communication skills required. Must be able to work full time, up to and including six days a week; which may include nights, weekends, and holidays, as required. Must meet company hiring criteria for pre-employment screening, including drug test, criminal background check, fitness for duty, and MVR check. Must be able to obtain all necessary certifications, including SBCA, Service, SW iM, and Ka/Ku, as required. Must be able to expect and embrace change. Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and inventory software systems preferred. SBCA and/or other industry certifications preferred. Six months experience in telecommunications, electrical, construction, or related field preferred. Working knowledge of handheld electronics, including smart phones, ipads, etc., preferred. Must be able to lift up to 75 pounds and climb ladders up to 40feet in length. Must be able to work in tight spaces, including attics and crawl spaces. Must be able to work outside in extreme weather conditions, including precipitation and temperature variations. Must be able to stand for extended periods of time. An essential duty of the position of Technician is to install satellite dishes with the use of a ladder on customers ‘homes. The ladders used by DIRECTV have been rated by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI)to hold a maximum total weight (including tool belt and equipment)of 375 lbs. To allow for the weight of equipment an individual's weight cannot exceed 325 lbs. *To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The qualifications and requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. DIRECTV employees are committed, dependable, professional and accountable. We value integrity, honesty and respect for others. We have high standards for how our employees conduct themselves at work and in the communities we support. Come join our team as we entertain the Future. Job Installation Technician",Satellite Installation Technician Job in Napa,,"Napa, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/satellite-installation-technician-job-napa-ca-us-166968562.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=2,,,fbf1ae1cea49bcf96bb571a08043fd96
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:56:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Food Grade Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Peoria, IL.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Company - Food Grade Division provides tank truck carrier services for manufacturers of food products. With over 40 years kosher food experience, Transport Service Co. offers a variety of liquid and dry food grade equipment. Food Grade's terminal operations span the Midwest and Southeast along with several support satellite locations throughout the United States.Transport Service Co.'s Food Grade business is categorized into two product segments, sweeteners and edible products. The sweetener product segment primarily consists of corn syrup, high fructose corn syrup and liquid sugar (""sweeteners""). The edible product segment consists of other bulk liquid food products such as: glycerin, juices, molasses, sorbitol, vegetable oils, beverage alcohols and many more.Our commitment is to provide our customers with the highest level or service excellence in our industry, exceeding their requirements and bringing added value to their overall logistics strategies. We differentiate ourselves with a driver-friendly culture that emphasizes a 100% commitment to safety and various quality-of-life opportunities for professional drivers.Company Drivers:Local & OTR positions Flexible home time Competitive pay Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank endorsement (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Peoria,Full Time Employee,"Peoria, IL",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-peoria-il-us-168464673.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,384ec62759041a4a31b6c1048fd4d89d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:56:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More USPS-Technology Consultant V, Public Trust or Secret Clearance|Tier III Job #:  658061 Looking for Technology Consultant VDescription: *** See attached for job description***Job Code CW 00S36J: Responsibilities: Provide technology consulting to external customers and internal project teams. Responsible for providing technical support and/or leadership in the creation and delivery of technology solutions designed to meet customers’ business needs and, consequently, for understanding customers’ businesses. As trusted advisor create and maintain effective customer relationships so as to insure customer satisfaction. Maintain knowledge of leading edge technologies and industry/market domain knowledge. Actively contribute to solutions portfolio by providing information ranging from technical knowledge to methodologies based on experience gained from customer projects. Shape technical direction and technical strategies within the organization and for external customers. Accountable for consistent and significant chargeability levels (or expense relief for internal project teams) and for assisting in meeting or exceeding revenue and customer satisfaction goals. Contribute to organization’s profitability by generating and cultivating new business opportunities and by providing technical support for deal proposal development.Master: Unique mastery and recognized authority on relevant subject matter knowledge including technologies, theories, or techniques. Contributes to the development of innovative principles and ideas. Successfully operates in the most complex disciplines, in which the company must operate to be successful. Provides highly innovated solutions. Routinely exercises independent judgment in developing methods, techniques and criteria for achieving objectives. Develops strategy and leads large, cross-division functional teams or projects the affect the organizations long-term goals and objectives. May participate in cross-division, multi-function teams.12PLUS years of professional experience and a Master of Arts/Science or equivalent degree in computer science or related area of study; without a Masters degree, three additional years of relevant professional experience (15PLUS years in total). Demonstrate strong knowledge in at least three major technology areas. Technical expertise is sought after and provided to several projects/accounts. Demonstrate in-depth knowledge of assigned technology and discipline area. Demonstrate in-depth knowledge of corporate organization and policies. Advanced level business, technical, or functional knowledge.Please contact Dominique Reed if you are interested, email your resume to dreed@apexsystemsinc.com             EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",USPS-Technology Consultant V,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/usps-technology-consultant-v-public-trust-or-secret-clearance-tier-iii-job-san-francisco-ca-us-168489762.aspx?mescoid=4100688001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b736407a095ceccddd888f5d4a40344e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:17:56:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"**Hours: Sunday-Thursday, 7PM-complete** POSITION SUMMARY: Under general supervision of the Warehouse Supervisor or other supervisory/management-level position within the Distribution Center, responsible for performing a variety of warehouse-related duties such as receiving and storage of goods, preparing orders for shipment by picking items from shelves and placing them in totes, and ensuring that orders are filled accurately and efficiently, continually striving for improved customer satisfaction. May lead one or more job groups within the Warehouse organization. Provides work direction to warehouse associates in the absence of Supervisor. This position is categorized as compliance critical and, as such, requires and is assigned specific responsibility for ensuring continual and proper compliance with all division, corporate and regulatory requirements. PRIMARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: If a PkMS enabled environment, must be able to utilize the functions of the warehouse management system in order to perform daily tasks. Responsible to assist with the efficient execution of, order filling, receiving, stocking, and returns based on shift assignment. May oversee shipping, operations (UPS, emergency orders, or general deliveries) Continues to perform as an individual contributor completing advanced and complicated tasks requiring considerable judgment, independent analysis and decision making and detailed knowledge of the position and procedures. Trains associates according to SOPs and performs observations as needed. As Warehouse Shift Lead, provides day-to-day tactical direction and guidance to Warehouse Associates. Responsible for daily workloads. Does not have direct supervisor/management duties such as hiring, performance evaluation, or disciplinary responsibilities but will provide related feedback to supervision as needed. Assists with inventory procedures as requested. Maintains a clean work area to help ensure that merchandise remains clean and to help prevent work related injuries. Complies with all appropriate policies, procedures, safety rules and DEA regulations. Must be able to work overtime when necessary and participate in physical inventory. Provides work direction to Warehouse Associates in the absence of Supervisor. Coordinates work flow with other departments in the Distribution Center. Makes recommendations on process flow and efficiencies. Performs related duties as assigned. EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS: Requires completion of a high school diploma, general education degree (GED) or equivalent combination of experience and education. Normally requires a minimum of two (2) years of equivalent work experience. Higher/secondary education or specialized training or certification is preferred.  MINIMUM SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITY REQUIREMENTS: Ability to read and understand the English language for the purpose of comparing and reading product descriptions, names and shelf labels. Must possess basic mathematical skills. Strong interpersonal skills; ability to develop and maintain cooperative working relationships with others. Strong organizational skills; detail oriented. Ability to use good judgment in order to carry out detailed instructions. Basic computer knowledge preferred. Applicants should be proficient on all battery powered equipment. IE, Cherry Picker, Reach Truck and Pallet Jack",Warehouse Lead (Shipping)-Night Shift Job in Bethlehem,Full Time Employee,"Bethlehem, PA 18017",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-lead-shipping-night-shift-job-bethlehem-pa-us-168301475.aspx?mescoid=5301033001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,8779ab3bf03511e7f8ecfa02286b7fd8
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:06:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tired of working ""on-call"" shifts? Would you like to have your weekends free again, PLUS make great money? Residential Maintenance Technicians who have solid experience repairing, maintaining and replacing residential HVAC units will find an ideal place to showcase their talents with American Homes 4 Rent. As a Maintenance Technician II covering properties we own in Oklahoma City, OK, you'll visit single-family homes that require HVAC servicing. You will perform most of the required maintenance and repair yourself, while using your expert judgement to determine which of the more complicated and time-consuming service calls should be outsourced to our external HVAC subcontractors. Your keen assessments in this area will help save our company both time and money. In addition to HVAC work, technicians may occasionally assist with other light maintenance work, including: ensuring that all appliances work; painting interior walls; conditioning floors; etc. You will Service Homes in the Following Zip Codes:73128731797306473099731207316273131731427301373012731607317073135Required Skills:High School Diploma required3 years HVAC service & repair experienceEPA Certification a plus2 years' experience in property management maintenance or related position requiredWorking knowledge of tools, materials, methods, and practices used in home maintenanceUnderstanding of occupational hazards and safety methods (OSHA) Required AbilitiesAbility to follow written and verbal instruction, self-motivate and work independentlyAbility to manage time effectivelyCapability to acquire and implement computer skills related to Company systemsAbility to safely operate power and manual toolsAbility to work a flexible scheduleAbility to work in a fast-paced environmentExcellent communication skills, both verbal and writtenPositive attitude and ability to foster strong interdepartmental working relationshipsAbility and willingness to redirect focus to time sensitive projects and prioritiesAbility to travel to homes in assigned territory within 15 minutes of receiving dispatch call American Homes 4 Rent (NYSE: AMH) is a leader in the single-family home rental industry and is fast becoming a nationally recognized brand, known for high quality, good value and tenant satisfaction. We are an internally managed Maryland real estate investment trust, or REIT, focused on acquiring, renovating, leasing, and operating attractive, single-family homes as rental properties in selected submarkets in 22 states. KeywordsHVAC, refrigeration, EPA certification, HVAC certification, handyman, repair, drywall, painting, electrical, floor repair, power washing, maintenance, appliances, laborer, kitchen remodeling, bath remodeling, heating, cooling, toilet repair, plumbing",Residential Maintenance Technician-HVAC Job in Oklahoma City,"Full Time, Employee","Oklahoma City, OK 73132",Real Estate/Property ManagementRental ServicesConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/residential-maintenance-technician-hvac-job-oklahoma-city-ok-us-168523384.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=10,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,387567d10bdd49bcac9185a5636453b0
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:12:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary: Responsible for maintenance and repair of HVAC systems, refrigeration systems, appliances, and other mechanical systems. Also oversees electrical/mechanical troubleshooting and maintenance of hot water and steam boilers, chillers, rooftop DX units, all types of pumps, exhaust fans, air handlers and all related control systems. Essential Job Duties:     1.                      Performs assignments involving repair, installation, alteration, maintenance and preventative maintenance of refrigeration, heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems including electrical troubleshooting, ability to read electrical diagrams and troubleshooting of all associated controls.     2.                      Maintains necessary work records including equipment records, logs, and timesheets.     3.                      Detects, troubleshoots, repairs and reports to building management any unusual conditions, defective materials, faulty equipment and equipment operating or installed incorrectly.      4.                      Ensures that all work performed is in compliance with all applicable standards, codes, policies, and procedures, including safety procedures and the maintenance of a clean work area.     5.                      May assist other maintenance personnel on projects as directed.     6.                      Familiarity with preventative maintenance and work order software systems.     7.                      Identifies and communicates opportunities for improvement: cost savings, productivity/efficiency improvements, safety improvements Skills, Education And Experience: ·         Minimum 2 years of HVAC/Refrigeration repair experience in an Industrial environment. ·         Associates or Trade School Degree preferred. ·         U.S. Environmental Protection Agency certification to repair all types of commercial refrigeration equipment. ·         Must possess a thorough understanding of the principles of HVAC systems design. ·         Skills & ability to repair and modify piping that is part of HVAC systems. ·         Ability to read and comprehend complicated blueprints, drawings, schematics, specifications, codes, and handbooks. ·         Ability to work on several projects simultaneously and prioritize work, as required. ·         Working knowledge of Microsoft computer applications used for compiling data and work records. ·         Ability to use various testing devices related to the electrical and mechanical trades. ·         Exceptional interpersonal skills and the ability to function as a team member in a demanding service environment. ·         Ability to communicate with customers at all levels of the organization in a professional, effective manner. ·         Current refrigerant recovery certification for the appropriate equipment preferred ·        May perform other duties as assigned   Physical Requirements Rarely (0-12%) Occasionally (12-33%) Frequently (34-66%) Regularly (67-100%) Seeing: Must be able to read reports and use computer       X Hearing: Must be able to hear well enough to communicate with co-workers       X Standing / Walking     X   Climbing / Stooping / Kneeling     X   Lifting / Pulling /Pushing     X   Fingering / Grasping / Feeling: Must be able to write, type and use phone system       X   Working Conditions:  Primarily, work is performed in an indoor, controlled environment – but there will be occasional outdoor work. Work may be strenuous at times and may include lifting heavy objects, and standing, stooping, and kneeling for long periods – sometimes in awkward and cramped positions or on ladders.   Standard working shift is daylight, M-F. Overtime, shift changes, and emergency call-ins may be necessary to meet customer requirements.   Note:  The statements herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees, and are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.   Newmark Grubb Knight Frank is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V Req. Code : 4180",HVAC Engineer Job in Parkdale,"Full Time, Employee","Parkdale, OH 45246",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/hvac-engineer-job-parkdale-oh-us-168431731.aspx?mescoid=1700193001001&jobPosition=2,,Equipment Install/Maintain/RepairFacilities Management/MaintenanceHVAC,53c4675b017c9c508d26d4a7ff465442
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:13:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Electrical/Manufacturing Engineer Near Columbus, Ohio $65-90K +bonus potential  A growing, profitable, and multi-location company with a facility in Southern OH seeks an electrical engineer to be a critical resource in their manufacturing operation.  This is a very diverse position, working with plant power, power distribution, control panels, motors, drives, PLC’s, HMI’s for both existing and new products and equipment.  This individual must have project planning and mechanical experience. Solid benefits, good security, and a bonus plan! Responsibilities for Electrical Engineer·         Specify, implement and troubleshoot Control panels and systems for new and existing equipment·         Support new equipment being developed by providing electrical process controls expertise.·         Improve the reliability of electrical distribution.·         Manage Power Panel construction·         Develop a plan and schedule for major outages and also support the area maintenance personnel with technical expertise and training to enable them to maintain, repair and improve the reliability of their electrical equipment.·         Conduct statistical analyses on plant efficiencies, provide and implement solutions.·         Participate in and lead capital projects efforts including the capital budgeting process Electrical Engineer Requirements·         REQUIRED: B.S. in Electrical Engineering·         2+ years of industrial experience and direct experience working with voltages and equipment from 24VDC up to and including 480 V.·         Well-rounded manufacturing experience and ability to participate in cross-functional improvement projects.·         Knowledge of switchgear, rectification, relaying, DCS systems  control panels.·         PLC’S and Ladder Logic – ability to write code and troubleshoot existing code·         HMI software (Panel view, etc).·         Able to design CAD Schematics with protective measures. ** Must be qualified to work in the US without visa sponsorship",Electrical Engineer Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH 43201",,http://jobview.monster.com/electrical-engineer-job-columbus-oh-us-167647400.aspx?mescoid=1700169001001&jobPosition=13,"65,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",Engineering,e9ca5ea40077f2bf2d15a3a78e3e273b
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:24:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Columbus Dispatch Research, Analytics & B2B Marketing department is seeking a Marketing Research associate to join its team on a temporary basis. Working 10-12 hours a week, you will assist the team in regular day to day activities, such as generating and maintaining monthly and ad-hoc research and reports, and maintaining core B2B marketing assets including media kit website, marketing e-newsletters, and lead generation programs. You will have the opportunity to participate in group brainstorming sessions and meetings, assist on custom data-driven marketing presentations, and use advanced technologies to design and develop new and interactive reports intended for use by the entire department. If you are a current Junior college student, working towards a degree in Marketing and looking to gain hands-on experience to jump start your career, apply today at dispatch.com/careers.",Marketing Intern Job in Columbus,Part Time,"Columbus, OH 43228",,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-intern-job-columbus-oh-us-167893733.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=12,,Student (Undergraduate/Graduate),a821c6d2b80322c6ffd0b9432ddbb61d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:24:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"SIMIN Solutions Inc. is currently seeking a CRM developer to provide staff augmentation to a project. Work would be primarily focused on development and configuration using Microsoft Dynamics CRM 2013/2015. Developers would also utilize supporting development tools languages C#, JavaScript frameworks,jQuery, HTML in support of the project effort. Specific worker characteristic requirements are listed below. Work will be performed at the Rhodes Office Tower 18th floor, 30 East Broad Street, Columbus, Ohio.Requirements:1. 3+ experience doing development and configuration work in current Microsoft Dynamics environment (2011-2015). 2. 1+ year of experience in entity customization, plug-in development, workflow development, JavaScript. 3. 2+ years utilizing VB .NET (4.x) in support of the Dynamics solution4. 2+ years Microsoft Visual Studio 2013/15 team edition to develop and maintain code bases including branching, merging and code builds5. 1+ year in formalized process controls for change management. 6. 1+ year of AGILE software development methodology.Responsibilities:1. Interact with Technical architect, Data architect, development team and management staff on a daily basis.2. Work with team members and independently to develop and configure Microsoft Dynamics.3. This work would include: Customization of entities, Plug-in development, workflow development, JavaScript development and security configuration. The incumbent may also assist the team with code migration of the Dynamics solution as well.4. Utilize Microsoft Visual Studio 2013/15 team edition to develop and maintain code bases including branching, merging and code builds 5. Utilize VB .NET (4.x) as needed in support of the Dynamics solution. 6. Knowledge of Microsoft Dynamics security concepts including business units and teams7. Background working on enterprise class Dynamics projectsSIMIN Solutions Inc is offering a competitive industry wage for this positionThe above information on this description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by the professionals within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of professionals assigned to this job.",Microsoft Dynamics CRM Developer Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH 43215",,http://jobview.monster.com/microsoft-dynamics-crm-developer-job-columbus-oh-us-167786739.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=9,,IT/Software Development,5c91c1daa455b61a81888f37e0184df6
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:24:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale, Dublin, OH 43016Job #: RNHO2colOH060597A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! We own and operate multiple hospice agencies around the country, with a full spectrum of care designed to respect the dignity of the people we care for. We focus on skilled and compassionate care while providing comfort and freedom from pain, and as much independence and control as possible.It's more than a job: it's a passion.Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a Hospice RN Case Manager to provide services in the Dublin, OH area. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on support and comfort for all our patients.Your responsibilities: * Complete an initial, comprehensive and ongoing assessment of patient and family to determine hospice needs * Provide a complete physical assessment and history of current and previous illness(es)* Provide direct nursing care to residents, in compliance with the Nurse Practice Act, and federal, state and local laws* Counsel the patient and family in meeting nursing and related needs * Assesses and evaluate patient's status by writing and initiating plan of care, regularly re-evaluating patient and family/caregiver needs, and making necessary revisions to the plan Required skills and qualifications:* Bachelor's degree from an accredited school of nursing* Valid Registered Nursing licensure in the state of practice* Must have hospice experience* At least one year of public nursing or hospital nursing experience * Valid driver's license within the state of practice* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as neededContact Donna Winterhaler at dwinterhaler1@brookdale.com. If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",RN Case Manager - Hospice Job in Dublin,Full Time Employee,"Dublin, OH 43016",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-case-manager-hospice-job-dublin-oh-us-168184779.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,287e7a3d0e15a280b57f089c882aa89c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:24:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Details Summary: Kitchen Steward is a core back of the house position responsible for the operation of the dish area, stocking received products, and many assignments of the kitchen cleaning schedule. Steward is an entry-level kitchen position; however its importance to successful kitchen operations has a much more elevated status. Job Description: Some duties and responsibilities of the Kitchen Steward position include: Operate the dish area cleaning china, glass, silver, pots and pans to Serve Safe sanitation standards Safety first in the Kitchen at all times Stock received food items using first in first out product rotation Stay out of the weeds when your dish area gets slammed Complete Steward assignments on the Kitchen cleaning schedule Some Brand Guest Service Standards for the Kitchen Steward position include: Every job and every employee is important to our success We will work together as a team to accomplish the Hotel’s tasks and service to the guests Guest Service is every employee’s first job We will welcome continued training, apply what we learn and teach others what we know We will look our best as a sign of service and respect to the guests Some desired qualifications of the Kitchen Steward position include: Meet physical requirements of the position; long periods of standing, lifting, carrying, bending, pushing Able to follow verbal or visual instructions/directions No fear of hard word work The Magnolia Offerings We believe our career experience offers opportunities for professional success. We like to couple the professional success by offering benefits for personal enrichment such as: Medical, dental and vision health plans Short-term, long-term and life insurance plans 401k profit sharing plan Paid vacation time Paid holidays Educational assistance program Complimentary shift meal Complimentary parking or public transportation pass",Dishwasher Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/dishwasher-job-dallas-tx-us-168495889.aspx?mescoid=3500617001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),851f2f4a1ba53f68ca088c79810a391d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:25:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"KinderCare Education is the nation’s leader in early childhood education. We nourish curiosity through purposeful experiences to create a future full of lifelong learners. From our National Support Center, to the classrooms where learning comes to life, we’re united by a passion to create a world of learning, joy and adventure for more than 161,000 children ages six-weeks through 12 years every day.   Our Teachers bring warmth, patience, and understanding to the classroom every day, encouraging children to learn and grow. They inspire children to be lifelong learners using our nationally recognized curriculum that promotes social, physical, verbal, and cognitive development. Our Teachers are committed to making their center successful and know that creating meaningful relationships with children, families, and their team play a crucial role in that success. When you join our team as a Lead Teacher you will: Lead, coach and mentor less experienced teachers in your classroom; model behaviors and provide feedback. Implement KCE’s curriculum in a way that is consistent with the unique needs of each child. Create a safe, nurturing environment where children can play and learn. Partner and communicate with parents, with a shared desire to provide the best care and education for their children.   Support your center’s success; partner with center staff and leadership to achieve goals around enrollment, accreditation, and engagement. Cultivate positive relationships with families, teachers, state licensing authorities, community contacts and corporate partners. Required Skills and Experience: A love for children and a strong desire to make a difference every day.  Ability to build relationships with families and coworkers and create a dynamic environment where play and learning happens. Outstanding customer service skills, strong organizational skills, and the ability to multi-task and manage multiple situations effectively Must possess active Child Development Associate (CDA) Credential or meet NAEYC candidacy requirements Approved state trainer (preferred) 2-3 years Early Childhood Education Experience(preferred) Bachelor’s degree in Early Childhood Education (preferred) CPR and First Aid Certification or willingness to obtain Must meet state specific guidelines for the role Must be physically able to use a computer with basic proficiency, lift a minimum of 40 pounds, and work indoors or outdoors.  Must be able to assume postures in low levels to allow physical and visual contact with children, see and hear well enough to keep children safe, and engage in physical activity with children. Ability to speak, read, and write English.   The benefits our career professionals enjoy: In addition to a rewarding career where you help shape children's futures, KinderCare Education provides a competitive compensation package. Benefits include:   Medical, dental and vision Discounted child care Generous paid time off Education assistance and reimbursement Medical expense reimbursement/ Life insurance/Disability benefits/ Health and wellness programs 401(k) savings and investment plan with employer match   KinderCare Education employs more than 32,000 team members across 1,700 locations nationwide. Our devoted family of education providers leads the nation in accreditation and includes KinderCare® Learning Centers, CCLC®, Champions® Before- and After-School Programs, Cambridge Schools™, Knowledge Beginnings® and The Grove School®.   KinderCare Education is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, age, sex, religion, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military or veteran status, gender identity or expression, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal law.",Lead Teacher Job in Reynoldsburg,Full Time Employee,"Reynoldsburg, OH 43068",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-teacher-job-reynoldsburg-oh-us-168136021.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=13,,Education/Training,c51d2c56e046127dbcfb41da1ba71991
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:25:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a .Net Developer in Columbus, Ohio (OH). The programmer will be working on modification/enhancement/rewrite of Classic ASP, VB.Net, C#.Net, Web form applications.REQUIREMENTS: VB.Net, Classis ASP, VB: 3+ years of experience C#.Net, ASP.Net: 5+ years of experience JQuery, KnockoutJS and Bootstrap: 2+ years of experience PL/SQL and stored procedures: 5+ years of experience Creating and implementing Web Services using WCF: 5+ years of experience Programming using MVC frame work: 3+ years of experience",.Net Developer Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Columbus, OH 43215",,http://jobview.monster.com/net-developer-job-columbus-oh-us-168098436.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ff830e4cc531adbb5dd5f7d8be5ce0f8
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:25:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Help Desk Technician Position in Dallas, TX  A Fortune 50 company is looking to fill a Help Desk Technician Position in Dallas, TX. Our client is looking for a Tier 2/3 Help Desk Technician.  Responsibilities: The role will provide on-going technical PC/LAN hardware/software support for Windows XP and Windows 7 desktop environment. Respond to priority one issues that have large financial impacts. Position will include hardware/software problem determination, workstation consulting and configuration, and hardware/software installation. Role requires in-depth knowledge of several technology disciplines including PC, Server, and Network infrastructure as well as Mobile Messaging/Communication software and hardware such as smart phones, broadband cards and other wireless technologies.  Detailed analysis of system problems and design review of server and pc configurations. The role will serve as a liaison between clients, vendors and other technical groups to resolve simple to complex infrastructure issues. Position requires performing periodic supervision of contract resources involved in discretionary projects as well as on-site technicians sent out to the field. Project work includes planning and implementation of new branches as well as branch decommissions. Position requires the ability to work independently with little supervision and make critical decisions in a timely manner.                                                                        Qualifications: Working in a Windows environments including Active Directory within Retail Financial Services. Hardware/software problem determination, consultation, configuration, installation, MACD requests (move, add, change, delete), PW resets, consultation requests, rights correction issues, hardware/software rollouts, and problem resolution ownership.ability to provide quality customer service via telephone, email, instant message, and incoming trouble tickets in a fast paced environment as well as the ability to handle multiple tasks at once while delivering results. Candidate must also have good verbal and written communication skills able to interact with team members, support teams, senior management and other internal customers. Strong documentation and analytical skills are required. This position will require discretion and independent judgment on a daily basis. Experience with desktop production support (3 in 1 printers, Samsung tablets, PCs)  If you are looking to further your career at a Fortune 50 company, then apply for this Help Desk Technician Position in Dallas, TX today!  ",Help Desk Position in Dallas,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Dallas, TX 75254",,http://jobview.monster.com/help-desk-position-in-dallas-tx-job-dallas-tx-us-168044304.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,72576ddd38f29cbd439cee28354c52da
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:25:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"ERP Analysts, Inc., a consulting firm headquartered in Dublin, Ohio, is looking for Business Systems Developers, Application Analysts, Computer Systems Analysts, Programmer Analysts, Systems Administrators, and Software Developers to fill multiple positions ranging from entry levels to senior levels and with different experience and education levels in Dublin, Ohio. Travel and/or relocation to various unanticipated locations throughout the U.S required. Some positions require an Associate's Degree and experience; other positions require a Bachelor's Degree and experience; other positions require a Master's Degree and experience. Please send 2 resumes and a cover letterreferencing 5772.000 to ERP Analysts, Inc., ATTN: Human Resources, 425 Metro Place North, Suite 510, Dublin, OH 43017. No calls please. This listing brought to you by The Columbus Dispatch and www.columbusjobs.com/monster. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",BUSINESS SYSTEMS DEVELOPERS / ANALYSTS Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43215",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/business-systems-developers-analysts-job-columbus-oh-us-168208514.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d2178d0798f0975d6eb0ac98e60dcd5e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:25:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"FedEx Ground Bonus Program for Package Handlers Package handlers who are employed through June 18 will be eligible to receive a bonus* equal to $1.00 per hour worked between March 27 and June 18, 2016. *A one-time lump sum bonus will be payable in July, 2016, and subject to tax withholding at the supplemental rate of at least 25 percent based on IRS requirements. In addition, normal percentage deductions such as federal/state/local tax will be withheld. NEW RATE OF PAY: Up to $13.00/hr. to start All interested individuals must attend a sort observation at a facility prior to applying for the package handler position. For more information or to register for a sort observation, go to fedex.com/watchasort. WANT TO STAY LONGER? Permanent package handlers enjoy many perks, including: - New program to pay extra $1/hour to current, incoming, full-time package handlers - medical, dental and vision benefits as well as vacation and holiday pay, after completion of an eligibility period - pay increases within the first six months of employment - career advancement opportunities in our ""promote from within"" environment - participation in the company's tuition assistance program FedEx Ground is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer (Minorities/Females/Disability/Veterans) committed to a diverse workforce COLUMBUS HUB 6120 S Meadows Dr Grove City, OH 43123 614-871-9675This listing brought to you by The Columbus Dispatch and www.columbusjobs.com/monster. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Package Handlers Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43215",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/package-handlers-job-columbus-oh-us-167419542.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,a604ebf82897182f25e08965d4ec6e28
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:25:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Computer Operator Job #:  652742Computer OperatorApex Systems, the nation’s 2nd largest IT Workforce Solutions organization, has an immediate and exciting opportunity for a Computer Operator for one of the largest Financial firms in Columbus, Ohio.  This opportunity is a 3 Month Contract to Hire. Applicants must have 3 years of Computer Operation experience in an enterprise level environment. If interested in this opportunity, please contact Christian Stewart at ctstewart@apexsystemsinc.com  If you’d like to receive Job Alerts from Apex that match your specific criteria, visit itcareers.apexsystemsinc.com. Company & Group Details of the Computer Operator:The Computer Operator will work as part of a collaborative team in a fast paced NOC like environment. The individual will need to be able to troubleshoot high level issues, have a self-starter mentality while being able to be a team player, and a willingness to learn and utilize new technologies.Work for one of the region’s Top Financial Firms. The organization offers several perks including but not limited to: training opportunities, great benefits, an onsite café and Starbucks, heavily involved with the community and philanthropy. Description for the Computer Operator:Able to provide the best service in a computer operations environment.The environmental responsibilities include: Mainframe Command Center monitoring, production scheduling, automation monitoring, Print Center, Data control report distribution, and Data Center off-host systems.Able to prioritize the daily workload to meet service level agreements.Maintain and operate peripheral equipment within the environment.Technologies and Skills for the Computer Operator:3 years of IT related experience, ideally with Computer Operations.At least 1 year of experience utilizing z/OS Mainframe, Mainframe production scheduling/restart package, ZEKE/ZEBB/Zena are preferred.Minimum of 1 year of experience within an MVS environment utilizing TSO, SDSF, SAR, and Netview.Proficient in Word, Excel, Outlook, and Sharepoint.Great communications skills, both written and verbal.Experience within Financial Services is a plus.Education or equivalent – Bachelor’s degree preferred.Potential Career Path from Position:The NOC encourages career growth and movement within the Network, Security, Server and Middleware teams, depending on interest/skills.  The shifts are also offered to current employees first but allows movement within shifts, once hired. *Please note that as a contract employee of Apex Systems, you’d be eligible for Health, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance; Short Term Disability; Hospitalization Coverage; Direct Deposit; Weekly Pay Periods; Training and Development Programs; Corporate Discounts/Perks and our Referral Program. Learn More",Computer Operator Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/computer-operator-job-columbus-oh-us-168478851.aspx?mescoid=4300750001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),85f3376884b7281e33c115afa02ef902
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:25:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for a customer service position to boost your career? This is an excellent opportunity for customer service candidates to gain invaluable experience with a top, Fortune 100 employer in the downtown Columbus area.Randstad is a $22.0 billion global provider of HR services and the second largest staffing organization in the world. Randstad holds top positions around the world and has approximately 29,300 corporate employees and around 4,500 branches and in-house locations in 39 countries around the world. Founded in 1960 and headquartered in Diemen, the Netherlands, Randstad Holding nv is listed on the NYSE Euronext Amsterdam.We have an immediate need to staff 3 Member Care Representatives with our client, a leader in the field of financial services and insurance. Your hourly pay rate is $14.00! These positions could potentially lead to dramatic career growth and progression with one of the largest employers in the Columbus, Ohio area! We are seeking energetic, customer focused individuals with solid computer, written, and oral communication skills to handle escalated situations that will arise as a result of a new program/product launch at our client (A large Insurance company located in the Arena District). This position is responsible for researching questions/ issues and then communicating your findings with members and business partners through email (75%) and phone (25%) using company approved response templates.Working hours: We will be staffing for two shifts. The first shift will be either 6am to 2:30p or 7a to 3:30p. The second shift will be 2:30 pm to 11 pm.Skills:Candidates must have:- A completed or near completed, bachelor's degree (preferably in business, or related field)- At least one and a half years of experience in customer service environment- Experience handling moderate call volume- Skilled in communicating messages and managing interactions.- Familiar with insurance products and customer service concepts--Excellent written and verbal communication skills--Work independently to take effective action--Able to adapt well to change--Effective problem solving skills--Proficient skills in computer navigation and using multiple programs at one timeWe will be staffing for two shifts. The first shift will be either 6am to 2:30p or 7a to 3:30p. The second shift will be 2:30p to 11p.If you are interested and qualified for this position please reply to this ad with your resume attached. Please include in your reply which shift(s) you are interested and available for. Qualified candidates will be contacted immediately for next steps and interview.Qualified candidates should submit a resume to Michelle.Liggett@randstadusa.com for immediate consideration.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Member Care Representatives Needed/Customer Service Job in Columbus  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Columbus 43251,Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/member-care-representatives-needed-customer-service-job-columbus-oh-us-167563451.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=7,14.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,,543d0b8b0c28d6c333f8bb6cf236d52a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:25:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cognizant Content Management and Portals (CMP) Content Management and Portals (CMP) Practice provide consulting and systems integration services in the areas of Portals, Content Management, Collaboration, Social Media and Enterprise Search. It holds partnership with the market leading products in each of the areas and offers customer’s services to consult, implement and maintain product based solutions. Key technology sub-practices include SharePoint, PCC (Portal Content & Collaboration), and ECM (Enterprise Content Management). The group is around 3000 associates worldwide and is one of the fastest growing businesses within Cognizant. Focus areas are in Digital platforms market expansion where we leverage Internet and Intranet Platform Products and Services portfolio in the digital platforms landscape. Also a market leader in the areas of Commerce and WCM, domain specific Web Portals and Cloud and Mobile Web, Social, Mobility, Core SP Business Applications, Migrations and upgrades   Job Title: CSF Designer Developer  Mandatory Skills: Strong knowledge on CSF Designer ESP in form composition, build Should have working knowledge of Documerge (as the source system) Knowledge of forms design best practices will be a plus Excellent communication skills is a must  Preferred Skills: Knowledge & practical experience of working in an agile, iterative development program/project as well as working with the existing vendor, IT and business teams  Roles and Responsibilities Responsible for the development and unit testing of templates/forms in CSF Designer Extraction of certain rules from Documerge may be required as well     Technical Skills SNo Primary Skill Proficiency Level * Rqrd./Dsrd. 1 Mainframe Utilities PL2 Required 2 ANSI SQL PL3 Required 3 VSAM PL2 Required 4 JCL PL2 Required 5 DB2 PL3 Required 6 COBOL PL3 Required   * Proficiency Legends Proficiency Level Generic Reference PL1 The associate has basic awareness and comprehension of the skill and is in the process of acquiring this skill through various channels. PL2 The associate possesses working knowledge of the skill, and can actively and independently apply this skill in engagements and projects. PL3 The associate has comprehensive, in-depth and specialized knowledge of the skill. She / he has extensively demonstrated successful application of the skill in engagements or projects. PL4 The associate can function as a subject matter expert for this skill. The associate is capable of analyzing, evaluating and synthesizing solutions using the skill.   Organization Marketing Statement Cognizant(NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centres worldwide and approximately 221,700 employees as of December 31, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on https://twitter.com/USJobsCognizant/.",CSF Designer Developer Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH 43206",All,http://jobview.monster.com/csf-designer-developer-job-columbus-oh-us-168328716.aspx?mescoid=2700414001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,efafa413d634298d3427f507d638f223
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:27:05,No,jobs.monster.com," Title: Sr Business AnalystLocation: Dallas, TXDuration: 1 Year Technical Expertise:• Effectively applies knowledge and skills of analysis, business processes, tools, domains, project methodologies, requirements definitions, and testing to solve a range of problems.• Partners with other Technology Team members to provide advice or solutions within his or her area of expertise.• Stays informed about current developments within his or her expertise.•         Cloud Computing – Maintains up-to-date knowledge of technologies and best practices that can be leveraged within Cloud Computing environments, such as IaaS, PaaS, SaaS, etc.•         DevOps – Maintains up-to-date knowledge of technologies and best practices that can be leveraged within DevOps environments, such as Continuous Integration Testing, Continuous Delivery, etc. Analytical Expertise:• Identifies problems, performs root cause analysis, investigates information, performs impact analysis, and formulates and executes plans to develop solutions.• Identifies strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions, or approaches to problems.• Understands and can estimate effort and value for solutions• Understands at a broad level how technology platforms/architectures are applied to automated business solutions. Professional Knowledge:• Actively engaged in industry, domain, process or technology trends.• Honesty/Integrity – Has the courage to speak one’s mind in a professional manner • Focuses on the situation, issue, or behavior, not on the person• Flexible/Adaptable – Adapts to changing priorities Communication:• Appropriately shares ideas and information with others• Practices attentive and active listening.• Ensures that regular and consistent communications take place.• Expresses ideas as well as business or technical requirements clearly and concisely in writing using appropriate levels of summary and synthesis.• Expresses oneself clearly in conversation and interaction with others. • Communicates effectively across Business groups at all levels (analysts through executives).• Communicates effectively across Technology groups, including Development Team and Architects.Must be able to meet any physical ability requirements listed on this description. May perform other job duties as directed by Employee’s Leaders.  EXPERIENCE: • Minimum of 5 years work experience as an Analyst or equivalent position required.• Minimum of 5 years of work experience using Word, Excel (pivot tables, formulas, lookup functions), PowerPoint creation and delivery required.• Minimum of 5 years of work experience in facilitating requirements gathering sessions required.• Minimum of 3 years of work experience in feature and user story creation and understanding OO Analysis and Design required.• Minimum of 3 years of work experience in creating test cases, supporting UAT (User Acceptance Testing), and data analysis required.• Experience in implementing solutions in a variety of delivery methodologies (SDLC, Agile, Waterfall) required.• Demonstrated experience with cross-functional business solution design required. • Experience with evaluation of existing processes and continuous improvement exercises required.• Proficiency in requirements analysis, gap analysis, and process mapping required.• Experience in leading analysis and solution discussions across multiple Teams required.• Previous leadership experience preferred.• Previous experience in software development or equivalent preferred.• Demonstrated experience using JIRA and Visio preferred. Critical Skills: • Excellent partnering, communication, and negotiation skills in working with various Teams and/or external partners.• Able to analyze large, complex, or vague Business or technical problems, articulating the problem or root cause, and translating the analysis into viable solution recommendations.• Able to work effectively in a strong Customer service / team oriented environment.• Able to research, create, and document requirements, processes, and technical specifications.• Ability to manage and prioritize multiple and widely varied work streams / tasks.• Able to take on multiple assignments, whether administrative or project related, while maintaining a successful level of completion in all responsible work. Able to mentor others to do the same.• Able to develop, present and effectively communicate ideas and strategies to a variety of audiences.• Able to teach and mentor others concerning technical and business subjects.Must be able to comply with Company attendance standards as described in established guidelines.   Raj VemulaDirector - Resource DevelopmentDirect:   469-533-7012Fax:        972-234-5732Email:    raj@infovision.comWeb:     www.infovision.com",Monster,," Title: Sr Business AnalystLocation: Dallas, TXDuration: 1 Year Technical Expertise:• Effectively applies knowledge and skills of analysis, business processes, tools, domains, project methodologies, requirements definitions, and testing to solve a range of problems.• Partners with other Technology Team members to provide advice or solutions within his or her area of expertise.• Stays informed about current developments within his or her expertise.•         Cloud Computing – Maintains up-to-date knowledge of technologies and best practices that can be leveraged within Cloud Computing environments, such as IaaS, PaaS, SaaS, etc.•         DevOps – Maintains up-to-date knowledge of technologies and best practices that can be leveraged within DevOps environments, such as Continuous Integration Testing, Continuous Delivery, etc. Analytical Expertise:• Identifies problems, performs root cause analysis, investigates information, performs impact analysis, and formulates and executes plans to develop solutions.• Identifies strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions, or approaches to problems.• Understands and can estimate effort and value for solutions• Understands at a broad level how technology platforms/architectures are applied to automated business solutions. Professional Knowledge:• Actively engaged in industry, domain, process or technology trends.• Honesty/Integrity – Has the courage to speak one’s mind in a professional manner • Focuses on the situation, issue, or behavior, not on the person• Flexible/Adaptable – Adapts to changing priorities Communication:• Appropriately shares ideas and information with others• Practices attentive and active listening.• Ensures that regular and consistent communications take place.• Expresses ideas as well as business or technical requirements clearly and concisely in writing using appropriate levels of summary and synthesis.• Expresses oneself clearly in conversation and interaction with others. • Communicates effectively across Business groups at all levels (analysts through executives).• Communicates effectively across Technology groups, including Development Team and Architects.Must be able to meet any physical ability requirements listed on this description. May perform other job duties as directed by Employee’s Leaders.  EXPERIENCE: • Minimum of 5 years work experience as an Analyst or equivalent position required.• Minimum of 5 years of work experience using Word, Excel (pivot tables, formulas, lookup functions), PowerPoint creation and delivery required.• Minimum of 5 years of work experience in facilitating requirements gathering sessions required.• Minimum of 3 years of work experience in feature and user story creation and understanding OO Analysis and Design required.• Minimum of 3 years of work experience in creating test cases, supporting UAT (User Acceptance Testing), and data analysis required.• Experience in implementing solutions in a variety of delivery methodologies (SDLC, Agile, Waterfall) required.• Demonstrated experience with cross-functional business solution design required. • Experience with evaluation of existing processes and continuous improvement exercises required.• Proficiency in requirements analysis, gap analysis, and process mapping required.• Experience in leading analysis and solution discussions across multiple Teams required.• Previous leadership experience preferred.• Previous experience in software development or equivalent preferred.• Demonstrated experience using JIRA and Visio preferred. Critical Skills: • Excellent partnering, communication, and negotiation skills in working with various Teams and/or external partners.• Able to analyze large, complex, or vague Business or technical problems, articulating the problem or root cause, and translating the analysis into viable solution recommendations.• Able to work effectively in a strong Customer service / team oriented environment.• Able to research, create, and document requirements, processes, and technical specifications.• Ability to manage and prioritize multiple and widely varied work streams / tasks.• Able to take on multiple assignments, whether administrative or project related, while maintaining a successful level of completion in all responsible work. Able to mentor others to do the same.• Able to develop, present and effectively communicate ideas and strategies to a variety of audiences.• Able to teach and mentor others concerning technical and business subjects.Must be able to comply with Company attendance standards as described in established guidelines.   Raj VemulaDirector - Resource DevelopmentDirect:   469-533-7012Fax:        972-234-5732Email:    raj@infovision.comWeb:     www.infovision.com",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-business-analyst-job-dallas-tx-us-167648007.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=6,,,40aaa5ad8fa496400c7140f17e4261d7
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:28:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"LPNs/MAs MaternOhio Clinical Associates needs full-time LPNs and Medical Assistants for our busy Columbus-area OB/GYN physician offices. Physician back office or hospital experience required, Ob/Gyn and phone triage experience preferred. MOCA offers a great team environment with competitive pay and a full benefits package including health insurance options, 401(k)/PS and paid time off programs. Qualified candidates should email resumes to careers@maternohio.com No phone calls or agencies, please. This listing brought to you by The Columbus Dispatch and www.columbusjobs.com/monster.",LPN's/MA's Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43215",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/lpn's-ma's-job-columbus-oh-us-168208487.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=9,,Entry Level,b3b015165d04376577c4a125a21b993d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:28:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Shift Maintenance Technician - $24-25.50 per hour - Large, privately held chemical company in the Columbus area seeks to hire an Industrial Maintenance Tech on 2nd or 3rd shift. This is mostly Monday through Friday with an occasional Saturday, averaging 45 hours per week. Must be well rounded - This person will be responsible for mechanical and electrical troubleshooting across the plant. Room for growth - two of the maintenance supervisors started out as technicians.Responsibilities for the Maintenance TechnicianMaintaining and repairing all mechanical and electrical equipment throughout facility.Installing, testing, troubleshooting, repairing and modifying various electrical and mechanical equipment, electrical controls, PLCs and instrumentation.Requirements for the Maintenance TechnicianMust have 2+ years experience as an industrial maintenance technicianExperience with pumps, valves, pneumatics, drives, PLCs.Welding experience highly desiredBenefits for the Maintenance Technician401k and Company PensionGreat health and dental benefitsTuition ReimbursementThis Job is located in Columbus, OH -> United States",Maintenance Technician - Mechanical/Electrical/nd or rd Shift Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH 43085",,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-technician-mechanical-electrical-2nd-or-3rd-shift-job-columbus-oh-us-168442648.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=14,"49,920.00 - 52,520.00 $ /year",,4cbfe61114f70ac775cab4f3f3b0ab26
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:28:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"TREE MAINTENANCE WORKER The City of Bexley will be accepting applications for the position of Tree Maintenance Worker through June 15, 2016. Summary: Under general supervision, climbs trees, operates light motorized equipment and performs skilled laborer tasks to assist with the care and maintenance of City-owned trees; Utilizes hand and power tools to maintain trees and equipment; performs other related duties as required. For a complete job description and application, please visit http://www.bexley.org/jobs/ This listing brought to you by The Columbus Dispatch and www.columbusjobs.com/monster.",Tree Maintenance Worker Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43215",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/tree-maintenance-worker-job-columbus-oh-us-167918570.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=14,,Entry Level,b23656fb1a17eca2f84f2d73e68440f7
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:28:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTION: Staff and maintain Snap-on’s mobile TECHKNOW showroom.  Focus exclusively on the needs of the professional automotive technician ranging from the basic to the most advanced diagnostic solutions in the market.  Utilize the mobile showroom to interact with franchisees and technicians.  Utilize displays, hands-on product demonstrations, and a complete range of accessories that pair with each platform to answer questions, provide solutions, and ensure confidence in the technician’s purchase.  Work in tandem with Snap-on franchisees to pre-qualify customers and provide solutions that are specific to each individual technician’s diagnostic needs. Responsibilities: ·         Assist the franchisee in selling diagnostic platforms and related products to end-users.·         Visit customers on routes, showing products and working with franchisees and mobile company stores to close sales. Write and sign quotes with end-users.·         Operate mobile showroom, showing product to customers.·         Evaluate and coach franchisees on methods to grow the diagnostic segment of their business.·         Operate mobile showroom van, selling diagnostic products with franchisees and mobile company store managers in order to attain sales, margin and profit targets.·         Maintain accountability for corporate assets in the form of assigned inventory product.·         Operate van in compliance with the Snap-on program.·         Operate van according to DOT regulations and safety guidelines.·         Interact with franchisees, company stores, and FPT members to ensure coordination of programs and policies, and to share best practices.·         Work with FPT members and franchisees to help region meet sales goals.·         Attend sales meetings as required to keep current on diagnostic products and promotions. Qualifications: ·         High school diploma·         Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience·         Sales or sales management experience and retail experience a plus·         Experience in business and related positions.·         Valid driver’s license.·         Ability to drive 16’x20’ vehicle 70-85% of the time.·         Ability to lift 50 pounds frequently (below shoulder height), and more than 50 pounds occasionally (using forklift or other lifting device).·         Ability to travel·         Adept at Microsoft Office·         Successful completion of Snap-on training programs.·         Product knowledge·         Collections·         Asset management·         Budgeting·         Business operations·         Computer proficiency The following individual characteristics and competencies are particularly important: ·         High energy level and highly motivated·         Results driven – set and achieve goals·         Strong communication skills–interpersonal, relationship building, presentations, verbal/written, listening·         Persuasive and influential·         Customer focused·         Strong core values·         Ability to influence participation Snap-on is an Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran    ",TECHKNOW Sales Rep Job in Poughkeepsie,Full Time,"Poughkeepsie, NY 12601",,http://jobview.monster.com/techknow-sales-rep-job-poughkeepsie-ny-us-168668793.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fd60d68bd8c46a678281857a47bb5e7e
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:28:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"""We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader.Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationshipsBenefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidatesQualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not requiredAbout UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. Aflac agents are independent agents of Aflac, and are not employees of Aflac. Certain criminal convictions may prohibit you from becoming an independent licensed agent under state and/or federal law.   """,Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Shreveport,Full Time,"Shreveport, LA 71107",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-shreveport-la-us-168522642.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=6,,Customer Support/Client Care,9dafb9ccd8c1f44078303880a0a2a792
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:28:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"ADT is committed to hiring team members who are passionate about providing exceptional customer service - people who understand the importance of customer satisfaction and what it means to their career development. As a company that is well-positioned to continue meeting and exceeding our customers' evolving needs, ADT also takes pride in upholding a rewarding work experience for all of our team members. An Emergency Dispatch Representative is responsible for monitoring and dispatching proper authorities for residential and small business alarms as well as contacting appropriate responsible parties.Duties and Responsibilities:·         Responds to alarms using the information provided in instruction screens.·         Places necessary outgoing calls to verify an alarm, dispatches the proper authorities, and notifies responsible parties.·         Properly documents alarm handling procedures within the alarm screens.·         Completes alarm processing in accordance with departmental procedures.·         Provide alarm reset instructions to customers during outbound alarm calls and inbound alarm call backs·         Receive inbound calls related to alarm call back inquires·         Other duties as assigned.Qualifications Education/Certification:·         High School Degree or equivalent.Experience:·         Minimum of six (6) months of external customer service experience required, call center experience preferred.Skills:·         Excellent communication skills.·         Able to type at least 25 wpm.·         Basic knowledge of computer applications.·         Strong organizational skills. ",Emergency Dispatch Operator Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37901",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/emergency-dispatch-operator-job-knoxville-tn-us-168090000.aspx?mescoid=4300732001001&jobPosition=1,,Security/Protective Services,2c927d5b8597446786ea77d09492fee6
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:29:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"""We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader.Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationshipsBenefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidatesQualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not requiredAbout UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. Aflac agents are independent agents of Aflac, and are not employees of Aflac. Certain criminal convictions may prohibit you from becoming an independent licensed agent under state and/or federal law.   """,Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Lawrenceville,Full Time,"Lawrenceville, GA 30045",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-lawrenceville-ga-us-168522573.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=6,,Customer Support/Client Care,9c459f3f270576d292c241c9286cfe9f
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:29:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is an opportunity for someone with a strong experience with Epic to make a difference! If you have strong experience with Epic as well as experience building dashboard and reporting for the business this is an opportunity for you.Client DetailsMedical center in downtown Boston, an opportunity to join a business that focus on patient care.DescriptionThe Team lead Healthcare Analyst reports to the Manager, Quality Improvement Data Analysis to facilitate the accessibility, understanding, and active use of data required to improve the quality of care, patient safety, service, and related outcomes by leveraging the reporting tool set.The Team lead Healthcare Analyst provides in-house content expertise on BusinessObjects and Epic tools with the support of Clarity Writer and Worbench Analysts.The Team lead Healthcare Analyst will be responsible for:Mentor and oversee the activity of the Clarity Writers/Workbench Analysts;Work under the supervision of the Manager, Quality Improvement Data Analysis, in prioritizing work;Work with and aiding in the project management on key reporting/dashboard components;Advocate and assisting in the training of internal and external staff on BusinessObjects and other technologies.ProfileThe Team lead Healthcare Analyst will have:- Strong experience with Epic and BusinessObjects- At least 2 years of working experience in the health care space- Experience developing reports in Workbench & Clarity- Experience providing data and information to customers in a readily accessible, understandable and actionable manner using tools such as Clarity, Workbench, Excel, PowerPoint, Crystal Reports, Visio and other tools as needed.- Bachelor degreeJob OfferFree health care25 days of vacation",Team lead Healthcare Analyst Job in Boston,"Full Time , Employee","Boston, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/team-lead-healthcare-analyst-job-boston-ma-us-168743790.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=3,"850,000.00 - 950,000.00 $ /year",,5be1e0afc5294b5e726325aac0dab901
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:29:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Helpdesk/Desktop Support TechnicianContract for hireThis position you will be on the phones 70% of the time & 30% hands on Desktop support.Basic operating system (desktop/OS), networking & applications experience including familiarity with Microsoft platforms (Windows 7 or higher, Server 2008 or higher, Active Directory, etc.).Experience using incident and problem management ticketing solutions.Experience with troubleshooting and escalation of incidents including documentation, diagnosing and following first-level-resolution steps.Strong customer service ethicExcellent verbal and written communication skills.Excellent analytical & problem solving skills.Ability to prioritize & quickly resolve issues",Helpdesk / Desktop Support Technician Job in Cleveland,"Full Time, Employee","Cleveland, OH 44124",,http://jobview.monster.com/helpdesk-desktop-support-technician-job-cleveland-oh-us-167664582.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=12,18.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,Customer Support/Client Care,8bb8090d530a33d6f904f3f7bcc79fcc
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:29:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sales Management TraineeLooking to use your skills with an industry leader? In the Enterprise Management Training Program, you can use those talents on a daily basis as you interact and do business with customers and business partners alike. You’ll also be taught how to lead a sales team, be responsible for P&L, and develop a plan to grow the business – all while honing your management, customer service and communication skills. You’ll have real responsibility from day one in all aspects of the business. And with our performance-based promotions, you’ll have real opportunity as well. Join the company that has repeatedly been recognized as a great place to launch a career. This is where it all starts.Entry-Level Sales Management Training Program Opportunities at EnterpriseThe chance to run your own business and share in the profits you help createHighly marketable skills and training in business, management, marketing, sales and serviceRapid promotion based on performanceA fun, team-oriented work environmentDuring your first year, you'll learn valuable business skills from capable mentors who were once in your shoes. Nearly 100% of all our managers and corporate executives started out as Management Trainees and helped define their own career path that took them to where they are today. Day-to-day responsibilities include actively participating in everything from sales, marketing and customer service to operations and finance. As you progress, you’ll be evaluated every step of the way. And upon successful completion, you can expect rewards, pay increases and the opportunity for continued promotions. Thanks to our entrepreneurial philosophy, there’s absolutely nothing holding you back. Your own initiative and capabilities, coupled with your ability to think on your feet and market effectively, will dictate how fast you advance.Qualifications include: Bachelor's degree required.Must be at least 18 years old.Must have participation or work experience in any of the following: work experience in a customer service, retail or commission sales environment, OR participation or leadership in athletic/team activities, OR membership or leadership in community, social or academic organizations OR military leadership experience.Must have an unrestricted valid driver’s license with no more than 3 moving violations and/or at-fault accidents within the past 3 years.No drug or alcohol related convictions on driving record (DUI/DWI) in the past 5 years.Must be available to work an average of 48 hours per week.Must be living within a reasonable commute of no more than 1 hour to the location(s) listed above within 30 days of anticipated start date.",Sales Management Trainee Job in Edison,"Full Time, Employee","Edison, NJ 08817",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-management-trainee-job-edison-nj-us-162897851.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=7,,Account Management (Non-Commissioned) General/Other: Customer Support/Client Care Retail Customer Service,f8a3ebdc5013469337f60ce3b39bc8a5
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:35:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"You will be responsible for managing the overall camera development lifecycle, acting as the project lead through design, development, validation, and release for next-generation core products.  The successful candidate will have strong product development fundamentals, exceptional communication skills, and a desire to work with an amazing team to build game-changing products.ResponsibilitiesDrive the creation of new cameras and features supporting the overall product development lifecycleDefine and manage project schedules, dependencies, deliverables and responsibilitiesPrioritize team deliverables, tasks, and issuesmanage change requests against scheduling and resource constraintsDrive and coordinate camera development cycle across Product Management, User Experience, Image Quality, Hardware, Firmware, Software, Quality, Beta and external vendor/partner teamsLead regular stakeholder reviews and communicate and present status and issues effectively to all levels of the organization, both verbally and in writingMust Have                   5+ years software development project management experience2+ years hardware/software systems integration experience preferredDemonstrated competency in the execution of multiple or complex projects with a track record of success, ideally in consumer-facing productsExperience with embedded systems, wireless technologies, and imaging systems preferredFamiliar with both Agile and Waterfall methodologies and able to apply them where best suitedSolid understanding of MS Project, Excel, Word, PowerPoint/Keynote, Confluence, and JIRA DesiredExperience with Digital Video and Photography technologies Location: San Mateo,CAType: ContractDuration:6 monthsDavid GutierrezOSI Engineering, Inc.1999 S. Bascom AvenueSuite 800Campbell, CA 95008Phone: (408) 550-2800Web: http://www.OSIengineering.com",Monster,,"You will be responsible for managing the overall camera development lifecycle, acting as the project lead through design, development, validation, and release for next-generation core products.  The successful candidate will have strong product development fundamentals, exceptional communication skills, and a desire to work with an amazing team to build game-changing products.ResponsibilitiesDrive the creation of new cameras and features supporting the overall product development lifecycleDefine and manage project schedules, dependencies, deliverables and responsibilitiesPrioritize team deliverables, tasks, and issuesmanage change requests against scheduling and resource constraintsDrive and coordinate camera development cycle across Product Management, User Experience, Image Quality, Hardware, Firmware, Software, Quality, Beta and external vendor/partner teamsLead regular stakeholder reviews and communicate and present status and issues effectively to all levels of the organization, both verbally and in writingMust Have                   5+ years software development project management experience2+ years hardware/software systems integration experience preferredDemonstrated competency in the execution of multiple or complex projects with a track record of success, ideally in consumer-facing productsExperience with embedded systems, wireless technologies, and imaging systems preferredFamiliar with both Agile and Waterfall methodologies and able to apply them where best suitedSolid understanding of MS Project, Excel, Word, PowerPoint/Keynote, Confluence, and JIRA DesiredExperience with Digital Video and Photography technologies Location: San Mateo,CAType: ContractDuration:6 monthsDavid GutierrezOSI Engineering, Inc.1999 S. Bascom AvenueSuite 800Campbell, CA 95008Phone: (408) 550-2800Web: http://www.OSIengineering.com",,http://jobview.monster.com/seeking-a-sr-technical-project-manager-at-a-consumer-video-product-company-in-san-mateo-ca-job-san-mateo-ca-us-165818484.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=20,,,a736529b79661355371dbfb268388efe
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:18:35:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionEaton's Electrical Division, North American Sales (NAS) organization located in Arden, NC has an opening for an Electrical Original Equipment Manufacturer (EOEM) Account Coordinator. The primary function of the position is:   Provide single point of contact of commercial support for our EOEM Sales Engineers and customers. This position provides OEM, HVAC and key Account order management for large EOEM customers. Candidate should demonstrate a considerable level of commercial knowledge and have the ability to manage multiple tasks.  This position will interact with Eaton’s manufacturing plants, warehouses, customers and field sales.   Other essential functions include:   A. Fulfill order entry, order management related activities for OEMs, HVAC, and Key Accounts for the electrical sector’s OEM products B. Drive customer affinity by delivering exceptional Customer Service (meeting or exceeding phone and email metrics as well as team service level agreement). C. Identify and implement process improvements D. Lead regular conference calls with field sales, plants and customers E. Maintain daily usage of the Customer 360 tool F. Change notice management G. Facilitate proper and efficient information flow in an effort to meet or exceed customer needs and departmental and division wide performance expectations H. Ability to handle high-pressure, fast-paced environment requiring diligence to detail I. Proven analytical and critical thinking skills J. Ability to constructively manage conflicts and discrepancies towards positive resolution K. Prioritizing customer demand to assist with improved product flow L. Work with finance team to resolve customer credit requests M. Train peers and customers as appropriate N. Fulfill any and all Eaton Business System requirements  Basic Qualifications (Including Educational Requirements)Basic qualifications:   • Bachelor's degree from an accredited institution • Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without company sponsorship • No relocation benefit is offered for this position. Only candidates currently residing within a 50 mile radius of Arden, NC will be considered.   Position Criteria• Candidate must have excellent time management, organization, communication and computer skills • Strong work ethic, flexibility, and a desire to actively contribute to the group’s success • Ability to prioritize multiple tasks • Team player • Strong professional presence • Occasional travel to plants and customer sites required Preferred qualifications include:   • Knowledge of Microsoft Office (word, excel, email, internet) • Minimum customer interaction experience (1 year) • Knowledge of CRM software and SAP • Strong written and verbal communication skills • Knowledge of Vista and Mentor software • Familiar with our assembly products and plantsEaton is a power management company with 2015 sales of $20.9 billion. Eaton provides energy-efficient solutions that help our customers effectively manage electrical, hydraulic and mechanical power more efficiently, safely and sustainably. Eaton has approximately 97,000 employees and sells products to customers in more than 175 countries. For more information, visit www.eaton.com At Eaton, we see things differently. We see opportunities to innovate, go above and beyond, and we work hard because what we do reflects who we are. If you see things differently—if you’re determined, motivated and focused on improving the world around you—then it’s time to see where a career at Eaton can take you. For more information, visit www.eaton.com/careers Eaton is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Eaton is committed to ensuring equal employment opportunities for all job applicants and employees. Employment decisions are based upon job-related reasons regardless of an applicant's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, marital status, genetic information, protected veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",EOEM Account Coordinator Job in Arden,"Full Time, Employee","Arden, NC 28704",,http://jobview.monster.com/eoem-account-coordinator-job-arden-nc-us-168696239.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=10,,Customer Support/Client Care,b2ad77b936ab62200e9f20af858f87e1
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:21:48,No,jobs.monster.com,".Superior group is looking for a Customer Service Representative-Paychex Insurance Agency for our client located in Indianapolis, IN. This position pays $15 per hour and is a expected to be a 6 month contract with possibility of being hired on. Shift is 10:00 AM-7 PM.Responsible for client set-up, ongoing administration and is the face of a current product offering of client called, Employer Shared Responsibility Services (ESR). Responds to written and phone inquiries from clients using ESR services. Responds to inquiries and provides technical product support to Sales and Operations partners.Responds to written and phone inquiries from client, Sales and Operations partners and places outbound calls to clients and Sales and Operations partners as required by the business unit to support onboarding of ESR clients, grant client access to client Health & Benefits website, resolve questions about Analysis & Monitoring reports and IRS 6056 Tax Filing and questions about the Employer Shared Mandate regulations.Gathers and interprets data from internal resources such as AskIt, iComm, Salesforce and external resources such as the IRS website, Department of Treasury, etc. to solve issues relating to ESR services, while maintaining positive and professional relationships with internal and external partners.Utilizes analysis and problem solving skills and makes appropriate recommendations to clients and Sales and Operations partners ensuring all client inquiries are resolved appropriately and accurately.Develops and maintains knowledge of new and existing client account set-ups, their corresponding systems and ESR processes to ensure resolution of client issues.Maintains accurate recording of all internal and external communications in order to document client needs and the client replies.Acts as a resource in product related projects pertaining to the ESR Regulations, product testing, or training sessions as requiredTrains and mentors less experience client and Contract employees within the group when required to ensure all staff is current on policies and procedures.Responsible for meeting departmental service level agreements within ESR Services.Responsible for ongoing client satisfaction through process and service efficiency.Strong verbal and written communications, analytical and mathematical skills, prioritization and organizational skills are required.Required Skills / Qualifications: Minimum of 2 years’ experience in customer service, sales or insurance. Preferred Skills / Qualifications:BA/BS degree in Business is preferred.Go Beyond. www.superiorjobs.com EEO Employer ? Minorities / Females / Disabled / Veterans / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity.",Customer Service Representative-Paychex Insurance Agency Job in Indianapolis,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Indianapolis, IN 46240",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-paychex-insurance-agency-job-indianapolis-in-us-168650342.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=7,,Customer Support/Client Care,5c209868d355e4f21938c22ff52fb483
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:23:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"""We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader.Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationshipsBenefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidatesQualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not requiredAbout UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. Aflac agents are independent agents of Aflac, and are not employees of Aflac. Certain criminal convictions may prohibit you from becoming an independent licensed agent under state and/or federal law.   """,Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in El Paso,Full Time,"El Paso, TX 79936",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-el-paso-tx-us-168522867.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=5,,Customer Support/Client Care,bb866fb116212a35034417db8ac387ac
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:45:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requirements: License/Certification/Education: Requires a High School Diploma or equivalent.  Meet all state & local requirements for Phlebotomy.  Normally requires a Valid Driver’s License along with a clean driving record. Prefer a minimum of two yrs experience as a patient service technician/phlebotomist. Must exhibit strong customer service skills demonstrating a patient-centric approach.  Must exhibit professional appearance and behavior.  Must be proficient at obtaining payment from patients.  Exhibit proficiency in all of the following: blood collection by venipuncture and capillary technique from patients of all age groups, urine drug screen collections, paternity collections, breath/saliva alcohol testing, pediatric blood collections, difficult draws (patients in long-term care, drug rehabilitation, prisons, psychiatric, or similar facilities).  Must exhibit proficiency in data order entry and processing of samples and have comprehensive understanding of compliance and safety.  Must possess the ability and skills necessary to perform other duties as required by the supervisor (training, travel, etc.) Job Description: LabCorp is seeking an experienced, customer service driven Phlebotomist to work on site at our client located in Louisville, KY.  This is a full time position working 9AM-5:30PM Monday-Friday and rotating Saturdays.  If you love to interact with patients and play a role in their overall healthcare experience, as our Phlebotomist, you’ll be able to do just that. Our technology is second to none in the industry, and you’ll work with new electronic reporting and accuracy tools, allowing you to focus on your patients and increase your success rates. Along with patient collection and obtaining specimens for processing, you’ll pack and ship specimens as well as prepare samples. Your daily interaction with patients and sense of ownership will be essential to our success.   LabCorp offers an excellent benefits package including medical, dental and vision insurance, 401 K with company match, holiday pay, and up to 144 hours of paid time off per year.  ",Phlebotomist Job in Louisville,Full Time Employee,"Louisville, KY",,http://jobview.monster.com/phlebotomist-job-louisville-ky-us-168632072.aspx?mescoid=3100561001001&jobPosition=14,,Customer Support/Client Care,3d192b55b08d084008612c2eaa41714c
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:46:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer/GuardState College, PAACCEPTING  APPLICATIONS Selected individuals will be interviewed in person at our Hiring Office or at the nearest available Work Site near you.Applicants must successfully pass a criminal record check in compliance with the PA Private Detective Act.Responsibilities of Security Officer / GuardPatrol facility or man post as instructed and serve as a general security presence and visible deterrent to crime and client rule infractions. Detect suspicious activities and watch for criminal acts or client rule infractions at or near assigned post which may be a threat to the property, client or employees at the site. Report all incidents, accidents or medical emergencies. Respond to emergencies, such as medical and bomb threats; and to alarms, such as fire and intrusion by following emergency response proceedings. Must be at least 18 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements. Must have a high school diploma or GED At least one verifiable employer. Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing for the purpose of public interaction and report writing. Authorized to work in the United States. Ability to perform essential functions of the position with or without reasonable accommodation. Willing to participate in St. Moritz pre-employment process which may include drug testing and full background investigation including MVR check. (motor vehicle driving record) Ability to maintain satisfactory attendance and punctuality standard. Neat and professional appearance. Friendly and professional demeanor. Ability to provide quality customer service. Ability to handle typical and crisis situations efficiently and effectively at client site. We offer an attractive compensation package including competitive hourly wage, benefits, training and opportunities for advancement. St. Moritz Security Services, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V.",Security Guard Job in State College,Part Time Employee,"State College, PA 16801",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/security-guard-job-state-college-pa-us-168566565.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=20,,Security/Protective Services,e7b2278af575fb8455e92659e37482f6
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:46:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Sr. Contracts Analyst Job #:  655758Sr. Contracts AnalystSan Antonio, TX6 Month Contract Hire If you meet the below qualifications, send resume in Word to kespinoza@apexsystemsinc.com . Needed Experience/Skills:- At least 10 years of 1102 contract experience- 10 yrs DoD contracts- ADP Public Trust- Bachelor’s degree- Knowledge of price and cost analysis sufficient to review proposals against previous history, actual and estimated expenditures, and established rates to determine price reasonableness or to determine a negotiation position- Knowledge of the methods and techniques of fact-finding, analysis, and resolution of complex problems, and the ability to develop concrete action plans to solve problems- Exceptional knowledge of Federal and DoD contracting principles (Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) and Defense Federal Acquisition Regulation Supplement (DFARS), DoD Directives and Instructions, laws, regulations and procedures- Demonstrated ability to provide expert technical advice, staff coordination and consultation to foster formulating guidelines, implementing new developments, and providing expert interpretation         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Sr. Contracts Analyst Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-contracts-analyst-job-san-antonio-tx-us-168780096.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f79ed3a945709225356f14cc3aaf0810
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:46:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a RPG Programmer Analyst in St Louis, MO. Immediate need; call 1-888-228-7164 ext. 2512 or email me at lvalentin@judge.com  Qualifications & Requirements:Must have a minimum of 5+ years experience in RPG coding Must be proficient in RPG IV, ILE Knowledge of RPG Free (preferred) Excellent SQL Skills Excellent written and oral communication skills The candidate must have a strong work ethic, works well with others, in a team environment, can work well under pressure and in high stress situations. Local is ideal (no relo offered) Contract set til end of year. Could be extended or even go temp-to-hire for right candidate.  Fulltime hours, Mon-Fri 8a-5p",RPG Programmer Analyst Job in Maryland Heights,"Full Time, Employee","Maryland Heights, MO",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rpg-programmer-analyst-job-maryland-heights-mo-us-168767027.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,af2b0baf32dfc395d958c7d4290a4e47
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:46:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Join the Leader in the Home Healthcare Industry! Let us be Your Road to Success Rotech Healthcare Inc. is seeking a dedicated Customer Service Representative who wants to be part of a company that makes a difference in patients' lives. In this role, you will be responsible for performing all tasks and communication related to the intake of patient information concerning the service of durable medical equipment and respiratory service and supplies.   Why work for Rotech? If we take a look at all the ways employees benefit from working at Rotech, we have a philosophy we like to call: “The Rotech Difference.” What's the Rotech Difference? It's made up of all the benefits, services and offerings available to Rotech Employees. It is the employee-based strategies that make our company an employer of choice in the healthcare industry. As a member of the Rotech Healthcare Team, employees can take advantage of many great opportunities as part of their career path. Job Responsibilities: Communicates with patients/clients and referral sources both verbally and in writing to ensure patient/client questions and concerns are processed in a timely manner Coordinates all patient information, processes paperwork, including preparation of file for Billing Department, and completes batch reports for UPS deliveries Complies with all applicable company policies and procedures to meet JCAHO and company standards Processes paperwork-confirms tickets, inputs new patient set-ups, and assembles charts Completes SOPs/CMNs and documents on tracking log Verifies Medicare, Medicaid, and private insurance coverage information Clears previous day’s route and checks all paperwork for accuracy and completeness Prepares deposit for location on a weekly basis Maintains referral log Provides service for all retail/walk-in equipment requests Job Requirements: High school diploma or GED equivalent Employment is contingent upon a drug screening test and background investigation Experience in medical field and administrative record management PHYSICAL DEMANDS: While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or listen. The employee is occasionally required to walk. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision Competencies: Knowledge of Medical terminology Knowledge of medical billing practices Knowledge of billing reimbursement Knowledge of insurance policies and requirements Strong customer service experience Benefits: ­Competitive Compensation Career Path and Management opportunities Health and wellness benefits to include medical, dental, prescription and vision plans, short term and long term disability, supplemental life insurance and flexible spending accounts Employee Assistance program PTO and paid holidays 401K Bonus' Employee Discounts Employee Referral program Employee Recognition program Make the right move, Contact us today! This application process will take approximately 15-20 minutes to complete. The hiring manager will review your resume and contact you if your qualifications match our needs. We appreciate your interest in Rotech Healthcare Inc. Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans, and Individual with Disabilities Rotech Healthcare Inc. recruits, employs, trains, promotes, transfers, separates from employment and compensates employees without regard to membership in, association with, or perception of race, color, age, gender, religion, creed, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, pregnancy or any other personal characteristic protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in each locality where Rotech has employees.",Customer Service Representative Job in Laurel,Full Time,"Laurel, MD 20723",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-laurel-md-us-168756675.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,31103b8270a85507d64b3095f4d51170
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:47:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Field Service organization ensures that critical equipment in hospitals, doctor's offices, reference laboratories, and research institutes across the country are serviced and maintained in an efficient manner. As a Field Service Coordinator you support the Service Organization and Beckman Coulter Customers. This includes but is not limited to the following responsibilities:  Achieve and maintain a positive rapport with customers in order to update them of their critical job status within specific timeframes. Schedule preventative maintenance, installations, and emergency calls while prioritizing the work as appropriate in any given day. Responsible for ordering parts and expediting orders required for the field service engineers and applications specialists. Use Oracle to retrieve customer and other installed base information, inventory availability, part order status, all work order updates, and to make changes as required. Collaborate with the field service teams to drive revenue growth by verifying and collecting purchase orders as well as identifying revenue generating opportunities. Check with credit department concerning credit status of customer and defined payment method (pre-payment or on account) where customers are liable for payment of support. Assist with the closure of service jobs as needed in order to invoice customers timely. Identify opportunities for combining open work to maximize efficiency of field service engineers based on specific criteria. Adhere to compliance requirements at all times Display team leadership with the ability to create and drive effective team working. Highly effective Time Management and Personal Organization. Familiarity with standard IT Tools (Windows, MS Office). Knowledge of Oracle is preferable although not required. Proven ability to thrive in a fast paced, ever changing team environment. Excellent communication skills to include demonstrated professional, conflict management, and persuasion skills.  Must possess strong problem solving skills. Demonstrated strong attention to detail while multi-tasking to achieve quality on-time completions of tasks. A “Do It Now” mindset coupled with a strong sense of accountability.  Ability to work a set 9 hour shift anytime between 6am – 8pm. High School Degree or equivalent with 4+ years relevant experience - OR - Bachelor’s Degree or experience in customer service, call center or coordination environment preferred",Field Service Coordinator Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46201",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsManufacturing - OtherMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/field-service-coordinator-job-indianapolis-in-us-168745151.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9911f9b909e8e13c029f0b7b21ebb42d
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:47:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Capital Management Services LP is looking to expand their security department. The security guard will be responsible for welcoming guests by promptly greeting them, in person or over the phone as well as answering or referring inquiries. They will be directing visitors by maintaining employee and department directories and giving instructions. Candidate must maintain security by following procedures, monitoring logbooks as well as issuing visitor badges, and maintaining a safe and clean reception area.The security guard will maintain continuity among work teams by documenting and communicating actions, irregularities, and continuing needs, as well as contribute to the team effort by accomplishing related duties as needed. The security guard must be able to work with confidential information as the candidate will be assisting multiple departments with sensitive information. The candidate must be able to manipulate different screens as well as multi task in a high volume area. We are looking for a candidate to work the required hours of 2:30pm-9:30pm with the flexibility to work Saturday shifts. Skills/Qualifications a potential candidate will need:•Telephone and verbal communication skills•Proficient in Microsoft programs including office, word and excel •Previously worked with confidential information•Professionalism•Customer focus•Organization•Working with multiple departments•Handles pressure•Multitasking•Clerical experience is a plusCapital Management Services, LP will offer:•Full Benefits package (health, life, dental, vision insurance)•Paid training•401K Plan(s)•Paid vacation and sick time•Room for advancement•“Free” Onsite Medical Office",Security Guard Job in Buffalo,Full Time,"Buffalo, NY",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/security-guard-job-buffalo-ny-us-168371279.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),80d4f2f11a08b23f38c1023d2725f46b
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:48:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Graphic Designer Overall Responsibilities: Responsible for conceptualization and design of multi-channel direct marketing campaigns and fundraising materials that support all the departments within Food For The Poor. The position requires not only creativity, but also a high level of problem solving, critical thinking, and ability work within specified direct mail and brand guidelines. The ideal candidate will be a team player interested in collaborating with a highly skilled creative team and will have a passion for Food For The Poor’s mission. We are looking for an individual that is detail-oriented, organized and can manage multiple jobs at once, while creating out of the box ideas and designs. Designers are responsible for preparing files for high volume print production, and for web usage. Other responsibilities include branding of special events and other programs. Skills & Qualifications: ·         Solid conceptualization, design and artistic ability·         Good communication and interpersonal skills, and ability to multi-task·         Detail and deadline-oriented with flexible and team player attitude and ability to work under pressure·         Aptitude to take direction·         Strong skills in Mac platform Adobe Creative Cloud, and fluency in In Design, Photoshop, Illustrator and Acrobat. ·         Experience working with font management, photo archiving systems and Microsoft Office a plus·         Photo color correction experience·         Strong knowledge of print production and pre-press procedures Education:  ·         Degree in graphic design or related field with ongoing education to keep up-to-date on all relevant computer programs and trends Experience:  A minimum of five years’ experience in direct mail/print industry. Fundraising and/or marketing background preferred, but not required. Web design experience is a plus.To apply for this position, please visit:  http://foodforthepoor.org/graphicdesigner",Graphic Designer Job in Coconut Creek,Full Time,"Coconut Creek, FL 33073",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/graphic-designer-job-coconut-creek-fl-us-168762138.aspx?mescoid=2700410001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6203480dda6eadd587fbfe158a43d581
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:48:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Adecco is currently assisting a local company in their search to fill multiple Call Center Representative jobs in Brunswick, GA. These are long term seasonal opportunities. You will be assisting customers with varying levels of questions, inquiries, or requests. Previous customer service or call center experience is a plus but not required - entry level candidates are welcome to apply. Apply Now if you meet the qualifications listed below!Responsibilities for this Call Center Representative job include:- Interact with customers via telephone to provide information- Process transactions and reply to inquiries about products and services- Use computer system to track, gather information, and/or troubleshoot customer issues- Record customer service interactions, details of inquiries, complaints, or comments, as well as actions taken- Achieve productivity standards and goals while maintaining the highest level of customer service- Refer unresolved customer issues to designated call center department or supervisor for resolutionQualifications:- Must have a High School Diploma or GED- Previous customer service or call center experience is plus; entry level candidates are welcome to apply- Must be computer literate - Proficient with Email and Microsoft Word - Excellent verbal and written communication skills- Ability to make good decisions and resolve issues in a clear and calm matterApply Now if you are interested in this Call Center Representative job in Brunswick, GA! Please contact the Brunswick Recruitment Team at 912-289-5627 if you have any questions.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",Customer Service Job in Brunswick,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Brunswick, GA 31520",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-job-brunswick-ga-us-168745934.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,,Customer Support/Client Care,6e218e9317cd31c35e6bbfb856c7a0b7
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:48:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is hiring individuals to work as Customer Counter Associates. This work involves contact with customers who are shipping packages. You will check shipping addresses, perform packaging quality inspections and complete sales transactions. Some computer work is also required, including package tracking, package processing and daily records accounting.This is a physical, sometimes fast-paced position that involves lifting, lowering and sliding packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. Part-time employees usually work four to five hours each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays. Shift schedules vary between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Customer Service Associate Job in Libby,,"Libby, MT 59923",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-customer-service-associate-job-libby-mt-us-168714209.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=18,,Customer Support/Client Care,fd801900bd4ee48ec2c13881ebc72671
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:50:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark                                                                                                                    Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day.  Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Aramark Uniform Services (AUS) provides uniforms and related products to more than 400,000 customers nationwide, in virtually every industry.  From designing and manufacturing to laundering and delivering, AUS works with local and national clients to create and maintain a total uniform solution that promotes teamwork and establishes a professional identity.  AUS operates from over 200 locations nationwide and has an immediate opportunity for a Customer Service Representative in Lexington, KY.   This Customer Service Representative position is responsible for providing exceptional service to customers in a professional manner.  Handling incoming calls with the objective of one-call resolution.  Facilitate and resolve issues with discrepancies and/or customer complaints to insure consistent customer satisfaction.   Responsible for auditing company service programs to ensure compliance with 100% follow up through customer call backs.    SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITIES: Handle inbound customer calls and provide requested information on all available items, pricing, and service of the customer’s account. Efficiently and accurately record all information including any notes related to the customer’s issue or account. Provide quality customer service through one-call resolution and establishing long-term customer relationships. Develop, execute and measure resolution plans and strategies that are specific to individual customer requirements. Build and maintain inter-departmental relationships in order to ensure customer’s situation is handled, managing company guidelines and customer expectations. Utilize decision making and trouble-shooting skills to resolve customer concerns in relation to pricing, invoicing, service delivery, and any other item related issues. Identify, manage and enforce company service programs to ensure 100% process compliance. Alert management to service concerns not resolved in a timely and acceptable manner. Identify and communicate service trends. Performs other duties as required or assigned in accordance with scope of activities enumerated above.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES: Strong knowledge of customer service processes including handling complaints, inventory or product availability, service issues and Accounts Receivable Ability to take initiative and strong sense of urgency Excellent communication skills to include answering phones professionally Proven worth ethic, positive attitude and a team player who enjoys a challenge Ability to work with all company software used to manage and maintain customers Excellent analytical and problem solving skills, with an attention to detail Capable of completing one-call customer resolution Must have the ability to monitor and drive all company service programs Experience with Oracle Teleservice application a plus Experience with Cisco CTI a plus Schedule flexibility to include day, nights, weekends and overtime EDUCATION: High school degree  Bachelor’s degree is preferred, but not required EXPERIENCE: Two years of customer service experience, and proven track record in a high call volume environment preferred.  ",Customer Service Representative - AUS Job in Lexington,"Full Time, Employee","Lexington, KY 40502",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-aus-job-lexington-ky-us-168758057.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=13,,Customer Support/Client Care,87c3b1b24bd40ec6e9ec68dc548ab5ac
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:55:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is working with a top client of ours in greater San Antonio, TX to identify a Business Analyst contract to hire opportunity. Ideal candidates will have strong experience gathering, analyzing and documenting requirements as well as experience working with e-Commerce. Job Functions: -Business Requirements Identification and Prioritization: Assists in assessing customer needs utilizing a structured requirements process (gathering, analyzing, documenting, and managing changes) to assist in identifying business priorities. Develops, writes, and communicates requirements for the implementation of business solutions. Seeks technical assistance to help in problem resolution. -Business Liaison: Establishes liaison relationship with business partners in order to provide technical solutions to meet user needs. -e-Commerce experience: Knowledgeable with transactional processes, applications and various tools associated with e-Commerce. -Test Case Development: Develops user test cases and validates test results during user acceptance testing. -Analyzes metrics to ensure customer satisfaction. -Problem Resolution: Investigates, resolves and escalates problems. -Project Status Reporting: Provides input to project status reports. Knowledge, Skills & Abilities: -Knowledge of e-Commerce -Knowledge of business requirement gathering. -Knowledge of database analysis. -Knowledge of test plans. -Knowledge of Internet and client/server architectures. -Skill in interviewing and asking detailed questions to develop business requirements. -Skill in effective listening to obtain an understanding of user needs. -Skill in creation of use cases for inclusion in a test plan. -Skill in proficient in Microsoft Office Suite. -Ability to propose solutions to problems and considers timeliness, effectiveness, and practicality in addressing client needs. -Ability to communicate clearly and effectively, both verbally and in writing.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",e-Commerce Business Analyst Job in New Braunfels,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,e-Commerce Business Analyst,"New Braunfels, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/e-commerce-business-analyst-job-new-braunfels-tx-us-168751140.aspx?mescoid=1500146001001&jobPosition=1,,IT/Software Development,6a91c4e3693dc344b404463d677bbb21
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:19:56:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"""We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader.Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationshipsBenefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidatesQualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not requiredAbout UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. Aflac agents are independent agents of Aflac, and are not employees of Aflac. Certain criminal convictions may prohibit you from becoming an independent licensed agent under state and/or federal law.   """,Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Rome,Full Time,"Rome, GA 30161",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-rome-ga-us-168522577.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=9,,Customer Support/Client Care,84a9d97daa1b24fc06eebbf9222c3de9
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:00:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"The ADT Corporation (NYSE: ADT) is a leading provider of security and automation solutions for homes and businesses in the United States and Canada. ADT's broad and pioneering set of products and services, including ADT Pulse® interactive home and business solutions, and health services, meet a range of customer needs for today’s active and increasingly mobile lifestyles. Headquartered in Boca Raton, Florida, ADT helps provide peace of mind to nearly seven million customers, and it employs approximately 17,500 people at 200 locations. More information is available at www.adt.com. Position Summary              The Residential Installer is responsible for installing, testing, repairing, and servicing electrical and electromechanical equipment in customer's premises and signal receiving centers. The Installer performs associated duties in the field and shop, delivers supplies and maintains pertinent records as required. Duties and Responsibilities of Residential Installer                                                                                                                                      Installs, dismantles, and reconstructs equipment required by customer or ADT order. Makes connections and required adjustments as directed; test operation of all components of each system to the signal-receiving center to properly establish service. Evaluates information furnished for the job, delivered materials, layout of customer's premises and practical routes for cable, conduit and/or wiring. Promptly reports defective material or equipment, inaccuracies or omissions in job information that may result in inadequate protection for customer use. Follows safety practices to safeguard against injury and damage to property. Safeguards against loss of unused materials, ladders, and tools on a job site or office location. Cleans up debris from installation, patches drill holes, and returns unused materials.Performs other duties as required.Qualifications Education/Work Experience Required            High School degree or equivalent mandatory.Electronic Trade School training desired2 years maintenance/installation experienceCore CompetenciesExcellent communications skills required.Valid driver's license. ADT LLC is a equal opportunity employer. Want to learn more about ADT?Visit us online at jobsatadt.com or on facebook.",Alarm Technician Job in Honolulu,Full Time Employee,"Honolulu, HI 96813",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/alarm-technician-job-honolulu-hi-us-168092027.aspx?mescoid=4900864001001&jobPosition=17,,Security/Protective Services,ac272b681c1ce6782fa7b6e7e1e2a461
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:10:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Technical Sales Support CoordinationAA degree required and mechanically inclinedParts experience is requiredHours: 8am- 5 PM  Please send resume to Gary@work22.comand then call Gary 323-694-6577Salary: $16 an hour direct hire with benefits - 401K and health insurance Location: Whittier, Ca. (562) area codecompany; www.work22.comJob Description:Career opportunity for an individual with excellent verbal and written communication skills, mechanical aptitude and good organizational ability.  Duties include customer service, answering phones, communicating with customers in a professional manner, applicant must be computer literate. Requirements: College degreeCustomer service experienceCommunicate with customers in a professional mannerResearch parts information (catalogs and Drawings)Mechanically inclinedComputer literate, proficient in Microsoft OfficeHandle customer inquiries by telephone & email regarding the status of customer quotes, orders, and change requests.",Technical Sales Support Coordination $ AA degree Job in Whittier,Full Time,"Whittier, CA",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-sales-support-coordination-16-aa-degree-job-whittier-ca-us-167729359.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=20,16.00 - 16.50 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),49daa33db5d06183352fc6d86dd5ab41
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:17:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"""We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader.Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationshipsBenefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidatesQualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not requiredAbout UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. Aflac agents are independent agents of Aflac, and are not employees of Aflac. Certain criminal convictions may prohibit you from becoming an independent licensed agent under state and/or federal law.   """,Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Ligonier,Full Time,"Ligonier, PA 15658",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-ligonier-pa-us-168522820.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=9,,Customer Support/Client Care,5156c65f10727d4273d59fd4c08323a4
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:20:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Field Technician. Technical Skills PC Technical Knowledge Yes 2 - 4 years VoIP (voice over IP) Yes 1 - 2 years MFDs / printers - Ricoh and XeroxPhones - Avaya and CiscoPCs - Dell, Lenovo, and HPWorking knowledge of Network equipment; switches and routers; and cabling.*** This role does involve frequent travel. May require worker to use own vehicle, expenses will be reimbursed.Must Have Skill Sets: PCLotus NotesService Now is the application usedExcellent communication skillsCandidate will be responsible for daily monitoring and resolution of Incidents and Requests involving PCs, Printers, phones, cabling, connectivity, etc.Location - Charlotte, North Carolina",Field Technician Job in Charlotte,"Full Time, Employee","Charlotte, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/field-technician-job-charlotte-nc-us-168766609.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,8bdac2195775f2d652a013eb561eb7aa
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:21:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"""We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader.Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationshipsBenefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidatesQualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not requiredAbout UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. Aflac agents are independent agents of Aflac, and are not employees of Aflac. Certain criminal convictions may prohibit you from becoming an independent licensed agent under state and/or federal law.   """,Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in San Marcos,Full Time,"San Marcos, CA 92078",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-san-marcos-ca-us-168522497.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=7,,Customer Support/Client Care,bb794a8c2cb50fb67cf64ed319928924
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:21:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"FRONT END WEB DEVELOPER – PERM – BLOOMINGTON, MNDesign and code industry-disruptive products with the latest tools and technologiesFront End Web Developer Skills & Requirements:• Strong passion for engineering software and an insatiable thirst to learn and grow• Firm grasp of software engineering best practices and why they are important• Strong experience with Angular.js• Mobile First• Advanced skills diagnosing and resolving issues• Proven track record building great softwareGreat If You Have:• HTML5, CSS3, Responsive Web, ASP.NET• RESTful Services, Bootstrap, JSON, AJAX, SQL• Design Patterns, Data Modeling, SaaS• Scrum, TDD, Git, Jira, Confluence• Bachelor's Degree in Computer ScienceFollow us on our BLOG to see more jobs like this: http://minneapolis.vereduscorp.com / Why Veredus?Candidates work with a professional Recruiter whose average experience is eight years in the industry. That means they have intimate knowledge of the Information Technology industry and market trends - who is in demand now and who will be next. Your Veredus Recruiter will lead you through a thorough screening process in order to understand your skills, experience, needs, and desires. They also counsel their candidates in resume writing, interviewing, and career planning so when there’s a position you really want, you’re fully prepared to get it. . Additionally, if the position is a consulting opportunity Veredus provides full benefits starting Day 1, and at virtually no cost to you. • Medical • Dental • Vision • 401K • Life Insurance ($20,000 benefit)• ATOP - Accrued Time Off Program• Consultant Lunches and Outings • Consultant Web-Site• Name Plates• Care packages/Survival packs• Dedicated Consulting Services RepresentativeVeredus has been recognized as one of the “Best Staffing Firms to Work For” by Staffing Industry Analysts the last 3 years in a row. Nervous about an upcoming interview? Want to be as prepared as possible?Click on the link below and you will have access to the Veredus Interview Prep Video - culled from hundreds of years of collective experience in preparing candidates for that all important job interview: http://vereduscorp.com/career-center / Veredus Corporation is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer M/F/D/V.Drug testing may be required; please contact Recruiter for more information.",Front End Web Developer Job in Bloomington,Full Time Employee,"Bloomington, MN",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/front-end-web-developer-job-bloomington-mn-us-166891784.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,"100,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",IT/Software Development,5de4fddbf0df8b45221a40d1dffd7e2f
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:21:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Camden County Sheriff ’s OfficeWhen you join the Camden County Sheriff ’s Office, you will have a career unlike any other. Deputies use their training and experience to help prevent crime, conduct investigations and a order. Do you have what it takes to become a Camden County Sheriff ’s Deputy? Located in the Central Ozarks region of Missouri, and serving the Lake of the Ozarks, the Camden County Sheriff ’s Office is a full-service law enforcement agency capable of enforcing all state and local statutes within its boundaries. Serving a year-round population of nearly 50,000 residents, the Camden County Sheriff ’s Office provides police services for nearly 250,000 residents, visitors and second-home owners during the busiest times of the summer. The department is divided into three distinct divisions: Administration, Operations and Corrections. Administration includes Communications (Dispatch), Records, Civil Process and E-911/Mapping and Addressing. Operations includes Patrol, Horseshoe Bend COPS District, Detective Bureau and Animal Control. Corrections includes court security, the administration and supervision of the jail, as well as detention and transportation of all incarcerated inmates from any law enforcement agency both in and out of Camden County. The Camden County Sheriff ’s Office also hosts and maintains training for a multi-jurisdictional Special Weapons and Tactics (S.W.A.T.) team. EMPLOYMENT:A pre-employment application must be signed and dated to be considered for employment.Contact Recruitment Lieutenant Bart Sims at 573-346- 2243, extension 4253 for further information. POSITION ..................................STARTINGCorrections Officer ....................$20,663.60 Communications Officer.............$21,257.60Applicants for non-sworn positions must be at least 18 years of age and possess a high school diploma or equivalent. A background investigation will be conducted. Drug testing is a requirement for employment.Employment benefits include, but are not limited to; health and life insurance for employee, retirement benefits, holiday and sick days. Shift work is required. A pre-employment application must be signed and dated to be considered for employment. http://adportal.marketplaceadsonline.com/gatehouse-adportal-test/CMS/temp/bd/d9/bdd96de5-af5b-46ca-9f08-e77610988a50/41234_ccsheriff_3x5_052716_ls__1_.pdf $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Corrections Officer,Full Time,"Camdenton, MO 65020",All,http://jobview.monster.com/corrections-officer-communications-officer-job-camdenton-mo-us-167848274.aspx?mescoid=3300579001001&jobPosition=8,,,fdbabe353e4b59ec57fcad08e1f88c60
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:21:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"We currently have a requirement for Lockbox developer, an ideal candidate should have: Solid understanding of relational databases and SQL Managed and led a successful Software Testing team Worked as the Lead Software Developer Experience with black box and white box testing Experience on unit testing and regression testing Experience in Agile Development NOTE:Cognizant is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V. Cognizant is committed to ensuring that all current and prospective associates are afforded equal opportunities and treatment and a work environment free of harassment.We will only be able to respond to those candidates that most closely meet our criteria. A Snapshot about Us:Cognizant (NASDAQ: CTSH) is the fastest-growing global IT services and business process outsourcing solutions provider, headquartered in Teaneck, N.J. Cognizant’s single-minded passion is to dedicate our global technology and innovation know-how, our industry expertise and worldwide resources to working together with clients to make their businesses stronger.Today with over 50 delivery centers worldwide and over 1,50,000 employees, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 1000, and the Fortune 500, and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world.   Organization Marketing Statement Cognizant(NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centres worldwide and approximately 221,700 employees as of December 31, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at http://www.cognizant.com/ or follow us on https://twitter.com/USJobsCognizant/",Lockbox Developer - BPO Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75247",All,http://jobview.monster.com/lockbox-developer-bpo-job-dallas-tx-us-168754783.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,IT/Software Development,35d4eaab5c0a08a1b74950ae4afe1dac
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:21:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recruiter to Contact: Adam SalazarJob Title: RecruiterLocation: Camden, NJCompensation: DOEAssignment length:  3 month contractDescription:The Contract Recruiter will be responsible for identifying diverse top-talent through aggressive sourcing methods, which include Internet research, networking, direct sourcing, representing the company at career events, etc. S/he will conduct thorough screening and interviews that follow company guidelines and meet legal requirements.Major functions:Technical/Functional skills:Education/Experience/Licenses etc.:•BA/BS degree in Business, HR or related field required. •At least 3-5 years of full life-cycle recruitment experience including thorough pre-qualifying screening, interviewing and closing professional level candidates•Demonstrated expertise sourcing, recruiting and placing talent from a multi-source pipeline including internal candidates, Internet sourcing and networking. •The ability to motivate candidates and provide appropriate direction and advice that may impact career decisions. •Proven experience in establishing, building and maintaining professional relationships with peers, leadership, candidates and clients to provide business solutions, facilitate the development of business opportunities, and support individual. •Proven experience with Applicant Tracking Systems (i.e., Taleo)Looking for candidate with experience sourcing and researching for engineering positions",Recruiter Job in Camden,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Camden, NJ",,http://jobview.monster.com/Recruiter-Job-Camden-NJ-US-165558947.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=7,,Human Resources,db970f6f86866e22fd4be039ccc45579
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:21:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Great Opportunity!!Thriving Company in the City of Whittier has a Payroll/HR Specialist job available for a Bilingual English/Spanish professional. The ideal candidate will have at least 3 years of payroll processing and human resources experience. The company offers a great opportunity for career growth. If you are sharp, forward thinking and energetic, this position may be the one for you! Responsibilities  Payroll:• Payroll processing for 250-300 weekly and biweekly employees using ADP Workforce• Journal entries for payroll• Preparation of various payroll related reports for managers Human Resources:• New hire processing• Benefits Administration• Answering staff queries regarding payroll and human resources matters• Ad hoc HR and Payroll matters Requirements:• AA or BS Degree preferred• 2-4 Years of Payroll & Human Resources Experience• Must be Bilingual English/Spanish• Must have excellent written and verbal communication skills If you are interested in this position, please apply online and or send resumes directly to cindee.edrosa@ajilon.com  ",Payroll / HR Specialist Job in Whittier,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Whittier, CA 90602",,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-HR-Specialist-Job-Whittier-CA-US-165461330.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=2,,Human Resources,9bb0f1e7a45aef0c4d9c9ae435f7345a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:22:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are an established growing company located in the Sarasota, Florida area and are looking to expand our Benefits Team.  A generous Benefits package and competitive pay are just a few perks that comes with working for our organization. We are looking to add Benefits Administrators to assist participants with retirement plan administration. If you have what it takes to keep our customers happy then review the job details below and apply today!Job Purpose:Provides pension benefits by administering plans; providing explanations and information.Duties:* Assist participants by answering questions; providing information; researching problems; interpreting plan provisions, laws, regulations, organization policies and procedures.* Administers pension programs by maintaining employee database; * Supports colleagues and participants by responding to requests; processing benefit determination letters and surviving spouse benefits.* Maintain team network and support by establishing and maintaining a working relationship with colleagues, management and clients.* Maintains employee confidence by keeping pension information confidential.* Enhances department and organization reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.Skills/Qualifications:Benefits Administration, Maintaining Files, Documentation Skills, Office Experience - General, Analyzing Information, Follow Up/Through, Written Communication, Verbal Communication, Planning, OrganizationMinimum Experience: Associates Degree;  Three (3) years of benefits experience may be substituted for a Degree. Two (2) years of experience within the benefits field.Benefits Experience: Employee Benefits, Benefits Eligibility, Defined Benefit, Defined Contribution administration. Administering H&W plans, HRS, IRA, KEOGH, SEP, Section 125 and POP plan administration.",Benefits Administrator Job in Sarasota,Full Time,"Sarasota, FL 34236",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Benefits-Administrator-Job-Sarasota-FL-US-157622139.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3a74ed700819d8e5e8d258e94dbadc5a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:22:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are conducting a targeted search for a 199454 – HR Systems Analyst to work for our Energy client in Charlotte, NCLength of W-2 Contract Assignment: 3 months with possibility for extensionLocations:               Charlotte, NCTravel:  see belowPay Rate:    $30.65/Hour W-2 pay rate maximum (Straight W-2, no relocation assistance, no benefits, no paid holidays) Corp-Corp Rate:   No Corp-Corp, No Third Party, Client does not support H1B or EADWork Authorization Required:   US Citizen, Green Card Holder, those Authorized to work in the USRecruiter:  Stephanie Leavitt -  stephanie@act-info.comHR Systems Support Analysts serve as the first Tier in the HR Systems Support service delivery model and is the first point of contact for employees having issues related to the Training, Time Reporting, or HR Data & Reporting tools and work processes. They will provide independent technical support around moderately complex issues, conduct research and analysis around issues, continuously work to improve processes, and evaluate security access requests. Individuals in this role should escalate issues to the subject matter experts in Tier 2 if the issue is beyond their scope of responsibility.  This candidate will be taking incoming calls. Schedule is 8am-5pm M-F. Must be familiar with Time Keeping/ Time Reporting. Required: 4 degree required, call center exp, customer service skills, business background  If you are qualified with the requirements listed, and interested in being considered for this position send your resume to Stephanie Leavitt at stephanie@act-info.com .  ",SL_March  _HR Systems Support Job in Charlotte,Full Time,"Charlotte, NC 28202",,http://jobview.monster.com/SL_March-23-2016_HR-Systems-Support-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-165171337.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=10,$30.65+ /hour,,713222756bc3dcefff9cab192363fca9
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:22:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full Cycle Recruiter Job in Florham Park, NJ Our client in the Florham Park area is searching for a Fully Cycle Recruiter to join their team on a contract basis. The position is open because the company continues to grow and they need extra help. This is a very polished, buttoned up group, so candidates must be extremely professional. JOB TO START ASAPDuties: Build a pipeline of top candidates by sourcing through multiple channels (internal job postings, searching on job boards, referrals, sourcing passive job seekers, social media, etc.)Interview and qualify potential candidates to ensure they fit the proper skill set and culture fitTrack candidate progress in HR database, and update as neededExtend offers to potential candidates, as well as follow-up with any candidates who have gone through the interview process Qualifications: Bachelor's Degree in Business, Human Resources or similar fields2-4 years of experienceSTRONG written and verbal communicationHIGH level of professionalism Interested Full Cycle Recruiters should apply to this job at www.ajilon.com ;",Full Cycle Recruiter Job In Florham Park,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Parsippany, NJ 07054",,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Cycle-Recruiter-Job-In-Florham-Park-NJ-Job-Parsippany-NJ-US-165377941.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=9,,Human Resources,08c0cf29081ca64d6c3b181b778615bf
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:23:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Application Support Specialist- Charlotte, NCOur well known client in Charlotte, NC is currently hiring an Application Support Specialist to join their team for a long term continuous project!In this role you will be responsible for first response calls to problems associated with Oracle EBS, LAN, WAN, and voice services. It requires professional experience assisting users with maintenance, analysis, troubleshooting, and repairs to computer software systems, hardware, and computer peripherals.  Candidates who apply will need strong MUST have solid internal customer service skills and good presentation due to daily interaction with onsite executives and employees.RequirementsBachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field, or equivalent experienceA+ and MCSA, or equivalent work experienceOracle and/or Oracle EBS experience requiredRequires a basic knowledge of Network Operating Systems, LAN-based electronic mail systems, telecommunication systems, and client applicationsThe ability to communicate moderately difficult technical matters to internal customersWorks effectively with all co-workers; team playerCommunicates effectively and in a professional mannerRoutinely lifts and moves PC and peripheral equipmentFor immediate consideration email a updated word version of your resume to jose.mata@principlesolutions.com Keywords: VoIP, support, applications, troubleshooting, troubleshoot, analysis, maintenance, maintain, repair, computer, Lan, Wan, software, hardware, system, A+, MCSA, Network, mail, email, telecommunications, PC, peripheral, voice, desktop, compliant, compliance, Taske, AES, CCE, Avaya, Unix, Windows, Active Directory, ghost, deployment, deploy, configure, configuration, server, workstation, setup, set up, Oracle, Financials, VPN, RSA, license",IT Support Job in Huntersville,Full Time,"Huntersville, NC 28070",,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Support-Job-Huntersville-NC-US-165777112.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=9,"20.00 - 23.00 $ /hourMedical, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance as well as a matching 401k program.",,23b0fb9533382e1bfa20804b99e6cfd5
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:24:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Human Resources ManagerThis role is a hands-on HR Management position that will support a unionized distribution facility in Milwaukee with roughly 300 employees that provide transportation and distribution for a Fortune 500 CPG organization. This person is responsible for implementing HR operational strategies; analyzing business information and leading HR and business project initiatives; proactively engaging in employee relations issues, managing candidate selection and employee development activities; and managing programs, policies and procedures in support of our business culture.Qualifications: 5-7 years of progressive HR Management experience Bachelor's Degree Previous experience supporting a distribution, manufacturing or transportation facility Familiarity implementing recruiting strategies for CDL drivers",Human Resources Manager Job in Milwaukee,Full Time,"Milwaukee, WI 53224",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Manager-Job-Milwaukee-WI-US-164962539.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=9,,Human Resources,77dc9810e5d4826f4f8ab1c094b99858
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:24:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is an end-user with Dynamics AX 2012R3. The environment is service module, finance, and projects accounting. We need a developer that is extremely skilled with analysis, documentations, customizations, and administration. The client is having issues with this environment and has many issues they needed resolved. The environment has about 400 users. Please give me a call or email if you are interest or know of anyone who might be a good fit.Description:Microsoft Dynamics AX 2009/2012 development environment.Morphx and X++Knowledge in implementations and customizationSSRS and SQL server experienceExperience with AIF or web servicesSecurity and configurationsNice to have .NET/C#* For more information please contact Mudia Akpobome at mudia.a@interpropeople.com or 646-586-8470Interpro People is acting as an employment agency in relation to this vacancy.MS AX /// AX Dynamics /// Dynamics AX /// Microsoft AX /// Axapta /// AX2012 /// AX Developer /// X++ /// AX Technical Consultant /// SSRS /// AIF",MS Dynamics AX - Sr. Developer – Clearwater,Full Time Employee,"Clearwater, FL 33757",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/MS-Dynamics-AX-Sr-Developer-%E2%80%93-Clearwater-FL-100-000-to-120-000-Job-Clearwater-FL-US-165482174.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,ada957eef3fbde5fa4b5e14d5f7bdf49
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:26:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a privately held company based in Chicago, is seeking a Human Resource Manager to be based in Chicago. This position will provide overall human resource support to the organization.  Overall responsibilities: Counsel management on application of policies, procedures, laws, standards and legal  compliance to  ensure consistency and applicability to the situationParticipate and engage in continuous improvement and management meetingsMaintain all legal reports, including EEO logs and I-9 administrationConduct recruitment efforts for all levelsDevelop management training programsAdminister compensation programAdminister performance evaluation programMaintain benefits and HRIS recordsRepresent the organization at personnel related hearings and investigations RequirementsBachelor’s degreeFive plus years’ experience in a HR Generalist role.PHR certification desirableUnderstanding of HR policies and regulations Email your confidential resume to: jbanser@fremont-partners.com ",Human Resources Manager Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Manager-Job-Chicago-IL-US-164858822.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=20,,,38e5d3a9e74cf37867184fe138d95480
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:33:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Kforce is one of the premier leaders in the staffing industry, where Great People = Great ResultsSM. For over 50 years weâ€™ve thrived on building relationships and making a positive impact in the lives of those we touch. We believe in acting with integrity, doing the right thing and giving back to our communities. A professional staffing services firm, Kforce stands for KnowledgeForce®, describing our highly skilled professionals. Our flexible and direct hire staffing specialists engage over 23,000 highly skilled Technology and Finance & Accounting professionals annually, connecting them with more than 4,000 customers. Our national network of 60 offices, two national recruiting centers, and 2,000+ associates support our ability to meet the needs of customers of all sizes, including 70% of the Fortune 100. Join the Kforce family and we will support you with expert training, innovative tools, an amazing culture, and a team of Great People that will cheer you on your road to success! SUMMARY: Under managerial direction; leverage the VMO (Vendor Management Organization) and/or candidate/client relationships by building solid, profitable relationships through delivery of exceptional customer service characterized by mutual respect, understanding, and trust. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Identify, engage, recruit, package and match qualified candidates by performing sourcing activities. Qualify candidates by conducting phone and in-person interviews, obtain work history, education, training, job skills and salary requirements. Establish a pipeline, align virtual bench and a communication plan with virtual bench candidates through consistent use of activities. Utilize, maintain and update client systems as appropriate. Prioritize job orders to ensure coverage on all assigned requisitions and package the candidates for presentation to the client as needed. Develop client expectations regarding job orders and ensure expectations are maintained as required. Coordinate client interviews with candidate and communicate necessary feedback throughout the recruiting process. Negotiate candidate pay rates and establish appropriate client bill rates as required. Contribute to customer service efforts related to candidate/client activities including but not limited to quality assurance, follow up, retention and extension, lead generation, re-marketing, and assignment end. Enter and track all related activities into Recruitmax. Ensure client and Kforce are in compliance with contractual obligations. Track and report performance statistics on assigned accounts. Develop and execute a daily plan. SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES: None required. KEY SUCCESS INDICATORS/ATTRIBUTES: Ability to prioritize and multi-task in a fast paced, changing environment. Demonstrate strong organizational skills and be detail oriented. Ability to self-motivate and self-direct. Ability to achieve set goals and deadlines. Demonstrate strong commitment to exceptional customer service. Demonstrate excellent verbal and written communication skills. Demonstrate excellent analytical and problem solving skills. Ability to maintain professionalism when interacting with internal and external customers. Ability to develop and maintain relationships with key business partners by building personal credibility and trust. Demonstrate strong drive for results and success; convey a sense of urgency to achieve outcomes and exceed expectations; persist despite obstacles, setbacks, and competing influences. Proficient personal computer skills with MS Office (Word, Excel, Power Point, Outlook). Commitment and adherence to Firm Core Values. EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE: Bachelorâ€™s degree and 0-2 years of related experience or the equivalent combination of education and experience required. Previous working experience in a staffing environment and/or recruiting preferred. CERTIFICATES AND/OR LICENSES: None required. TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS: Travel as required, up to 5%. Kforce is an Equal Opportunity Employer â€“ Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans",Vendor Management,Full Time,"Boston, MA 02210",,http://jobview.monster.com/Vendor-Management-Recruiter-Finance-Accounting-Job-Boston-MA-US-165767765.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),18353bb1de26231706ca5befd4cc9627
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:38:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Our Leisure group within SLC specializes in serving consumers; recreational and entertainment needs in national and state parks, zoos, aquariums, science centers, museums and other day-use cultural attractions.   The scope of our operations includes operating lodging, conference and meeting space, houseboats and other marine activities, retail merchandise shops, fine dining restaurants, and interpretive tours in some of this country's most pristine protected lands and national parks.   We have been active partners with the National Park Service and various zoos, aquariums, and other cultural attractions for over 20 years, providing high-quality visitor services in numerous locations across the United States in over 12 states.  We are considered a premier provider of professional services by clients and competition alike, committed to providing high-quality recreation, hospitality and authentic experiences to clients and visitors from all over the world.   Some of the national and state parks in which we operate include: Asilomar Conference Center, California Denali National Park, Alaska Glacier Bay, Alaska Lake Powell Resorts and Marina, Arizona Zephyr Cove Resort & Marinas, Nevada Mesa Verde National Park, Colorado Olympic Peninsula, Washington Togwotee Mountain Lodge, Wyoming     Responsibilities: Provide all general support of HR functions at the unit level Identify best practices and organizational efficiencies, as well as coach and train line managers to properly apply human resource policies and procedures within the unit.   Manage the process and implementation of the following: payroll, benefits, employee incentives, retention, turnover, recruitment, safety, training and development.  Work closely with the Leadership team to drive elements of the Talent Management Strategy (Talent Acquisition, On boarding, Performance Management, Development, Succession Planning and Retention).  The Human Resources Specialist will utilize solid business acumen to assertively partner with the management team regarding HR, Staffing, ER/LR, policies/procedures, compliance and general management topics. Responsible for providing and maintaining extraordinary levels of service through a high level of influence, execution and prioritizing of duties.   The Human Resources Specialist will also ensure that all employees working are being treated fairly and correctly under the federal and state guidelines that have been set and that all employees have been trained properly according to corporate, state and federal guideline   Qualifications Qualifications:   A minimum of 3-5 years experience in a Human Resource Generalist role required. Human Resource experience must include specific employment and recruiting experience. Proficiency in all Microsoft Office applications is desired. Preferred experience in dealing with unions. Candidate must be willing to be hands on with staff and operations and be willing to work event-based hours that include evenings and weekends. Additional Information:",Assistant Human Resources Manager - Lake Powell - Bullfrog,"Full Time, Employee","Bullfrog, UT 84533",,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Human-Resources-Manager-Lake-Powell-Bullfrog-UT-Job-Bullfrog-UT-US-164567847.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=18,,Human Resources,129ffb94b9adf3cc86f6a9b0f9d8b484
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:44:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Payroll Associate I(contract-to-hire)This position is a Customer Service role supporting Corporate Payroll. The Payroll Associate I answers in-coming calls from internal employees all over the country who are calling in with questions about their payroll. This position also provides basic payroll processing services to ensure employees receive paychecks in a timely and accurate manner.Duties:• Compile and enter high-volume payroll data• Calculate and post payroll deductions• Reconcile employee payroll deductions• Research discrepancies• Process payroll reports• Ensure compliance with federal, state and local guidelines Qualifications:• At least 2 years' experience in high volume payroll.• Strong verbal communication skills are a must!• Strong data entry skills• Excel skills• Ability to pass background (criminal and credit)",Payroll Associate I Job in Phoenix,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Phoenix, AZ 85013",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Associate-I-Job-Phoenix-AZ-US-165768189.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=10,15.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Human Resources,9e3464d2f89542adebdaa8f5d8ce0035
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:44:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"HR Manager will establish and enhance the organization's human resources function by planning, implementing, and evaluating employee relations and human resources policies, programs, and practices.The person will have the opportunity to create a Human Resource environment, virtually from scratch, to support a company with 100+ employees enjoying double digit revenue growth. Responsibilities include: • compensation and benefits administration• payroll administration, currently via Paychex• employee onboarding, development, needs assessment, and training• maintaining the work structure by updating job requirements and job descriptions for all positions• maintaining the organization's staffing by establishing a recruiting, testing, and interviewing program; counseling managers on candidate selection; conducting and analyzing exit interviews; recommending changes.• performance management• compliance with all federal and state employment regulatory requirements• employee communication• organizational development• maintaining management guidelines by preparing, updating, and recommending human resource policies and procedures, health and safety standards, establishing an employee handbook• planning, monitoring, and appraisal of employee work results by training managers to coach and discipline employees; hearing and resolving employee grievances; counseling employees and supervisors. Skills and Qualifications • Human Resources Management, Benefits Administration, Performance Management, Communication Processes, Compensation and Wage Structure, Supports Diversity, Employment Law, Laws Against Sexual Harassment• Fluent in English and Spanish is a MUST",HR Manager Job in Napa,Full Time Employee,"Napa, CA 94558",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/HR-Manager-Job-Napa-CA-US-165770138.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=18,"85,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Human Resources,cd2c6c71619884af37468e271867b935
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:20:54:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"** 35 hour work week** Knowledge of MS Windows 7, Mac OS, MS Office, MS Exchange and PC & Mac Hardware Intermediate to Expert end user of common office technology (MS Office, Web-based Applications, etc.), history of self-training on new applications as necessary Strong technical aptitude, troubleshooting and organizational skills Superior customer service orientation Experience working with multiple groups Excellent communication and interpersonal skills **Mac OS support in enterprise environment strongly preferredExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Deskside Support Representative Job in Mendota Heights,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Deskside Support Representative,"Mendota Heights, MN 55120",http://jobview.monster.com/Deskside-Support-Representative-Job-Mendota-Heights-MN-US-165763591.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=10,,IT/Software Development,a6a620997adbe7a15d631feb31dde207
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:21:06:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Payroll Specialist Randstad Professionals Greater Baltimore team specializes in Accounting and Finance, contract and contract to hire staffing and helps over 1000 professionals start and grow their career each year. We have an upcoming opportunity for a Payroll Specialist. Job Responsibilities: • Maintains payroll information by collecting, calculating, and entering data.• Updates payroll records by entering changes in exemptions, insurance coverage, savings deductions, and job title and department/division transfers.• Responsible for garnishments, terminations, compliance.• Prepares reports by compiling summaries of earnings, taxes, deductions, leave, disability, and nontaxable wages.• Determines payroll liabilities by calculating employee federal and state income and social security taxes and employer's social security, unemployment, and workers compensation payments.• Resolves payroll discrepancies by collecting and analyzing information.• Provides payroll information by answering questions and requests.• Maintains payroll operations by following policies and procedures; reporting needed changes. Maintains employee confidence and protects payroll operations by keeping information confidential.• Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed. Requirements: • 3-5 years of Payroll experience• Experience with ADP required• SAP, Peoplesoft, Great Plains system knowledge• Must be extremely organized• Data entry and clerical skills• Strong written and verbal communication skills• Good hands-on experience with Microsoft Office products Word, Excel• Proven ability to handle and prioritize multiple tasks and in project completion Application Process Once we know of your interest, a Randstad Professionals recruiter will review your resume and contact you to better understand your skills and tell you more about the opportunity. We will meet qualified candidates face to face and our best talent will interview with the employer face to face - we will move quickly! Click Apply to submit your resume today! Stay Connected! Download our new Randstad Jobs smartphone app from Google Play and the App Store today.",Payroll Specialist Job in Baltimore,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Baltimore, MD 21202",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Specialist-Job-Baltimore-MD-US-165769863.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=20,,Human Resources,4db169ba6b777acbaf66265d366f5eee
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:21:17:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have an immediate opening for a Payroll Coordinator to work in our office located in North Hollywood, CA Position is for a national physician group practice company focused on the delivery of hospitalist support services. Position Summary: Payroll Coordinator will be in charge of administration of bi-weekly payroll for multiple entity payroll in 38 states and 4000+ employees in a fast-passed environment. This role will keep informed on company policies while following State/Federal guidelines. Individual in this position will be working in a cooperative team environment to provide quality payroll services to regional and corporate team. It is expected that Payroll Coordinator carries out his/her duties by adhering to the highest standards of ethical and moral conduct and acts in the best interest of Company. Key Responsibilities: Set up new hire record in Timekeeping system Input employee data into Payroll processing system Handle Payrollquestions Outlook inbox Assist with payroll report validation Process pay requests through Payroll processing system Organize payroll folders for validation Consolidate and scan payroll processing backup Download and save pay statements and reports for all entities Update accrual balances in Timekeeping system Assist with distribution of payroll checks Prepare terminated employee packets to be mailed Qualifications: Minimum 4 years of payroll processing experience Knowledge of multi-state payroll processing Experience with paycheck calculation, including pre-tax and after tax deductions Experience processing payroll utilizing payroll services, ADP Enterprise V5 a plus Demonstrate positive and tactful interpersonal skills Proficiency in Microsoft Office, Excel proficiency is preferred Ability to manage multiple tasks simultaneously Must have excellent verbal and written communication skills Demonstrate attention to detail and exceptional organizational skills Display superior judgment and ability to take the initiative to accomplish tasks This is a full-time position that requires overtime each processing (bi-weekly) Fridays and Mondays. Additional overtime hours might be required based on departmental needs.",Payroll Coordinator Job in North Hollywood,Full Time Employee,"North Hollywood, CA 91602",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Coordinator-Job-North-Hollywood-CA-US-165766740.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=20,,Human Resources,da69155012edc5a65cdfb66cb6bb1108
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:21:53:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Signature Worldwide is a leader in training employees to deliver legendarycustomer service while increasing sales. Since 1986, our unique training methodology has provided ameasurable ROI for our customers, compelling them to return year after year.We are currently searching for the right candidate to fill our HumanResources Coordinator position at our Corporate Office located in Dublin, Ohio.As a company, we believe that great people = great business. Here atSignature Worldwide, we surround ourselves with caring, sharing people that arehard-working, fun, know how to celebrate success and are willing to share whatthey have learned with anyone who will listen.Visit our website www.signatureworldwide.com for more information about our company.  Title:  Human Resource CoordinatorDepartment: Human ResourcesReports to:  HR ManagerLocation:  Corporate Office (Dublin, OH)FLSA Status:  ExemptEmployment Status: FTHours:  40+ hours per week JOB PURPOSEToprovide assistance with and facilitate the human resource process for all humanresource functions including recruiting, benefits administration, performancemanagement, compensation, and worker’s compensation.   The humanresource coordinator ensures employee health and welfare plans are administeredin accordance with federal and state regulations and plan provisions arefollowed. This role provides administrative support to human resources functionas needed including record keeping, file maintenance and HRIS entry.                                                                               Job ResponsibilitiesAdministers health and welfare plans including enrollments,changes and terminations. Processes required documents through payroll andinsurance providers to ensure accurate record keeping and proper deductions. Performs customer service functions by answering employee requestsand questions. Verifies I-9 documentation and maintains that they are current.Creates and prepares various reports as needed utilizing HRISsystem.Prepares and submits compliance information as required for governmentalreporting.Submits the online investigation requests and assists with newemployee background checks.Reconciles benefits statements.Conducts audits of payroll, benefits or other HR programs andrecommends corrective action.Assists with processing of new hire paperwork and terminations.Assists with the preparation of the performance review process. Assists with recruitment and interview process. Tracks status ofcandidates in HRIS system.Makes photocopies, faxes documents and performs other clericalfunctions.Files papers and documents into appropriate employee files. Assists or prepares correspondence.Prepares new employee files.  ESSENTIAL EXPERIENCEAND QUALIFICATIONS Completionof college-level educational training in subjects related to Human ResourceManagement or Business Administration.Aminimum of two (2) years increasingly responsible experience in Human Resources.Acombination of Human Resources education and/or experience which would likelyproduce the necessary knowledge and abilities.Must have attention to detail, the ability toproblem solve and think outside of the box.                                                                                       COMPETENCIESBuilding Trust – Interacting with others in a waythat gives them confidence in one’s intentions and those of the organization. Customer Focus – Making the company’s customersand their needs a primary focus of one’s actions and decisions. Fornon-customer-facing roles, consider not only the actions but also the rules,processes, and decisions that impact customer(s) directly or indirectly throughother individuals serving the customers. In The Spirit of Giving – Community giving is part of theSignature Worldwide corporate culture and philosophy, therefore, we will payeach person an equivalent workday to give of their time and talent in theirtalent in their communities. Generosity of time and self, leading by example,and inspiring others to do more is how we can all make a difference in thelives of those we touch and grow the spirit of giving within us all.Work Standards – Setting high standards ofperformance for self and staff; assuming responsibility and accountability forsuccessfully completing assignments or tasks; and self-imposing standards ofexcellence rather than having standards imposed. DecisionMaking -  Identifying and understandingissues problems, and opportunities; comparing data from different sources todraw conclusions; using effective approaches for choosing a course of action ordeveloping appropriate solutions; taking action that is consistent withavailable facts, constraints, and probable consequences. Results Driven – Turns goals into results.Consistently meets objectives in a continually changing environment. Guides andinspires others to achieve results, and improve organizational effectivenessand efficiency. Implements effective control measures and fosters a climate ofreasonable risk taking. Follow –Up – To continue or complete a processor activity by doing something in response to or taking appropriate action. InitiatingAction – Taking prompt action to accomplish objectives; taking action toachieve goals beyond what is required; being proactive.  REPORTING TO THISPOSITIONNo Direct Reports PHYSICAL ACTIVITIES ANDREQUIREMENTS, VISUAL ACUTIY, AND WORKING CONDITIONS  The physical activities and requirements and workingconditions characteristics described here are representative of those that mustbe met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of thisjob.  Reasonable accommodation may bemade to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essentialfunctions. PhysicalActivities:  While performing the duties of this job,employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, sit, and use hands to handleobjects and tools; reach with hands and arms, talk and hear.  Employee must occasionally lift and/or moveup to 25 pounds. Speaking - Talking to others to convey information effectively. Speech Recognition -The ability to identify and understand the speech of another person. Speech Clarity -- The ability to speak clearly so others can understand you. Oral Expression --The ability to communicate information and ideas in speaking so others will understand. Specific vision abilities required by the job include: Near Vision -the ability to see details at close range (within a few feet of the observer), Visual Color Discrimination – the ability to match or detect differences between colors, including shades of color and brightness, peripheral vision, viewing a computer terminal, extensive reading, distance vision, and the ability to adjust focus. Oral Comprehension -- The ability to listen to and understand information and ideas presented through spoken words and sentences Selective Attention -- The ability to concentrate on a task over a period of time without being distracted. Written Comprehension -- The ability to read and understand information and ideas presented in writing. ",Human Resources Coordinator Job in Dublin,Full Time,"Dublin, OH",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Coordinator-Job-Dublin-OH-US-164660228.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=2,,,3a5220d7fcd8a20bb092a3de4a467754
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:21:54:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Temp-Stop LLC, a local chain of convenience stores based in Lee's Summit, Missouri, is seeking an Asst. System Administrator for a full time, permanent position at our main office!Temp-Stop is looking for an Assistant Systems Administrator to assist our project leader with the day to day, hands on, Information Technology issues. This position primarily requires working with the project leader to complete projects as well as maintain current company IT infrastructure.Successful candidates will have the following qualifications.2 to 3 years Linux experience in a production environment using Internet facing servicesGeneral knowledge of Windows networking (domain, PDC)General knowledge of networking topology (LAN, WAN, VPN)General knowledge of visualization / cloud technologyApplication and process support experience in a 24x7 environmentStrong verbal and written communication skills as well as a commitment to working in teamsExcellent problem solving, multitasking, troubleshooting skills, logical thinking, attention to detail, and above all, a willingness to learnNice to haves:Programming experience with shell scripting and PHPExperience in the C-Store industry- Have a good understanding of TCP/IP networking.- Have some experience administrating a small Windows domain including Windows 2008 & 2012 Foundation Server and Windows XP, and Windows 7.Specific knowledge of Gentoo Linux, the Convenience Store industry are a bonus, but not required.We are looking for someone to start immediately for training with our System Administrator.",Systems Administrator Job in Lake Lotawana,Full Time,"Lake Lotawana, MO 64086",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Systems-Administrator-Job-Lake-Lotawana-MO-US-165773357.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=10,"40,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),d8d5cf57fa078368ef79d56cf98197e9
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:22:18:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"ENMediaWorksHEARSTCAREER OPPORTUNITIESSan Antonia Express News ExpressNews.com mySA.comHUMAN RESOURCES BUSINESS PARTNERHuman Resources - Full TimeThe San Antonio Express-News is looking for an HR Business Partner to provide strategic and tactical support in all areas of human resources, with a strong background in Talent Management and Talent Acquisition. The successful candidate must have a proven track record of providing strategic support that focuses on enhancing organizational performance; developing a competent and committed workforce and building organizationalcapabilities that directly impact business results.WHAT WILL YOU DO?- Coach, consult, and act as advocate to managers and employees.- Demonstrate recruiting best practices to develop and support world-class talent acquisition efforts for all Texas company locations, by developing effective sourcing and recruitment processes that attract top talent, including diversity initiatives and partnerships with community-based organizations.- Project manage the day-to-day recruitment operations through thedevelopment and execution of full life cycle recruitment plans.- Assist in the development of value-added HR strategies that align with business goals that drive business results.- Direct the workload of other HR professionals.- Operate as the HR focal point/lead for the San Antonio Express-News facility.- Generate qualified candidate pools through cost-effective efforts, i.e. Twitter, Facebook, diversity sites, etc.- Provide expertise on all talent-management processes and programs, including performance management and training and development.- Develop formal internship and on boarding programs.WHAT WILL IT TAKE TO BE SUCCESSFUL?- Bachelors degree or equivalent. Masters degree and/or PHR/SPHR/SHRM Certification a plus.- In-depth knowledge and work experience as anHR Generalist and Recruiter with 7-plus years ofexperience with talent management, organizationaldesign, change management, employee relations,performance management, training and development,recruitment and retention, policies and proceduresand legal compliance.- A demonstrated track record of building collaborativerelationships and lasting business partnerships.- Align HR activities to the business by prioritizingactivities and balancing short-term decisions toachieve strategic long-term goals.- Knowledge of Federal and Texas labor laws and theability to apply those legal requirements to complexsituations in the workplace.- Excellent written and verbal communications skills.BENEFITS INCLUDE:- Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance- 401(k)- Paid Vacation and Sick TimeTo apply, please submit your cover letter and resume to https://hearstnewspaperscareerlinks.silkroad.com/ Hearst Corporation is one of the nation's largest diversified media companies, with newspaper, magazine, broadcast, interactive media and syndication divisions. It publishes 15 daily newspapers and top magazines, and operates television and radio stations, business-to-business information services and electronic databases.Click here to see Newspaper ad",HUMAN RESOURCES BUSINESS PARTNER Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/HUMAN-RESOURCES-BUSINESS-PARTNER-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-165199889.aspx?ch=sanantonio&mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fea50ec68a7a9c963f90b78a21bd3a57
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:22:20:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Production Supervisor in Kansas City, Kansas (KS).Major Duties and Responsibilities: Meets production cost schedule and maintains quality requirements Complies with the terms of Local and National Labor agreements Implements divisional and corporate policies Implements safety and good housekeeping standards Frequent contact with others outside the work group Trains, develops, and evaluates employees Keeps management informed of developments as they occur Maintains corporate management control systems (Audit Reports and Information, Time Keeping System (TKS), Grievance Systems, etc) Maintains department records Responsible for effective use of personnel, material and equipment in supporting SPQRC initiatives Must support plant in achieving Safety, People, Quality, Responsiveness and Cost goals Must be willing to work any assigned shift, work daily, weekend, and holiday overtime as required Supports/implements the QS9000/ISO14001/(GMS) Global Manufacturing System compliance processesREQUIREMENTS: Minimum High School diploma or GED Minimum of 10 years and automotive experience Demonstrated exceptional level of ability in the areas listed below Must complete pre-supervisory assessment program required for proper job preparation Leadership interest and abilities required for effective supervision of employees Knowledge of manufacturing processes and procedures Knowledge of basic math Oral and written communication skills Understanding of basic technology of area where assigned Relatively high level of analytical ability where problems are complex Minimum high level of interpersonal skills to work effectively with others, motivate employee and elicit work output Experience working in a represented environment Knowledge of and ability to insure a safe industrial work environment",Production Supervisor Job in Kansas City,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Kansas City, KS 66101",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-Job-Kansas-City-KS-US-165766904.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4dd60537b62d69cb6aaa394f64899dbe
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:22:20:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"1.Manages the order management process from receiving to completing a technical and professional assignment. 2.Asks the appropriate questions when taking job orders. 3.Comprehend technical/professional job orders. 4.Responds to and qualifies job orders efficiently. 5.Perform credit checks. 6.Analyzes resumes accurately and assign appropriate skill codes. 7.Conducts candidate reference checks. 8.Uses candidate reference checks to develop additional business opportunities. 9.Uses recruiting tools such as TechBase and Field PowerBase to fill assignment order rapidly with qualified contract employees. 10.Enter skill code information accurately while maintaining and updating the existing computer database. 11.Interview candidates to evaluate their technical qualifications for assignments. 12.Communicate effectively with technical buying influences. 13.Troubleshoot to resolve problems or complaints of customers and contract employees. 14.Use personal computer workstations effectively to perform day-today responsibilities. 15.Administer or coordinate Service Quality Training and Quality Performance Programs. 16.Build professional relationships with customers, contract employees and staff. 17.Make key skill sales calls to acquire new business. Qualifications The Technical Recruiter is responsible for: 1.delivering high quality service to customers and temporary employees by matching skills of temporaries to customer needs 2.developing and retaining business by providing outstanding customer service and 3.performing a variety of administrative tasks that support the overall mission of quality performance and service. Associate degree in a technical field (i.e. electronics, computer science, laboratory science). BS degree is preferred. Previous recruiting experience in the technical services industry is preferred. One to three years prior work experience in a technical environment such as computer operations, electronics, manufacturing or laboratory science, and/or formal technical training is required. Ability to communicate effectively with others. Ability to advise, counsel, guide, and negotiate with others (e.g., staff, temporaries). Ability to develop (i.e. through teaching, training, etc.) the professional skills of employees. Ability to effectively and tactfully deal with people. Ability to analyze and evaluate people, data, and things (e.g. work related materials and equipment) to determine courses of action. Ability to influence the opinions or decisions of others (e.g. customers, temporaries, staff). Ability to shift back and forth between two or more tasks. Ability to understand and accurately apply basic math skills. Ability to make competent use of work related equipment and materials. Ability to access areas where needed people, information, or equipment are located. Must be capable of producing results within an unstructured environment and have the flexibility to identify and respond to changes in priorities. Business development skills are necessary as well as a keen awareness of the business community. Personal computer knowledge is essential. We offer all of the advantages you would expect from an industry leader including a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, vision, and life insurance, holiday and vacation pay, 401K, stock purchase plan, and much more. Manpower is an Equal Opportunity Employer Travel: NoExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Technical Recruiter Job in Eden Prairie,Full Time Employee,Technical Recruiter,"Eden Prairie, MN",http://jobview.monster.com/Technical-Recruiter-Job-Eden-Prairie-MN-US-165463458.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=17,,Human Resources,03746f1af5bc8368c6af09a0d85c413a
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:23:20:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Stewart, a Xerox Company, is one of the Delaware Valley's largest and most respected business technology consultancy firms specializing in digital office technology.  Headquartered in Burlington, New Jersey, our footprint extends to seven (7) local offices in the New Jersey, Eastern Pennsyl­vania and Northern Delaware areas.  We sell and support office solutions that enhance daily productivity and help reduce costs. From our SBS360° Assessment methodology, cutting-edge Xerox technology, managed print services, value-added Software and Stewart's Signature Service, Stewart's mission is to help organizations excel by fully optimizing their document workflow.  Backed by world-class products from Xerox, Stewart provides customers with the best of both worlds – the national resources and strength of Xerox and the agility of locally managed services and support teams. We offer extensive product and service training, excellent benefits, competitive compensation, a positive working environment, and development opportunities. EOE.  Qualified women and minorities encouraged to apply. This position will provide clerical support for Human Resources and Recruiting activities.  Some duties include: Schedule interviews  Assist with onboarding Respond to employee inquiries regarding policies, procedures, and programs Assist with completion of various reports and agency requests Assist with workers' compensation, unemployment, and Short-term disability claims Administer Anniversary Card program Administer Fleet Safety program Perform routine clerical duties including filing, copying, faxing, etc Qualifications Accessibility to confidential information is a requirement of this position, therefore a successful candidate must, at all times, display the ability to handle information in a professional manner. High School Diploma; degree in Human Resources preferred Minimum of 1 year experience as an Administrative Professional  Effective verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills. Intermediate skills with Microsoft Excel, Outlook, Word Basic math aptitude and ability to work accurately with numbers. Knowledge of HR State and Federal employment laws Effective time managment and organizational skills For more information, or to apply now, you must go to the website below. Please DO NOT email your resume to us as we only accept applications through our website. https://stewartxerox.applicantpool.com/jobs/74687-7730.html    ",Human Resources Assistant Job in Burlington,Full Time,"Burlington, NJ 08016",,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Assistant-Job-Burlington-NJ-US-165452810.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=2,Hourly,,c1eed53111d222ab26ea7f7147736775
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:23:56:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our client, a competitor to ADP is looking for a Payroll Processor.Direct Hire/Permanent role.Pay: Dependent on ExperienceThis is handling payroll for their clients (various companies). THIS IS NOT simply entering payroll (data entry of payroll) into a system. JOB SYNOPSIS:* Make a variety of computations to calculate payroll, overtime and shift premium schedules, payroll deductions and withholdings for separate states. * Take payroll hours from clients, enter into the data system, run all reports, process invoices, answer client questions, deliver payroll to local clients. * Miscellaneous data entry, posting and filing projects. Records new or changed pay rates and other data. Gathers information from clients in regards to vacation policy. * prepare severance, insurance and credit union payments. Assists with related special projects. * Interprets company policies and government regulations. * Reviews payroll accuracy. Issues written and oral instructions for clients to ensure accurate processing of payroll. Adjusts errors and complaints, High level of customer service and consulting. * Coordinate activities of clients engaged in recording hours of work, processing time records, compiling payroll records, maintain payroll control records, calculating payrolls by performing the following:Must have experience processing multiple state payroll for a wide variety of industries. weekly, bimonthly, monthly - will support client employers with payroll processes - either online, fax or phone timecard entries for up to 1800 employees. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1024149 Job Experience:,, REQUIREMENTS:* Must have experience processing multiple state payroll for a wide variety of industries.",Payroll Processor Job in Maitland,Full Time,"Maitland, FL 32751",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Processor-Job-Maitland-FL-US-165552879.aspx?mescoid=4300702001001&jobPosition=18,Up to $20.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),ab02bd379481108e8e3945bd2e2b9932
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:23:56:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"  PayrollSpecialistisresponsibleforaccuratelykeyingorimportingclientPayrollandrelatedPayrollinformation,AccountingTransactions(GeneralLedger,AccountsPayable,etc).PayrollSpecialistensuresthatdatasubmittedbyclientsreconcilestodatakeyedbyreviewandcomparingcontroltotals. ThePayrollSpecialistmayberequiredtokeyEmployeeMasterFileandmoneyinformation,from conversion files. PayrollSpecialistwillbeassignedspecificclientstoserviceandsupportallaspectsoftheirpayrollprocessfromqualityassuranceproceduresforensuringaccuratedataentryorimporting,runningspecialprocesses,correctingmasterfileinformation,andotherrelatedissues. PayrollSpecialistwillworkwithclientsandassociatestowardsautomatingdataconversioneffortsfromfax&paperbeingkeyedtoExcelspreadsheetorInternetinput.CustomerService calls for non-Internet & PC clients will be handled by the Payroll Specialist. PayrollSpecialistmayberequiredtoworkwithotherteammembersand/orcontactclientsbytelephonetoreconcilediscrepanciesbetweencontroltotalsprovidedandinformationkeyedortoaskfor additional information asmaybe required fromtimetotime.Essential Duties:ThePayrollSpecialist’sprimaryresponsibilitieswillbetoaccuratelyenterPayrollandAccountingtransactions.Occasionaltelephonecontactmayberequiredtoclientstorequestadditionalinformation,clarifyinformationtransmitted,orresolvediscrepanciesincontrol totals provided versus the keyed information. As Payroll Specialist you will be responsible for: ·       Accurately enter client payroll dataonatimelybasis·       Accurately enter client accounting data on a timely basis·       Verifying the accuracy of keyed information to source documents&Control Totals·       Resolve differences withimmediate supervisor asnecessary·       Call clients to resolve differences RevisedNovember2015-Printed March 7,2016                                         2·       When feasible will convert & train clients toExcelSpreadsheetsforsubmittingPayroll&Accounting data·       Useseffectiveproblem solving skillsto resolve datadiscrepancyissues·       Performspayrolladjustmentsrunsforallclients·       Provides support to the Payroll Manager·       Maintains ateam orientation indealingwithfellowassociates·       Provides quality service·       Learnandtroubleshootalltimeand attendance systems·Other Duties:OtherrelatedornewdutiesmaybeassignedtothePayrollSpecialistinotherareasoftheCompanyto provide additional backupandsupport. Education / Training / Certifications: PreviousTraining,Certifications,andEducationinPayrollorAccountingrelatedcurriculumisaplus.TheCompanyencouragesEmployeestoobtainjobrelatedCertifications.Participationin Web-basedtraining is key.Decision Making:PayrollSpecialistisexpectedtoaccuratelyenterClientPayroll&AccountingInformation,andotherrelatedmattersthatarewithintheareaofresponsibilitiesandareconsistentwiththe prevailing Department and Company policies. Financial Responsibilities:None. Communication:Excellentoralandwrittencommunicationandanalyticalskillsrequired.Mustbeabletoworkundertimeconstraintsandmeetdaily,weekly and monthly deadlines.  ",Payroll Specialist Job in Seymour,Full Time,"Seymour, CT 06483",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Specialist-Job-Seymour-CT-US-165761036.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8d48bef5ab11f24c7074260043af3240
United States of America,US,10/Nov/2015:23:56:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ensure the recruitment of personnel in a future oriented and economical manner, the development of all employees and administration of employee related matters, Maintain safety training standards; Responsible for all phases plant safety/ OSHA compliance, Maintain a positive working environment, Maintain plant security.  Responsible for all phases of plant Human Resources. Position is for a 600+ facility and reports to HR Director. Identifies legal requirements and government reporting affecting human resources functions and ensures policies, procedures, and reporting are in compliance.Advises management in appropriate resolution of employee relations issues. Clarifying, deciding and execution of disciplinary measures; in the case of terminations together with the supervisors.Responsible for budget for Human Resources, safety and canteen. Defines required profiles for vacant positions in coordination with the responsible dept. heads and in consideration of future requirements of that position.  Manages internal/external recruitment of all personnel from selection of media and resources, to formulating recruitment ads and assignment of recruiters, to managing the selection process (interviews, assessment centers, etc.), including offers of employment (in coordination with company management), as well as support of the departments in the creation of introduction plans and control of the successful process.Adheres to all Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) regulations and identifies and implements OSHA regulatory programs required in the state of Alabama. Identifies, develops and implements training procedures and policies to ensure a safe and healthy work environment for all employees. Investigates accidents and prepares reports for insurance carrier. Represents organization at personnel-related hearings and investigations. Measures salary development with other department heads in consideration of the structure in departments and company (including. obtaining surveys of the external market).Administers performance review program to ensure effectiveness, compliance, and equity within organization.Oversees administration of payroll and benefits programs such as life, health, dental and disability insurances, leave of absence, and employee assistance.  Prepares employee separation notices and related documentation, and conducts exit interviews to determine reasons behind separations. Prepares reports and recommends procedures to reduce absenteeism and turnover.Responsible for the development of plant personnel policies and procedures. Determine general training needs and ensure training of staff in hiring procedures, OSHA Safety and sexual harassment.  International Human Resources: Initiate and manage immigration procedures for new and existing employees, handle international transfers and relocation for employees.     We offer a competitive salary/benefit package.",Human Resources Manager Job in Vance,Full Time,"Vance, AL 35490",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Manager-Job-Vance-AL-US-165096145.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=3,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),1f9020903ef0a2d9595c072367bb38bc
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:23:58:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Human Resources Manager job in San Diego, CA Have you always wanted to break into the Biotech industry but can’t seem to get your foot in the door?  We have the perfect opportunity for you!  Ajilon is partnering with a Biotech company who is seeking an experienced HR Manager to join the team.  Our client offers a wonderful work environment within a company that is growing and has been in business for over 12 years.  The team is diverse and expanding and they need YOU!  This job is a temporary to direct hire opportunity starting immediately and your salary will be between $75K to $100K based on your experience.   Your responsibilities as an HR Manager: - Manage all Human Resources functions for the company- Perform job analysis, create job descriptions, and evaluate compensation- Perform Benefits analysis and administration- Handle all hiring needs, full cycle recruiting- Process payroll- Performance Management Qualifications for the job in San Diego, CA: - Must have experience working within both private and public industries- Paychex and/or ADP extremely helpful- Minimum of six (6) years of relevant HR Management experience If you are ready to pursue a career with this job in San Diego, CA, please submit your resume for immediate consideration. Visit our website www.ajilon.com to apply for this position or apply below.   ",Human Resources Manager in San Diego,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Diego, CA 92121",,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Manager-in-San-Diego-CA-Job-San-Diego-CA-US-166335640.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=20,,Human Resources,20bf6cab75e5b3f86475ae58ad7449fe
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:23:29:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Details: MECHANICAL DESIGNER       TO $20/HRAn immediate hiring need is available for a Mechanical Designer with the ability to work in a small group environment. The ideal candidate will be a team player with good communication and organizational skills. Requirements are the following: Experience using AutoCAD (Autodesk Inventor preferred) Able to understand configuration management Associates Degree or Technical DiplomaSEND A COPY OF YOUR RESUME TO:Karl MartinezLIBERTY PERSONNEL SERVICES, INC.EMAIL: km@libertyjobs.com PHONE: (484) 567-2086FAX: (610) 941-2424KEYWORDS: design, CAD, Autodesk, Inventor, mechanical, drafting, draftsman, designer, manufacturing ",Mechanical Designer Job in Trenton,"Full Time , Employee","Trenton , NJ",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Mechanical-Designer-Job-Trenton-NJ-US-167064814.aspx?mescoid=1700184001001&jobPosition=3,,IT/Software Development,fa29adeab4cdcf3a980329019f0c3dc6
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:23:29:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"HELP DESK TECHNICIAN II JOB IN COPPELL, TEXAS LOCATION: S Royal Coppell, TX 75019LENGTH: 12 Month Contract to Hire (Will look to convert full time after 12 months based on performance) This company offers an opportunity to convert full time with an excellent benefits package. Once converted full time there is room for career growth and the opportunity to change verticals and take your career to the next level!  This will be a Help Desk environment for multiple end clients so candidates must have a diverse skill set. Education: High School Diploma  Technical Skills: • Active Directory and VPN are a must• Troubleshooting skills-Need to know what questions to ask to get to the root of the problem quickly• Windows/Outlook software support• Desktop Support• Remedy ticketing system preferred, but other ticketing systems will be considered• A+ certification is preferred Soft Skills:• Flexibility since the processes may change on a day-to-day basis depending on the client they are working with and what the client’s needs are• Moldable• Able to take direction• Multitasking• Good attendance (there is a point system)• Ability to thrive in an up-tempo high stress environment.  Main Responsibilities: • Provides technical support to users for basic computer related technical problems.  • Enters tickets into the call tracking tool; ensures information is accurate, prioritized and assigned to a queue. • Answers help desk telephones and responds to basic customer inquiries to ensure customer needs are met. • Assists customers in resolving basic technical problems by providing scripted guidance regarding software and hardware problems.  • Resolves and/or refers more complex technical problems through a defined escalation process. • Logs and tracks inquiries using a problem management database and maintains history records and related problem documentation. • Identifies, evaluates, and prioritizes customer problems and complaints to ensure that inquiries are resolved appropriately. • Experience with solving computer related problems.  • Experience with company products, operation systems and escalation policy.  • Good communication, interpersonal and organizational skills.   Is this job tailored just for you?  Our client is ready to begin interviewing for this Help Desk Technician Job at their Coppell, TX location, so please upload your most recent resume and apply today!    ",HELP DESK TECHNICIAN II JOB IN COPPELL,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Coppell, TX 75019",,http://jobview.monster.com/HELP-DESK-TECHNICIAN-II-JOB-IN-COPPELL-TEXAS-Job-Coppell-TX-US-167074641.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=7,,IT/Software Development,186a35a786a4214abc652d33d0dbc574
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:23:29:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"At H10 Capital, we connect great talent with great companies. Below is a position for one of the biggest E-Commerce companies in the world. If you're interested, apply with us today!*********************************************************************Title: HR Data Analyst (17007)This team is looking to hire someone to help with data entry, organization, and reporting during the build of automated tools.A candidate should be able to:Collate and organize large lists of requests from different groupsAccurately enter large amounts of information into an Internet based interfaceHave a high attention to detail; ability to QA one's own workIndependently pursue tasks with little oversight or directionOrganize inputs and track changes from multiple different parties without losing data integrity or overlooking requestsChange direction with little notice and directionPrioritize in the face of competing demandsQuickly gain proficiency in new technologies and interfacesBasic QualificationsExperience organizing large quantities of dataProficiency with MS Excel; including use of multiple formulas, pivot tables, and vlookupsFamiliarity with MS AccessBachelors DegreePreferred Qualifications2+ years of experience handling and organization large and diverse question sets.Familiarity with SharePoint",HR Data Analyst Job in Seattle,Full Time,"Seattle, WA 98121",,http://jobview.monster.com/HR-Data-Analyst-Job-Seattle-WA-US-165860436.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=17,DOE,Entry Level,a7db6f8c25e4db62dbb7dc7a5617eb81
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:23:25:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a a growing healthcare services organization in Bucks County, is looking to add TWO Contract Managers to their staff. The company offers an employee-first environment, with a strong and knowledgeable team. The Contract Manager position will report directly to the VP of Contracts and will be responsible for the following duties:• Researching target insurance companies and utilizing due diligence• Crafting initial letters of interest• Engaging selected payers in order to facilitate maximum reimbursement• Negotiating contract language and rates• Assisting VP with various tasks as neededRequirements:• Bachelor's degree preferred• Previous experience working with healthcare contracts required • Healthcare industry experience required • Strong negotiation skills are essential",Contract Manager Job in Jamison  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Jamison 18929,Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/Contract-Manager-Job-Jamison-US-166370525.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=18,"80,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",Legal,28f95828eda58f931a5a12e2285c99d1
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:23:23:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"ARC Document Solutions, Inc. (NYSE: ARC) provides technology and services to businesses of all types, with a focus on the architectural, engineering and construction industry, in thousands of customer locations nationwide, 170 worldwide service centers, and secure document storage in the cloud. Find out more at www.e-arc.com We are currently seeking candidates for a Regional Human Resources Director position who will be responsible for overseeing and directing HR functions for designated Region(s). They will serve as resource/consultant to management ensuring that HR planning, employment, employee relations, benefits administration, training, salary administration, and personnel policies and procedures are clear and applied fairly and consistently and in compliance with all state and federal labor laws. Responsibilities include:Foster a work environment with an emphasis on respect for individuals, quality, innovation, and teamwork by developing and implementing policies and ""best"" practices that reflect the vision and values of the companyMaintain the handbook for the states within their RegionCreate and maintain a wellness program for the RegionCreate and maintain an Affirmative Action planFacilitate an online Employment Application and New Hire processManage all employees through their employment life cycleCreate and implement a Reward and Recognition program for the RegionWork with acquired companies to fold their policies and procedures into oursTravel as needed to address Employment, Management and Corporate issuesMaintain existing and establish new HR policies, standards and practices for the companyRecommend and add staff to accommodate the company's growth and as approved by managementManage, direct and audit payroll functionsManage and direct recruiting process. Maintain job descriptions for all company positionsManage and direct employee relation/safety programsIdentify legal requirements and government reporting regulations affecting safety and ensures policies, procedures, and reporting are in complianceManage benefit administration including medical, disability, life insurance, 401(k), stock purchase plan, holidays and paid time offRecommend and implement new benefits plans as the company grows.Manage the performance review process. Evaluate the compensation structure for internal and external equitabilityAdvise managers and employees on employee relations issuesCounsel employees at all levels in dealing with communication issues and sensitive concerns.Keep abreast of current human resources trends, developments, and legal issues in the industryMaintain accurate employee information in the payroll systemAssist employees with Payroll, Benefits and Human Resources-related questions.Other special projects and tasks as assigned Required Skills:Strong communication and interpersonal skills; Proactive approach when working with othersExcellent organizational skills and attention to detail High level of integrity and ability to handle sensitive and confidential information in a professional manner Knowledge of local, state and federal laws and regulations governing employment. Multi-site (state) experience is preferred Ability to conduct investigations, train and develop staff; and maintain documentation in an organized mannerExperience in investigating complaints, grievances, meeting with employees and management to resolve issuesThe ability to balance multiple priorities in a fast-paced environment and align HR processes to achieve business resultsSelf-motivated with the ability to work independentlyDemonstrated experience in developing strong working relationships with internal and external customers Required Experience:Bachelors in HR, Business or related field and/or equivalent to PHR certification PHR certification preferredAt least 7 years of HR Generalist experience in a multi-site (state) environment, or equivalent combination of education and experienceSolid understanding of labor laws (EEOC, FLSA, FMLA, ADA) and HR fundamentals",Regional HR Director () Job in Costa Mesa,Full Time,"Costa Mesa, CA 92626",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/Regional-HR-Director-890-Job-Costa-Mesa-CA-US-165863094.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=16,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),9df634c0e9a61914de08ac8d4667682f
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:23:19:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Established staffing firm located in N. Dallas is in need of a Staffing Consultant. This position will require the following:    Two (2) plus years of staffing experience in either a Staffing Consultant role or as a Jr. Recruiter    Someone who is comfortable speaking with clients / customers over the phone    Comfortable with going on(existing) customer visits to meet with clients    Interviewing candidates for open positions    Handling time sheets to be processed for payroll    Someone who is polished and professional, that is a mustThis is a great opportunity for someone to expand their skill set from a Jr. Recruiter role or someone who has been a Staffing Consultant and move into more of a Coordinator role...The company offers base compensation that meets experience, bonus plan on both temp / temp-hire candidate placements as well as direct hire placements... Full benefits, 401k, covered parking... ",Staffing Consultant Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75251",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Staffing-Consultant-Job-Dallas-TX-US-166224739.aspx?mescoid=1301121002005&jobPosition=8,,,44126c20d50f1e7cba05d04c96f1033a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:22:41:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client in Palm Beach Gardens, FL has an urgent need for a Systems Administrator focused on Windows and VMware. This is a 6 month long engagement and our client is looking to interview and hire ASAP. The full description is below. Please submit all qualified resumes to mpress@judge.com W-2 Candidates ONLY Please as our client is not setup to work with Corp to Corp based candidates at this timeJob Description: Title: Systems Administrator (Windows/VMware)Location: Palm Beach Gardens, FL Duration: 6 monthsResponsibilities:•Demonstrates a thoroughness of detail and completeness of work product. Demonstrates keen organizational skills that allow others to understand one’s own work product as well as avoid missed tasks.•Effectively estimates Analysis work, sets and meets target dates for completion.•Possesses the core technology competencies within their discipline to design, test, implement, enhance and support approved technologies within the Walter infrastructure.•Solid understanding of the various Infrastructure components (Network, Servers, Databases, Middleware, Security) and their dependencies/relationships.•Transforms business designs/requirements into technical designs/solutions. •Manages the impact of change to applications/systems •Develops, implements and maintains standards and procedures •Develops, implements, and maintains monitoring and reporting solutions •Identifies KPIs and develops related metrics to identify trends, thresholds, and predictors to improve performance, stability and/or prevent changes•Ensures appropriate capacity based on existing usage and consumption as well as future growth and shrinkage projections Skills: •3-5+ years as a System Administrator/Engineer •Solid experience with a Windows 2008 – 2012 R2 •Solid experience with a virtual environment running on VMWare ESXi 5.1 – 6.0 and VMWare Site Recovery Manager 6.1 (SRM) Solid experience with EMC VNX SAN storage and EMC RecoverPoint •Solid experience with Multi-Exchange 2010/2013 DAG environments •Solid experience with Enterprise Backup solutions (i.e. EMC Avamar/DataDomain, NetBackup, etc.)•Solid experience with Microsoft enterprise server technologies (i.e. Certificate Services, Direct Access, etc.)•Solid experience with Microsoft Operating System Deployment technologies (MDOP, Windows ADK, SCCM, MDT, WDS, etc.)•Solid experience with SCCM 2012 – 2012 SP1 CU4. •Solid experience supporting development teams. •Solid experience with automation and scripting. •Moderate experience with enterprise network architecture. •Moderate experience with Enterprise level Antivirus •Moderate experience administering Citrix XenApp and XenDesktop environments •Moderate experience with SQL SERVER 2008 R2 – 2014 SP1 •Moderate Experience with FTP, SFTP and FTPS protocolsW-2 Candidates ONLY PleaseThank you,Mike PressSr. Technical RecruiterJudge Technical Staffing",System Administrator/Engineer (Windows,"Full Time, Employee","Palm Beach Gardens, FL",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/System-Administrator-Engineer-Windows-VMware-Job-Palm-Beach-Gardens-FL-US-167052739.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,2a73d865c4286428d6c46b666f555493
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:22:38:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Exciting full-time opportunity!!One of Kforce's marquee clients, a custom web and application development agency in Center City, Philadelphia (PA) is hiring a Project Manager/Business Analyst to join their team. This is a full-time, salaried position with a competitive salary, bonus potential and a comprehensive benefits package at a small but growing company with great people and a great casual, collaborative culture.This PM/BA will join a high profile custom web development team and will be play a key role in service delivery of strategic technical solutions to their client base. These solutions will focus on custom web development, data integration, mobile, e-commerce, and content management systems. products. Candidates who are interested are encouraged to forward their updated resumes and apply online today!REQUIREMENTS: Practical experience in delivering web-based technology products / solutions from idea inception through product launch Experience performing business analysis of new features, changes and custom client applications Experience working in an Agile (or hybrid method) development environment (including experience with backlog creation, sprint management, user story definition, and writing functional specifications) Experience working with a number of groups including clients, service and delivery teams",Project Manager (Web and App Dev Projects) Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA 19401",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Web-App-Dev-Projects-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-167078680.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),aaacd8cd51d65eb728a898d05d701b01
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:22:08:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Small, well-established (AV rated) family law firm in San Mateo is seeking a full time paralegal with at least three years of family law experience. Position requires the ability to multi-task and work under pressure with tight deadlines. Must be organized, detail oriented, and have excellent writing skills. Duties include, but are not limited to, interacting with clients, drafting judicial council forms, preparing pleadings and declarations, drafting correspondence, preparing files for hearings, trials, and meetings, propounding discovery requests and responses, adhering to court filing deadlines, calendaring and conducting legal research. Knowledge of local and state rules of court and filing procedures in multiple counties is required. Must have experience with Word, Outlook, Excel, and Adobe. Familiarity with Westlaw and Essential Forms is required. Knowledge of DissoMaster is strongly preferred.  We offer a competitive salary. Please submit a cover letter, resume, and list of references to be considered for the position.  ",Family Law Paralegal Job in San Mateo,Full Time,"San Mateo, CA 94402",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Family-Law-Paralegal-Job-San-Mateo-CA-US-166665473.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=5,,,8616c9a1202810f56aa38443c280cddb
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:22:00:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Developer - SSIS Job #:  656200Role: SSIS DeveloperIndustry: Healthcare ITLocation: Eden Prairie, MNTerms: ContractSalary: Competative SSIS – Heads down work.  But they will be working relatively independent (or with another SSIS dev).  What is the specific title of the position? Senior SSIS Developer What are the top 5-10 responsibilities for this position? (Please be detailed as to what the candidate is expected to do or complete on a daily basis) (i) Strong Experience with SSIS Task Factory (ii) Data Mapping and Migration, schema, tables (ii) Database Development utilizing SQL Server (iv) Developing and deploying stored procedures, tables, views, and functions (v) Support software integration (vi) Deliver software in two week sprint cycles What software tools/skills are needed to perform these daily responsibilities? Strong Experience with SSIS Task Factory Experience with Data migration Experience in Database Development utilizing SQL Server Strong communication skills Demonstrated knowledge of systems development life cycle and project management life cycle required What skills/attributes are a must have? SSRS, MS SQL, SDLC processes, Agile processes, good communication skills What skills/attributes are nice to have? Job automation, healthcare IT experience Please contact: bzielinski@apexsystemsinc.com         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Developer - SSIS Job in Eden Prairie,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Developer - SSIS Job #:  656200Role: SSIS DeveloperIndustry: Healthcare ITLocation: Eden Prairie, MNTerms: ContractSalary: Competative SSIS – Heads down work.  But they will be working relatively independent (or with another SSIS dev).  What is the specific title of the position? Senior SSIS Developer What are the top 5-10 responsibilities for this position? (Please be detailed as to what the candidate is expected to do or complete on a daily basis) (i) Strong Experience with SSIS Task Factory (ii) Data Mapping and Migration, schema, tables (ii) Database Development utilizing SQL Server (iv) Developing and deploying stored procedures, tables, views, and functions (v) Support software integration (vi) Deliver software in two week sprint cycles What software tools/skills are needed to perform these daily responsibilities? Strong Experience with SSIS Task Factory Experience with Data migration Experience in Database Development utilizing SQL Server Strong communication skills Demonstrated knowledge of systems development life cycle and project management life cycle required What skills/attributes are a must have? SSRS, MS SQL, SDLC processes, Agile processes, good communication skills What skills/attributes are nice to have? Job automation, healthcare IT experience Please contact: bzielinski@apexsystemsinc.com         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Developer-SSIS-Job-Eden-Prairie-MN-US-166965415.aspx?mescoid=1500142001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),78b765841e9e1da6901810c80880306d
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:21:59:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"SAP BW on HANA Architect  Cognizant’s SAP Business Unit is seeking a talented SAP BW on HANA Architect to join its growing organization.  We are looking for individuals in any major city across the USA who are willing to be traveling executive consultants for us, traveling to and from clients Monday through Friday. As part of the SAP Practice, this person will be responsible for driving successful projects around SAP HANA.   This person will work closely with our clients and must demonstrate professional knowledge to ensure that the work products and deliverables are of the highest caliber to ensure client satisfaction. This person will also apply subject matter expertise to identify, develop, and implement techniques to improve engagement productivity, increase efficiencies, mitigate risks, resolve issues, and optimize cost savings and efficiencies for each client. Key SAP Experience: 12+ years of SAP Analytics experiences with strong experience on Enterprise HANA, BW on HANA and Suite on HANA Strong SAP HANA Solutions Experience is mandatory Lead HANA engagement; mobilize and manage engagement teams; define HANA deliverable structure and content; facilitate buy-in of proposed HANA solutions from top management levels at the client; direct on-time,  quality delivery of work products; manage engagement economics; manage engagement risk Manage day to day interactions with SAP HANA clients and sponsors Develop and maintain contact with top decision makers at key clients; organize and lead HANA pursuit teams; participate and lead aspects of the proposal development process; contribute to the development of SAP HANA proposal & solution Develop HANA solutions and methodologies; develop ""thoughtware"" and ""point- of-view"" documents; participate in public speaking events; get published in industry periodicals A solid understanding of key HANA trends. Key Business Experience and Skills Extensive experience working for a Tier 1 or specialist boutique consulting group Demonstrated thought leadership in their respective field (speak at forums; whitepapers, etc.) Demonstrated cross functional leadership i.e. ability to look at the end to end process and understand how it fits together Excellent communication with executives and clients on both the business and IT side  Ability to lead and facilitate design workshops (Blueprint), assessments, planning sessions i.e. demonstrate leadership experience in upfront projects Demonstrated ability to maneuver through complex and political organizations with multiple stakeholders i.e. what companies/clients has the candidate done this type of work for; who are all the stakeholders, how all the players together gain consensus. Key Responsibilities: Provide technology and architectural leadership, strategic direction and long-term vision for the SAP investment; inspire creative solutions for maximizing the value contribution of that investment.  Define and promote enterprise architecture standards and strategies. Making recommendations on strategic direction and roadmap for the use and implementation of SAP applications, as well as integrated third party systems Champion continuous improvement, driving inefficiencies out of implemented processes and solutions. Providing technical expertise on SAP architecture and making recommendations to improve performance. Providing technical leadership on upgrades and maintenance planning for SAP applications. Conduct work effort estimation and develop work plans Advocate and enforce applicable standards, policies, procedures, and best practices in the implementation and/or maintenance of NetWeaver and its various components. Develop, communicate, and ensure adherence to relevant architectural artifacts such as policies, standards, guidelines, roadmaps, and maturity models. Provide insight on new SAP HANA and how it can be leveraged appropriately to improve the current environment. Cognizant is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V. Cognizant is committed to ensuring that all current and prospective associates are afforded equal opportunities and treatment and a work environment free of harassment. SAP BW on HANA Architect  Cognizant’s SAP Business Unit is seeking a talented SAP BW on HANA Architect to join its growing organization.  We are looking for individuals in any major city across the USA who are willing to be traveling executive consultants for us, traveling to and from clients Monday through Friday. As part of the SAP Practice, this person will be responsible for driving successful projects around SAP HANA.   This person will work closely with our clients and must demonstrate professional knowledge to ensure that the work products and deliverables are of the highest caliber to ensure client satisfaction. This person will also apply subject matter expertise to identify, develop, and implement techniques to improve engagement productivity, increase efficiencies, mitigate risks, resolve issues, and optimize cost savings and efficiencies for each client. Key SAP Experience: 12+ years of SAP Analytics experiences with strong experience on Enterprise HANA, BW on HANA and Suite on HANA Strong SAP HANA Solutions Experience is mandatory Lead HANA engagement; mobilize and manage engagement teams; define HANA deliverable structure and content; facilitate buy-in of proposed HANA solutions from top management levels at the client; direct on-time,  quality delivery of work products; manage engagement economics; manage engagement risk Manage day to day interactions with SAP HANA clients and sponsors Develop and maintain contact with top decision makers at key clients; organize and lead HANA pursuit teams; participate and lead aspects of the proposal development process; contribute to the development of SAP HANA proposal & solution Develop HANA solutions and methodologies; develop ""thoughtware"" and ""point- of-view"" documents; participate in public speaking events; get published in industry periodicals A solid understanding of key HANA trends. Key Business Experience and Skills Extensive experience working for a Tier 1 or specialist boutique consulting group Demonstrated thought leadership in their respective field (speak at forums; whitepapers, etc.) Demonstrated cross functional leadership i.e. ability to look at the end to end process and understand how it fits together Excellent communication with executives and clients on both the business and IT side  Ability to lead and facilitate design workshops (Blueprint), assessments, planning sessions i.e. demonstrate leadership experience in upfront projects Demonstrated ability to maneuver through complex and political organizations with multiple stakeholders i.e. what companies/clients has the candidate done this type of work for; who are all the stakeholders, how all the players together gain consensus. Key Responsibilities: Provide technology and architectural leadership, strategic direction and long-term vision for the SAP investment; inspire creative solutions for maximizing the value contribution of that investment.  Define and promote enterprise architecture standards and strategies. Making recommendations on strategic direction and roadmap for the use and implementation of SAP applications, as well as integrated third party systems Champion continuous improvement, driving inefficiencies out of implemented processes and solutions. Providing technical expertise on SAP architecture and making recommendations to improve performance. Providing technical leadership on upgrades and maintenance planning for SAP applications. Conduct work effort estimation and develop work plans Advocate and enforce applicable standards, policies, procedures, and best practices in the implementation and/or maintenance of NetWeaver and its various components. Develop, communicate, and ensure adherence to relevant architectural artifacts such as policies, standards, guidelines, roadmaps, and maturity models. Provide insight on new SAP HANA and how it can be leveraged appropriately to improve the current environment. Cognizant is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V. Cognizant is committed to ensuring that all current and prospective associates are afforded equal opportunities and treatment and a work environment free of harassment. Additional Information:",SAP BW HANA Architect Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/SAP-BW-HANA-Architect-Job-Dallas-TX-US-167090814.aspx?mescoid=1700157001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7dd315c616f1a006451242370c8cfe24
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:21:42:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are a well-established downtown Fort Lauderdale law firm specializing in insurance defense and are looking for an experienced Florida Workers’ Compensation associate.  At present, the position is available as a  part-time employee with flexible hours or as a per diem independent contractor, but may transition to full-time, depending on future case load.  Due to the recent change in Florida's Workers' Compensation laws, we anticipate an increase in litigation volume and case referrals.  This position has great growth potential.Experience in handling Florida Workers’ Compensation cases is a requirement, no exceptions.  Familiarity with Client Profiles is a plus.",Associate Attorney - Work Comp Job in Fort Lauderdale,Per Diem,"Fort Lauderdale, FL 33316",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Associate-Attorney-Work-Comp-Job-Fort-Lauderdale-FL-US-167086657.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=16,Salary negotiable,Experienced (Non-Manager),935f4a3ae67ead73d7b836d578fa08d2
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:21:30:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Recruiter for this company, you will be sourcing your own candidates for international positions. You will be doing full cycle recruiting: sourcing candidate, pre screening candidates over the phone, scheduling in person interviews, job matching, and references checks.  This is a temp to possible hire opportunity.  They need someone for a solid 3-6 months with the right to hire at the end of the assignment. The hours would be Monday thru Friday 8-5. In order to be successful in this position you will need: Associates or higher education2-4 years previous technical recruiting experience Ability to source your own candidatesMust be a team playerProfessional and reliable Prior experience posting to job boards  If you are interested in this position please visit www.ajilon.com and apply!",Technical Recruiter job in Blue Ash,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cincinnati, OH 45236",,http://jobview.monster.com/Technical-Recruiter-job-in-Blue-Ash-OH-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-166261024.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=19,,Human Resources,dd750647e017aca49cdf361269e1cd0a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:21:17:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"ASSOCIATE ATTORNEYIf you have at least five (5) years of litigation experience and at least one (1) year of employment law experience, and you’re passionate about civil rights/equality/employment discrimination and want to work for a small, fast-paced, high-volume, litigation firm where you will increase and utilize your legal talents, then you should apply for this position.REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS:- A minimum of 5 years of litigation experience- A minimum of 1 year of employment law experience- Knowledge of state, local, and federal Rules of Civil Procedure- License to practice law in Ohio- Excellent research and writing skills (grammar, punctuation, usage)- An unrestricted driver’s license- Highly organized and energetic- Ability to work independently- Ability to work long hours when needed- 2-3 professional referencesJob Type: Full-timeRequired experience:Employment Law: 1 yearRequired license or certification:J.D.",Associate Attorney Job in Cleveland,Full Time,"Cleveland, OH 44139",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Associate-Attorney-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-164941837.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=2,,,0b30b8c36c12eba861409570a6734c46
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:21:01:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More IT Security Lead Job #:  652978Our great Fortune 500 client in Franklin, WI has 2 immediate openings for IT Security Leads. If you are interested please apply with resume to aboettcher@apexsystemsinc.com .Accountable for evaluation, creation and publican of information protection policies and standards. Accountable for consulting and advising on the need for information protection controls. Accountable for executing processes and monitoring, measuring and reporting on the effectiveness and efficiency of controls. Accountable for investigating and responding to information security incidents.I am looking for two Security Leads to represent our Infrastructure Security teams on some major projects in flight. Both are around setting up a cloud-based infrastructure. For the roles I require, these people would need to have a good understanding of cloud infrastructure, with a strong general Security infrastructure background to be ready to provide guidance and direction that supports our security direction. Our teams are in a building mode and I do not have enough people to dedicate resources to projects like this. The engineer would be working with the project teams and consulting back with our teams on direction, planning, issues etc. The resource needs to be able to cover areasLearn More",IT Security Lead Job in Milwaukee,Full Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Security-Lead-Job-Milwaukee-WI-US-167072301.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7f7933028aedcc05b5f12c0ca759064a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:21:00:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is an exciting time in Honeywell and here is a great opportunity to showcase your skills!    Position Description:   Systems engineering and testing on various platforms, including Windows, UNIX, and Linux, such as Fedora, RedHat, or Ubuntu  Conduct in-depth analysis of IV&V, C&A, and functional/operational test results for accuracy, compliance, and adherence to DoD and Federal IA technical and operational security requirements Document residual risks by conducting a thorough review of all the vulnerabilities, architecture and defense in depth and provide the IA risk analysis and mitigation determination results for the Test Report Provide assistance to system owner, enclave, and/or site personnel by reviewing and completing required system documentation and SOPs addressing cybersecurity requirements for assigned systems Administering DoD IA C&A Directives including, but not limited to DoD 8500.2, NIST 800-53, NIST 800-53a Participate and/or develop IV&V Test Plan that describes how to perform validation actions as outlined in the applicable STIG checklists and disseminate to system owner, documentation team, and IV&V team;  Participate and/or oversee the execution of IA certification testing to identify all vulnerabilities, and document residual risks by conducting thorough risk assessments.     BA/BS in Information Systems Management, Computer Science or related discipline plus 6 years of experience. In lieu of formal education, at least 12 years of related experience. Specific contract requirements regarding education and experience will prevail. Secret clearance required. 3+ Years working experience with Windows, UNIX, and Linux, such as Fedora, RedHat, or Ubuntu with system administrator level knowledge Must be 8570 Compliant.   Additional Qualifications:   General working knowledge of Red Hat/Linux software/technologies to include RIPA, Puppet, Kerberos/LDAP, AIDE, HAProxy, Suricata/Snort, Bro, Elasticsearch, Splunk, Syslog  General working knowledge of networks, networking products, networking terms (routers, switches, firewalls, IDS/IPS, VPNs, Remote Access technologies, etc.)  General working knowledge of Windows Server environments and active directory General working knowledge of VMware virtual environments Experienced with eMASS Proven knowledge with one or more Enterprise Level Technologies (e.g. Operating Systems, Databases, Networking Appliances)  Experienced running Windows/Linux SCAP Benchmark and SPAWAR SCAP Compliance Checker Tool Experienced with ACAS Security Center Experienced with DIACAP/RMF activities and procedures   Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 25%",Windows/Linux Security SME Job in Charleston,"Full Time, Employee","Charleston, SC 29406",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/Windows-Linux-Security-SME-Job-Charleston-SC-US-166369812.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,IT/Software Development,02d8032fffbd65805332d305daf8a809
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:20:46:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client Service Rep II Vernon Hills, IL PR: 13.79/hr  Job Description: Communicates tasks and projects that impact administration of the plans to achieve timely and efficient action. Documents and communicates program information to various departments Monitors plan activity and supervised by manager on key issues, upcoming changes, or potential concerns with client programs. Experience and Skills: Preferably worked with an insurer or insurance broker, effectively utilize computer applications. Minimum of 3 years related industry experience",Client Service Rep II Job in Vernon Hills,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Vernon Hills, IL 60061",,http://jobview.monster.com/Client-Service-Rep-II-Job-Vernon-Hills-IL-US-167023772.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=9,,IT/Software Development,6e8d863181593143fc9b6315847b8cc8
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:20:35:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is hiring for a temporary-to-hire Payroll Specialist job opportunity for a growing stable company in Cleveland, Ohio.  You must have at least three years of high volume payroll processing experience.  You will be responsible for processing payroll for 3,000+ weekly employees, garnishments and processing payroll taxes.  The hourly rate for this position is starting at $16 per hour.      The Payroll Specialist Job responsibilities include:-Processing payroll for up to 3,000 employees -Multi-state payroll processing -Garnishments experience-Payroll taxes-Payroll accruals-Entering and updating employee information-Customer Service Qualifications:-At least three years of payroll processing experience-Bachelor’s in Accounting-SAP payroll experience preferred-Ability to work in a fast paced environment-Strong attention to detail-Ability to multitask-Strong communication skills If you are interested in this temporary-to-hire Payroll Specialist job opportunity in Cleveland, OH or other accounting opportunities from Accounting Principals please click 'apply' below and/or visit our website at www.AccountingPrincipals.com! Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled ",Payroll Specialist Job in Independence,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Independence, OH 44131",,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Specialist-Job-Independence-OH-US-165852939.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=2,,Human Resources,bcadc30d1154ed92e4bc47b5ab874bd9
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:20:27:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"No CONTRACTORS Please !Possible to work remotely.Our client is a leading provider of electronic data interchange (EDI) software and are in search of an EDI specialist to join a very dynamic team.The Senior EDI Specialist will be responsible for advanced or key account client service management and tier 3 client support.Serves as a premier support team member to the client and an internal HQ product subject matter expert for the consultants to enhance their skills and competencies in troubleshooting and analysisIn addition, will be responsible as the primary support contact for a major accountWill act as a liaison between development and support teams as requested by Technical Client Services ManagerInitiate correspondence between clients and trading partnersObtains and documents EDI specifications from trading partners and clientsSetup communications for EDI transmissions – including but not limited to: AS2, FTP and VAN setupsMapping documents into various formats including but not limited to XML, and flat file layouts utilizing ODBC connectivitySkillfully implement customers from initial stage into live productionExperience and Educational Requirements:Minimum of 10 years of EDI, ERP implementation, or integration experienceAdvanced knowledge of EDI is requiredKnowledge of ANSI X12 EDI StandardsSkills and Core Competencies:Communication: Openly shares information with others in a transparent manner; has a proactive approach and values consistent follow up; must have excellent written and verbal communication skillsEstablishing and Maintaining Interpersonal Relationships: Developing constructive and cooperative working relationships with others, and maintaining them over time.Camaraderie: Highly collaborative approach with team members, management, and colleagues; must be an active and participative team member committed to the success of the entire team and not just individual goals",EDI Specialist Job in Cleveland,Full Time,"Cleveland, OH",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/EDI-Specialist-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-166324297.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=5,"70,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /yearbonus",Experienced (Non-Manager),1d695aec6f0f84cfa2b18b72a6999431
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:20:26:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a Facets Developer in San Francisco/Sacremanto. CA   Job Roles/Responsibilities   ·         Develop scalable solutions towards data warehouse, data marts and operational data stores ·         Monitor and optimize the performance of the ETL, database scripts, routines and environments ·         Administer and maintain ETL environment, including performing configuration management activities related to the ETL environment (Informatica) ·         Work with data architects, as needed, to provide and facilitate technical design for data integration ·         Develop unit/integration test plans and conduct execution ·         Conduct knowledge transfer and training for client and junior team members on data integration design and techniques ·         Coordinate with offshore team on development activities and provide requirements, clarification, manage and review the deliverables ·         Lead projects and conform to development best practices ·         Travel up to 75% depending on client/project specific expectations   Must Have Skills: ·         Strong Understanding of Dimensional Data Warehouse/Business Intelligence concepts ·         Experience developing BI solutions using leading BI analytical tools such as SSRS/SSAS, Business Objects or Cognos strongly desired ·         Experience with Facets, hpXr and data model ·         IT/Computer Science Bachelor’s degree/industry equivalent ·         Certified ETL/Informatica and/or Certified Business Intelligence Professional Preferred ·         Solid understanding of Microsoft Office Applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Visio, Project). ·         Should be self-directed and a strong team player. ·         Solid organizational skills; ability to manage multiple tasks at once and meet deadlines. ·         Excellent [written and verbal] communication and customer service skills. ·         Problem solving/solution development skills. ·         Consulting Experience a plus   ·         Working with Off shore resources and process experience is a plus   Technical Skills SNo Primary Skill Proficiency Level * Rqrd./Dsrd. 1 Facets - Claims PL3 Required 2 Facets - Provider PL3 Required 3 Facets - Membership PL3 Required 4 .Net Programming-VB .Net PL2 Required 5 ANSI SQL PL2 Required 6 Core Java PL3 Required     * Proficiency Legends     Proficiency Level Generic Reference PL1 The associate has basic awareness and comprehension of the skill and is in the process of acquiring this skill through various channels. PL2 The associate possesses working knowledge of the skill, and can actively and independently apply this skill in engagements and projects. PL3 The associate has comprehensive, in-depth and specialized knowledge of the skill. She / he has extensively demonstrated successful application of the skill in engagements or projects. PL4 The associate can function as a subject matter expert for this skill. The associate is capable of analyzing, evaluating and synthesizing solutions using the skill.       Organization Marketing Statement Cognizant(NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centres worldwide and approximately 221,700 employees as of December 31, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at www.cognizant.com or follow us on https://twitter.com/USJobsCognizant/.       Additional Information:",Facets Developer Job in Sacramento,Full Time Employee,"Sacramento, CA 95826",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Facets-Developer-Job-Sacramento-CA-US-166367325.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=1,,IT/Software Development,0421e91984915d7296a0fdf0b710c26f
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:19:59:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is hiring a UX Architect for a 6+ month role in Northbrook, IL! Qualifications: -create estimates and project plans (related to user-centered design efforts); define user profiles and usability objectives (aligned with business goals); and plan, conduct and facilitate iterative evaluations of user interface designs. -The final deliverable is often a user interface design specification document produced using Sketch, InVision and Zeplin. -Other tools are also available for producing interim design deliverables per the skill set/preference of the individual, which include Axure, the Adobe Creative Suite and Omnigraffle. -5 to 7 years of proven experience in all aspects of user centered design. -Strong communication and behavioral skills are also a necessity to be able to facilitate conversations with business and technical partners. -Position is focused more on structural, functional, and interaction design of user interfaces at the wireframe level. -Ability to create annotated wireframes and low to medium fidelity prototypes are a must Responsibilities: -The User Experience Architect is responsible for applying knowledge of user-centered design methods, human-computer interaction and UX industry best practices to drive useful and usable interface design solutions. -The primary activity is translating business requirements into user experience design specifications. This position also requires the ability to -The User Experience Architect will be a member of a User Experience team, but will be assigned to projects independently. Work products and plans will be occasionally reviewed by peers and senior leadership for quality. -The User Experience Architect reviews the initial requirements and assists in identifying various usage scenarios and underlying user and business needs. If the requirements are not clear, the User Experience Architect will facilitate in articulating the requirements with the business. -The User Experience Architect evaluates the complexity of each project and prepares a project plan for UX activities within the expectations of the overall project. -The User Experience Architect will recommend and conduct user centered design activities as appropriate for each project. -The User Experience Architect will need to actively seek out information needed to understand the existing business processes and systems, which requires a clear sense of ownership for project assignments. -He/she will need to rapidly gain a solid understanding of the end-user tasks and goals as well as demonstrate this knowledge while walking reviewers through these usage scenarios while defending design decisions. -All applicants should provide work samples (with proper consideration of copyright restrictions) along with the resume, via link to a website, or temporarily share during an in-person interview.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",UX Architect Job in Northbrook,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,UX Architect,"Northbrook, IL",http://jobview.monster.com/UX-Architect-Job-Northbrook-IL-US-167070960.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,IT/Software Development,6a218975e861e40e3c88027f4986f4a2
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:19:26:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business Title: Security Program Coordinator Opportunity We have an immediate opening for a Security Program Coordinator in our IT Security organization. The Security Program Coordinator is responsible for working with the IT Security Services Team which consists of Director of IT Security, Team Leads, Incident Responders, Engineers, and Analysts in a supportive and organizational role that will help ensure the team is utilized to its fullest while meeting company goals and objectives. The Security Program Coordinator provides a wide range of support, from the very small individual contribution to the large, multi-business coordination of activities. The position will support the IT Security Services team in interactions with internal business and project teams, addresses technical requirements and are aligned with company security strategies, policies and standards. This position plays a key role in helping to further mature the security program and capabilities. The ideal candidate will be expected to be pragmatic, well organized, and results oriented in every aspect of their work. We are looking for self-starters who are comfortable making good decisions and formulating creative solutions to business and operational problems. Specific responsibilities and desired skills include, but are not limited to the following: - Ability to support the department by providing general administrative duties such as calendaring, on/off boarding staff members, documenting and tracking IT Security Services action items - Coordinate project deliverables and track progress, monitor resource allocations within team and approve weekly time tracking of baseline and project work using project management tools. - Highly collaborative and able to work successfully with cross functional teams and communicate effectively within with non-technical teams including senior product and business management - Effective organizational skills with the ability to handle multiple concurrent activities and work successfully under pressure - Support team in developing and updating technology documentation such as Runbooks and Roadmaps and Metrics - Demonstrate strong problem solving ability and analytical skills - Can deal with ambiguity and requests for change - Participate in meetings with team members, business members, and vendors being able to identify additional follow up needs Review and understand department financials and monitor expenditures within department cost center Job Required Education/Experience: - At least 5 years of project coordination or related experience in IT or IT Security related fields or a Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience - Excellent written and verbal communication skills with strong relationship building skills - Strong business acumen and a commitment to integrity, process improvement and customer satisfaction - Basic understanding of project management principles - Experienced in MS Office tools - Experienced in producing presentation materials that include charts and spreadsheets that can be used to assess or quantify the status of tools, programs, and projects Job Additional Education/Experience: - Knowledge of healthcare industry and industry related technology would be a strong plus - Initiative - shows willingness and aptitude to use own discretion in taking appropriate steps in finding solutions to problems; presents options and ideas to enhance current processes or procedures. Takes on additional responsibility when both big and small tasks need to be done - Integrity - Firmly adheres to the values and ethics of company. Exhibits honesty, discretion, and sound judgment - Cooperativeness - Willing to work with others, collaborating and compromising where necessary; promptly share relevant information with others - Flexibility - Is open to changing situations and opportunities and is willing to perform all tasks assigned - Independence - Able and willing to perform tasks and duties without supervision - Resiliency - Maintains a positive can-do"" outlook, rebounds quickly from frustrations, and maintains composure and friendly demeanor while dealing with demanding situations Required Skills: 1.MS office 2.Verbal & communication skills 3.Strong problem solving ability 4.Change management 5.Ability to track ambiguous initiatives Education Requirement: B.S.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",IT Security Program Coordinator (JB) Job in Sacramento,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,IT Security Program Coordinator (JB),"Sacramento, CA",http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Security-Program-Coordinator-JB-Job-Sacramento-CA-US-166974037.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,23014fc1077871e4b4026c6ae7d8506b
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:19:24:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title - Oracle DBA - SecurityLocation - NYCDuration - 6 months + possible extensionsU.S. Citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. are encouraged to apply. We are unable to sponsor at this time. "" (GC & USC Only)If interested please email resumes to Lindsey Monaco at Lindsey.Monaco@nttdata.comThis mid-senior level role is responsible for gathering requirements for Oracle database security; designing the security solution using Oracle Advanced Security, Oracle Database Vault, Oracle Audit Vault and Database Firewall; implementing and testing the solution; documenting standard operating procedures and transferring knowledge to support team. The Database Administrator will work with onshore/offshore Oracle DBAs, Sr. Data Architect and other IT team members report directly to the Sr. Manager Data & Analytics.Tasks include: Requirements Gathering Understand data protection requirement and policies. Analyze databases environments, size, complexity and type of data that need protection.Solution Design Develop data protection strategy. Develop detailed plan for encryption, database vault, audit vault and database firewall.Solution Testing Implement the data protection solution Perform backup/restore test Perform failover and failback to High Availability and Disaster Recovery nodes Performance Tuning Troubleshot application issues Support case management with OracleDocumentation Build documents on database encryption installation and configuration, database Vault and database Firewall Policies, disaster recovery and key management.Go Live and Hand over Perform Go Live activities. Transition knowledge to support team. Required Skills (Solid experience in the following is required) Oracle Enterprise Edition 12c on Red Hat Linux 6.x. Oracle Enterprise Manager 12c. Oracle clients on Linux and Windows environment. Oracle Database 12c with Oracle Advanced Security, Database Vault, Audit Vault, Key Vault and Database Firewall. Oracle Data Guard Oracle RMAN and Datapump Linux shell scripting Strong knowledge of T-SQL, PL/SQL and SQL query optimization The Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company will consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religious creed, citizenship, national origin, ancestry, age, sex, sexual orientation, genetic information, physical or mental disability, veteran or marital status, or any other class protected by law. To comply with applicable laws ensuring equal employment opportunities to qualified individuals with a disability, the Company will make reasonable accommodations for the known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified individual with a disability who is an applicant or an employee unless undue hardship to the Company would result.",Oracle Database Administrator (Security) Job in New York,Full Time,"New York, 10019",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Oracle-Database-Administrator-Security-Job-New-York-167084362.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5123d59c09d09dcb304eb50d5451072a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:48:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.The Customer Service Tech II will complete high speed data installation and repair, experience in cable maintenance, air pressure, splicing, test and tag, fiber splicing, copper bonding installation and repair. This position interacts directly with CenturyLink customers.Job responsibilities include, but are not limited to:Perform installation, maintenance and troubleshooting of high-speed internet, video and voice networks including associated wiring and equipment.Perform maintenance and repair on outside plant facilities.Climb poles, use a shovel and pick to dig up and bury cable; and may be required to work in manholes or controlled environmental vaults (CEV).Locate buried telephone cables.Observe all safety rules and regulations.Assist other Technical personnel in the performance of their duties when requested.Convey a positive and professional appearance and demeanor when communicating the company’s products and services to our customers.Actively support sales and marketing related activities.Assume all other duties as assigned Job RequirementsEducation: High School Diploma or GED.Three (3) years of current telecommunications industry experience in one or more of the following areas: installation, maintenance, and repair of aerial, buried and underground wire and cable; switched digital television; High Speed Internet; station equipment.Manhole/paper cable experience with knowledge of how to troubleshoot using the proper test equipmentPrior experience in a customer facing or customer service operationAbility to visually identify all colors used in telephone cableWorking knowledge of PC’s, including basic computer operational tasksPossession of a valid driver’s license, with proven ability e to safely operate company vehicles and equipment, and maintain a safe driving recordAbility to safely use hooks, ladders, bucket trucks; and to climb polesAbility to handle 28-foot extension ladders (up to 75 lbs) and manhole covers (up to 150 lbs).Ability to work in confined spaces.Ability to work outside in all weather conditions and at various hours of the day/nightAbility to respond to after hour call-outs, work overtime, shift, weekends, and holidays as required.Ability to travel overnight as necessary for business requirements and trainingStrong interpersonal communication skills for communicating CenturyLink’s products and services to customersPreferred Job Qualifications: CCNT, CCNA, Network+, or A+ CertificationsTraining on basic IT and network fundamentals.Experience in Outside Plant functionsExperience or training in how to read and interpret outside and subscriber plant facility records.Internet protocol telephony exposureElectronics training or experience that demonstrates knowledge of AC/DC theoryKnowledge of analog and digital transmissionAlternate Location: Mifflintown, PA (Pennsylvania)Requisition #: 1261 Company StatementCenturyLink is an industry-leading provider of communications, high speed Internet and entertainment services from coast to coast.  Our combination of business and residential service solutions – including home and wireless voice solutions and digital television – provide innovative solutions to our customers.  CenturyLink is proud to be a participant in the U.S. General Services Administration Networx program, the largest communications services contract in the world.  CenturyLink offers you the opportunity to develop and cultivate your career as we lead the communications industry into the future.Disclaimer:The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",CUST SERVICE TECH II Job in Mifflintown,Full Time Employee,"Mifflintown, PA 17059",,http://jobview.monster.com/CUST-SERVICE-TECH-II-Job-Mifflintown-PA-US-166961568.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,,8baa4d18c3ceb95fe833ae5dff09c823
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:32:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cognizant is hiring for ""Service  Desk Analyst"" in NYC, NY. We are looking for someone local and candidates who were interested in relocation can also apply. Note : Relocation assistance will be provided. Job Description:  Support of PCs and laptop, email administration, file / print services and remote access provided on a standard operating environment.  Other IT tasks include moves/adds/changes, PC software installation, intranet support (or equivalent) and LAN access.  Key Activities: Supply and install new desktop equipment and software, including printers, scanners and other desktop peripherals as per well established procurement procedures Supply and install upgrades to desktop equipment and software Recommend desktop standards such as suitable hardware and software configurations to continuously reduce the cost of ownership Supply, install and upgrade LAN server software  Establish asset management system to track desktop equipment and software, including license management Relocate and re-install of desktop equipment as requested by users Provide introductory training for new users covering the desktop computing environment and the specifics of their particular PCs Identify hardware and software faults (LAN and desktop) and remove impact from business within timescales defined in SLR  Ensure desktop / LAN documentations are kept up-to-date  Maintain LAN server equipment to ensure agreed availability and reliability targets are met. Provide LAN storage facilities including onsite and offsite backup and disk management covering capacity, archiving, configuration, redundancy and data placement  Ensure LAN and desktop security administration is undertaken in accordance with agreed security policies Provide central LAN servers management covering configuration management and general system administration activities  Undertake backup and recovery activities of LAN servers in accordance with SLR and agreed policies Provide disaster recovery facilities to selected LAN servers to ensure service recovery is accomplished as expected business units Provide technical advice on desktop computing to users and application teams Undertake capacity management activities, tuning and system performance of the LAN servers, excluding the applications servers. Additional Information:",Service Desk Analyst Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10014",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Desk-Analyst-Job-New-York-NY-US-166969816.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,5aaeb32319a58667a929ba315550f4c3
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:30:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"WHi,We have an urgent opening for Nuance IVR O&M with our direct clientTitle: Nuance IVR O&MLocation: San Francisco, CADuration: 12 MonthsRate: DOENuance IVR O&M –Need a technical resource who is responsible for tracking production issues and driving them to closure. Should have excellent technical skills to be able to check logs, code, and write code for bugs, enhancements. Should have good communication skills – ability to communicate with other technical teams and line of business partners.Thanks,UmaSr. RecruiterPhone: 630-847-9067 (Direct)Fax: 630-517-0076uma@ryleetechnologies.comwww.ryleetechnologies.com",Nuance IVR O&M Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Nuance-IVR-O-M-Job-San-Francisco-CA-US-166170460.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,,63d95dd49b973ab194f65572cea6f206
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:11:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Role Summary/Purpose:The AVP, Senior Engineer - Privileged Identity Management is responsible for overseeing the Privileged Identity solution components. This role will have the authority to grant approval to anything that affects (updates/modifications) the Privileged Identity Management environment and architecture.Essential Responsibilities:Lead design and development projects to effectively implement and integrate privileged identity management technologies,Develop and deliver to a privileged identity management roadmap; including demand prioritization, vendor product selection and project delivery within the privileged identity management environment.Provide day-to-day oversight of the privileged identity management servers and databases deployed in support of privileged identity management functionality at Synchrony. Establish, maintain and report operational metrics regarding the health and effectiveness of the highly privileged access environment.Qualifications/Requirements:Minimum of 2 years of in-depth understanding of privileged identity management tools to include CyberArk, Lieberman and ObserveIT session recording and their featuresMinimum of 2 years of significant experience in and around the governance, risk and compliance spaceMinimum of 2 years of hands on experience in support of highly privileged identity and access solutionsMinimum of 2 years of basic understanding of release management within a complex environmentMinimum of 2 years of previous experience with large, enterprise Privileged Identity and HPA deployments and supporting teamsDesired Characteristics:Excellent communication skillsEligibility Requirements :You must be 18 years or olderYou must have a high school diploma or equivalentYou must be willing to take a drug test, submit to a background investigation and submit fingerprints as part of the selection processYou must be able to satisfy the requirements of Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.If currently a Synchrony Financial Employee, you must have been in your current position for at least 6 months (AP) or 24 months (level 8 or greater), have at least a ""consistently meets expectations"" performance rating and have the approval of your manager to post (or the approval of your manager and HR to apply if you don't meet the time-in-job or performance requirementLegal authorization to work in the U.S. is required.  We will not sponsor individuals for employment visas, now or in the future, for this job opening. Grade/Level: 10Job Family Group:Information Technology",AVP,Full Time,"Charlotte, NC",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/AVP-Senior-Engineer-Privileged-Identity-Management-L10-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-166315723.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1a80d67a4702952d4e0ddab7f7278d66
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:05:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Overview Under the general direction of the Director of Quality, the Data Manager is responsible for overseeing organization-wide analytics and data management to meet the business needs of the organization. The Data Manager will work across departments to develop and maintain robust mechanisms for data retrieval and compilation, statistical and predictive analysis, reporting, and to assure data integrity. This position will create and lead a cross-functional Data Analytics team with representatives from key departments such as Fiscal, Care Management, Provider Services, and Quality. The Data Manager is also responsible for supervision of the Data Analyst position. Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Data Management (75%)* Create and maintain robust mechanisms for conducting statistical analysis, predictive data modeling, and production of reporting to meet a variety of business needs such as service utilization, enrollment/disenrollment trends, member acuity, service cost and revenue projections, etc. * Assure integrity of data and compliance with HIPAA standards, member confidentiality, and applicable federal and state laws, administrative rules, MCO policies and procedures, and accepted professional standards.* Create and lead a cross-functional Data Analytics team to ensure an integrated approach to data management. Data Analysis and Reporting (15 %)* Oversee data reporting for the organization including organizational-wide metrics, Utilization Review/Utilization Management (URUM) Sub-Committee, reports needed to support analytical work of other departments, etc. * Create reports to assist case management staff with determining cost effectiveness and appropriateness of care provided through the use of authorized member services and in relation to member needs.* Present data findings at various internal and external meetings to different levels of staff. Project support (10%)* Provide consultation to Directors and Executives in development of metrics for Key Performance Indicators and organizational goals across departments. This includes client's Strategic Plan and Business Plan goals and objectives.* Provide data support for quality improvement activities and projects to improve performance, create efficiencies and streamline processes, and improve member/customer experience and satisfaction with organization. Qualifications:Requires at a minimum a Bachelor's Degree in statistics, business, management information systems, computer science, or related field.Prefer background and experience in healthcare analytics such as Medicaid, Medicare or commercial claims. Knowledge or experience with managed care and insurance industry operations and functions preferred; knowledge of Family Care program a plus.Requires advanced level experience with Microsoft Office, including Excel, Access, MS SQLMinimum of two (2) years of experience with techniques needed to design and build systems to integrate data from multiple systems to facilitate reporting and analysis requiredAbility to work with multiple file formats such as xml, txt, xlsx/m, csv.Experience working in data warehouse environment with large datasets preferred. Experience developing an Integrated Data Warehouse (IDW) a plus. Knowledge or experience with the Encounter Reporting System and Long Term Care Functional Screen a plus.Demonstrated strong analytical skills and proficiency in statistical and financial analysis required. Proficiency in the use of relational database software required. Please email thaase@ibs.com for further consideration, thank you! ",Data Manager - SQL,Full Time Employee,"Platteville, WI 53818",,http://jobview.monster.com/Data-Manager-SQL-Excel-Access-Job-Platteville-WI-US-167077232.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,461147fbd8ba0a4cd83cc4c941836e2c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:00:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:Specialist Talent AcquisitionJob DescriptionThe Talent Acquisition Specialist plays a crucial role in the growth and success of Convergys, a global leader in Customer Management. This individual will be responsible for leading and implementing various Talent Acquisition initiatives including day to day full life cycle recruiting, updating key recruitment metrics reporting, and establishing strong relationships with functional operations and training groups.Principal Duties and Responsibilities:Perform full-cycle, high volume recruiting for non-exempt positionsGuide candidates through each step of the selection process in a timely manner based on established processes.Create and update local recruiting reports.Partner with training and operations to optimize the new hire onboarding experience.Attend and/or implement job fairs.Work with internal account managers to enhance the level of service that the recruiter provides.Work with internal HRIS and Applicant Tracking systems.Post internal job openings.Education & Professional Certifications:Bachelor's degree in Human Resources from a four-year college or university.Candidate Profile:One to three years related experience or equivalent combination of education and experience.High volume recruiting experience strongly preferredMust have proficiency with various software applications programs including Microsoft Outlook, Word, and Excel.Must be able to work independent of direct supervision.Solid communication skills, both oral and written.Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively and professionally with internal and external associates.Demonstrated ability to work with and lead a team. Ability to organize and prioritize projects in a fast-paced, deadline-oriented and rapidly changing business environment.Decision-making skills for problem identification and solution recommendation and implementation.Analysis and problem solving skills to determine effects on existing systems and/or business processes.Environment, Physical & Other Requirements: The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified.EEO Employer/Vet/DisabledLocation:USA, Orlando, FLLanguage Requirements:Education:Work Experience:Call Center ExperienceTime Type:Full time Additional Information:",Specialist Talent Acquisition Job in Lake Mary,Full Time Employee,"Job Title:Specialist Talent AcquisitionJob DescriptionThe Talent Acquisition Specialist plays a crucial role in the growth and success of Convergys, a global leader in Customer Management. This individual will be responsible for leading and implementing various Talent Acquisition initiatives including day to day full life cycle recruiting, updating key recruitment metrics reporting, and establishing strong relationships with functional operations and training groups.Principal Duties and Responsibilities:Perform full-cycle, high volume recruiting for non-exempt positionsGuide candidates through each step of the selection process in a timely manner based on established processes.Create and update local recruiting reports.Partner with training and operations to optimize the new hire onboarding experience.Attend and/or implement job fairs.Work with internal account managers to enhance the level of service that the recruiter provides.Work with internal HRIS and Applicant Tracking systems.Post internal job openings.Education & Professional Certifications:Bachelor's degree in Human Resources from a four-year college or university.Candidate Profile:One to three years related experience or equivalent combination of education and experience.High volume recruiting experience strongly preferredMust have proficiency with various software applications programs including Microsoft Outlook, Word, and Excel.Must be able to work independent of direct supervision.Solid communication skills, both oral and written.Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively and professionally with internal and external associates.Demonstrated ability to work with and lead a team. Ability to organize and prioritize projects in a fast-paced, deadline-oriented and rapidly changing business environment.Decision-making skills for problem identification and solution recommendation and implementation.Analysis and problem solving skills to determine effects on existing systems and/or business processes.Environment, Physical & Other Requirements: The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified.EEO Employer/Vet/DisabledLocation:USA, Orlando, FLLanguage Requirements:Education:Work Experience:Call Center ExperienceTime Type:Full time Additional Information:",Business Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Specialist-Talent-Acquisition-Job-Lake-Mary-FL-US-165859350.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=18,,Human Resources,02d693e72b092e39c742c57f6e73d8b0
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:00:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Transactional AttorneyOur client, a boutique law firm, is looking for a transactional attorney with 7-10 years of experience in the real estate/transactional arena. Transactional experience is critical, and work with public entities is a plus! To be considered for this position you must be detail oriented, and able to work on multiple projects with specific deadlines. Some experience in the real estate arena is a must. Position includes excellent benefits and competitive pay. A Colorado law license in ""good standing"" is required to be considered for this position.",Transactional Attorney Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO 80203",,http://jobview.monster.com/Transactional-Attorney-Job-Denver-CO-US-167090420.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=8,,,582197e90999d6581f6f833c15607d21
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:00:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Computer Operator Job #:  657869Apex Systems is seeking a qualified Computer Operator for a large financial company located in Akron, OH. The Computer Operator will work within the Mainframe Computer Operations Group and is responsible for monitoring and operating the IBM z/OS mainframe computer system and determine whether it and associated hardware and software are properly functioning and analyze potential problems. The Computer Operation group supports the Company on a 24X7 basis. If interested please send your resume to Liz Gooding at lgooding@apexsystemsinc.com         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer Operator Job in Akron,Full Time Employee,"Akron, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Computer-Operator-Job-Akron-OH-US-166990868.aspx?mescoid=4300750001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2aff72a3e684179a52952b6a34a64568
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:00:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Helpdesk Support Analyst Job #:  652686One or our clients in San Antonio is looking to expand their help desk team. The following are the desired skills for each applicant. Experienced with Windows XP / Windows 7 supportOffice Suite support experienceKnowledge of telephony, technologies and applications including customer relationship management software, workforce management software, quality monitoring systems, ACD reporting, interactive voice response systems, and web-based and chat customer service applicationsAt least one year of experience as a call center analyst with a proven track record of success supporting technical issues with network connections, PC’s, Microsoft Outlook and especially telecommuter configurations and security please email kespinoza@apexsystemsinc.com Learn More",Helpdesk Support Analyst Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Helpdesk-Support-Analyst-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-167023187.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0ee2c44f1ad77349a3cd6f801dbec72c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:18:00:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"2-3 years of Coudera Experience and overall 8-10 year of IT Experience. Design and implement Cloudera Hadoop based big data solutions, including leadership role in design to develop shared/reusable components. Hands on experience on Core Java in Linux environment. Work with functional team/ Frameworks team to understand requirements and translate them to technical specifications. Cloudera certified will be added advantage.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Sr. Cloudera Architect Job in Raritan,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Sr. Cloudera Architect,"Raritan, NJ",http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Cloudera-Architect-Job-Raritan-NJ-US-167072221.aspx?mescoid=1700157001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,9b77680f379e30d51e0329acfba950a2
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:59:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"A-Line Staffing Solutions is seeking an experienced payroll professional for a Major Pharmacy inChesterbrook, PA. If you are interested in the Payroll Coordinator position, please contact me IMMEDIATELY!Robert Carter 412.823.2500 or by email rcarter@alinestaffing.com Hours: 8:00am – 5:00pm Monday thru FridayPay rate: $20.00/hour Payroll CoordinatorPrimary Responsibilities and Duties:Specializes in payroll and payroll tax related projects as directed by payroll managementCompiles, prepares, processes and inputs payroll information in order to produce timely and accurate paychecksEnsures integrity with data in the system by inputting data accurately and completelyProperly administers all payroll-related functions in compliance with the Corporate Payroll Department’s standard operating proceduresAudit payroll data for newly-hired and terminated associatesPrepares manual payments that are handled outside of the regular payroll cycle; maintains proper documentationCompletes payroll processing by generating applicable reports such as balancing reports and all required payroll reportsResponds to all payroll-related cases that are submitted via case management from associatesResponsible for all facets of payroll processing including interfacing with the payroll system and Kronos time-keeping systemResponsible for maintaining a high-degree of confidentiality relative to personal data, salary data and associate benefits information maintained in the HRIS systemResearches issues and promptly resolves associate requests and inquiriesEnsures that the specific pay group he/she is responsible for is processed in time for centralized processing, contributing to a successful payroll every other weekInteracts closely with other departments within Human Resources in order to complete necessary paperwork required for payroll processingPerforms related duties as assigned Payroll Coordinator Qualifications and Requirements:Minimum 4 years’ experience (Preferred, but not required)Certified Payroll Professional (Preferred, but not required)Good understanding of payroll processing software programs, preferably Workday (will train)Skilled, resourceful, and agile in working with various forms of technologyAbility to communicate effectively both orally and in writingStrong interpersonal skillsAdept at handling sensitive and confidential situationsStrong organizational skills; attention to detailAbility to implement processes resulting in satisfactory audit practicesIntermediate level of knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint A-Line Staffing SolutionsRobert CarterStaffing Manager412.823.2500rcarter@alinestaffing.com Keywords: Payroll; payroll processing; payroll operations; payroll systems; Kronos; HRIS systems; time-keeping systems; paychecks; audit; administration; payroll administration; payroll management",Payroll Coordinator Job in Chesterbrook,Full Time Employee,"Chesterbrook, PA 19087",,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Coordinator-Job-Chesterbrook-PA-US-167077992.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=20,20.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Human Resources,7a03bf94fa47b9e89c3bb0d9f201f566
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:59:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"More information about this job:OVERVIEW:At Sysco, we offer our associates the opportunity to grow personally and professionally, to contribute to the success of a dynamic organization, and to serve others in a manner that exceeds their expectations. We are looking for talented, hard-working individuals to join our team. Come grow with us and let us show you why good things really do come from Sysco.POSITION SUMMARYProvide Human Resources generalist support for Operating Company. As a member of the senior leadership team, the Human Resources Business Partner works strategically with leadership to successfully execute local, regional, and corporate initiatives within the Opco.  The Human Resources Business Partner is involved with key initiatives and ensuring such initiatives are aligned with business objectives. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS/ RESPONSIBILITIES:Talent Acquisition: Work with OpCo leaders to create and maintain workforce staffing plans.  Recruit, interview, and select associates to fill vacant positions in the Operating Company as well as manage the pre-employment process.  Plan and conduct new associate orientation and on-boarding process.    Ensure that competent, diverse, and skilled workers are hired and workload levels are appropriate and maintained, and work to minimize turnover.  Track retention and assist OpCo leaders in developing strategies that maintain and improve retention.Leadership Development: Partner with senior management to identify and proactively develop talent through formal training, mentoring, coaching, and “stretch” assignments.  Participate in succession planning to ensure talent is available and ready to assume positions of greater responsibility both at the OpCo and elsewhere at Sysco.  Responsible for personal development through internal resources as well as external resources.Performance Management: Oversee the performance management process.  Work with OpCo leaders on their associate evaluations. Provide training and consultation as necessary.Employee Relations: Provide coaching and guidance to OpCo leaders and associates regarding employment issues in such areas as policy and procedure interpretation/application, dispute resolution, corrective action, leaves of absence, harassment, and terminations. Facilitate the Sysco Speaks associate engagement survey efforts in the OpCo.  Analyze findings and review trends with senior management and recommend actions to ensure positive organizational changes.  Coordination of employee relations/recognition related events.Compliance: Review, interpret, administer and ensure compliance with federal, state, and local employment laws, and company policies and procedures; including the maintaining and retention of all personnel records.  Maintain all DQF’s (driver qualification files) through iCertainty as required by Sysco and the Department of Transportation (DOT).  Develop and maintain the OpCo’s Affirmative Action Program (where applicable), complete required Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) reporting and ensure Equal Employment Opportunity Commission (EEOC) compliance.  Perform investigations and prepare written responses to EEOC claims, unemployment claims, etc.Reporting & Documentation: Prepare reports as requested.  Develop and disseminate reporting, as necessary, related to retention, labor, expenses, etc.  Document investigations, terminations, and any other related matters.  Conduct exit interviews upon voluntary separations to better understand the reason behind the separation.Safety: Support the installation, maintenance and continuous improvement of the process and strategies of Vision Ø, Sysco’s Behavioral & Compliance Safety program.  Ensure compliance with all applicable federal, state and local laws as well as company policies and procedures. Adhere to all GMP’s (Good Manufacturing Practices), PWM’s (Preferred Work Methods), and all other safety policies.  Direct resources and activities to support a culture of prevention awareness and accountability across the organization. Support the development of Health, Safety and Environmental (HSE) plans to meet operational goals to reduce accidents, injuries and incidents.  Partner with 3rd party administrator (TPA) to manage workers compensation claims.Compensation and Benefits: Oversee all benefits and compensation policies, procedures, and programs.  Provide guidance on benefits and compensation strategy planning and administration.  Communicate all benefit and compensation programs to associates.Training: Oversee the execution and delivery of all local training for all associates.  Deliver leadership training for all OpCo leaders on various HR topics, including ethics, labor laws, policies, and procedures. Oversee administration of Sysco Interactive University (SIU) programs.HR & Safety Team: Provide day-to-day direction and support to HR and Safety staff including proactive guidance, troubleshooting support, and issue escalation.REQUIRED MINIMUM EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE:Bachelor’s degree with major or emphasis in Human Resources, Business Administration, or a closely related field5 years of HR experience in the design, development, and execution of HR strategies and tacticsStrong consultative, presentation, and business communication skillsValid driver’s license and driving record meeting Sysco standardsCERTIFICATIONS AND/OR TECHNICAL REQUIREMENTS:Human Resource Certification Institute (HRCI) Professional Human Resources (PHR) or Senior Professional Human Resources (SPHR) certification preferredSystems Applications and Products (SAP) experience preferredApplicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States.Sysco is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer, and considers qualified applicants without regard to race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran status or any other protected factor under federal, state or local law.This opportunity is available through Sysco Corporation, its subsidiaries and affiliates. *mons",HR Business Partner Job in Orlando,Full Time Employee,"Orlando, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/HR-Business-Partner-Job-Orlando-FL-US-167064644.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=9,,Human Resources,5fdd4ffb01d5f52551abae5ef03423e5
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:44:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Schedule: Sunday-Thursday 11pm-7:30amBasic Purpose:Under general supervision and using established procedures perform varied assignments related to monitoring EVO’s network operations and network security. Identify and resolve issues arising on a day-to-day and especially outside of normal business hours to minimize impact on daily production cycle. Recommend process improvements to ensure systems uptime and availability.Essential Functions:• Assist with after-hours help requests and ticket assignment.• Utilize Network tools to monitor unauthorized Wi-Fi devices, and document device name with the wireless application.• Monitor hardware, network, router and infrastructure issues as they become visible.• Serve as primary point-of-contact for requests, questions, and issues raised outside of normal business hours.• Escalate any issues to IT Support Groups as needed.• Monitor security systems and maintain contact with vendor if action is needed.• Monitor facilities and environmental issues, and escalate as necessary.• Provide Level I support for issues raised by Customer Services, ISO Support and Technical Support teams outside of normal business hours and weekends.• Monitor file transfers to ensure that the files are being sent and received from external customers’ network (Global, EDS, Amex, etc.), investigate and resolve potential network issues, and escalate to IT support if necessary.• Monitor processing of FTP files for front end applications prior to start of production.• Collect data, perform critical analysis, and provide essential reporting for the business on all aspects of security, network and infrastructure monitoring.• Maintain system metrics which include system availability, number of incidents, open unresolved issues, and other relevant metrics to ensure network functionality.• Inventory computer hard drives, cables, and supplies, as well as storage space and alert IT if appropriate.• Document daily, the process for new applications that are used or come into the system.• Perform daily operation tasks, maintenance not including job processing, network maintenance, workstation, and documentation.• Participate in the implementation and support of new technologies.• Provide daily status report of activities to manager.Minimum Qualifications:• High School or equivalent experience and 1 to 3 years of Network Operations or Help Desk experience in the banking or finance industry; credit card processing preferred. Associates / Bachelor’s degree in Computer Networking generally preferred.• Basic knowledge of PC hardware, including troubleshooting and configuration.• Basic knowledge of concepts, techniques and practices of computer operations.• Experience in network environment and network principles (i.e. security, login, print queues.)",Computer Operator Job in Moorestown,Full Time Employee,"Moorestown, NJ 08057",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Computer-Operator-Job-Moorestown-NJ-US-165404306.aspx?mescoid=4300750001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,1694149a53f1d544555f76e187185656
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:44:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Live IT Up at Ciber   At Ciber, we believe the most inspired, innovative and industrious companies should win, regardless of size or legacy. We’re the small company that cares and the big company that can. We deliver breakthrough performances and powerful solutions that are anything but cookie cutter in order to give our clients the competitive advantage they deserve.  Work. Ciber Inc. is currently seeking a Java Developer in Roseville, CA.   More than 4 years experience writing code using languages such as (and not limited to) PL/1, Java, J2EE, Struts.Knowledge, skill and mental development equivalent to successful completion of four years of college with course work in computer science or directly related fields.Five plus years of professional experience in Java development for large, web-based applications systems. Experience in developing ERP based solutions is preferable. Working knowledge of Information Technology concepts and principles, the theories and functions of computer systems, and the principles and techniques of Information Technology documentation. Working knowledge of the methods, procedures and techniques of conducting studies for system conversions and enhancements, including the use of structure, behavior, and interaction diagrams in the analysis and design of web-based systems. Ability to effectively participate in and profit from continuing education, both in a formal and in-service training setting. Ability to analyze data logically and exercise sound judgment in defining, evaluating, and solving moderately difficult technical and operational problems. Ability to gain and maintain effective working relationships with agency officials, associates, vendors, clients and others. Developed oral and written communication skills to present technical information to others with clarity and precision. Requires education/experience as outlined above for the following: Java EE framework technologies, Struts Framework, Spring Framework, Spring Batch, Java EE systems development; WebSphere; web based application development, especially creating Java server pages and data access objects (SQL); testing with JUnit. Experience with DB2 databases.Experience with interface development and troubleshooting.Experience with any ERP application development / maintenance. Experience with PDI data integration tool or other ETL tools is a plus. This position requires the successful completion of a background investigation and/or drug screen.  Ciber, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.  Learn. Ciber Transformation Services help our clients accelerate the pace of change. Through effective talent identification, thoughtful implementation and reskilling, we help IT organizations modernize their workforce, meet emerging industry requirements and ultimately shift their labor pyramid.Grow.  For more than 40 years, Ciber has delivered the technical savvy and IT solutions that help businesses achieve strategic goals. A global IT consulting company with some 6,500 people, Ciber has offices on four continents and in 15 countries. Founded in 1974, Ciber remains client focused and results driven. The company trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE: CBR). For more information, visit http://www.ciber.com/. Additional Information:",Java Developer Job in Roseville,"Full Time, Employee","Roseville, CA 95661",,http://jobview.monster.com/Java-Developer-Job-Roseville-CA-US-167024497.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,,IT/Software Development,b35ece86f1faa256ea8dfcbbf094221a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:43:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:The Director of Merchandising and Sales Support Systems is responsible for providing strategic vision and direction to an organization of Information Technology (IT) professionals for the merchandising, product development, financial, supply chain and human resource systems used in the execution of Gander’s business strategy. This position will drive the overall strategic direction of the merchandising and sales support technology roadmap.  The position will ensure Gander’s merchandising and sales support application solutions will exceed business expectations in delivering quality services and support, while maintaining optimal resource allocation and supporting lowest total cost of ownership objectives.Responsibilities:Essential Functions:Serve as a liaison and primary point of contact within the merchandising, product development, finance, logistics, and HR  organizations cross functional partners to evaluate, prioritize, develop, manage, implement and test technology initiativesParticipate in the development and execution of strategic and tactical business plans with other members of the cross functional team supporting the Merchandising and Sales Support strategyPartner with key cross-functional teams to ensure all relevant organizational goals and implications are factored into Merchandising and Sales Support projectsBuild and direct a cohesive team of internal and external personnel to effectively develop Merchandising and Sales Support solutionsProven leadership of large projectsProvide expertise on current retail industry best practices. Consult on cross-functional projects to ensure principles are incorporatedIdentify new areas of systems opportunity beyond current organizational thinkingLead and develop the Merchandising and Sales Support systems team, aligning all factors for optimal performance.  Work with other members of the IT leadership team to deliver the needs of the business.Ensure all merchandising and sales support applications perform as needed in a 24x7 environment.  Interact closely with business and IT operational teams, insuring appropriate analytics are integrated and accurately providing visibility to the interactions of customers with web solutions.Participate in the creation of annual capital and expense budgets; manage the budgets accordingly. Non-Essential Functions:Complete other duties as assignedQualifications:Education/Experience: Information Systems related Bachelor’s degree.  Graduate technical or business degree a plus. 10+ years of experience in both leadership and technical roles; including 5+ years of experience as an IT practitioner in a retail application development environment Other Qualifications:Knowledge of Oracle retail solutions suite required and extensive knowledge of merchandising and planning systems and sophisticated analytics.Experience effectively leading and managing large groups of people >30 & large budgets >$15 M, including multiple application development related management teams.Demonstrated strategic planning experience within a large enterprise.Proven ability to align information systems to effectively solve strategic business problems.Proven effectiveness managing strategic vendor/ supplier relationships.Demonstrates broad knowledge (technical, business) and organizational awareness.Retail business acumen; proven ability to provide technology options and facilitate decision making around IT investments with sound engineering and IT practices.Proven communication skills both oral and written, with the ability to interact at all levels of the organizationStrong problem-solving and negotiation skillsA strong architectural focus and demonstrated skill in incorporating architectural vision into day-to-dayIT processes and practices that emphasizes ongoing process improvement.Ability to deliver by managing through others, build relationships and influence decisions.Flexibility and adaptability to change; ability to manage multiple priorities with a high degree of self-motivation.Demonstrated organizational skills and attention to detail while maintaining a strategic perspective. Outstanding analytical skills, strong experience interpreting test results & drawing conclusionsDemonstrated strong business judgment and decision-making skills; ability to identify, prioritize, and articulate highest impact initiatives Gander Mountain is committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.***With Rights Come Responsibility.*******Gander Mountain is a responsible licensed federal firearms seller.****",Director of Digital Merchandising and Support Systems (IT) Job in Saint Paul,Full Time,"Saint Paul, MN 55101",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Digital-Merchandising-Support-Systems-IT-Job-Saint-Paul-MN-US-167085377.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=7,,"Executive (SVP, VP, Department Head, etc)",e03a7dc8eb662d579ddad84ad8c08824
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:42:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"NYC Corporation has a short term project for a paralegal or junior attorney starting next week for someone who understands the meaning of the actual paragraphs of a services agreement who can quickly, succinctly, and accurately draft a summary (ie:  a warranty or indemnity) that they can compare to terms of other contracts.    This is a 3-5 day project, but if the person is does well they are looking for staff on an ongoing basis for regular tasks, so a solid candidate might be considered for other assignments.   Please send resume if you have the required skill set.    Pay rate is $23/hr.",Temporary Junior Contracts Paralegal/Attorney Job in New York,Full Time,"New York, NY",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Temporary-Junior-Contracts-Paralegal-Attorney-Job-New-York-NY-US-165861409.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=9,,,adbda672e2ff89d5d6c31a08cbcd3338
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:41:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Human Resources ManagerDiscover the Difference You Can Make at Gate GourmetGate Gourmet, a gategroup company, is the world’s largest independent provider of catering and provisioning services for the airline industry.  For the past 70 years, we have served over 250 carriers in more than 30 countries. Gate Gourmet combines culinary expertise with the highest standards of food safety and production to deliver delicious, healthy, and affordable meals to over 270 million travelers around the globe.We are currently looking for a Human Resources Manager to join our HR team based in JFK, New York; Reporting to the General Manager, the Human Resources Manager acts as human resources business partner to General Manager(s) of single unit or multiple units in a geographic area.Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Partners with General Manager of operating unit to understand business objectives and identify corresponding human resource needs; implements human resources strategy to support business objectivesPartners with Operations and other key functions to develop programs that support employee retention.Helps drive division-wide human resources strategy, programs and processes into unitsPartners with operations and training functions to identify training needs and provide input on training approaches and content.Partners with operations and recruiting functions to identify and understand workforce needs; may be required to actively participate in recruiting union hourly employees and support recruitment for exempt and non-exempt positions.Serves as the primary employee and labor relations manager to mediate and resolve employee disputes and union grievances for kitchen.Provides counseling/training for unit management in the areas of labor/employee relations, EEO, affirmative action and discrimination.Provides policy interpretation and ensures accurate and consistent application of all company policies and procedures, and related local, state and federal laws, and applicable collective bargaining agreement(s).Receives and responds to employment-related claims from various government or public agencies; recommends settlement or defense based on actual investigation of facts.Accomplishes human resources and organization mission by completing related results as needed.Education:Bachelor degree from four year college or university requiredWork Experience:5 years experience in progressively responsible human resource roles, with at least 2 years experience in Labor Relations and Employee Relations.At least 2 years experience managing HR staffExperience recruiting in transportation, hospitality, manufacturing or food service environment highly desirableJob Skills:Multi-lingual skills highly desirableDemonstrated knowledge of state and federal employment lawPosition requires experience and skills in:Business acumenEffective relationship buildingBusiness partneringCross-functional collaborationTalent acquisitionBusiness partneringNegotiationEstablishing metrics for human resources performanceAnalysisTime managementPrioritizing multiple projects/tasksCandidate must have strong interpersonal skills, and be highly organized, action oriented and collaborativeMust also have proficiency in all areas of EEO/Tile VII compliance including expertise in investigating and formally responding to Title VII chargesMust have strong computer and database application skills (Excel, PowerPoint, etc.)Accomplishes human resources and organization mission by completing related results as needed.Communication Skills:Excellent oral and written communication skills; must also be good listenerCertificates, Licenses and Registrations:PHR/SPHR preferredTravel:If responsible for multiple units, must be able to travel frequently between assigned units in the designated geographic area;Ability to travel up to an additional 10% of timeEnvironmental Requirements:Regularly, stands, bends, lifts, and moves intermittently during shiftsIn a normal production kitchen facility there may be physical discomfort due to temperature and noiseAbility to work a flexible schedule as neededDemonstrated Competencies to be Successful in the Position:Thinking - Information search and analysis, problem resolution skillsEngaging - understanding others, team leadership, developing peopleInspiring - influencing and building relationships, motivating and inspiring, communicating effectivelyAchieving - delivering business results under pressure, championing performance improvement, customer focusThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by the individual(s) assigned to this position.  They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required.  Management reserves the right to modify, add, or remove duties and to assign other duties as necessary.  In addition, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.Candidates will be required to go through Pre-employment drug screen, criminal background check, and/or airport fingerprinting.Gategroup is an equal opportunity employer committed to workforce diversity.  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran status, disability status or other category under applicable law.For further information regarding Equal Employment Opportunity, copy and paste the following URL into your web browser:http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf.#ggi##jobcopy p {margin: 5px 0 0;}",Manager,"Full Time, Employee","New York - Jfk Airport, AL",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Manager-Human-Resources-Job-New-York-JFK-Airport-AL-US-166120189.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),99bc2290002b3f7b9a5450b2101d3ae9
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:40:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Planner Job #:  659576The Planner will work with our region personnel and asset renewal team to identify transmission rehab needs for their assigned geographic areas.  They will then work with the appropriate area planners to see which rehab items can be added to larger planning driven projects already in development.  * BSEE from an ABET accredited school        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Planner Job in Tulsa,Full Time Employee,"Tulsa, OK",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Planner-Job-Tulsa-OK-US-167072276.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fba4ac0fe93d6374cc3573fe5b8e6cbf
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:40:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"SENIOR WEB DEVELOPER Company Overview:Business Promotion is a successful marketing company that builds contemporary website designs and implements competitive marketing strategies for its clients by departmentalizing production and SEO processes into a multi-faceted assembly method. Job Description:Business Promotion is presently seeking web developers who are self-motivated and experienced. The right candidates will possess strong back-end skills with the versatility to work on small- and large-scale commercial products. The developers who fill these positions will work in a team-based environment. If hired, these web developers would initially telecommute, which is to say, work from home. The positions are at first contract work with the opportunity to evolve into full-time positions that have comprehensive health benefits, 401k and the possibility of relocation to Utah. (The Business Promotion office is located in American Fork, Utah, nestled among the majestic Rocky Mountains.) Business Promotion’s compensation is competitive and based on experience. Requisite Qualifications:Qualified applicants must have at least four years of hands-on experience with developing web applications, as well as good communication abilities and a strong knowledge of the following technologies and skills: HTML5 / CSS3Advanced JavaScript (with and without jQuery or Angular or other frameworks)AJAX, JSON, SOAP, RestFULPHPObject-oriented programmingRelational databasesVersion controlMVC Preferred Qualifications:Bachelor of Science degree in Computer ScienceC++, C#Rest, Soap, ODBCJquery, AngularJSRuby, Python, PerlNodeJSMongoDBActionScript / Flex.NETJava  Additional InformationBusiness Promotion delivers modern business with old-fashioned excellence. We have been delivering complete online business solutions with unparalleled expertise and experience since our company’s inception in 2008. Our company offers plenty of opportunities for personal advancement and growth, competitive to above-average compensation and comprehensive benefits. The perks of working at Business Promotion include a great work environment, which consists of fun-loving co-workers and leadership. The employees of Business Promotion have a strong sense of camaraderie, and we enjoy positive morale throughout each department. So, if you’re interested in becoming a Business Promotion web developer, please contact us today! E-mail your resume to teresa.cheshire@businesspromotion.com with the phrase “Senior Web Developer” in the subject line.",Senior Web Developer Job in Spartanburg,Full Time,"Spartanburg, SC 29301",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Web-Developer-Job-Spartanburg-SC-US-167078913.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e9de163b76858090a78f73daf1f318f5
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:38:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Job Title:      Corporate ParalegalReports To:  SVP, General Counsel & Corporate SecretaryRole and Responsibilities:Manage program to ensure compliance with corporate registration/reporting requirements in multiple jurisdictions.Manage program to ensure compliance with contractor and professional license requirements in multiple jurisdictions.Act as department liaison between Legal Department  and other corporate departments and external parties.Design and implement code of conduct and ethics training and compliance programAssist with corporate governance, stock program management, and records management for parent company and subsidiaries Manage document storage and retention process.Manage service of process program, including legal notices, subpoenas, document requests, liens, etc.Provide support to internal and external counsel on claims and litigation matters.   Assist in research and drafting of corporate policies and procedures.Assist in drafting and negotiation of agreements, including nondisclosure agreements.Develop and implement legal issues education and training programs for wide range of clients.Special projects as assigned.Skills and Experience:Professional, confident demeanorDetailed oriented, strong organization and multitasking abilitiesPositive attitude, excellent communication and interpersonal skillsSolid computer and technical skillsExcellent writing and drafting skillsSound judgment and ability to identify issues that should be escalatedProactive and able to work under minimal supervisionProblem solving and creative resolution skills, ability to deal well with dynamic work environment8 - 10 years relevant experience Bachelor’s degree required",Corporate Paralegal Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95112","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/Corporate-Paralegal-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-166482540.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=7,,,a20b3d30263e7ab786c76bebad9ca3ef
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:37:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Shibboleth (Open Source) Application Developer-Remote Opportunity As a leading IT managed services specialist with more than 12,000 associates worldwide, we rely on the personal relationships we build with our consultants and the clients who depend on them. Join the CompuCom Team! * Ideal candidate develops in Shibboleth and has upgraded v2 to v3 and added metadata to the new environment. * Initial work will require significant OT. * The next development phase will last 6-8 weeks and the work schedule will be 8-5 standard working hours.W2 only, no Corp to Corp. We are unable to sponsor H1B visas at this time.**CompuCom supports Employment Equity and Diversity**CompuCom Systems, Inc., a global company headquartered in Dallas, Texas, provides IT managed services, infrastructure solutions, consulting and products to Fortune 1000 companies committed to enhancing their end users' experience. Founded in 1987, privately held CompuCom employs approximately 11,500 associates. For more information, visit www.compucom.com",Shibboleth Dev-Must have Version  Experience-Work Remotely Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project","Philadelphia, PA 19106",Computer Hardware Computer Software Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Shibboleth-Dev-Must-have-Version-3-Experience-Work-Remotely-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-167051301.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a9661c356e69f70555d82cc6462e3c91
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:37:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:The transceiver module validation engineer is expected to perform optical module performance validation over test corner condition. The specific tasks might include: •        Perform optical module performance characterization and validation testing across temperature and power supply corners, which may include but are not limited to optical transmitter, optical receiver, high-speed electrical interface, management interface, DC power consumption, power supply noise immunity/rejection, electromagnetic interference/emission testing •        Optical transmitter testing may include measurements of eye mask margin, modulation amplitude, average optical power, and jitter decomposition testing •        Optical receiver testing may include measurements of receiver sensitivity, stressed receiver sensitivity, jitter tolerance •        High-speed electrical interface measurements may include input eye stressed condition acceptance mask, output jitter generation, jitter transfer, output eye mask •        Tasks may also include assembling test fixtures and building test stations, recording test logs (test conditions, module serial numbers, etc.), maintaining test data in networked drives and/or databases, basic test data analysis and generating basic test reports, maintaining and tracking modules/devices under test •        Debug test failures and performance issues that do not meet target specifications, including logging issues into JIRA •        Conduct firmware verification test, based on the test script and GUI developed by firmware engineers •        Support firmware engineers on module firmware download, bootloader download, power-on test, and manual calibration per instruction •        Support firmware engineers on data collection over temperature and over power supply range  Additional qualifications include:  •        Minimum B.S. degree required in EE or CS Computer Science with at least five years of industry experience. •        Familiar with electrical test equipment, optical test equipment, transceiver testing, firmware testing, easy to work with, quick learning curve. •        Familiar with software tools, for example, Excel, PowerPoint, and JMP (a Plus) •        Proven knowledge in the use of laboratory measurement equipment such as high speed oscilloscopes, multi-meters, and time-domain reflectometers to characterize electrical performance of new silicon and platform interfaces. •        Experience in validating the timing and signal quality performance of high-speed interfaces such as XAUI and CAUI interfaces. Knowledge and experience running system level test scripts is a plus. •        Excellent communication skills, both written and - Verbal, coupled with the ability to work independently and in a team environment. •        Experience designing and - Validating optical, RF, analog, digital or mixed-signal circuits/systems would be an added advantage.",Validation Engineer Job in Santa Clara,Full Time,"Santa Clara, CA 95054",Internet Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Validation-Engineer-Job-Santa-Clara-CA-US-166419814.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=18,55.00 - 60.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),eebd172f9ce4494e79e8e9a904f72185
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:37:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Provide analytic support to align compensation programs with business objectives.  Plans, develops, implements and administers compensation programs to maintain competitive practices for BCBSM in the marketplace.  Ensures compensation programs and job classifications comply with applicable wage and hour laws. Develops, communicates and executes compensation policies, plans and procedures. Essential Duties and Responsibilities Independently resolve complex employee and management inquiries that arise related to the development, implementation and administration of BCBSM compensation programs, policies, practices and processes to support business needs. Responsible for program design, development and administration of the merit and incentive programs to ensure accurate pay calculations for payroll processing. Responsible for compensation activities including job evaluation, market pay analysis, internal impact analysis, cost projections, data audit and analysis, implementation and communication strategies, to improve upon current compensation practices. Analyzes jobs through the job evaluation process to ensure internal equity of positions across job families and grade levels. Identifies internal comparisons; recommends grade and salary changes. Interviews managers and incumbents to obtain position information.  Develop and/or update nonbargaining job descriptions and bargaining unit job postings according to accurately capture job roles and responsibilities within BCBSM. Lead and/or participate in HRIS projects and compensation systems. Participates in salary surveys, audits and studies of compensation practices and develops recommendations for compensation program changes.  Lead work groups composed of various areas in the enterprise to complete projects (i.e. merit and incentive program development and administration) and/or work assignments (i.e. salary analysis).  Identify and analyze business problems and devise procedures and solutions to the problems.  Assist HR team and clients by answering questions, supplying information and training as necessary. Develop, maintain and produce monthly, quarterly or annual reports, as required for audit and program compliance to improve upon current compensation practices. Research, analyze and develop information to support Human Resources policies and procedures or client requests; develop presentations to communicate and document results.  Provide consultative advice to HR and managers as needed on all pay related issues and provide analytic support as needed.  Prepare necessary analysis and presentations on compensation related topics for senior and/or executive management review and approval. Apply knowledge of federal, state and local laws governing equal employment opportunity, wage and hour and regulatory/compliance requirements to compensation programs.  Other duties may be assigned. Education and/or Experience Bachelor's Degree in Business Administration, Human Resources Management, Mathematics, Accounting, Finance or related area preferred. Five (5) years or more experience in compensation or related area required. Certified Compensation Professional (CCP) designation preferred. Excellent analytical, organizational, problem resolution, verbal and written communication skills. Must be self-motivated, able to work independently and within a team to meet established deadlines. Strong analytical and computational skills and ability to demonstrate a high attention to detail and accuracy. Advanced knowledge of current industry standard PC applications and systems (i.e., Excel, Word). Thorough knowledge of applicable Human Resources laws (i.e., State and Federal labor laws, FLSA, etc.). Strong knowledge of HRIS and ITMS systems Other related skills and/or abilities may be required to perform this job. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to, among other grounds, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, protected veteran status or status as an individual with a disability.   *LI-MB1 Additional Information:",Senior Compensation Analyst Job in Detroit,Full Time Employee,"Detroit, MI 48226",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Compensation-Analyst-Job-Detroit-MI-US-167037942.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=19,,Human Resources,141c9b603c92ca898dfacca91998d49d
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:36:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Contracts Negotiator/Paralegal or AttorneyOur client, a southwest Denver corporation, is looking for a contracts negotiator/paralegal or attorney, who is looking to move away from the practice of law to join its team. We are looking for someone that has a transactional or contracts background, and looking to go down a non-traditional path. Experience working with derivatives, contract reviews and bank operations are a plus for this position, but not a must. The right candidate will be self-motivated, a team player, and someone who takes initiative in their work. Strong verbal and written communication skills is a must! Extensive training will be provided to the right candidate. If you are looking for a unique opportunity, we would love to see your resume.",Contracts Negotiator/Paralegal or Attorney Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO 80127",,http://jobview.monster.com/Contracts-Negotiator-Paralegal-or-Attorney-Job-Denver-CO-US-167092642.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=20,,,5a1764b4129ff0dd04f22c6fd54c55eb
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:36:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: SQL DBALocation: Charlotte, NCDuration: Direct HireWork Requirements: U.S. Citizens, Green Card Holders, and only those authorized to work in the U.S. for any employer without sponsorship will be considered.Looking for a strong SQL DBA for a great company. Experience in Oracle is a plusSkillset / Experience:  3+ years of database administration experience in SQL Experience with performance tuning, query tuning, troubleshooting and driving problem resolution working in a team environment Solid understanding of physical and logical database design 3-5+ years of High Availability & Scalability Skillset with Microsoft Clustering, Availability Groups, Mirroring, Log Shipping and Replication Backup/Recovery & Refresh Skillset with Log Shipping, SQL back-ups, SAN Replication Snapshots Experience with performance tuning, query tuning, troubleshooting and driving problem resolution working in a team environment. High level understanding of core IT Infrastructure and their architecture (Storage, networking, operating Systems, etc.)Plus but not required: Experience working with Oracle 10g/11g/12c databases  High Availability & Scalability Skillset with Oracle RAC, Advanced Data Guard and other Replication Technologies Oracle RMAN Backup experience, Database Cloning and SAN Snap RecoveryAbout TekPartners:TekPartners is one of the fastest growing private staffing firms in the United States. We are a premier provider of highly qualified IT talent, Workforce Solutions and Business Intelligence Solutions to many enterprise organizations across the nation. As experts in the industry, our team continues to match proven talent to the right job opportunity every day. TekPartners is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Title: SQL DBALocation: Charlotte, NCDuration: Direct HireCompensation: 100K-105K, yearly bonus, great benefits, 25 PTO days, and moreWork Requirements: U.S. Citizens, Green Card Holders, and those authorized to work in the U.S. for any employer will be considered.Skillset / Experience:  Participates in product roadmap discussions and identify key areas for database improvements in the product, and incorporate these goals into ongoing & future development initiatives Maintains database performance by calculating optimum values for database parameters; examining execution plans and tuning indexes and stored procedures; implementing new releases; completing maintenance requirements; assist in expanding and tuning monitoring solutions Own, track, and resolve database related incidents and requests, fulfilling requests and resolving incidents within service level agreements Respond to database related alerts and escalations and work with database engineers to come up with the strategic solutions to recurring problems Contribute to our growth and evolution through high availability solutions such as Mirroring, Clustering, AlwaysOn Mentor team members on best practices and related skills Daily database oversight Oversee support and auditing of user accounts and security rights (SQL and AD Logins) Create database backup procedures as well as system disaster recovery processes Responsible for maintaining data integrity, including maintaining backup strategies and periodic database consistency checks Oversee system patches or security updates 7+ years' experience with SQL Server relational database management systems as an administrator SQL Server 2005 ? 2014 Administration Backup and restore strategies Implement and maintain security access (logins, users, schemas) SQL Server Agent job system Table partitioning SQL Server Transactional Replication Identifying system bottlenecks Performance tuning, and index maintenance Linked servers Experience with high availability and disaster recovery solutions for MSSQL (i.e. database mirroring, clustering, AlwaysOn) Proficiency in T-SQL development Knowledge of virtual servers and SANs related to capacity planning, security and performance tuning Computer Science degree or equivalent work experienceAbout TekPartners:TekPartners is one of the fastest growing private staffing firms in the United States. We are a premier provider of highly qualified IT talent, Workforce Solutions and Business Intelligence Solutions to many enterprise organizations across the nation. As experts in the industry, our team continues to match proven talent to the right job opportunity every day. TekPartners is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Title: SQL DBALocation: Charlotte, NCDuration: Direct HireCompensation: 100K-105K, yearly bonus, great benefits, 25 PTO days, and moreWork Requirements: U.S. Citizens, Green Card Holders, and those authorized to work in the U.S. for any employer will be considered.Skillset / Experience:  Participates in product roadmap discussions and identify key areas for database improvements in the product, and incorporate these goals into ongoing & future development initiatives Maintains database performance by calculating optimum values for database parameters; examining execution plans and tuning indexes and stored procedures; implementing new releases; completing maintenance requirements; assist in expanding and tuning monitoring solutions Own, track, and resolve database related incidents and requests, fulfilling requests and resolving incidents within service level agreements Respond to database related alerts and escalations and work with database engineers to come up with the strategic solutions to recurring problems Contribute to our growth and evolution through high availability solutions such as Mirroring, Clustering, AlwaysOn Mentor team members on best practices and related skills Daily database oversight Oversee support and auditing of user accounts and security rights (SQL and AD Logins) Create database backup procedures as well as system disaster recovery processes Responsible for maintaining data integrity, including maintaining backup strategies and periodic database consistency checks Oversee system patches or security updates 7+ years' experience with SQL Server relational database management systems as an administrator SQL Server 2005 ? 2014 Administration Backup and restore strategies Implement and maintain security access (logins, users, schemas) SQL Server Agent job system Table partitioning SQL Server Transactional Replication Identifying system bottlenecks Performance tuning, and index maintenance Linked servers Experience with high availability and disaster recovery solutions for MSSQL (i.e. database mirroring, clustering, AlwaysOn) Proficiency in T-SQL development Knowledge of virtual servers and SANs related to capacity planning, security and performance tuning Computer Science degree or equivalent work experienceAbout TekPartners:TekPartners is one of the fastest growing private staffing firms in the United States. We are a premier provider of highly qualified IT talent, Workforce Solutions and Business Intelligence Solutions to many enterprise organizations across the nation. As experts in the industry, our team continues to match proven talent to the right job opportunity every day. TekPartners is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Title: SQL DBALocation: Charlotte, NCDuration: Direct HireCompensation: 100K-105K, yearly bonus, great benefits, 25 PTO days, and moreWork Requirements: U.S. Citizens, Green Card Holders, and those authorized to work in the U.S. for any employer will be considered.Skillset / Experience:  Participates in product roadmap discussions and identify key areas for database improvements in the product, and incorporate these goals into ongoing & future development initiatives Maintains database performance by calculating optimum values for database parameters; examining execution plans and tuning indexes and stored procedures; implementing new releases; completing maintenance requirements; assist in expanding and tuning monitoring solutions Own, track, and resolve database related incidents and requests, fulfilling requests and resolving incidents within service level agreements Respond to database related alerts and escalations and work with database engineers to come up with the strategic solutions to recurring problems Contribute to our growth and evolution through high availability solutions such as Mirroring, Clustering, AlwaysOn Mentor team members on best practices and related skills Daily database oversight Oversee support and auditing of user accounts and security rights (SQL and AD Logins) Create database backup procedures as well as system disaster recovery processes Responsible for maintaining data integrity, including maintaining backup strategies and periodic database consistency checks Oversee system patches or security updates 7+ years' experience with SQL Server relational database management systems as an administrator SQL Server 2005 ? 2014 Administration Backup and restore strategies Implement and maintain security access (logins, users, schemas) SQL Server Agent job system Table partitioning SQL Server Transactional Replication Identifying system bottlenecks Performance tuning, and index maintenance Linked servers Experience with high availability and disaster recovery solutions for MSSQL (i.e. database mirroring, clustering, AlwaysOn) Proficiency in T-SQL development Knowledge of virtual servers and SANs related to capacity planning, security and performance tuning Computer Science degree or equivalent work experienceAbout TekPartners:TekPartners is one of the fastest growing private staffing firms in the United States. We are a premier provider of highly qualified IT talent, Workforce Solutions and Business Intelligence Solutions to many enterprise organizations across the nation. As experts in the industry, our team continues to match proven talent to the right job opportunity every day. TekPartners is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",SQL DBA Job in Charlotte,Full Time,"Charlotte, NC 28201",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/SQL-DBA-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-167079409.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=18,,IT/Software Development,d4e4375601d7969b334b845dfbf0f1f2
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:17:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do You love helping solve technical problems? Are you the most popular outgoing Tec-head in your circle of friends and family? Do you love talking to people? Are you looking to get your foot in the door of the #1 fastest growing Software as a Service companies in the Midwest? What are you waiting for!? email me your resume now! I'm excited to meet you. :) What cool stuff will I do every day:  Asses the nature of problems and resolve the issues over the phone in the US and Internationally with our Spanish speaking partners to ensure quality service and support is provided.Build and maintain business relationships with clients by providing prompt and accurate service so as to promote customer loyalty.Provide advanced level tech support for customer software applications, including proprietary software and website support.Address and resolve customer inquiries, problems and complaints regarding products in a timely and accurate manner.Responsible for monitoring, troubleshooting, and supporting customer software applications.Initiate, update, track, and close tickets through work order system.Enter all required information into the system to create and maintain customer database, ensuring accuracy and fast :)Escalate complex issues to supervisorsComplete and maintain all required paperwork, records, documents, and tech support logs according to procedure.Recognize, document and alert the supervisor of trends in customer calls.Recommend process improvements, because your feedback matters to us!Education and Skills: Some CollegeFluent in Spanish for support with our international office Software experience 2 + years experience supporting customers via phone in technical help desk environment.HTML,CSS,Dreamweaver & Browser Knowledge Skilled in Microsoft Office suite (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, etc.).",English/Spanish Technical Customer Support Specialist II Job in Milwaukee,Full Time,"Milwaukee, WI 53224",Internet Services,http://jobview.monster.com/English-Spanish-Technical-Customer-Support-Specialist-II-Job-Milwaukee-WI-US-167088490.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=9,"2 weeks paid vacation, 6 paid sick days, 10 paid holidays, full package",Experienced (Non-Manager),2a6fe4671e53c7617294636013115e14
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:14:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.BROADBAND TECHNICIANJob # 35714Location: Salt Lake City, UtahPlease take a moment to view this generic video to learn more about our service techician positions.This video is not specific to this position .https://vimeo.com/34623506Broadband Technician - Field technician roleTake command of your success as you deliver the future with advanced technologies!  We offer exceptional paid training, an inclusive empowering work environment, state-of-the-art tools and an innovative team culture.  We have the vision, ambition, and practical know-how to succeed! Do you?Job Responsibilities: Service and sell our product portfolio of integrated communications services.Personally represent CenturyLink as a full-throttle, next-generation communications company.Deliver the future of voice, data, internet, entertainment, and cloud services to our customers.Serve the customer at all levels.  Provide the customer with the best customer service.  Foster excellence in customer relationships.Convey a positive, professional appearance and demeanor when communicating the company’s products and service options to our customers.Make decision as to the type of repair required at the customer premise.  Determine whether to repair or replace equipment as needed.Inspect customer premises to determine the appropriate method of installation or repair.Work closely with the dispatch center for work assignments and service orders.Carry out all work in the safest possible manner.Be prepared and enjoy working outside in all types of weather conditions.Assist other technical personnel in the field when requested.All other duties as assigned. Qualifications: Valid driver’s license, with a satisfactory driving record.Full participation and successful completion of paid classroom training.Willingness and drive to continually keep up with changes in broadband technology and CenturyLink product offerings.Best in class customer service skills to develop strong relationships with CenturyLink customers.Strong communication skills – ability to explain technical issues to customers clearly.Ability to handle multiple issues simultaneously, with a positive, upbeat attitude.Highly motivated technician, with a proven record of outstanding productivity.Ability to analyze and troubleshoot technical and practical issues daily.Flexibility and ability work individual or as team as customer needs dictate.Ability to demonstrate knowledge of computer operating systems to install and repair customer networking products.Experience within the last 5 (five) years installing, maintaining, repairing and/or testing any of the following residential or small business broadband products:  high speed internet, phone lines, home theatre, wireless networks, cable TV, satellite TV, sound/audio installs, closed circuit TV, security alarm or fire alarm systems.Experience cabling (CAT5 or Coax) various electronic components (e.g., routers, TVs, gaming consuls, stereo systems and home entertainment systems).Physical Requirements: Ability to perform strenuous physical activities, including but not limited to, lifting and/or moving up to 75 pounds and working aloft.Ability to perform job activities outdoors in different weather conditions (e.g., extreme cold and/or heat, inclement weather).Ability to bend, stand, sit, crawl, climb and lift throughout the day as the job requires it.Ability to climb and work at varying elevations (e.g., from ladders, poles, lift trucks) exceeding 18 feet. Ability to work in confined spaces (e.g., attics, crawl spaces, utility holes). Alternate Location: Salt Lake City, UT (Utah)Company StatementCenturyLink is an industry-leading provider of communications, high speed Internet and entertainment services from coast to coast.  Our combination of business and residential service solutions – including home and wireless voice solutions and digital television – provide innovative solutions to our customers.  CenturyLink is proud to be a participant in the U.S. General Services Administration Networx program, the largest communications services contract in the world.  CenturyLink offers you the opportunity to develop and cultivate your career as we lead the communications industry into the future.Disclaimer:The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Broadband Technician Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time Employee,"Salt Lake City, UT 84107",,http://jobview.monster.com/Broadband-Technician-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-167019710.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=14,,,3963f248483d96974a105b7d85173470
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:13:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Senior BIDW SAS Developer in Oakland, California (CA).Summary: Under general supervision, this role will run existing SAS programs, under a MVS mainframe environment, and produce Microsoft Office based reports from the output of the SAS programs.Contract employee may be required to perform minor code changes, and trouble shoot errors during a production run. Daily Responsibilities: Run Mainframe based SAS programs Generate Excel Reports Quality Check program output and generated Excel ReportsREQUIREMENTS: Microsoft Excel SAS Programming Knowledge Working MVS Knowledge Working Knowledge of Microsoft ExcelSoft Skills: Oracle SQL",Senior BIDW SAS Developer Job in Oakland,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Oakland, CA 94612",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-BIDW-SAS-Developer-Job-Oakland-CA-US-166975295.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7ad223028d79d3581d3e72ffcd1d179c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:05:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Technical Security Analyst (Monitoring, Log Analysis, Troubleshooting) Location: Moorestown, NJ Position Summary: The Technical Security Analyst is responsible for monitoring client systems and tools for IT security alerts and performing level 1 log analysis and evaluation to discover trends and patterns that existing tools may miss. The Technical Security Analyst will document this work in the approved ticketing system and work within the team to remediate these incidents. Major Duties: -Perform level 1 information security monitoring, troubleshooting and triage for suspicious or anomalous activity -Create and manage tickets for all issues related to fraud or security related incidents -Validate and remediate suspicions or anomalous activity through the use of various security tools and checks -Perform workflow related tasks including but not limited to working with vendors, other teams or escalations to senior team members -Perform log analysis to find trends or patterns that may indicate malicious activity -Other duties as assigned Qualifications: Education: -Associates degree in Network Security, Computer Science, MIS, or relevant years of experience -Bonus Certifications: Security+, CCNA, SANS GIAC Experience: -One to two years of experience in troubleshooting IT security related issues -One to two years of experience working with a trouble ticket or help desk ticketing system technologies -One to two years of experience working with Security Incident and Event Management tools, such as Arcsight, Q1 or Intellitactics or related log aggregation technologies - This experience would be helpful but is not required -Basic TCP/IP and UDP/IP networking knowledge -Experience in a SOC or NOC environment preferred -Experience with ticketing systems, such as Remedy TTS, Magic -Experience in performing log analysis or examination to identify malicious patterns -Must have strong written and verbal communication skills -Must have strong troubleshooting skills -Some analytical and problem solving ability",Technical Security Analyst Job in Mount Laurel,Full Time Employee,"Mount Laurel, NJ",Internet ServicesTelecommunications ServicesComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Technical-Security-Analyst-Job-Mount-Laurel-NJ-US-167070241.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=8,,Computer/Network SecurityNetwork and Server AdministrationSystems Analysis - IT,5120e8cf58beca0bee2ec3fcc575d089
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:17:01:03,No,jobs.monster.com," PAYROLL SPECIALIST JOB- Located in Northern Kentucky An organization located in Northern Kentucky is looking to add an experienced Payroll Specialist to their growing team. If you are currently looking for new opportunities and have 2 or more years of experience, please apply today.   The Payroll Specialist Job Information:• This position is an hourly paid temp-to-hire opportunity located in Cincinnati• They are experiencing significant growth with future internal advancement opportunities Payroll Specialist Job duties include:• Process in-house payroll for both salary and hourly.• Verifies, calculates and posts employee time sheet data and earnings including base pay, overtime, shift differential and other incentives.• Audit payroll register to ensure payroll is accurate and/or needed changes have been made • Processes individual salary/wage or other changes affecting employee payroll status including new hire, transfers, and terminations, paid or unpaid leaves of absence. • Answer and assist with any payroll related questions in a timely manner• Ensure on-boarding documentation is in compliance with company policies and procedures Requirements for the Payroll Specialist Job:• At least 2 years of previous payroll experience• In-house payroll experience• Associates Degree is preferred • Exceptional attention to detail• Must have the ability to be both a team player and work independently If you are interested in the above Payroll Specialist Job, please apply by submitting your resume to  www.accountingprincipals.com.  In addition, feel free to visit www.accountingprincipals.com for additional accounting and finance related job opportunities.    ",Payroll Specialist Job in Alexandria,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Alexandria, KY 41001",,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Specialist-Job-Alexandria-KY-US-165915088.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=19,,Human Resources,5fb41e289f8c11febfff050766d1a468
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:16:57:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Department: Contracts Management and AdministrationReports to: Assistant Director, Contracts Operations Please apply here for consideration: http://www.pcori.org/about-us/careers Position Summary Under the direction of the Post-Award Manager, the Post-Award Contracts Administrator will work in tandem with the rest of the post-award team to operationalize the Director’s contracting strategy; execute post-award tasks; and facilitate the contracting experience for PCORI awardees. While focusing on post-award activities, the Post-Award Contracts Administrator must facilitate the entire contracting process for potential PCORI awardees. When needed, this may include activities that are traditionally denoted as pre-award. Nevertheless, the position will manage a portfolio of awards (typically grouped by national research priority area and PCORI Science Team) from Board of Governor award announcements, to contract negotiation, administrative analysis, budget review, contract negotiation, contract execution, during-the-award monitoring and reporting, audits, and close-out. In addition to these activities, the post-award team must generate internal reports and metrics that assess their collective progress and outline areas for continuous improvement. Duties and Responsibilities                              Manage a portfolio of awards – typically by national research priority area and/or PCORI Science directorate – through the entire post-award contracting cycle. Working closely with counterparts on the pre-award team, the Administrator must ensure seamless transitions between pre- and post-award processes. Actively contribute to the design, implementation, update and testing of PCORI Online (Contracts Management System). Under the direction of the Post-Award Manager, implement the Department’s communication strategy for messaging of PCORI Online to the research community.Coordinate the contract negotiation process within an award portfolio; including, management of all pre-contract applicant communications, active support of contract negotiations, management of all requested / approved contract edits, and collection of fully executed documents and all support documentationExtract application components from the PCORI Online system and perform administrative and budget reviews (analysis of proposal-to-budget alignment, allowable / allocable costs, budget analyses, validation of direct and indirect cost calculations, etc.).Enter, maintain, and manage all awardee data for an assigned contracts portfolio in the PCORI Online Contracts Management System. The Administrator must be able to provide accurate and real-time data for senior management reports.Perform during-the-award monitoring and reporting on the awards within a specified portfolio. This includes invoice review/approval/processing, timely receipt and management of all financial and performance status reports, review and acceptance of project milestones and deliverables, collaboration with the PCORI Science team to ensure progress, conducting and documenting awardee site visits, and serving as the primary point of contact for all contract issues within an awardee portfolio.Prepare drafts of all contract vehicles, contract modifications, and other support documents related to an assigned award portfolio. Work closely with the PCORI Science team that oversees the assigned awardee portfolio to support all aspects of PCORI’s Active Portfolio Management approach to contracting.Identify potential risks for each project. In consultation with the Post-award Manager and General Counsel if appropriate, devise and implement mitigation plans with Science staff. As needed, plan and perform site visits.Provide regulatory, programmatic and administrative counsel to portfolio Awardees.Ensure that the documentation for each award is maintained in a manner that is compliant with the Institute’s policy and auditor specifications. Manage an assigned award portfolio through annual financial and programmatic audits: prepare, submit, and substantiate all awardee portfolio documentation.Manage the close-out of awards; including, final cost and progress reporting, collection of all deliverables, documentation that all contract conditions were achieved, and award termination or transfer to a new (continuing) institution.Operate with great latitude for independent judgment and initiative. Participate in meetings, providing input and suggestions that relate to an assigned awardee portfolio.Ensure that the confidentiality and security of all information under his/her supervision is maintained.Provide excellent customer services to all PCORI constituents.Travel is mandatory Incumbent(s) in this position may be required to perform other duties and special assignments not specifically stated above. Statements outlined in this section are designated as essential job functions in accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990. *PCORI Staff Conflict of Interest Statement - No PCORI employee can receive a direct financial benefit from a healthcare related organization during the course of his/her employment with PCORI.  PCORI is an equal opportunity employer committed to cultural diversity in the workplace.Required SkillsIntermediate knowledge of MS Office and email systems (Outlook)Knowledge of relational databases preferred, i.e. EasyGrants, Salesforce, Cayuse424, ClickCommerece SAP, Peoplesoft, Oracle, Fluxx,  Serve to Serv Grant Systems, etc.At least 3 years experience in a customer services environmentAbility to effectively communicate, both in writing and orallyAward recipient experience and/or award funder experience Required ExperienceBA/BS and at least 5 years of related professional experience; MA, MS, MPA, MPH, MBA, or equivalent Masters-level education and at least 3 years of related professional experience preferredHigh-level working knowledge  of OMB Circulars A-133, A-21, A-110, etc.  General working knowledge of FAR and nonprofit contract law also needed.Experience managing budget portfolios greater than $25 millionDemonstrated experience with risk assessments and action plan development ",Administrator,Full Time,"Washington, DC 20036",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Administrator-Contracts-Operations-Job-Washington-DC-US-166964382.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,,,44c390ea8f61990cada8bb5ba901ed87
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:16:55:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking for a legal secretary and/or paralegal with excellent secretarial skills.  Must have 15+ years of litigation experience in state and federal courts. Applicant must possess strong communication, organization and time-management skills; reflect sound problem solving and independent judgment skills; demonstrate initiative and work independently with minimal supervision; and earned a reputation for being accurate, efficient and smart.  Duties include: Transcribing dictation, case management, management of e-filings and court filings including preparation of notices and pleadings for e-filing in various courts, preparation of correspondence and memos, notebooks for depositions, mediations and trial, maintaining attorney calendar, including calendaring all trial and case settings and discovery, scheduling depositions, handling telephone calls and making travel arrangements.",Legal Secretary/Paralegal Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX 77007",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Legal-Secretary-Paralegal-Job-Houston-TX-US-166754814.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=14,Salary with Benefits,Experienced (Non-Manager),91018d741183369c8d814dd56019ff5b
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:16:55:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Work Location: Horsham, PA  About Capgemini:  With more than 180,000 people in over 40 countries, Capgemini is one of the world's foremost providers of consulting, technology and outsourcing services. The Group reported 2015 global revenues of EUR 11.9 billion. Together with its clients, Capgemini creates and delivers business, technology and digital solutions that fit their needs, enabling them to achieve innovation and competitiveness. A deeply multicultural organization, Capgemini has developed its own way of working, the Collaborative Business ExperienceTM, and draws on Rightshore®, its worldwide delivery model.  Learn more about us at www.capgemini.com .  Rightshore® is a trademark belonging to Capgemini.  SUMMARY This role requires an expert level of business knowledge and understanding of the Insurance industry, in a senior leadership capacity, overseeing large operations. This position requires migration, transitioning and setting up the operations in steady state for healthcare vertical.  Desired Candidate Profile  Responsibilities – Migration of large processes 300+FTEs from onshore and stabilizing the operations.  Experience & Skills – Minimum 12 years of experience in the IT / BPO / KPO industry.Managed and transitioned large processes offshore in healthcare domain.Experience in the IT/ BPO industry, primarily in operations and transitioning role.Account management and operational experience as well as good understanding of US Healthcare Insurance industry.Bring in new perspective & lateral thinking skills, able to work independently without constant supervision or guidance, analytical & number driven individualAbility to work in multi-cultural, global environmentMinimum 5+ years of experience in operations, transitioning in BPO/KPO industry.Experience in migration and managing operations of health insurance back office.Workflow with 837 EDI output.Process Mapping.Good knowledge of TPA services and product offerings.Excellent Track record with demonstrative success in following best practices in operations management.Desirable Black Belt in six sigma methodology.  LANGUAGE SKILLS  Excellent communication skill and proficiency in English language.  Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures, or governmental regulations.  Ability to write reports, business correspondence.   Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, and prospects.   WORK ENVIRONMENT  The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Qualifications: To perform this job successfully, the individual must be able to perform each essential duty effectively. The individual must possess;Relevant Long term care (LTC) / Disability Insurance background is requiredwell versed knowledge in using acronyms and terminology used in the LTC/ Disability Insurance industryExcellent oral, written and interpersonal communication skillsExcellent customer orientationAbove average core product knowledgeExtensive experience in Life insurance operations / process managementProficient in Microsoft Office tools – Word, Excel, Access, PowerPoint, SharePointSolid understanding of insurance terminology and definitionsExceptional listening and analytical skillsProficiency in financial analysisCore company knowledge of departmental processes and proceduresDecision making skillsEnergy and drive with a focus on deliveryStrong people management and leadership skillsUnderstanding of technology and how to leverage for operational effectiveness and efficiencyReasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Ability to  present and facilitate training content to ensure understanding by varied audienceread and interpret documents such as policies and operating and procedural manuals.write detailed correspondence, business cases, as well as internal and client-facing presentationsspeak effectively and professionally to clients, external and internal stakeholders, employees of the organization. Fluency in spoken and written English required; fluency in French a definite asset. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS  ICA and/or LOMA strongly desired. Working toward an industry designation (CISR, FLMI). Note:Must have a stable career backgroundBachelors Degree preferredCapgemini is an equal opportunity employer. Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled Additional Information:",Operations Director for an Insurance Client Job in Horsham,Full Time,"Horsham, PA 19044",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Operations-Director-for-an-Insurance-Client-Job-Horsham-PA-US-167056203.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),62de485f8dcd8d5c5c9f8bef4575b66d
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:16:54:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce is looking for someone for a position at a company in the Tampa, FL area. This person would be responsible for developing and maintaining various pieces of in-house software platform. They would know the innards of how the company solves their client's PBM needs with custom software and also know how to diagnose and fix any basic- to high-level issues in said software. They would help further establish and maintain the sense of trust and shared responsibility IT shares with the rest of the company through earnest listening, quality solutions, and strong follow-through. Beginning to explore career development via external sources such as blogs, meet-ups, and/or conferences, always evaluating the applicability of new technologies with respect to our business. They would be actively participating in team technology & procedure discussions, knowing that their opinions could help determine future technological direction.Essential Job Functions: Good understanding of general PBM processes and handling of such End-to-end handling of basic- to high-level issues in all in-house software End-to-end handling of basic larger scale fix & feature implementations Basic to intermediate modification and/or creation of existing Java code (with attendant tests) within the scope of our in-house software applications Basic to intermediate modification and/or creation of existing T-SQL code within the scope of our in-house software applications Basic to intermediate modification and/or creation of new UX code within the scope of our in-house software applications Light to medium interaction with in-house client user base as it relates to current operations of our systems and/or potential issues they might be having Very light availability on weekends/holidays for emergency issues as they arise Adherence to all departmental and company-wide procedures and policiesREQUIREMENTS: Education: BS in CS or equivalent experience Experience: 3-5 years development experience on any front Background Check Required: YESPreferred Qualifications: Java 1.6+ MS SQL Server 2008+ Servlet 2.5+, JSP 2.1+, JSTL 1.2+ JBoss 6.0+ TestNG 6.8+ HTML 4+ CSS 2+ JavaScript 1.8+ jQuery 1.2+ IntelliJ 10.0+ Gradle 2.0+ JIRA 6+",Java Developer Job in Tampa,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Tampa, FL 33607",,http://jobview.monster.com/Java-Developer-Job-Tampa-FL-US-167031241.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a056377232a7542ea12709c38f3c79ce
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:16:29:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you a SharePoint and .Net Developer in Omaha, Nebraska looking for a place that will continue to grow your existing skills? Modis is seeking a Sharepoint/.Net Developer for a terrific company here in Omaha!This is a 6 month contract to hire. This company is known for their unlimited growth potential, casual environment and amazing benefits! They work with latest and greatest technology and offer an environment that lends itself to collaboration and learning.  This person will be on a team with 2 other developers and 1 lead. It will be 65% C# .Net Development and 35% SharePoint. The work will be comprised of creating and maintaining Sharepoint sites, doing .Net backend data based development and working with other teams throughout the company. This person will be primarily responsible for developing applications (web and native client apps) to support the implementation of business process improvement strategies. Position Type: 6 month contract to hire Position Requirements: 3+ years of C#, .Net Development experience2+ years of SharePoint Development experience-creating and maintaining SharePoint sitesExperience with WebServices (Rest/SOAP/XML)SQL Server experience is required.  If this contract to hire opportunity in Omaha, Nebraska sounds like it could be a good career move for you, please apply to be considered!",Sharepoint/.Net Developer Job in Omaha,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Omaha, NE 68137",,http://jobview.monster.com/Sharepoint-Net-Developer-Job-Omaha-NE-US-166979474.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,128e4ac2270c238d4098cab68073fca6
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:16:28:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"PowerSchool® is the SIS leader, serving as the hub of educational ecosystems for over 40 million users. PowerSchool’s products allow stakeholders to manage school processes and data, manage and monitor the special education process, and provides registration module for K-12 organizations. PowerSchool embraces a secure, open architecture and provides an extensive set of APIs that customers control to enable their schools to have the industry’s best integrations.  Job DescriptionThe System Administrator monitors, upgrades, troubleshoots and maintains networks and production & development servers of our systems and data center. This individual provides day to day support, completes maintenance requests, system administration tasks, server backups and archival, system & network monitoring/reporting, scheduled job processing, report generation, and distribution.ResponsibilitiesWork within a growing and fast paced environment managing the hosting infrastructureManage and administer all facets of Hosting from hardware to software, operating systems to related applicationsWill work within a collaborative, adaptable and team based environment to meet the needs of an evolving technology and business modelSkills & RequirementsMust have Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, MIS, or equivalent experience.Exposure to Systems Administrator functionsAbility to provide technical customer support to employeesWorking experience with Windows 2008 and 2010, and LINUX serversKnowledge of Active Directory and Group policiesKnowledge of email systems like Office 365Working knowledge of Shell Scripting, Batch ScriptingExposure to remote management and IT automation toolsKnowledge with Disaster Recovery, Virtualization and CRM productsKnowledge of private and public Cloud providersAbility to work non-traditional hours requiredMust have strong written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work within a team environment",System Administrator Job in Folsom,Full Time,"Folsom, CA 95630",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/System-Administrator-Job-Folsom-CA-US-167091655.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=5,"55,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),d1a506ee2b3ffa2726f5b3710c91eb80
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:16:18:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Legal SecretaryTowson law firm seeks to hire a Legal Secretary with 1-3 years of litigation experience Necessary qualifications include proficiency with Microsoft Office and Adobe Acrobat Professional, organizational and administrative skills, telephone skills, and professionalism. Please email resume to aturner@levingann.com",Legal Secretary Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,21204,Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Legal-Secretary-Job-US-166529097.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5890beeac8bed416cf8f8d062a7822d8
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:15:54:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Professional - Change Management Consultant Job #:  659762Greetings!Apex Systems is actively seeking qualified Change Mangers to work onsite at a large energy client’s location in Charlotte, NC. If you are interested in entering your candidacy, please send your resume to RMorris@ApexSystemsinc.com .        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Professional - Change Management Consultant Job in Charlotte,Full Time Employee,"Charlotte, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Professional-Change-Management-Consultant-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-166955721.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2500d3ca9c9c91811251b616c20b18e2
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:15:54:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Leading Global Information and Technology Health Services Company is looking for a Customer Service Representative in Warren, NJ! Schedule is Monday - Friday, 8:00 AM - 5:00 PM (some flexibility required)Pay is $16.54/hour Duties: Will handle incoming calls from customers dealing with loyalty/Rx discount cards for different pharmaceutical companiesAnswers incoming calls from pharmacies and patients and gathers information from the caller to troubleshoot the issueProvides pharmacy co pay assistance for loyalty card programs Navigates multiple screens to research callers requestLogs all calls in web traxEnrolls patients into co pay programsSupport transactions by interacting between pharmacies and patients Makes outbound calls following up on rejected claims and other issues Escalates more complex issues to Supervisor/Manager as necessary  Requirements: Candidates with administrative experience in a medical office that can analyze/understand EOBs (explanation of benefits) forms are highly desiredPhone customer support experience requiredMedical, pharmacy or healthcare background is a plus Must be computer literate and familiar with MS Office  If you feel like you would be a good fit for this position, please apply with your current resume today! ",Customer Service Representative in Warren,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Warren, NJ 07059",,http://jobview.monster.com/Customer-Service-Representative-in-Warren-NJ-Job-Warren-NJ-US-167091830.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,d0428d9e96b841da90880cc69a406e5d
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:15:45:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Take command of your success as you deliver the future with advanced technologies!  We offer exceptional paid training, an inclusive empowering work environment, state-of-the-art tools and an innovative team culture.  We have the vision, ambition, and practical know-how to succeed!    Do you? Job Responsibilities: Service and sell our product portfolio of integrated communications services.Personally represent CenturyLink as a full-throttle, next-generation communications company.Deliver the future of voice, data, internet, entertainment, and cloud services to our customers. Serve the customer at all levels.  Provide the customer with the best customer service.  Foster excellence in customer relationships. Convey a positive, professional appearance and demeanor when communicating the company’s products and service options to our customers. Make decision as to the type of repair required at the customer premise.  Determine whether to repair or replace equipment as needed.Inspect customer premises to determine the appropriate method of installation or repair in the safest possible mannerWork closely with the dispatch center for work assignments and service orders. Be prepared and enjoy working outside in all types of weather conditions.Assist other technical personnel in the field when requested.All other duties as assigned.  Job requirements Best in class customer service skills to develop strong relationships with CenturyLink customers.Valid driver’s license, with a satisfactory driving record. Full participation and successful completion of paid training.Willingness and drive to continually keep up with changes in broadband technology and CenturyLink product offerings.Strong communication skills – ability to explain technical issues to customers.Low voltage experience.Work Environment:May climb and work at elevations (e.g., from ladders, lift trucks) exceeding 18 feet.May work in confined spaces (e.g., attics, crawl spaces, utility holes).May perform strenuous physical activities including, but not limited to: lifting objects weighing over 75 pounds.May perform job activities outdoors in different weather conditions (e.g., extreme cold and/or heat, inclement weather).When working aloft, employee’s weight and tools combined may not exceed the 300-pound weight limit as specified by the manufacturer.Must work varying shifts and hours including possible mandatory overtime, weekends and holidays.Drive company provided vehicle.Alternate Location: US-Nebraska-OmahaRequisition #:  48607Company StatementCenturyLink is an industry-leading provider of communications, high speed Internet and entertainment services from coast to coast.  Our combination of business and residential service solutions – including home and wireless voice solutions and digital television – provide innovative solutions to our customers.  CenturyLink is proud to be a participant in the U.S. General Services Administration Networx program, the largest communications services contract in the world.  CenturyLink offers you the opportunity to develop and cultivate your career as we lead the communications industry into the future.Disclaimer:The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Broadband Technician Job in Omaha,Full Time Employee,"Omaha, NE 68122",,http://jobview.monster.com/Broadband-Technician-Job-Omaha-NE-US-166960240.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=5,,,56e92832323a9cc7589de5f9fbbc7aec
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:15:45:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Telephony and Systems Administrator Job Description The Telephony and Systems Administrator will be responsible for the administration and maintenance of our client’s phone system and supporting infrastructure. Responsibilities include the administration, maintenance and operational changes to Windows servers and the CIC system such as telephone moves, adds and changes, modifying users, creating queues and system customization such agency table and custom handler configurations and call flow design and modifications. The Administrator will also collaborate with department supervisors and managers in making sure all their needs are being met and suggesting any improvements for operational efficiencies.Required Skills Ideal candidates will possess the following experience:Minimum 4 years work experience on the Interactive Intelligence CIC phone system with CIC version 4.0 the minimum version requirement with 2015 or 2016 preferredMinimum 6 years work experience on Windows Server environment administration experience with 2008 or 2010 experience requiredExperience with the Interaction Center Platform including Interaction Administrator and the Interaction Center .Net Client and/or Interaction client or Interaction Desktop and ICBMWorking knowledge of VoIP, VOIP protocols and telecommunicationsACD/Skills-Based routing knowledge Preferred Skills/KnowledgeInteraction Center Handler Developer knowledge preferredCIC Media server understanding preferredICBM Report generation experience preferredBasic SQL knowledge preferredHigh proficiency in MS Office Suite, especially Excel Behaviors and CompetenciesAnalytical and critical thinking abilityAbility to work flexible shifts and weekends as neededAbility to communicate with various levels of management, orally and writtenExcellent communication, interpersonal and organizational skills Education/CertificationBS/BA degree in Information Systems, Computer Science or equivalent experience.Industry Certifications preferred but not required",Telephony and Systems Administrator Job in Milwaukee,Full Time,"Milwaukee, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/Telephony-Systems-Administrator-Job-Milwaukee-WI-US-167037909.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=16,,,00cc8f0954e7c93be1249577bf3e44ab
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:15:15:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Prodigy Placements is recruiting for a Talent Acquisition Coordinator with Financial Services experience for a 6 month or longer contract in Chicago.This person will join a highly collaborative group responsible for coordinating all phases of recruiting and staffing across US and international offices. In addition, the ideal candidate will demonstrate an ability to manage and prioritize multiple clients and tasks. The successful candidate will have experience within the Financial Services industry and be comfortable interacting in a high paced team environment with varied levels of staff. Support recruiting for areas of business/geographical division as assignedEnsure excellent candidate experience reflective of the Company's brand, through tight management through the recruiting process, including closing and hand-off to HR for onboardingHelp organize and maintain vendor management program Partner with HR and Lines of business colleagues to ensure successful search executionEnsure that HRBPs and HMs are kept in the loop throughout the recruiting processExecute search processes in support of Recruiting Leads, HR and/or businessPost job descriptions into Taleo and other approved job sites and review new resumes for roleManage candidate logistics, schedule interviews, and assessment between HM, candidate/agencyAct as point of contact for candidate/agency on daily basis regarding logisticsConduct references checks Help coordinate participation in recruitment opportunities including networking events, career fairs, and conferencesDescription:Bachelor’s degree requiredMinimum 2+ years of corporate recruiting experience in a fast paced, highly dynamic organization; financial services experience preferredDemonstrated exposure to an environment that is developing and sustaining a robust talent pool to include diverse candidatesAbility to interface effectively as a member of the broader Human Resources TeamProficient with MS Office, Excel, PowerPoint, etc., and the ability to quickly learn new computer applicationsExposure to applicant tracking systems requiredAbility to prioritize and multi-taskAbility to communicate effectivelyCustomer/client focused attitude",Recruiting Coordinator Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Recruiting-Coordinator-Job-Chicago-IL-US-167044292.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=2,,,510b5d667acbdbf9eeb2e8bdc9f7c81d
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:15:06:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tech WriterPantheon is looking for a Tech Writerfor a contract role inHouston, TX.Contract length: 6 monthsJob Description•         Review and edit all training material content prepared to ensure that correct grammar and formatting is used and that content is understandable by intended audience.•         Track completion of content by responsible Subject Matter Experts.•         Review published materials and recommend revisions or changes in scope, format, content, methods of reproduction and binding. Detailed Responsibilities:•         Manage multiple assignments simultaneously, while working independently and with other content developers.•         As an integral part of cross-functional product teams, this person must learn the products by hands-on experience.•         Confer with subject matter experts and project managers to establish technical specifications and to determine material to be developed for publication.•         Select photographs, drawings, sketches, diagrams, and charts to illustrate material.•         Arrange for typing, duplication, and distribution of material. Job Requirements:•         Strong analytical skills, as well as technical or business writing experience.•         Bachelor's degree with demonstrated interest in technical communications, technology and technology issues.•         Outstanding written and verbal communication skills.•         2-4 years of experience writing documentation such as procedures and training manuals.•         Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite (including Visio), desktop publishing, and graphics software.•         Has sound organizational, analytical and conceptual skills•         Ability to plan coordinated objectives•         Can provide change management perspective on project teams•         Can ensure effective communication of Change Management processes to change owners",Tech Writer Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX 77098",,http://jobview.monster.com/Tech-Writer-Job-Houston-TX-US-166978090.aspx?mescoid=2700440001001&jobPosition=9,,,b49a4aa59b43a7d500a51ffa5375211e
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:15:05:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Lead Ad Operations Strategist in Menlo Park, California (CA).Responsibilities: Lead the setup and execution of successful advertising campaigns from a portfolio of partners Own all aspects of trafficking, campaign optimization, troubleshooting, and reporting, with a sustained focus on efficiency and scalability Perform campaign performance analysis and provide reporting to internal partners Establish strong relationships with internal teams and partners, manage communication during all phases of an active campaign's lifecycle Stay abreast of key media and advertising trends and innovations to bring to future product marketing campaigns and potentially expand the scope of marketing effortsREQUIREMENTS: 3+ years of relevant advertising or operations experience; Advertising or similar is preferred Knowledge of online advertising and/or measurement methods and technologies Ability to perform well autonomously Ability to quickly absorb training on product and tool functionality Excellent quantitative and analytical skills Extremely strong written and verbal communication Passion and experience in the media industry Ability to perform well autonomously",Lead Ad Operations Strategist Job in Menlo Park,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Menlo Park, CA 94025",,http://jobview.monster.com/Lead-Ad-Operations-Strategist-Job-Menlo-Park-CA-US-166982579.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d2f37ce23ed98fb33bc7cd491d8a7b4e
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:14:54:49,No,jobs.monster.com,-*Must be a United States Citizen because this position requires a United States Government Clearance or be able to be clearable for one. Softworld Inc. client is currently looking for a Help Desk professional to work with a well-known client in the Falls,Help Desk Technician Job in Falls Church,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Falls Church, VA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Help-Desk-Technician-Job-Falls-Church-VA-US-167032442.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,e0c75de8ca2348da2f500cd96bf5fa7c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:14:54:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Senior Linux Systems AdministratorLocation: Midtown NYCIndustry: FinTechType: Full Time PermanentWe are a prominent Financial Technology firm specializing in various trading systems. Partnered with a number of the country's primary financial institutions, our firm continues to expand at a rapid pace. With the recent expansion, we are seeking to grow our primary infrastructure team with a Senior Linux Systems Administrator.The individual in this role will be a key point of contact for all Linux-related matters. This is the chance to become highly visible among our primary technology teams and senior management at deep technical level.Essential Duties & Responsibilities:Maintain, manage, configure and deploy relevant Linux servers.Administer and configure a range of VMWare environments.Investigate, escalate and troubleshoot Linux- and Virtualization-related issues.Configure a variety of storage devices.Create and execute scripts to perform essential systems functions.Qualifications & Skills Required:5+ years of System Administration experience.Extensive experience with Linux Administration (CentOS, Red Hat, Fedora).Deep knowledge of VMWare vSphere.Strong scripting skills (Perl, Bash, Python).Thorough knowledge of Linux (network stack, file systems, etc.).Strong understanding of application and server monitoring tools.Experience working within a Data Center and an understanding of Data Center Operations.Strong communication skills and the ability to coordinate well with team members.If you're interested, please Apply to Alex at Huxley.",Senior Linux Systems Administrator Job in New York,"Full Time, Employee","Position: Senior Linux Systems AdministratorLocation: Midtown NYCIndustry: FinTechType: Full Time PermanentWe are a prominent Financial Technology firm specializing in various trading systems. Partnered with a number of the country's primary financial institutions, our firm continues to expand at a rapid pace. With the recent expansion, we are seeking to grow our primary infrastructure team with a Senior Linux Systems Administrator.The individual in this role will be a key point of contact for all Linux-related matters. This is the chance to become highly visible among our primary technology teams and senior management at deep technical level.Essential Duties & Responsibilities:Maintain, manage, configure and deploy relevant Linux servers.Administer and configure a range of VMWare environments.Investigate, escalate and troubleshoot Linux- and Virtualization-related issues.Configure a variety of storage devices.Create and execute scripts to perform essential systems functions.Qualifications & Skills Required:5+ years of System Administration experience.Extensive experience with Linux Administration (CentOS, Red Hat, Fedora).Deep knowledge of VMWare vSphere.Strong scripting skills (Perl, Bash, Python).Thorough knowledge of Linux (network stack, file systems, etc.).Strong understanding of application and server monitoring tools.Experience working within a Data Center and an understanding of Data Center Operations.Strong communication skills and the ability to coordinate well with team members.If you're interested, please Apply to Alex at Huxley.",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Linux-Systems-Administrator-Job-New-York-NY-US-166960147.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=8,,,b2a7c1a3abf5c5db138d3bb807b7e2c8
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:14:52:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Goldberg Segalla, a dynamic and rapidly growing law firm with a national and international practice seeks a highly motivated and organized individual to join their team. The Billing Department is seeking a Billing Specialist to provide supervision of the billing staff while overseeing the daily processes within the department. Description:The Billing Specialist will be responsible for daily review and submission of billing, including electronic billing to various vendors. Vendors include but are not limited to: Legal Exchange, Legal-X, Litigation Advisor and Tymetrix360. This individual must become familiar with and follow existing Firm billing policies and procedures. They must be able to communicate in a professional manner with internal and external clients, attorneys and paralegals. Candidate will be working closely with other departments within a large Finance department and should possess good team building skills. They must be comfortable working in a fast pace, deadline driven environment. Strong follow-up skills and communication is a must. Ideal candidate will be motivated with the goal of becoming a long term asset within the organization.Requirements/Skills:Ideal candidate should be motivated with the goal of becoming a long term asset within the organization.At least two (2) years of billing, accounts receivable and/or accounting experience preferred.Law Firm experience is desirable but not required.Experience with Electronic Billing is preferred.Bachelor’s degree preferred but not required.Excellent written and verbal communication skills.Strong analytical skills, forward thinking and creative.Ability to demonstrate self-motivation and ownership of assigned work.Works well in team environment.Computer skills including understanding of Microsoft Excel and Word.This position offers a very competitive salary, bonuses, and a full benefits package.  Qualified applicants should email their resume with salary history and requirements to Heather Marciano at resumes@goldbergsegalla.comGoldberg Segalla is a growing law firm more than 250 lawyers strong, with 17 offices in the United States (spanning New York, Illinois, Florida, Maryland, Missouri, North Carolina, Pennsylvania, New Jersey, and Connecticut) and in Europe (in London, where we operate as Goldberg Segalla Global LLP). We look to hire only those people who are excellent at what they do and are dedicated to the pursuit of client service and quality representation within a Best Practices framework. We value team spiritedness, collegiality, and interpersonal harmony within our working community. We are a firm that believes in diversity in the workplace and we offer a professional and positive work environment to each and every member of our team. ",Billing Specialist Job in Buffalo,Full Time,"Buffalo, NY 14203",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Billing-Specialist-Job-Buffalo-NY-US-164199594.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=1,,,65e74c39e38790be1bff13d9fd05b83d
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:14:52:26,No,jobs.monster.com,One of our direct client is looking for Business Analyst with Agile expertise in Washington DC on Contract / Full Time Basis. This position requires a minimum of 8+ yrs experience as Business Analyst preferably in financial or capital markets domain. Must have strong experience in Agile/Scrum environments. This candidate should be able to play the role of an expert in this area suggesting improvements and ideas that will address the needs of the business usersRole : Agile Businesss Analyst Location : Washington DCPosition : 3Duration : Long Term  Key skills:·          Mortgage Domain skills mandatory.·          Must have strong experience in Agile/Scrum environments. Experience in CICD environment is a plus.·          Demonstrable knowledge in defining Use Cases·          Ability to interact and collaborate with Business users and understand their needs and document them as requirements·          Ability to communicate to development team the requirements and clarify the questions that can come up·          Review test cases and provide inputs on the coverage and suggest improvements to testing team,Agile Business Analyst (Capital Market) Job in Washington,Full Time,"Washington, DC 20001",,http://jobview.monster.com/Agile-Business-Analyst-Capital-Market-Job-Washington-DC-US-167052266.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=6,,,a51e26262c1a21543d0eb29346d9e0c9
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:14:40:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quantum Technology Resource Group Inc. is a boutique, technology-driven recruiting firm with offices in NJ and Arlington, VA. We are seeking a motivated full-desk Recruiting Consultant to join our growing Arlington, VA office. Interested candidates can apply via Monster.com or send an email directly to Bglyck@qtrg.com  RESPONSIBILITIES:Develop recruiting strategies and proactively identify qualified candidates by using various networking tools including social media, linkedin, job boards, and meet up groups.Work with Partner to develop and execute on business development strategies. Create trust based, lasting relationships with clients and candidates.Manage Applicant Tracking System.Evaluate the strengths and weaknesses of candidates from both a technical and environmental perspective.Negotiate salary, benefits and other terms and conditions of employment with candidates.Oversee pre-employment steps, including reference checks and background and drug tests.Effectively manage pipeline, activity and goals.REQUIREMENTS:Bachelor's degree and relevant work experience (professional/internship experience in recruiting, sales, or marketing)Skilled communicatorQuick learner Strong Organizational skillsGoal-driveTeam-orientedSelf-motivatedCustomer and business development focused QUANTUM is an elite search & consulting firm with a 20 year history providing game-changing talent to innovative and industry leading companies. Quantum has successfully recruited high-impact individuals for clients within the following verticals:Information Technology & Analytics Healthcare & Life SciencesManagement ConsultingFinancial ServicesIndustrial (Manufacturing, Energy, & Construction)Retail What distinguishes Quantum from other search firms? DRIVE – We exclusively recruit the top percentile (%) candidate for our clients. We refuse to settle for anything less because we understand that innovative, creative, and passionate leaders drive a company’s success. INTELLECT – We take the time to understand the specific needs of our clients from both a technical and environmental perspective. Every work atmosphere has a unique flavor. We understand the difference between a technically strong candidate and an impact-player that can thrive in your company’s unique work environment. PASSION –We are passionate about the companies and individuals we work with and believe strongly that any individual we recruit should have the same mindset. We strive for excellence in every search because we care about your company’s success. ACTION – Weare relentless in our pursuit of the best possible talent on the market that will lead your company’s growth and positively impact your bottom line. Our precision in sourcing and recruiting top-candidates in a timely manner is unparalleled. REPEATABLE RESULTS – We provide our clients with actionable results. Our candidate presented to candidate-hired ratio is amongst the highest in the nation. We also boast an exceptional employee retention rate, which is why our clients call on us time and time again for their hard to fill searches.",Recruiting Account Manager Job in Arlington,Full Time,"Arlington, VA 22207",,http://jobview.monster.com/Recruiting-Account-Manager-Job-Arlington-VA-US-153866185.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=8,"35,000.00 - 45,000.00 $ /yearBase + Uncapped Bonus",Experienced (Non-Manager),34435fc99135b24c3b232979962cd785
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:14:18:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chubb is the world’s largest publicly traded property and casualty insurer. With operations in 54 countries, Chubb provides commercial and personal property and casualty insurance, personal accident and supplemental health insurance, reinsurance and life insurance to a diverse group of clients. The company is distinguished by its extensive product and service offerings, broad distribution capabilities, exceptional financial strength, underwriting excellence, superior claims handling expertise and local operations globally.   The Messaging System Administrator is responsible for all operations and engineering for the messaging environment including: •        Managing the activities, training, and daily work assignments of all mail systems administrators.   •        Accountable for making strategic decisions for the ongoing development of the messaging infrastructure.  •        Manages resolution of issues by coordinating appropriate resources to ensure timely resolution. •        Responsible for maintenance, upgrades and installations to ensure the most optimal messaging environment. Key Responsibilities: •        This position will lead the administration and support, of Microsoft Exchange 2013 and for the health and performance of the messaging infrastructure •        Will manage a Team of (7) Mail Systems Administrators •        Performs needed maintenance, upgrades and installations to ensure the most optimal messaging environment •        Provide day to day support in mobile device platforms, including technologies to manage them (i.e. Traveler, GOOD) •        Monitors and identifies system performance issues •        Diagnoses issues and restore Exchange services to avoid outages for end-user. •        Insure proper escalation and notification for ongoing projects. •        Troubleshoot and resolve Support issues. •        Provides Tier 3 support for escalations from Help Desk related to the messaging environment. •        Handle day to day support activities, production support incidents, escalating when necessary and drive towards permanent resolutions. •        Experience in installing, configuring, administering, tuning, and troubleshooting complex mail application installations. •        Supports after hours and weekend escalations as needed. Recommended Qualifications: •        College degree, specialized training or equivalent work experience •        7-10 years progressive experience with messaging systems administration within Microsoft Exchange •        7+ years’ experience of Leadership  (particularly in strategy and execution) and Management (optimizing processes and performance) •        Expertise MS Exchange •        Experience with Windows Active Directory and familiar with Group Policy •        Knowledge of Microsoft Windows 2008/2012 Server, Active Directory, Certificate Server, SQL Server •        Knowledge of Lotus Notes environment a plus •        Scripting experience a plus, ideally PowerShell.  •        Knowledge of Internet Explorer, IIS and other MS Tools/Products •        Knowledge of Mobile device platforms, including technologies to manage them (i.e. Traveler, GOOD) •        Strong written and verbal communication skills with the ability to interact with all levels within the organization •        Experience with providing guidance to junior staff. •        Experience in initiating, conducting and facilitating discussions with multiple stakeholders, and ability to translate the results and issues at hand to the business and to the IT teams •        Excellent written and verbal communication skills •        Strong interpersonal / relationship management skills Chubb offers a competitive compensation package and comprehensive benefits package including life, health and dental, vision, a generous retirement savings plan, disability coverage, stock purchase plan, flexible spending accounts, tuition reimbursement, and business casual dress. Chubb is an equal opportunity employer and our employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, age, gender, national origin, disability, handicap, marital status or any other status or condition protected by Federal and/or State laws, except where bona fide occupational qualifications apply. Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 25%",Messaging System Administrator Job in Basking Ridge,,"Basking Ridge, NJ 07920",,http://jobview.monster.com/Messaging-System-Administrator-Job-Basking-Ridge-NJ-US-166979152.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4cba794d677024cd9f31593ecd0051d3
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:14:18:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recruiter - Corporate - x-MilitaryFor field services group installersFocus on outreach efforts with military basesHR and admin work to schedule interviews, get feedback, extend offers and onboardLong term contractExperis Consultant Benefits Available:Health, Dental/Vision, 401K, FMLA, Disability, Life Insurance, Direct Deposit and a Great Recruiter to work with you, Ron Shewbart at 817-333-6419 and/or Ron.Shewbart@experis.comExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Military Job in Frisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Military,"Frisco, TX 75034",http://jobview.monster.com/Military-Job-Frisco-TX-US-167081514.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,Human Resources,ee1df682e15d6338c7b971b361ded501
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:00:21:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Blytheville, AR",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-blytheville-ar-us-159709923.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=10,,Logistics/Transportation,b05211e36924f5ab97a2bdaff6b9e5f8
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:00:22:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:What can YOU do with the right information? At OptumInsight, the possibilities and the impact are limitless. You'll be empowered to ask more questions, develop better solutions and help make the health care system greater than ever. It's always fresh. It's always exciting.  As a CDI Senior Consultant you'll provide consulting services to strengthen and improve health care operations that result in stronger financial returns and a healthier health care system. You'll use your strong strategic and business acumen to work closely with clients to define, develop and document business requirements to ensure needs are captured and critical deliveries are executed. This consulting career gives you the opportunity to travel and share in a mission that inspires. You'll see your ideas come to life and your achievements recognized. You won’t find tougher challenges. And you won’t find smarter people working together to solve them. Join us and start doing your life’s best work.(sm)   Primary Responsibilities:Ability to participate/lead evaluation/gap analysis of current clinical documentation improvement programs and provide written reports that describe our findings and recommendations for improvement Leveraging previous CDI experience to participate in ongoing refinement of CDI assessment and implementation methodology and approach, including: development of deliverable templates, workflows, training manuals/content; integration with technology Assist service offering leader with solution development and sales support of CDI through proposal development, responding to RFPs, development and delivery of client presentations Engagement participation and overall quality assurance of deliverables as an individual and as an engagement team Act as Project Lead during engagements as required by management/practice Participate in industry events and speaking engagements to promote CDI expertise and capabilitiesQualifications:Required Qualifications: Must have either the CCDS/CDIP credential or be an RN/NP/MD/PA/RHIA/RHIT with prior CDI hospital based consulting experience to be considered Direct experience in working as a CDI Specialist or in development of CDI program in the acute care setting and understanding of CDI program infrastructure, workflow and reporting/metrics Prior healthcare consulting experience Experience in conducting gap analysis, identification of risk and opportunity and development of findings and recommendations, including development of a Road Map; CDIP gap analysis experience preferred but qualified candidates may have comparable experience with other similar initiatives Strong understanding of clinical, HIM, Quality and Case Management workflow Individual must be proficient in ICD-9-CM Diagnosis/Procedures Codes, MS-DRG reimbursement and clinical documentation requirements (coder credentials not required) Has facilitated physician education or has experience in working directly and communicating with physicians Ability to travel 70-80%Preferred Qualifications:Clinical Documentation Improvement Specialist/Professional (CCDS/CDIP) credentials through AHIMA or ACDIS License: RN, Nurse Practitioner (NP), MD, Physician Assistant (PA), RHIA/RHIT Experience providing CDI-based training to physicians and CDI Specialists ICD-10 experience BS or MS degree Health care isn't just changing. It's growing more complex every day. ICD10 replaces ICD9. Affordable Care adds new challenges and financial constraints. Where does it all lead? Hospitals and health care organizations continue to adapt, and we are a vital part of their evolution. And that's what fueled these exciting new opportunities.Optum360 is a dynamic new partnership formed by Dignity Health and Optum to combine our unique expertise. As part of the growing family of UnitedHealth Group, we'll leverage all our resources to bring financial clarity and a full suite of revenue management services to health care providers nationwide.If you're looking for a better place to use your passion and your desire to drive change, this is the place to be. It's an opportunity to do your life's best work.(sm)   Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.  Job keywords: CCDS, CDIP, RN, Registered Nurse, NP, Nurse Practitioner PA, Physician Assistant, RHIA, RHIT, CDI, CDIP gap analysis, HIM, Quality Management, Case Management, ICD9, CM, MS DRG, AHIMA, ACDIS, ICD 10, Travel, telecommuteTravel: Yes, 75 % of the Time CitizenshipStatus: Other Visa Accepted Function: Bus Advisory & Tech CnsltngBusinessSegment: OptumInsight Division: Optum360 Rev Cycle Technology DeliveryModel: Platinum ContestNumber: 652697 Shift: Day Job OvertimeStatus: Exempt",Clinical Documentation Improvement - CDI - Senior Consultant - Travel Job in Los Angeles,Full Time,"Los Angeles, CA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/clinical-documentation-improvement-cdi-senior-consultant-travel-job-los-angeles-ca-us-167325511.aspx?mescoid=2900531001001&jobPosition=17,,"Executive (SVP, VP, Department Head, etc)",f32f03b87a54af0ea9060c12073edb05
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:00:25:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Morgan Hill,Full Time Employee,"Morgan Hill, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-morgan-hill-ca-us-167323039.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,d5fb0d54201cfb7d9b75ce1137a3b73d
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:00:28:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have prior manual driving experience and looking for a job near the Marysville, Ohio area? Spherion of Bellefontaine is now hiring for Non-CDL Drivers at a client in Marysville, Ohio. Positions are available for Full Time/Temp-to-Hire opportunities and available on all shifts with pay ranging from $10.00-$11.00/hour.Non-CDL Drivers must know how to drive a manual transmission and must have a valid drivers licenseClick APPLY NOW to fill out our application, or visit us at APPLYOHIO.COM - CLICK APPLY NOW, THEN SELECT BELLEFONTAINE. FOR QUESTIONS, CALL 937-565-4289. ",Non-CDL Drivers Needed! Job in Marysville,Full Time Employee,"Marysville, OH 43040",,http://jobview.monster.com/non-cdl-drivers-needed!-job-marysville-oh-us-165850380.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=17,9.00 - 10.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,eab33ce429d2a8fb9b46162efb03dc8e
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:00:29:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Trenton, NJ",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-trenton-nj-us-159710043.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=1,,Logistics/Transportation,2d8049ccd80b9bae9763f4c03d6ac992
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:00:47:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"College graduate in related field preferably college level reading, writing, and math skills; excellent telephone usage skills and strong verbal skills; knowledge of health care service delivery systems and third party reimbursement; understanding of admission and discharge function; familiarity with medical terminology, diagnostic terms and treatment modalities; knowledge of medical record keeping; strong interpersonal, organizational, evaluative, and time management skills; policy interpretation skills; familiarity with applicable standards and regulations; flexibility; attention to detail; able to comprehend psychiatric evaluations, consults, lab results, etc.; responsiveness to deadlines; assertiveness, persistence, and persuasiveness; able to work with minimal direction or supervision. EOE. Job Requirements:College graduate in related field preferably college level reading, writing, and math skills; excellent telephone usage skills and strong verbal skills; knowledge of health care service delivery systems and third party reimbursement; understanding of admission and discharge function; familiarity with medical terminology, diagnostic terms and treatment modalities; knowledge of medical record keeping; strong interpersonal, organizational, evaluative, and time management skills; policy interpretation skills; familiarity with applicable standards and regulations; flexibility; attention to detail; able to comprehend psychiatric evaluations, consults, lab results, etc.; responsiveness to deadlines; assertiveness, persistence, and persuasiveness; able to work with minimal direction or supervision. EOE.Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=190915&site_id=35",Utilization Review Coordinator (PRN) Job in Atlanta,"Per Diem, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30306",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/utilization-review-coordinator-prn-job-atlanta-ga-us-167142594.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,7561b0821d868d951b323313666e06e5
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:00:59:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) Senior Technician US - TN - Memphis Company Overview Throughout our 100 year history, Gannett Fleming has been an innovator and leader at a global level, providing world class services in engineering, consulting, design, program and construction management. With more than 60 offices worldwide, we are consistently ranked among the nation’s most prestigious engineering firms. Our people are our secret to delivering excellence as promised! We have fostered a culture promoting progressive thinking to tackle complex engineering challenges --- transforming creative ideas into reality! We are committed to supporting your career goals by providing professional development and training, the opportunity to work with respected industry thought leaders, while at the same time encouraging a healthy work life balance.  Our benefits and perks are competitive because we want to see a smile on your face as we change the world together. Since 1915, Gannett Fleming has played a major role in some of the most multifaceted and iconic engineering accomplishments in the world. Join us in our journey as we continue to provide thought provoking, customized solutions to our clients, improving and sustaining communities for the next 100 years!  Description/Responsibilities Installation and testing of various types of splice enclosures on all sizes of cables. Ability to fusion and mechanical splice single or multi-mode fiber optic cables, including termination with various types of connectors and patch panels. Installation and dressing of fiber optic and network cables. Experience using fiber test equipment including an OTDR. Job Qualifications Must have 8+ years of networking experience. 5 + years ITS experience desired. High school degree or equivalent. Must possess excellent verbal and written communication skills. Certification from recognized fiber training program. Valid driver’s license required. Work Environment: While performing the duties of the job, the employee may be required to sit, stand, walk, handle, feel, and operate objects, tools, or controls. The employee may need to lift up to 50 pounds. This position requires both close and distance vision (corrected acceptable). The employee will be required to competently use computers and test equipment. Position may require working at heights up to 50 feet in a bucket truck. Working Conditions: Much of the work will be performed in outdoor settings, often near high-speed roadway traffic. Performance of the position requires working safely and may require working outdoors in all weather conditions, all noise levels, hazardous conditions, and on a full range of outdoor work surfaces. Work will also be performed indoors, and may require the employee to sit all day. Appropriate safety equipment will be provided for all expected conditions. Extensive travel will be required, approximately 90%. Gannett Fleming is an Equal Opportunity Affirmative Action Employer, including veterans and disability status. NO AGENCIES PLEASE: Unsolicited resumes from third party agencies will not be accepted.",Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) Senior Technician Job in Memphis,Full Time Employee,"Memphis, TN",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/intelligent-transportation-systems-its-senior-technician-job-memphis-tn-us-167864251.aspx?mescoid=5301072001001&jobPosition=19,,Logistics/Transportation,01b0479becd87e5fa7c1db7478d08175
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:01:32:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Napa,Full Time Employee,"Napa, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-napa-ca-us-167323590.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=1,,Logistics/Transportation,51aafc29834548264bf72ee123748631
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:01:58:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"High school  reading, writing and math skills; basic English usage; courtesy; neatness; adherence to instructions and deadlines; knowledge of, and skills in applying, basic cleaning and housekeeping procedures and methods; institutional experience desired.   #MACHINES, TOOLS AND EQUIPMENT USED ON JOB:   Cleaning and polishing solutions and compounds, vacuum, carpet shampooer, mop and broom, drive company vehicle, etc.     Job Requirements:High school  reading, writing and math skills; basic English usage; courtesy; neatness; adherence to instructions and deadlines; knowledge of, and skills in applying, basic cleaning and housekeeping procedures and methods; institutional experience desired.  Cleaning and polishing solutions and compounds, vacuum, carpet shampooer, mop and broom.  Preference given to those that have worked in a hospital /hotel environment.    Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=188556&site_id=35",Housekeeper Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30306",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/housekeeper-job-atlanta-ga-us-166963457.aspx?mescoid=3700623001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,4e3002caa2b04a3785235f94f6b184ad
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:01:59:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Thoroughly inspect all diesel related issues on company equipment, perform truck (tractor) safety and general maintenance related repairs, assist with major repairs in coordination with advanced level mechanics, and use basic electrical diagnostics to repair electrical systems.Complete advanced preventative maintenance inspections on tractor equipment in compliance with specified safety procedures and DOT regulationsThoroughly understand basic tractor maintenance, diagnosis, and repair, root causes of common issues, and corrective steps to keep trucks running at maximum efficiency.Recognize and identify, non-diesel specific related repair or maintenance items (trailer, tires, etc); Ensure the issue is fixed by appropriate personnel in a timely mannerPerform quality checks for entry level mechanics; Mentor and assist any shop personnel as needed to create a cohesive and well-rounded shop environment centered around learning.Utilize computer programs to track various information such as Asset Tracking, Work Order Management, Parts Management, etc.Assist in the moving of equipment around the yardMaintains a clean and safe work area compliant with OSHA and company regulation and policyMaintain a positive work atmosphere by acting and communicating in a manner which facilitates the success of business operations in order to meet company demands and expectations.Perform additional duties as requiredSkills: Demonstrated/proven superior customer service skills; valid drivers license; ability to read and understand repair manuals, understanding and ability to complete/fill tags and repair orders; computer keyboarding.Education: High School Diploma GED or graduation from trade/techinical school preferred. Additional technical school education may substitute for required experience. Drivers license required.Experience Required: Three (3) years of heavy equipment/mechanic related experience. Completion of Swift 3M Packet may substitute for one (1) year of required experience. Must possess the skills required to accomplish the essential job duties. Position RequirementsDemonstrated/proven superior customer service skills; valid drivers license; ability to read and understand repair manuals, understanding and ability to complete/fill tags and repair orders; computer keyboarding. Required EducationHigh School Diploma GED or graduation from trade/techinical school preferred. Additional technical school education may substitute for required experience. Drivers license required. Required ExperienceThree (3) years of heavy equipment/mechanic related experience. Completion of Swift 3M Packet may substitute for one (1) year of required experience. Must possess the skills required to accomplish the essential job duties.",Diesel Mechanic - m Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/diesel-mechanic-3m-job-denver-co-us-167889758.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=18,,,09eff9302ee6cbce469fbf7b9190e76b
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:02:18:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Industry: Meat DistributionLocation: Atlanta, GAWarehouse Supervisor (Bilingual in English and Spanish)Job Description: JOB SUMMARY: Supervises the day-to-day operations of the Warehouse department, to ensure efficient operations and a safe working environment. Schedules and monitors associate activities and equipment use to meet and exceed company objectives. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: Plans, implements, and monitors the day-to-day operations for the warehouse department to ensure that established objectives for shipping, product rotation, sanitation, safety, and timeliness are met or exceeded. Monitors loading, dispatch, and receiving times and makes appropriate changes, ensuring compliance with QIP, HACCP, and DOT regulations. Routinely informs and communicates with associates to ensure compliance with established warehouse productivity, safety, and sanitation policies and procedures. Monitors and completes numerous computer-based and manual reports and related paperwork, including time records, daily logs, damage reports, etc. Monitors product damage and audits routes to ensure reliable product delivery. Plans and schedules manpower. Plans and coordinates vehicle and equipment maintenance and utilization reports. Performs other related and assigned duties as necessary. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education and experience equivalent to: Education/Certification: AA degree from an accredited vocational, technical, or junior college institution. Forklift instructor certification. Experience: 3 to 6 years of relevant work experience. Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Knowledge of (B/basic; J/journey; E/expert): Relevant safety policies, practices, and procedures (J)Storage and shipment of food or allied products. (B)Food handling (B)Inventory control concepts and techniques (B)Barcoding (B)Company computer systems (B)Warehouse racking systems/processes (B)Supervisory concepts and techniques (B)Relevant regulatory procedures and standards (OSHA, USDA, AIB, HAACP, etc.) (B) Skill and ability to: Lead a diverse workforce in a 24 hour/7 day per week operation Work in a union environment Supervise and motivate associates in a team-based environment Interpret warehouse operations anomalies and identify appropriate solutions Work effectively in a general business environment, with a focus on high levels of quality and customer service Act in accordance with GSF’s Values and Creed LEADERSHIP/MANAGEMENT RESPONSIBILITY: Build and optimize schedule for team of 10-25, working on diverse activitiesProvide team members with direction and performance feedback on process stepsLead shifts to meet and exceed established metrics for efficiency and accuracyDevelop and implement standard operating procedures for teamSupervise other warehouse teams during after-hours or weekend shifts, as neededHelp develop and rollout of new process improvementsCollect process improvement feedback from the teamHire and onboarding new associatesTrain, develop and coach associatesReview hours, approve overtime and submit time for payroll processingTrack and manage associate performance, provide feedback, and take actPERFORMANCE CATEGORIES Productivity/quality standards: efficiency, timeliness, and reliability Productivity/quality standards: cases per hour Productivity/quality standards: product integrity Teamwork within the department and across departments Project/assignment standards Customer satisfaction External relationships with regulatory agencies Safety standards and procedures: associates Safety standards and procedures: facility and warehouse equipment Safety standards and procedures: food safety and handling.Salary: Competitive salaryContact: Send resume to lpozzolo@amigosmeat.com; jorgel@amigosmeat.com;  ",Monster,,"Industry: Meat DistributionLocation: Atlanta, GAWarehouse Supervisor (Bilingual in English and Spanish)Job Description: JOB SUMMARY: Supervises the day-to-day operations of the Warehouse department, to ensure efficient operations and a safe working environment. Schedules and monitors associate activities and equipment use to meet and exceed company objectives. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: Plans, implements, and monitors the day-to-day operations for the warehouse department to ensure that established objectives for shipping, product rotation, sanitation, safety, and timeliness are met or exceeded. Monitors loading, dispatch, and receiving times and makes appropriate changes, ensuring compliance with QIP, HACCP, and DOT regulations. Routinely informs and communicates with associates to ensure compliance with established warehouse productivity, safety, and sanitation policies and procedures. Monitors and completes numerous computer-based and manual reports and related paperwork, including time records, daily logs, damage reports, etc. Monitors product damage and audits routes to ensure reliable product delivery. Plans and schedules manpower. Plans and coordinates vehicle and equipment maintenance and utilization reports. Performs other related and assigned duties as necessary. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education and experience equivalent to: Education/Certification: AA degree from an accredited vocational, technical, or junior college institution. Forklift instructor certification. Experience: 3 to 6 years of relevant work experience. Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Knowledge of (B/basic; J/journey; E/expert): Relevant safety policies, practices, and procedures (J)Storage and shipment of food or allied products. (B)Food handling (B)Inventory control concepts and techniques (B)Barcoding (B)Company computer systems (B)Warehouse racking systems/processes (B)Supervisory concepts and techniques (B)Relevant regulatory procedures and standards (OSHA, USDA, AIB, HAACP, etc.) (B) Skill and ability to: Lead a diverse workforce in a 24 hour/7 day per week operation Work in a union environment Supervise and motivate associates in a team-based environment Interpret warehouse operations anomalies and identify appropriate solutions Work effectively in a general business environment, with a focus on high levels of quality and customer service Act in accordance with GSF’s Values and Creed LEADERSHIP/MANAGEMENT RESPONSIBILITY: Build and optimize schedule for team of 10-25, working on diverse activitiesProvide team members with direction and performance feedback on process stepsLead shifts to meet and exceed established metrics for efficiency and accuracyDevelop and implement standard operating procedures for teamSupervise other warehouse teams during after-hours or weekend shifts, as neededHelp develop and rollout of new process improvementsCollect process improvement feedback from the teamHire and onboarding new associatesTrain, develop and coach associatesReview hours, approve overtime and submit time for payroll processingTrack and manage associate performance, provide feedback, and take actPERFORMANCE CATEGORIES Productivity/quality standards: efficiency, timeliness, and reliability Productivity/quality standards: cases per hour Productivity/quality standards: product integrity Teamwork within the department and across departments Project/assignment standards Customer satisfaction External relationships with regulatory agencies Safety standards and procedures: associates Safety standards and procedures: facility and warehouse equipment Safety standards and procedures: food safety and handling.Salary: Competitive salaryContact: Send resume to lpozzolo@amigosmeat.com; jorgel@amigosmeat.com;  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-167708453.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=9,,,f3ec81a187088310398842c91f0fd078
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:02:21:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Channahon, IL.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Co. Chemical Division has developed into a premium tank truck carrier over the past 60 plus years of offering outstanding service to the chemical industry handling both liquid and dry bulk chemicals. Transport Service Co. has a reputation of meeting the unique needs for customer's equipment and service requirements.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division is now offering premium pay to drivers with tank experience. ** Company Drivers:Local, Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Owner-Operators:Local, Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Competitive pay - mileage or percentage contract Loading and unloading pay Zone pay for local work Health insurance plans available 100% of Fuel Surcharge paid to Owner-Operator 100% of Billable Pump or Compressor Charge paid to Owner-Operator Paid Orientation and Training Paid Weekly Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay *Independent contractors referring their own lease drivers are not eligible for referral payments And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.** Premium pay requires Class A CDL with a minimum of 5 years recent, verifiable tank experience. Call 800-871-4581 Option #3 Dawn/Recruiter for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Channahon,Full Time Employee,"Channahon, IL",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-channahon-il-us-167862559.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=3,,Logistics/Transportation,463ad600682f3b2f4fb93de2926ed9de
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:02:21:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Fairfield,Full Time Employee,"Fairfield, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-fairfield-ca-us-167323547.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,,Logistics/Transportation,63685b73257614b6733071d80912ed28
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:02:26:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Great Opportunity! High Commission for “New Agents” Brand New Agents (No Experience)Earn 95% of the first year premium PLUS renewals.Click here for more info. “Agents with experience can earn up to 115%”                                                                       FRESH Leads – You’ll receive REAL inquiries from individuals currently researching final expense insurance. Our Complete Training Library is FREE to our Agents,and includes more than 100 hours of audio & video Training. Find out how NEW Agents are making $2,000 per week by visiting:  HowToSellFinalExpense.com",General Sales Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30327",,http://jobview.monster.com/general-sales-job-atlanta-ga-us-167957388.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,5d60d05576f5c1d54dd69f62974d3fd7
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:02:31:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Aflac - Benefits Sales Consultant Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30311",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-benefits-sales-consultant-job-atlanta-ga-us-167809113.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,,Customer Support/Client Care,0ce16105a3e9e65023e9bc41ec38b7a1
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:02:31:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Freed Maxick ABL (Asset Based Lending) Services was established in 1996 in recognition of the growing outsourcing requirements of the commercial finance industry.  Since that time, Freed Maxick ABL Services has become the largest provider of field examination services in North America.  The unit has over 25 full-time personnel and performs over 1300 field examinations annually. Our objective is to assist the commercial finance industry in evaluating the integrity of their customers’ collateral by performing pre-loan surveys and rotational collateral monitoring field examinations.  We provide these services to financial institutions granting loans, increasing credit lines or reducing loan loss exposure based on our field examination report results.  We also help provide direction for an orderly liquidation of operations.  Immediate opportunities in the Atlanta area for home-based professionals with an accounting degree and previous experience in asset based lending auditing, public accounting, internal audit or as a controller / accounting manager. Our Auditors (Field Examiners) assist lenders in evaluating their clients' collateral. Strong interpersonal and computer skills a must (especially Excel), and the ability to travel extensively, including national travel. This position requires 75 % regular travel. Send cover letter, resume and salary requirements in confidence to career@freedmaxick.com. Diverse Client Base Challenging Positions With A World-Class Group Of Professionals Excellent Salary And Benefit Package Positive, Productive Work Environment Growth And Advancement Opportunities Visit our website to learn more www.freedmaxick.com",Field Examiner / Auditor Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30303",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/field-examiner-auditor-job-atlanta-ga-us-157015039.aspx?mescoid=1300111001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,30c9ec553d878bed03a7fdceb0d9c83c
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:02:31:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsible for completion of the Resident Assessment Instrument in accordance with federal and state regulations and company policy and procedures. Acts as in-house case manager by considering all aspects of the resident's care and coordinating services with physicians, families, third party payers and facility staff. Registered Nurse with current, active license in state of practice Minimum two (2) years of clinical experience in a health care setting Minimum of one (1) year of experience in a long term care setting Prior experience as an MDS coordinator with demonstrated expertise Must be capable of maintaining regular attendance Clinical assessment skills at the level necessary to meet the job requirements Basic understanding of computer technology, including email use Knowledge of nursing and medical practices and procedures, as well as laws, regulations, and guidelines that pertain to long term care Knowledge of Medicare regulations and coverage guidelines as related to skilled nursing Knowledge of case mix guidelines as indicated by state specific reimbursement model Ability to plan, organize, develop, implement and interpret the programs, goals, objectives, policies and procedures, etc., that are necessary for providing quality care Proven written and oral communication skills Proven decision making and analytical skill with ability to make independent decisions on a regular basis Capable of researching new methods and principles to incorporate them into existing nursing practices Must be able to maintain confidentiality regarding patient, employee, and company proprietary information Must have the ability to relate professionally and positively and work cooperatively with residents, families and other employees at all levels Additional Information:",Director of Resident Assessment Job in Decatur,Full Time Employee,"Decatur, GA 30030",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-resident-assessment-job-decatur-ga-us-165816675.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,ba37172a24879bf5bd290e5cf2b76279
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:02:57:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB ANNOUNCEMENT   JOB TITLE:                 DENTAL ASSISTANT                          SALARY:                    $27,068.91 ($13.01 per hour)   BRIEF JOB DESCRIPTION: Assists Dentist in the delivery of Dental Services. Performs clerical duties relative to patient appointment records.  Provides chair side assistance in the examination and treatment of dental patients. Location: Main Center  MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Graduate of an accredited Dental Assistant Program.  Six months to one-year experience as a Dental Assistant in a public or private setting preferred. Bilingual a plus.   CONTACT:              HUMAN RESOURCES DEPARTMENT   CLOSING DATE:             UNTIL FILLED E.O.E.  ",Monster,,"JOB ANNOUNCEMENT   JOB TITLE:                 DENTAL ASSISTANT                          SALARY:                    $27,068.91 ($13.01 per hour)   BRIEF JOB DESCRIPTION: Assists Dentist in the delivery of Dental Services. Performs clerical duties relative to patient appointment records.  Provides chair side assistance in the examination and treatment of dental patients. Location: Main Center  MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Graduate of an accredited Dental Assistant Program.  Six months to one-year experience as a Dental Assistant in a public or private setting preferred. Bilingual a plus.   CONTACT:              HUMAN RESOURCES DEPARTMENT   CLOSING DATE:             UNTIL FILLED E.O.E.  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/dental-assistant-job-atlanta-ga-us-166706466.aspx?mescoid=3100555001001&jobPosition=5,,,ad1d6a5571ffc3b59e4ee25097c2c9bb
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:03:47:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Georgia Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities (DBHDD), is seeking qualified candidates for the position of Craftsman at Georgia Regional Hospital – Atlanta, located in Decatur, GA.Job Description: Oversees the repair, maintenance and construction of state buildings and related structures. Supervises and plans work of assigned staff. Job Responsibilities & Performance Standards: Supervises and plans work of assigned staff  Assembles, installs and/or repairs wiring, electrical and electronic components, pipe systems and plumbing, machinery, and equipment  Coordinates the handling of hazardous materials according to laws and regulations  Diagnoses and corrects mechanical and structural problems, checking blueprints, repair manuals, and parts catalogs  Ensures all maintenance conforms to quality standards and designated timeliness  Installs, maintains, evaluates and repairs any components of the systems  Operates plant equipment and building automation systems  Operates trade related tools and equipment; maintains/assists an accurate inventory of all materials and equipment  Oversees routine preventive maintenance to ensure that machines operate smoothly, efficiently and physical condition of buildings does not deteriorate  Performs general maintenance and repair work on facilities and equipment  Performs skilled painting, carpentry, and roofing tasks  Reads, utilizes blueprints, plans, drawings and sketches to determine the work to be performed and resources required  Renovates or builds additions to existing facilities  Repairs and performs maintenance on plumbing fixtures, lighting, air vents and air conditioning units and facilities  Wears safety equipment and observes all safety practices and regulations   Sample Technical Competencies: Knowledge of the standard methods, practices, tools and equipment used in a variety of building maintenanceAbility to repair and maintain tools and equipmentAbility to safely work at various heights on ladders, platforms and scaffoldsAbility to install, repair, and maintain component parts of the systems Knowledge of plant equipment and building systems Skill in the use and application of equipment, tools, and equipment applicable to area of assignment Ability to train/teach the operations of systemsAbility to assign tasks to lower staff and/or act as a lead worker This position is subject to close at any time once a satisfactory applicant pool has been identified.  ",Craftsman Job in Decatur,Full Time,"Decatur, GA 30034",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/craftsman-job-decatur-ga-us-167128307.aspx?mescoid=2700403001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),05fe84053e461254d7c80b571efa6a9e
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:03:47:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Entry Level Management Trainee - Immediate HireAbout the Job at 3MP Atlanta, Inc.​Businesses everywhere are interested in outsourced marketing and sales but few are savvy enough to accomplish the job themselves.​ Outsourced marketing and sales is the standard, and our service is highly valued.​ We help Fortune 500 companies within the telecommunications industry market new and inventive products business-to-consumer. We are the best in the industry at sales and marketing, which is why we represent such prestigious clients. That being said, endless growth and opportunity exists within our company.​  We are looking for intelligent, hard working individuals! This is a chance for new candidates to learn firsthand about sales, marketing, advertising, and communications.​ 3MP Atlanta, Inc. promotes solely from within, which grants unlimited growth and opportunity.  This job involves one to one sales based interaction with customers.www.3mpatlanta.com BenefitsSales Commissions paid weekly:  3MP Atlanta, Inc. understands that within a sales industry it’s important to have money in your pocket.​ 3MP Atlanta, Inc. provides weekly paychecks.​ We believe wasted time is wasted opportunity.​  Pay based on performance.Hands on Sales Training:  At 3MP Atlanta, Inc. we offer daily sales seminars as well as hands on training.​ Sales gets a poor reputation since most organizations don't have the resources to train their employees efficiently. At 3MP Atlanta, Inc. we value the development of our employees! ​ As a society we believe that one must be well educated to perform at a high level within a professional environment. And, most importantly, At 3MP Atlanta, Inc. we make sales education and sales training fun!Qualified Sales leads provided:  3MP Atlanta, Inc. agrees that cold calling is time consuming, difficult and draining.​ When our clients are hiring us to drive sales and market their product we request “hot leads."" Community Service:  3MP Atlanta, Inc. believes that it is important to give back to the community.​ We have contributed to Operation Smile, the Georgia Humane Society, Down Syndrome Association of America and have made many other charitable contributions.​ Sales is the driving force of our business but our most important sale is giving back to the community that we have taken so much from.​Travel Opportunities:  3MP Atlanta, Inc. offers many travel opportunities within the United States.​  This upcoming year 3MP Atlanta, Inc. plans to travel to Phoenix, Seattle, New Orleans, New York, Chicago & Los Angeles.​ The primary focus of these trips is to learn about different cultures, educate employees at sales seminars, and have some well-deserved rest and relaxation.​Time Management & Financial Management:  Along with extensive sales seminars, 3MP Atlanta, Inc. offers time management and financial management courses.​ As our employees grow and develop within the company we want to make sure everyone is able to save for the future.​ Our extensive courses teach our employees firsthand how to save money for an early retirement.​Team Building & Recreational Events:  After hours 3MP Atlanta, Inc. provides great networking events.​ Company karaoke nights and bowling nights occur weekly.​ We have a work hard play hard mentality.​Qualifications & ExperienceMotivation to be part of our Marketing & Sales Management Training ProgramExceptionally driven with a very strong work ethicExcellent communication skillsHave a strong desire to succeed and advance into managementHave a positive ""Solution Oriented"" attitudeAre competitive, sports mindedPossess an entrepreneurial spiritAre goal orientedHave a student mentalityPossess qualities of a natural leaderBachelor’s DegreeCustomer service or hospitality experienceRetail sales experienceExperience creating and delivering sales presentationsAthletic/sports experience",Entry Level Management Trainee - Immediate Hire Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30318",Advertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-management-trainee-immediate-hire-job-atlanta-ga-us-167049111.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=3,,Business/Strategic Management,72b8e9e768849ffd4edd25054621997f
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:04:11:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"On Call Drivers Needed for Courier Company With Box Truck or Tractor Trailer COMPANY: Virtuoso Transport Connections inc Courier company  needs temporary/part time drivers that could lead to full time work in the Atlanta area. You must have a good drivers record, and can pass a drug test any time, as well as a professional appearance. We need a driver with a 16 foot box truck, and a driver with a tractor. THANK YOU     Virtuoso Transport Connections Inc   Respond online today.​ Location: Decatur, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 21723 Vehicle Type: 16 ft. Box Truck Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Decatur,Temporary/Contract/Project,"On Call Drivers Needed for Courier Company With Box Truck or Tractor Trailer COMPANY: Virtuoso Transport Connections inc Courier company  needs temporary/part time drivers that could lead to full time work in the Atlanta area. You must have a good drivers record, and can pass a drug test any time, as well as a professional appearance. We need a driver with a 16 foot box truck, and a driver with a tractor. THANK YOU     Virtuoso Transport Connections Inc   Respond online today.​ Location: Decatur, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 21723 Vehicle Type: 16 ft. Box Truck Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-decatur-ga-us-167906695.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=20,,Logistics/Transportation,38f6982c9b5d8bd8263a49e1b1b7a5f3
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:04:12:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Desktop Support - Runner Job #:  657952Apex Systems, the nation's 2nd largest IT staffing firm, is looking for a Staging Technician who would be interested in a professional IT job opportunity for a large Healthcare company in the Richardson area.Key details of the Staging Technician role:Pay: $13/hour (paid weekly, on W2 basis)Hours/Days: Monday to Thursday 3PM-2AMLocation: Richardson, TX 75082Contract Duration: 6 weeksDress Code: Business CasualHiring Requirements for the Staging Technician role:Staff capable of communicating in English, ability to follow instructions and work with the migration leads through chats and conference callsMust have own/reliable cellphoneKnowledge of PC and Laptop and how to connect the cables correctly to the systemMust be able to lift minimum of 40 poundsPerks of working with Apex Systems include: CompTIA certification discounts, career development workshops through Apex Systems, technical training webinars, contractor health benefits (at a group discounted rate), matching 401K, and more! To apply, please send resume and contact information to Chelsea at cderr@apexsystemsinc.com!        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Desktop Support - Runner Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Desktop Support - Runner Job #:  657952Apex Systems, the nation's 2nd largest IT staffing firm, is looking for a Staging Technician who would be interested in a professional IT job opportunity for a large Healthcare company in the Richardson area.Key details of the Staging Technician role:Pay: $13/hour (paid weekly, on W2 basis)Hours/Days: Monday to Thursday 3PM-2AMLocation: Richardson, TX 75082Contract Duration: 6 weeksDress Code: Business CasualHiring Requirements for the Staging Technician role:Staff capable of communicating in English, ability to follow instructions and work with the migration leads through chats and conference callsMust have own/reliable cellphoneKnowledge of PC and Laptop and how to connect the cables correctly to the systemMust be able to lift minimum of 40 poundsPerks of working with Apex Systems include: CompTIA certification discounts, career development workshops through Apex Systems, technical training webinars, contractor health benefits (at a group discounted rate), matching 401K, and more! To apply, please send resume and contact information to Chelsea at cderr@apexsystemsinc.com!        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/desktop-support-runner-job-atlanta-ga-us-168003874.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d1535acf06d822ebbca388d586fc760f
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:04:18:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a UX / UI Interaction Designer in Atlanta, Georgia (GA).Responsibilities: Iterate on prototypes from low to high-fidelity, based on metrics and user insights Facilitate a consistent product experience across channels and devices, and between the physical and digital worlds of each product Evolve and maintain design guidelines including colors, icons, typography, imagery and interaction concepts Directly collaborate with other designers, developers, creative directors, and product managers to help improve the usability and presentation of product features Critique the work of peers and incorporate peers' and directors' insights from critique into one's own designs Design compelling digital experiences and reach millions of users across desktop and mobile spaces Work closely with product managers and engineers throughout the product development processREQUIREMENTS:The ideal candidate will have similar skills and abilities to perform the duties listed above. Any relevant education and / or training will be considered a plus.",UX / UI Interaction Designer Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30318",,http://jobview.monster.com/ux-ui-interaction-designer-job-atlanta-ga-us-168067612.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=10,"100,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),355fe2a26dc57c28df83543eab857c8c
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:04:25:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"PeopleEnsure the cleaning techs and mechanics have proper instruction and procedures to perform their duties safely and efficiently.Respond to all cleaning techs concerns and act on them promptly as they relate to: SafetyMechanics & Cleaning techs abilities to perform his/her duties effectively, Opportunities that would increase efficiency for both the Company and the customer, Cleaning procedures and equipment needs & Maintenance procedures and equipment needsEquipment and FacilityEvaluate daily capacities and thru-puts on shop and washracks to determine any areas of improvement in efficiencies concerning cleaning processes and procedures.Coordinate and carry out solicitation of potential new commercial shop and washrack business.Manage existing commercial customers to ensure our washracks and shops are consistently meeting requirements.Communicate any problems associated with service to the Branch Manager with recommendations for improvements.Monitor chemical inventory level.Measure amount consumed relative to activity.Manage effluent disposal and ensure compliance with all environmental guidelines and regulations at a branch level.Maintain equipment according to company guidelines, along with Federal agency guidelines.Track and maintain inventoryFinancialDevelop new commercial maintenance and cleaning revenue.Track shop and washrack revenue numbers compared to plan and goals.DataEnsure cleaning tickets are approved and entered into the cleaning system on a timely basis.Where applicable ensure invoicing for commercial cleaning accounts is completed on a daily basis.Track productivity and KPI’s on the washrack and report these to the Branch Manager.Ensure commercial accounts receivables are kept current.Ensure all work orders are approved and entered.Customer ServiceEnsure the washracks and shops meet all customer requirements and any changes are communicated immediately.Service failure reports are recorded and brought to the attention of the Branch Manager or designate.Utilize sales report form to report commercial sales activity to the Branch Manager.Safety and RegulatoryEnsure all shop and washrack equipment meets regulatory and corporate compliance.Assist in ensuring processes allow cleaning techs and mechanics to complete their duties in a safe manner.Assist in ensuring safety equipment is available and in use by employees at all required times.Accountable for developing an environment that adheres to the companies Safety, Health, Environmental and Security policiesAuthorityMaintain process control and respond to needed or required changes as they occur.Maintain and control environmental regulations and report discrepancies to Branch Management.Maintain control of disposal activity with all wastes generated by the facility.Knowledge/Skills:Five to seven years of related experienceGood knowledge of maintenance and tank wash industryExperience in bulk and/or hazardous commodities is desirableAdvanced communication and managerial skillsSelf-motivated and able to work with minimal supervisionExperience in computerized environmentGood sales and customer development skillsUnderstanding of marketing services",Shop and Washrack Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/shop-washrack-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-168042465.aspx?mescoid=5301080001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,96344bfd8bdd26a41eaefd18a68fe0d3
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:05:01:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"COMPUTER/IT Senior Hyperion Analyst. Work in Atlanta, GA. Dvlp & maintain Hyperion & Oracle BI apps. Reqs: Bachelor's Comp Sci, Engg or rel +5 yrs exp in IT or Finance rel position; 3 yrs Hyperion Essbase Admin exp; Expert proficncy w/MS Excel; Proficncy in Financial Reporting, SmartView, & OBIEE. Must have legal authority to work in US. EEOE. Mail resume: Valerie Hunter, Randstad, 3625 Cumberland Blvd, #600, Atlanta, GA 30339.",Senior Hyperion Analyst Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30339",All,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-hyperion-analyst-job-atlanta-ga-us-167920952.aspx?mescoid=1500144001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4206be335373d5d4e32cb4fe65dcda36
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:05:14:49,No,jobs.monster.com," What if you could actually live that life you dreamed of? What if you didn’t have to go at it alone? What if you had the Power? Here, nothing is impossible. Your success is in your own hands, and we have your back the whole way. Strong leaders, mentors, training and powerful tools – they’ll help you push yourself to the top, and keep pushing, until your idea of the top is higher than you ever imagined. It’s time to kiss your dreams hello.Named Fortune Magazine’s #1 Workplace for Millennials, when you begin your sales career at Power, you know you will be set up to thrive from day one.  All sales representatives are full-time, W-2 employees who complete our proven sales training program — a comprehensive approach to learning corporate sales strategy, communications, and leadership skills that will map out a path to future opportunities and financial independence. Sales representatives will also gain exposure to a variety of other areas within the company, including business development, marketing and operations — and will be provided ongoing opportunities for growth in the form of sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis, as well as unparalleled leadership conferences featuring high-profile, world-renowned speakers in business, entertainment, sports, and government twice a year.  Primary job responsibilities include:No cold calls required as all leads are pre-qualifiedDelivery of interactive sales presentations to homeowners on Power’s eco-friendly, green products and services Participation in ongoing sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis Qualifications:Highly developed interpersonal, organizational and communication skillsAbility to speak publicly with confidence and poiseStrong sense of ambition, self-motivation and self-disciplineCommitted individual who is passionate about fulfilling the company’s missionNaturally positive, outgoing and articulate individual who thrives in social settings Previous sales experience preferred BA/BS preferredSalary and Benefits:$75,000-90,000 average first-year compensation Monthly opportunities for performance-based rewards, such as luxury vacations, high-end electronics, gift cards and tickets to concerts and sporting eventsVarious medical, dental, life and disability insurance plans that can be tailored to your specific needs or the needs of your familyAmple paid vacation and holidaysA competitive 401(k) retirement savings program, matched by PowerAccess to the latest technology, such as laptops, smart phones and tablets that will help you reach your earnings goals faster and more efficientlyA dynamic social program filled with can’t miss events, parties, and activities, including an annual bonus in the form of a company trip to a tropical destination for you and a guest.",Sales Representative Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",Architectural and Design Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-job-atlanta-ga-us-167710410.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=6,"75,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,3fca27e016eb723d2baf3eeb3f340ec3
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:05:26:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have strong experience within Account Management? Volt in partnership with a leading aviation company is looking for a Customer Service Account Manager in the College Park, GA area. The position includes but is responsible for all aspects of customer accounts including quoting and order process, contract management, revenue growth and performance reporting. We are looking for a self-motivator to work innovative team. Aviation knowledge or experience is required. Bilingual Preferred. Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Requirements are: Maintains strong client relationships and acts as the primary point of contact for all customer service activity. Leads Customer Service Team and acts as an escalation point for issues identified by Customer Service Representatives. Ensures that customer service representatives are trained and knowledgeable on the global processes. Ensures customer quotations and purchase orders are managed to meet expectations. Manages and attends meetings to resolve problems and provide solutions. Works with Purchasing, Operations and Sales to coordinate the purchase order flow in the warehouse as required. Must have prior Aviation knowledge/experience. Conducts customer field visits and periodic program performance reviews. Assist and perform responsibilities given by the customer service Director. Works with Sales and Purchasing on forecasting.",Customer Service Account Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-account-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-167976702.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,General/Other: Customer Support/Client Care,ce901022d17edd2e4f4be6a9ae268bfb
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:05:26:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our key client has retained us to identify a Sr. Cost Accountant for an aerospace manufacturing company. This role offers great potential for growth into a Finance Manager within 12 months. This person will report directly to the President, and is responsible for creating and maintaining daily/monthly/ad hoc sales and operational analyses, forecasting and budgeting financial performance, and maintaining product standard costs.Duties:Create and maintain various internal management reports.Prepare ad-hoc reports and analyses including historical distributor performance, new product pricing and profitability, and operational metricsAssist with preparation of annual budget and quarterly reforecastComplete monthly variance analysis and support board presentationsMaintain and update standard costsInvestigate and resolve manufacturing variancesInterface with outside audit firms as neededSkills:Outgoing and confident. Able to build relationships across departmentsAttention to detail with an understanding of financial modelingSelf-motivated and able to work independentlyAble to work with and manipulate large volumes of dataExperience with standard costing a strong plusEfficient processor and compiler of financial informationExperience:Undergraduate degree in Finance or AccountingMBA preferred but not requiredC.P.A. certification a strong plus3-7 years' work experience in a finance or accounting role, including exposure to forecasting and/or financial modelingExcellent analytical and technical skillsExceptional communication and presentation skillsStrong computer desktop skills and Microsoft Excel skills (i.e., macros, pivot tables, etc.) requiredAerospace experience strongly preferred although not required",Sr. Cost Accountant Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,AtlantaGA,Computer/IT Services Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-cost-accountant-job-atlanta-ga-us-168036055.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=8,"100,000.00 - 105,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,effae325d916e5978b5e98a462e290d4
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:05:29:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Perform thorough inspections and related repairs on equipment owned or operated by Swift Transportation as directed by supervisor and provide superior customer service to Swift drivers.Complete advanced preventative maintenance inspections to comply with DOT regulations and assist with basic mechanical repairsUtilize basic understanding of trailer maintenance, diagnosis, and repair, root causes of common issues, and corrective steps to keep trailers running at maximum efficiency.Perform quality checks for entry level mechanics; Mentor and assist any shop personnel as needed to create a cohesive and well-rounded shop environment centered around learning.Utilize computer programs to track various information such as Asset Tracking, Work Order Management, Parts Management, etc.Recognize and identify, non-trailer specific related repair or maintenance items; Ensure the issue is fixed by appropriate personnel in a timely mannerAssist in the moving of equipment around the yardMaintains a clean and safe work area compliant with OSHA and company regulation and policyMaintain a positive work atmosphere by acting and communicating in a manner which facilitates the success of business operations in order to meet company demands and expectations.Perform additional duties as requiredSkills: Demonstrated/proven superior customer service skills; valid drivers license; ability to read and understand repair manuals, understanding and ability to complete/fill tags and repair orders; computer keyboarding.Education: High School Diploma GED or graduation from trade/techinical school preferred. Additional technical school education may substitute for required experience. Drivers license required.Experience Required: Three (3) years of heavy equipment/mechanic related experience. Completion of Swift 3MT Packet may substitute for one (1) year of required experience. Position RequirementsDemonstrated/proven superior customer service skills; valid drivers license; ability to read and understand repair manuals, understanding and ability to complete/fill tags and repair orders; computer keyboarding. Required EducationHigh School Diploma GED or graduation from trade/techinical school preferred. Additional technical school education may substitute for required experience. Drivers license required. Required ExperienceThree (3) years of heavy equipment/mechanic related experience. Completion of Swift 3MT Packet may substitute for one (1) year of required experience.",Trailer Mechanic - mt Job in Arcadia,"Full Time, Employee","Arcadia, FL","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/trailer-mechanic-3mt-job-arcadia-fl-us-167889740.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=19,,,268eea8e21b0dbc406238616ae37489b
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:05:31:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have an eye for detail and like to multi-task? If so, this fast paced role is for you! Our Fulfillment Center Processors are responsible for many different tasks including performing audits, recording violations, and booking merchandise into the mainframe by sorting, scanning and repacking according to purchase order.  They also assure that all customer orders are accurately filled, paperwork is completed and merchandise is shipped in a timely manner. We’ll value your: Ability to walk and stand for long periods of time Ability to follow a productivity program Ability to lift up to 50 pounds This position works 3-12 hour days. At Bon-Ton, we want to give back to our associates. We offer competitive pay, great associate discount, 401k plan (once eligible) – including potential company match and great volunteer opportunities. ",Fulfillment Center Processor Job in West Jefferson,Part Time Employee,"West Jefferson, OH",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/fulfillment-center-processor-job-west-jefferson-oh-us-167857443.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,Logistics/Transportation,e85ba35d6eff63a618bdeff0f198df1e
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:06:10:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Searching for an Overhead Crane Operator for a holding center in The Port of Indiana!! OH Crane Operator Company Profile Our client is a premium provider of flatbed trucking services. Company owned equipment comprises over half of the fleet and is operated by the highest quality flatbed drivers using top of the line equipment allowing truck movement to be tracked in real time and customers can be assured their shipments will arrive on time. Position Overview Loading and unloading steel coils from rail cars and warehouse locations. The Ideal Candidate ·         1-2 years Remote Overhead Crane (25T preferred)·         Working knowledge of safety protocol in operating OH cranes·         Understanding of warehouse operations About JMJ Talent Solutions and Staffing JMJ Talent Solutions has been proudly servicing our clients with integrity and responsiveness. Our staff focuses on the needs of our clients and the proficiencies of our candidates guaranteeing the best placements. We have long standing relationships with HR professionals in the market we serve. We are proud of our diligent work, our reputation, and our track record. We base this on our commitment to professional partnering, and it shows! Year after year, our business grows primarily through our customer service, satisfied clients, and happy candidates. JMJ Talent Solutions is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. Our policy of equal employment opportunity is to recruit, hire, train and promote persons without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, handicap or any other protected status. Visit or call our offices 2621 Highway Avenue Highland, IN 46322 | 219-838-56273195 Willowcreek Road Portage, IN 46368 | 219-764-96754361 Franklin Street Michigan City, IN 46360 | 219-879-4900 www.jmjtalent.com",Overhead Crane Operator Job in Portage,Full Time Employee,"Portage, IN 46368",,http://jobview.monster.com/overhead-crane-operator-job-portage-in-us-167341219.aspx?mescoid=5301074001001&jobPosition=8,,Logistics/Transportation,3973ee7899b9f5e9bca6949ab2d07a91
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:06:12:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Selenium QA Engineer Job #:  665140 Selenium Consultant/Tester  Will be acting as Selenium SMENeed to know how to use SQL to query SQL and OracleExperienced in System Performance and Regression testing Needs to know automated testing very well Agile environment        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Selenium QA Engineer Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/selenium-qa-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-167946808.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),772710f1f4c06074b9a1be0c4df6849b
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:06:12:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"TRAINER: Presenter - Teacher - Speaker - Educator - Consultant – WANTED NOW Job Label:TTTFLCV_Atlanta ~~Seeking trainers for our highly successful research-based school program: 21ST CENTURY CLASSROOM MANAGEMENT:  EFFECTIVE STRATEGIES FOR WORKING SUCCESSFULLY WITH CHILDREN WHO CHALLENGE™You will train other teachers using our copyrighted and highly successful evidence-based programs. We are the Center for Teacher Effectiveness and we train largely in PK – 12 grade public schools and charter schools and at universities nationwide.  A smaller number of our trainers train at boys and girls clubs, military (DOD) schools, as well as at churches and private and Christian schools.  We are seeking teachers / trainers / presenters / and consultants to join our team. You have the choice to remain in your current position and train for us on “off days” or train for us on a more robust basis.  You can work in your local area, regional area, or nationally and travel to work in other states (you determine).Our training (hopefully your training) helps make extraordinary teachers. Our presentation (hopefully your presentation) is proven to help teachers, students, and schools succeed together on a level they never thought possible. We have and immense amount of school success data and we are eager to share it with you. Click on the link immediately below to view school success data from Dr. Johnny Alvarado, an administrator with the Fresno County Office of Education. These are the kind of results we are known for (and hopefully you will be known for if you join our team)!  https://www.filesanywhere.com/fs/v.aspx?v=8b6f65875c616fbd739cWe do NOT pay hourly. Our trainers usually earn $1000 - $3500 per training day.  None of our trainers earn less than $1000 per training day and often much more.If your passion to present is strong and you believe your presentation style would be equally strong; and if you have demonstrated the art of presenting / training / teaching / and leading exceedingly well, then we are interested in you. If you possess the qualities of a ""Top Tier"" professional, please follow the steps BELOW in this post to apply to our elite team.~~If you:1. Are a real 'teachers' teacher' or school leader (you are good at what you do)2. Or, are an impeccably professional trainer / consultant / speaker / presenter3. Love leading, teaching, and speaking - and are good at all three 4. Have an entrepreneurial spiritThen we:1. Will invite you to join our team of esteemed instructors2. Will train you to become an elite regional or national teacher/trainer for our firm3. Will help you achieve all of your personal and professional goalsWhat types of professionals are we seeking?  Certified educators of all job types and grade levels, but we do have a small number of trainers who are not certified. It is beneficial to have a background in the education field or close ties/a connection with PK - 12 education. If you are not certified but have a close connection working with children and enjoy training adults – then you will be considered.  We also seek university professors, seasoned speakers, and trainers from all backgrounds and currently successful consultants.For illustrative purposes, successful consultants who work with us have the following backgrounds: teachers, principals, counselors, professors, assistant principals, superintendents, retired educators, social workers, behavior specialist, staff development coordinators, professional speakers and consultants, authors, plus other backgrounds dealing with students. We also have a few trainers that have worked training adults in other areas (e.g. in prison settings) and also those that are speakers for other companies.By the way, if you are a retired educator (or retired trainer) we are interested and hope you will consider our offer because your experience is invaluable!Our trainers are highly qualified and can hold the attention and deliver a message to an audience. You MUST enjoy training and staff development.If you are interested in learning more about our company, beliefs, financials, etc., we request that you reply to this posting with a resume or brief describing your background and your connection with students/schools.• WE WILL MEET THIS SUMMER ON THE EAST COAST• APPLICANTS WHO MEET OUR REQUIREMENTS WILL BE INVITED TO ATTEND OUR NEXT 4-DAY TRAIN-THE-TRAINER SESSION.Orlando, FLJuly 11th-14th, 2016 (Monday- Thursday)Rosen Plaza Hotel & Conference Center9700 International DriveOrlando, FL 32819 * All consultants and trainers for our company attend a train-the-trainer session prior to training at schools – this is required.We seek exemplary teachers and administrators who serve children, parents, and teachers honorably and with great commitment. Like you, we are also a highly regarded. Our strong corporation enjoys a sterling reputation with teachers, schools, and districts all around the United States and in other countries!• Our educational roots run deep. Components of our program were initially developed with the help and guidance of Dr. Madeline Hunter and Coach John Wooden, both from UCLA. Yes, that’s right, Coach John Wooden!• Integrity means much to us.We are calling for accomplished teachers and administrators to help us meet an ever-growing training demand. We seek you because we need the very best to help us train in schools and districts and at education conferences everywhere. We are hoping you are that teacher or administrator.You don't know if you qualify?  Here is how to tell:Do you possess our ""three P's?""• Personality. Do you have the personality to deliver content in a way that will engage, entertain, move, and inspire your audience? We will give you the content that will make you shine, but can you DELIVER the message?• Professionalism. Are you the teacher, administrator, speaker, presenter, or professional that others admire? Are you the one that others come to for advice because you care and you are good! • Passion. The most important ""P."" Even more than a yearning to earn a big paycheck, do you have an overriding passion to improve education and help teachers and children succeed like never before?If you answered no to any of the three questions above, we are not the right company for you. If your passion is just a big paycheck we will not work well together. If, however, your passion is to help improve teaching and learning BUT you don’t mind receiving handsome pay for doing just that, then we want to talk with you immediately!Your first step will be to evaluate us and to do this you will access our website to learn about our heritage, history, and our beliefs as well as view some of our school success data.If you believe you would make a ""Top Tier"" presenter, click below to learn more about this opportunity! http://www.timetoteachtrainer.com/directors/rick-dahlgren (follow the steps on our CEO’s page).We are prepared to offer the finest teacher, speaker, consultant, or administrator a professional and financial opportunity of a lifetime. An opportunity that comes with pay unmatched, even in the corporate world.Several additional thoughts:**** Check this out today. You will be glad you did and we want to meet you!**** Retired and retiring teachers and administrators or leaders are also strongly encouraged to apply.**** If this opportunity does not fit you but you know an impeccable professional who would be a great trainer for us would you kindly forward this message to that professional?**** In the event you believe this may be ""too good to be true"" we are immediately prepared to have you speak with ""active duty"" classroom teachers and principals who have been training for us for many years and in some cases close to two decades!Thank you for reviewing our information - we wish you the best as you endeavor to help teachers and students succeed!  Our nationally recognized instructors teach innovative and highly effective discipline and differentiation strategies at seminars and education conferences, in schools and districts, and are helping teachers everywhere! You will find our seminars to be a breath of fresh air. Our “active duty” K-12 teacher-trainers live “in the trenches” on a daily basis and pride themselves in successfully using the research based strategies they teach to you in their own classrooms.You will receive highly practical and proven strategies which can be immediately implemented when you return to your classroom. Teachers and administrators who evaluate our training say that we are redefining teaching and learning in schools by providing powerful, easy-to-use, teacher friendly strategies that immediately improve classroom behavior and that help teachers address diverse learning needs to promote motivation and a desire to learn in all. To apply for this position or refer someone you know, please use our online interview system managed by Accolo. Apply for this job Once you have completed the online interview, your information will be forwarded to the hiring authority for decisions on next steps. Related Keywords: trainer, presenter, speaker, consultant, educator, teacher, education, seminar, webinar, certified educators, presentation, speaking, principals, counselors, professors, assistant principals, superintendents, retired educators, social workers, behavior specialist, staff development coordinators, professional speakers,consultants, authors",TRAINER: Presenter - Teacher - Speaker - Educator - Consultant – WANTED NOW Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30304",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/trainer-presenter-teacher-speaker-educator-consultant-%E2%80%93-wanted-now-job-atlanta-ga-us-168034844.aspx?mescoid=2500398001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,01d01196b5c7d44c1c6a2d286f5dd57e
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:06:24:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Construction – Change Career to - Truck Driver – Entry Level,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-%E2%80%93-change-career-to-truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-no-experience-full-time-w-training!-job-atlanta-ga-us-159796662.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=16,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,011d69f8c712625bc41bb6a7aa4156a4
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:06:26:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR opportunity at a highly regarded manufacturing firm near Pine Lake, GA in Atlanta metro east. Twelve hour day shift. Includes relocation.Responsibilities for the Production SupervisorOversee up to 45 production workers and Responsible for all production operations of shift, packaging, and safety assigning and supervising personnelSupervise shift production operations to assure their shift is operating within the limits prescribed. Takes necessary action to maintain continuity of plant operations.Coordinate with the maintenance department to maintain equipment and utilities in proper working condition and monitors to assure equipment is utilized in a safe, efficient manner.Coordinate with the warehouse department to maintain and expedite customer product.Participate in controlling the plant operating budget in those areas affected by their job accountabilities and reporting personnel and support the reduction of raw material loss and maintains scrap levels within company standards.Provide accurate records of production, employee absenteeism, accidents, wage increases, vacations, and overtime. Responsible for data input into computer programs/systems as required for records.Maintain a high level of employee relations and open communication with all employees. Responsible for communicating and enforcing company policies and procedures as they relate to the accountabilities of the supervisor and their shift personnelEnforce plant safety rules, housekeeping, and employee work practices in accordance with company policy and OSHA regulations.Requirements for the Production SupervisorMinimum 5 years Manufacturing/Production Supervision or Managerial experience overseeing a team of preferably at least 20 employeesOverall minimum 8 years experience in manufacturing or relevant fieldHS Diploma, A PLUS to have 2 year degreeDemonstrated strong Leadership, Problems solving, and Decision making skills, and a team oriented mentoring management styleFamiliar with manufacturing related safety, GMP, OSHA guidelinesGood interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills and general knowledge of PC applicationsBenefitsSalary in range shown based on qualificationsComprehensive BenefitsGrowth opporuntiySolid stable manufacturing firmThis Job is located in Atlanta, GA -> United States",Production Supervisor - Manufacturing/Production/Packaging Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30306",,http://jobview.monster.com/production-supervisor-manufacturing-production-packaging-job-atlanta-ga-us-167227866.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=3,"50,000.00 - 58,000.00 $ /year",,2cb42b18e4eeb8d4324c0b59be790071
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:06:48:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in Texas Job in San Marcos,Full Time Employee,"San Marcos, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-texas-job-san-marcos-tx-us-167323695.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,,Logistics/Transportation,ffe0e47694b1a955026dce1f9c53cb6e
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:07:03:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Splunk Apps Lead/AgileYour IT skills are needed just about anywhere. But is it where you want to go? Imagine working for one of the nation's most respected companies. Making a strategic contribution. Receiving the rewards and recognition you deserve. Whether you are pursuing a contract or permanent placement, Experis knows how and where to get you where you want to go.In this Splunk Apps Lead/Agile position, you will have the opportunity to Design, develop, and configure software systems to meet market and/or client requirements either end-to-end from analysis, design, implementation, quality assurance (including testing), to delivery and maintenance of the software product or system or for a specific phase of the lifecycle. Apply knowledge of technologies, applications, methodologies, processes and tools to support a client, project or entity.Are you interested? The ideal Splunk Apps Lead/Agile candidate will possess the following experience:Agile PLMSplunkYou can see it. More challenging work. A more interesting work environment. The opportunity to use your finely honed skills to make a real difference. And to collect pay that reflects your talent and expertise. If this is what you see for yourself, you need to talk to Experis.Through our reach and resources, Experis brings you career options you couldn't find on your own. We're experts at placing each of our candidates into his/her ""dream job"" - one perfectly matched to skills, ambition and lifestyle.We've got the right opportunity. Tell us why you're the right person. Apply today!Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Splunk Apps Lead/Agile Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Splunk Apps Lead/Agile,"Atlanta, GA",http://jobview.monster.com/splunk-apps-lead-agile-job-atlanta-ga-us-167812782.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,IT/Software Development,9373798d1b32dd3ae087abd0204cb52e
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:07:04:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) Senior Technician US - TN - Nashville Company Overview Throughout our 100 year history, Gannett Fleming has been an innovator and leader at a global level, providing world class services in engineering, consulting, design, program and construction management. With more than 60 offices worldwide, we are consistently ranked among the nation’s most prestigious engineering firms. Our people are our secret to delivering excellence as promised! We have fostered a culture promoting progressive thinking to tackle complex engineering challenges --- transforming creative ideas into reality! We are committed to supporting your career goals by providing professional development and training, the opportunity to work with respected industry thought leaders, while at the same time encouraging a healthy work life balance.  Our benefits and perks are competitive because we want to see a smile on your face as we change the world together. Since 1915, Gannett Fleming has played a major role in some of the most multifaceted and iconic engineering accomplishments in the world. Join us in our journey as we continue to provide thought provoking, customized solutions to our clients, improving and sustaining communities for the next 100 years!  Description/Responsibilities Installation and testing of various types of splice enclosures on all sizes of cables. Ability to fusion and mechanical splice single or multi-mode fiber optic cables, including termination with various types of connectors and patch panels. Installation and dressing of fiber optic and network cables. Experience using fiber test equipment including an OTDR. Job Qualifications Must have 8+ years of networking experience. 5 + years ITS experience desired. High school degree or equivalent. Must possess excellent verbal and written communication skills. Certification from recognized fiber training program. Valid driver’s license required. Work Environment: While performing the duties of the job, the employee may be required to sit, stand, walk, handle, feel, and operate objects, tools, or controls. The employee may need to lift up to 50 pounds. This position requires both close and distance vision (corrected acceptable). The employee will be required to competently use computers and test equipment. Position may require working at heights up to 50 feet in a bucket truck. Working Conditions: Much of the work will be performed in outdoor settings, often near high-speed roadway traffic. Performance of the position requires working safely and may require working outdoors in all weather conditions, all noise levels, hazardous conditions, and on a full range of outdoor work surfaces. Work will also be performed indoors, and may require the employee to sit all day. Appropriate safety equipment will be provided for all expected conditions. Extensive travel will be required, approximately 90%. Gannett Fleming is an Equal Opportunity Affirmative Action Employer, including veterans and disability status. NO AGENCIES PLEASE: Unsolicited resumes from third party agencies will not be accepted.",Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) Senior Technician Job in Nashville,Full Time Employee,"Nashville, TN",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/intelligent-transportation-systems-its-senior-technician-job-nashville-tn-us-167864254.aspx?mescoid=5301072001001&jobPosition=18,,Logistics/Transportation,2388b66cb99ad231a7b61b2205665d9d
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:07:24:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Seaside,Full Time Employee,"Seaside, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-seaside-ca-us-167323061.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,343b7b0339981f9e4e2d0ec335c12800
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:08:06:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is currently seeking highly motivated, energetic self-starters to work as a Part-Time Operations Supervisor. This management position involves directly supervising seven to ten part-time Package Handlers. Part-Time Supervisors train, develop, and hold their workgroups responsible for safety, production and attendance. The Part-Time Operations Supervisor impacts the organization by contributing to the continued growth and profitability of UPS by maintaining the highest standards for account productivity, accuracy, customer service, organization, communication, cooperation, and safety. The Part-Time Operations Supervisor provides innovative and effective leadership and cultivates a functional working relationship with all levels of personnel throughout the organization. Part-Time Supervisors generally work Monday through Friday at 5 1/2 hours a day, with a guarantee of 27 1/2 hours  a week. Medical, Dental, Vision, Life, and legal benefits are offered to employees and their eligible dependents. Additional benefits include educational assistance, 401K, discounted stock, and paid vacations/holidays. Please note that these opportunities are part-time only. The Part-Time Operations Supervisor responsibilities may include but are not limited to the following:Management of department resources to ensure maximum output, accuracy, and efficiency at all times.Meet or exceed all established standards for accuracy and productivity.Direct daily transload activities to support account objectives for level of service, cost management, customer expectations, and volume requirements.Ensure that all department and/or corporate policies and procedures are communicated, understood, and adhered to. Establish and promote a positive, team-oriented work environment emphasizing employee involvement, pro-active communication, inter-departmental cooperation, and continual improvement on all levels.Implement employee personal development plans as required to ensure the continuing professional growth of department personnel. Ensure that all department employees receive specific and detailed orientation, skills and safety training, appropriate materials and information, regular evaluations, and pro-active coaching to support their continued development. Establish and maintain an aggressive cross-training program within the department to promote development, enhance flexibility, and ensure backup coverage of vital functions and processes. Function as an effective liaison and advocate on all levels to ensure that employee, department, and corporate needs are addressed in a timely and productive manner. Responsible to ensure that all employees adhere to safety policies and procedures at all times, operating in full compliance with department, station, corporate, OSHA, and WISHA requirements. Experience and Education:Candidate is preferred have a High School diploma or equivalent degree.Management/supervisory experience in a production/processing environment is preferred.Prior experience in both operations and customer service is preferred.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Part Time Preload Supervisor Job in Greenville,,"Greenville, SC 29607",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-part-time-preload-supervisor-job-greenville-sc-us-167857296.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,d4b7fddc0809dfd1a731690313aca096
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:08:07:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Train and supervise daily activities of package handlers and clerks to ensure that all assigned duties are accomplished safely and timely.  Supervisors typically work Monday through Friday: however, weekend work may be required based upon location and business needs.  Part-time management employees are generally expected to work 5 1/2 hours per day and are paid weekly.  Medical, dental, and vision benefits are offered to employees and their eligible dependents.  Additional benefits include educational assistance, 401K, discounted stock, and paid vacations/holidays. Job Requirements:Customer service skills (internal/external)Phone etiquetteAbillity to work varying shifts, additional hours and/or overtime depending on service needsMulti-tasking skillsPerform general office tasks such as paperwork, typing, and/or use of a computer, filing, calculating and the use of telephoneGood cognitive reasoning skillsSelf motivationMicrosoft Office knowledge (ie. excel, word, wordperfect)Work cooperatively in a diverse work environmentThe ability to work in adverse weather conditionsAbility to direct the work of the other employees effectivelyVerification and submittal of timecardsPerform other functions that may be assignedUPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS PT PRELOAD SUPERVISOR Job in Lakeland,,"Lakeland, FL 33801",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-pt-preload-supervisor-job-lakeland-fl-us-167856930.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,c03aedf85e2a198c7fd7e9f434587ace
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:08:14:41,No,jobs.monster.com," What if you could actually live that life you dreamed of? What if you didn’t have to go at it alone? What if you had the Power? Here, nothing is impossible. Your success is in your own hands, and we have your back the whole way. Strong leaders, mentors, training and powerful tools – they’ll help you push yourself to the top, and keep pushing, until your idea of the top is higher than you ever imagined. It’s time to kiss your dreams hello.Named Fortune Magazine’s #1 Workplace for Millennials, when you begin your sales career at Power, you know you will be set up to thrive from day one.  All sales representatives are full-time, W-2 employees who complete our proven sales training program — a comprehensive approach to learning corporate sales strategy, communications, and leadership skills that will map out a path to future opportunities and financial independence. Sales representatives will also gain exposure to a variety of other areas within the company, including business development, marketing and operations — and will be provided ongoing opportunities for growth in the form of sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis, as well as unparalleled leadership conferences featuring high-profile, world-renowned speakers in business, entertainment, sports, and government twice a year.  Primary job responsibilities include:No cold calls required as all leads are pre-qualifiedDelivery of interactive sales presentations to homeowners on Power’s eco-friendly, green products and services Participation in ongoing sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis Qualifications:Highly developed interpersonal, organizational and communication skillsAbility to speak publicly with confidence and poiseStrong sense of ambition, self-motivation and self-disciplineCommitted individual who is passionate about fulfilling the company’s missionNaturally positive, outgoing and articulate individual who thrives in social settings Previous sales experience preferred BA/BS preferredSalary and Benefits:$75,000-90,000 average first-year compensation Monthly opportunities for performance-based rewards, such as luxury vacations, high-end electronics, gift cards and tickets to concerts and sporting eventsVarious medical, dental, life and disability insurance plans that can be tailored to your specific needs or the needs of your familyAmple paid vacation and holidaysA competitive 401(k) retirement savings program, matched by PowerAccess to the latest technology, such as laptops, smart phones and tablets that will help you reach your earnings goals faster and more efficientlyA dynamic social program filled with can’t miss events, parties, and activities, including an annual bonus in the form of a company trip to a tropical destination for you and a guest.",Sales Representative Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",Architectural and Design Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-job-atlanta-ga-us-167401319.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,"75,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,6479b49484a88b3290958351529e92c1
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:08:26:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"More information about this job:OVERVIEW: At Sysco, we offer our associates the opportunity to grow personally and professionally, to contribute to the success of a dynamic organization, and to serve others in a manner that exceeds their expectations. We are looking for talented, hard-working individuals to join our team. Come grow with us and let us show you why good things really do come from Sysco. POSITION SUMMARY: The Chief Financial Officer (CFO) is responsible for all financial and fiscal management aspects of Operating Company operations. The responsibilities include the traditional Sysco controllership respondsibilites, strategic planning, forecasting, resource and project management, change management leadership, process improvement, decision support, and operational effectiveness. The position also oversees business intelligence and profitability analysis functio. It is focused on the continuous improvement of processes to continue cost reduction and containments. Responsible for managing and ensuring the integrity of the balance sheet, the P&L, understanding the key drivers of margins, expenses, profitability, driving results and initiatives at the Operating Company. This role also provides companywide business support, aids in the development and support of pricing strategies that are consistent with and complimentary to overall marketing strategies. RESPONSIBILITIES:Asset and Risk Management Protect and preserve the assets of the organization. Work with local Operating company management and SBS to develop specific actionable items that affect financial risk. Ensure business case success at the Operating Company by studying new metrics and deriving actions from the data. Work with Operating company leadership to manage liquidity, and to develop specific actionable items to affect liquidity, including but not limited to credit policies, inventory management, and business modeling. Coordinate operating company managers to ensure systems that cross department lines, and cost centers are controlled in an efficient manner. Assess their contribution to the entire operation, through balance of capabilities, costs and service levels to fulfill Finance responsibilities. Control all company expenses indirectly (through department heads) for all departments and directly for the General & Administrative and Credit departments. Manage tax responsibilities and work closely with shared services SBS on tax processing, and transactional finance roles. Manage cash flow and forecasting by developing reliable cash flow projection process while optimizing Sysco intercompany interest income/expense. Ensure petty cash is controlled. Manage customer credit exposure and collections by working directly with credit services and customers to manage the collection process to balance customer relations, customer retention and risk management. Ensure the credit manager establishes and maintains credit and collection policies in accordance with Sysco guidelines. Chair Shrink and Credit committees Interact with TPA on workers compensation claims management Work with Corporate, Market and local management to improve safety performance and governmental compliance Management Coordinate operating company managers to ensure systems that cross department lines, and cost centers are controlled in an efficient manner. Assess their contribution to the entire operation, through balance of capabilities, costs and service levels to fulfill Finance responsibilities. Control all company expenses indirectly (through department heads) for all departments and directly for the General & Administrative and Credit departments. Manage tax responsibilities and work closely with shared services SBS on tax processing, and transactional finance roles. Work with Operating company leadership to manage liquidity, and to develop specific actionable items to affect liquidity, including but not limited to credit policies, inventory management, and business modeling. Work with local OpCo management to prepare well thought out profit plans with actionable items that translate the plan into reality. Work with SBS to complete accounting and finance activities, accurately, timely and completely. Work with market management team to meet local and market objectives. Business performance and value focus to improve strategic decision- making. Ensure appropriate programs in all departments are established and maintained to minimize safety hazards. Staff Management In SUS environment, directly manages A/R, A/P, Profit Management, Inventory Control, Credit Services, Accounting Staff and other administrative positions. In SAP environment, directly manages local Agreement Services, Inventory Control, Credit Services, Accounting Staff and other administrative positions. Indirectly manages Accounting, A/P, A/R and Agreement Services with SBS. Controllership Responsibilities Ensure the integrity of the balance sheet by ensuing the integrity of account reconciliations, ensures score card exposure items and reconciling items are resolved timely Completes Corporate required certifications timely and accurately; ensures certifications required of other site leaders are completed timely Performs annual Internal Audit activities to test internal control strength and compliance Remediates audit points and oversees improvement to internal processes throughout the operating company Minimize operational, safety, credit, balance sheet and accounting related risks Operator Oversee all accounts, ledgers and reporting systems, ensuring compliance with appropriate accounting standards and principles, regulatory requirements Manage Finance department personnel and functions. Interact with other functional site leaders and support local operating company President Support and achieve initiatives Maintain internal control safeguards and coordinate all audit activities including SOX controls. Perform transaction processing by initiating or requesting correcting entries due to on-going ledger review, or entries related to residual bookkeeping functions that are not centralized and remain at the Operating Company. Ensure compliance with the Sysco Capital Investment Proposal manual. Strategist & Catalyst Analyze the financial and operating results with the president of the company and other managers to develop ways to improve and compare results, Work to stimulate behaviors across the organization to achieve strategic and financial objectives: is responsible and accountable for transformational projects across the organization. Monitor results with all of the Executive members to ensure operational success through cost analysis support, compliance with operational and contractual requirements. Responsible for financial planning, financial analysis, reporting, reviewing and compliance. Provide financial leadership with respect to strategic business decisions and alignment of financial strategies. Work with local OpCo management to prepare well thought out profit plans with actionable items that translate the plan into reality. Business performance and value focus to improve strategic decision- making. Identify prospects, perform due diligence and oversee integration activities of future Mergers and Acquisitions. QUALIFICATIONS: Basic Qualifications: 5-7 Years of broad commercial and operational finance experience. Delivery of effective corporate finance strategies and providing financial advice at Executive and Board levels. Considerable broad-based experience in complex, ever-changing environments. Leading and managing people at all levels within the organization. Preferred Qualifications: SAP system experience CPA preferred Education : Four Year Bachelor's Degree in Finance Related Major required. Professional Skills: Experience in strategic planning and execution. Knowledge of contracting, negotiating, and change management. Knowledge of finance, accounting, budgeting *MONS #ML-POST Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States. Sysco is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer, and considers qualified applicants without regard to race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran status or any other protected factor under federal, state or local law. This opportunity is available through Sysco Corporation, its subsidiaries and affiliates.",Chief Financial Officer Job in Plympton,Full Time Employee,"Plympton, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/chief-financial-officer-job-plympton-ma-us-167783676.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=1,,Logistics/Transportation,b046c920fea2abca5a31a35c5152cf06
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:08:31:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"TOP Group – Atlanta, GA TOP Group is an international recruiting company in NYC, Chicago, Atlanta, Texas, Los Angeles, and San Francisco. Our clients are from all business sectors and we work to source the most qualified candidates available. A Global Automotive Parts Manufacturing company is currently looking for a Quality Assurance Manager for their facility near Atlanta, GA ***NO visa support is available for this position***Please apply with your resume in an MS Word attachment Position: Quality Assurance Manager - Automotive Position Location: Atlanta, GA Quality Assurance Manager –AutomotiveCompensation: Salary – (DOE up to $80K) Responsibilities – Quality Assurance Manager –Automotive Process monitoring, supplier evaluation, product warranty claim analysis, field product return evaluation, metric analysis & reporting.Manage a team of Quality professionals such as Engineers, Technicians and SupervisorsWork closely with Customers and Visit Suppliers to be part of external auditsUse the results of evaluations to develop, recommend, and implement action plans to improve product quality and the quality systemComplete and approve Quality Documentation such as PPAP and APQPConduct extensive data analysis to identify root cause and related improvement actionsSchedule routine audits to assure quality standards are metTake part in Scheduling and Quality Audits Work with customers in solving quality issues, concerns or questionsGenerate and submit monthly and quality reportsAssure compliance with ISO standards and TS 16949 certificationsPerform other duties, as assigned by management Requirements – Quality Assurance Manager –AutomotiveBachelor’s Degree within a Technical field (Mechanical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Chemical Engineering, etc.)7 Years’ mass production experience within a quality function, preferably automotive or aerospace3 years’ experience within a Quality leadership roleExperience monitoring Engineers, technicians and commencing corrective actionsDetailed knowledge of Microsoft Access Word, Excel, Power Point etc.Knowledge of ISO 9000, ISO 14001, TS 16949Strong Communication skills (Speaking / Writing / Reading)Good Time Management skillsDetail Oriented Quality Assurance Manager –Automotive  This position includes manufacturing and warehousing work environment. While performing the duties of this job you may be required to intermittently sit, stand, walk, lift up to 25 pounds, lift in excess of 25 pounds with a lift assist, climb stairs, use hands to handle or feel parts/equipment, reach with hands and arms, stoop, kneel, crouch, bend at the waist, talk and hear. You may also be required to use close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and peripheral vision.This position is required to work in a manufacturing environment facility. When in the plant, the worker is frequently exposed to moving mechanical parts. The noise level in the work environment is usually Loud. Hard hats, steel toe safety shoes, and safety glasses are required in all production areas. We screen ALL Candidates to verify the validity of each applicant with criminal background / Social Security verification. Upon submitting your resume, we will contact only those candidates that we deem qualified for our client. If we do not contact you, we do not see the fit for the position. If we are unable to reach you in a reasonable time frame, you will be eliminated from the pool of potential candidates “Direct applicants only.”“We do not accept any resumes from any third party organizations or other recruiters.”  ",Monster,,"TOP Group – Atlanta, GA TOP Group is an international recruiting company in NYC, Chicago, Atlanta, Texas, Los Angeles, and San Francisco. Our clients are from all business sectors and we work to source the most qualified candidates available. A Global Automotive Parts Manufacturing company is currently looking for a Quality Assurance Manager for their facility near Atlanta, GA ***NO visa support is available for this position***Please apply with your resume in an MS Word attachment Position: Quality Assurance Manager - Automotive Position Location: Atlanta, GA Quality Assurance Manager –AutomotiveCompensation: Salary – (DOE up to $80K) Responsibilities – Quality Assurance Manager –Automotive Process monitoring, supplier evaluation, product warranty claim analysis, field product return evaluation, metric analysis & reporting.Manage a team of Quality professionals such as Engineers, Technicians and SupervisorsWork closely with Customers and Visit Suppliers to be part of external auditsUse the results of evaluations to develop, recommend, and implement action plans to improve product quality and the quality systemComplete and approve Quality Documentation such as PPAP and APQPConduct extensive data analysis to identify root cause and related improvement actionsSchedule routine audits to assure quality standards are metTake part in Scheduling and Quality Audits Work with customers in solving quality issues, concerns or questionsGenerate and submit monthly and quality reportsAssure compliance with ISO standards and TS 16949 certificationsPerform other duties, as assigned by management Requirements – Quality Assurance Manager –AutomotiveBachelor’s Degree within a Technical field (Mechanical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Chemical Engineering, etc.)7 Years’ mass production experience within a quality function, preferably automotive or aerospace3 years’ experience within a Quality leadership roleExperience monitoring Engineers, technicians and commencing corrective actionsDetailed knowledge of Microsoft Access Word, Excel, Power Point etc.Knowledge of ISO 9000, ISO 14001, TS 16949Strong Communication skills (Speaking / Writing / Reading)Good Time Management skillsDetail Oriented Quality Assurance Manager –Automotive  This position includes manufacturing and warehousing work environment. While performing the duties of this job you may be required to intermittently sit, stand, walk, lift up to 25 pounds, lift in excess of 25 pounds with a lift assist, climb stairs, use hands to handle or feel parts/equipment, reach with hands and arms, stoop, kneel, crouch, bend at the waist, talk and hear. You may also be required to use close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and peripheral vision.This position is required to work in a manufacturing environment facility. When in the plant, the worker is frequently exposed to moving mechanical parts. The noise level in the work environment is usually Loud. Hard hats, steel toe safety shoes, and safety glasses are required in all production areas. We screen ALL Candidates to verify the validity of each applicant with criminal background / Social Security verification. Upon submitting your resume, we will contact only those candidates that we deem qualified for our client. If we do not contact you, we do not see the fit for the position. If we are unable to reach you in a reasonable time frame, you will be eliminated from the pool of potential candidates “Direct applicants only.”“We do not accept any resumes from any third party organizations or other recruiters.”  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-manager-automotive-ga-jbu-19065-job-atlanta-ga-us-167147302.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=11,,,7b38d28c7a178b4f1722cbfcfb8108bd
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:08:42:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Route Sales Driver Location: Lancaster, SC Reports to: Route Sales Supervisor Position Summary: Responsible for sales of milk products to retail stores, driving truck over established route to deliver and sell products or render services by performing the following duties. Role Responsibilities: Safely loads and unloads products onto route delivery truck. Drives truck over established route to deliver and sell such items as milk, dairy products, flavored drinks, etc. Writes customer order and instructions. Establish and maintain relationships with all customers to retain and increase sales. Informs regular customers of new products or services. Listens to and resolves service complaints. Rotates and places stock on shelves or racks. Sets up merchandise and sales promotion displays or issues sales promotion materials to customers. Collects or picks up empty containers, rejected or unsold merchandise and loads into truck. Completes daily inventory, orders and paperwork properly. Obtains cash/check from customer: accountable for final tally. Cleans inside of truck. Performs routine maintenance on truck. Performs MVI's (Motor Vehicle Inspections) on truck to conform to D.O.T. regulations and company policy. Regular and predictable attendance is required. Must be courteous toward customers, be able to work cooperatively with co-workers and supervisors, maintain neat appearance and follow established policies and directions of supervisor. Must be able to work safely in a constant state of alertness. Qualifications and Experience: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Minimum age- 21 years Verifiable experience in route sales is preferred, but not mandatory. D.O.T Class B CDL with Air Brake endorsement- 1 year verifiable experience in license class Ability to read, write, communicate and perform general math, computer and analysis skills Successfully pass D.O.T. required physical and drug screen. Acceptable driving record in accordance with Company's Insurance standards. Borden Dairy is an Equal Opportunity Employer PI94304957Apply Here",Route Sales Driver Job in Lancaster,Full Time,"Lancaster, SC 29720",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/route-sales-driver-job-lancaster-sc-us-167788110.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=10,,,4d0b83b182043e25697a5decc9792989
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:08:45:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manager in Training - Entry Level Account Management - Paid Training  CUSTOMER SERVICE REPRESENTATIVES MARKETING, SALES, PUBLIC RELATIONS, & ADVERTISING  Are you ready to get your career started, or perhaps just ready for a career change?  Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants is the leading Promotions and Marketing firm in the Atlanta area. Our focus is to find outgoing, team-oriented brand representatives who enjoy working with our clients to create massive brand recognition within the general public.  We are looking for recent graduates, and MOTIVATED professionals willing to grow with our company to fill some of our Entry-Level positions in: Promotional SalesPublic RelationsEvent MarketingCampaign ManagementCustomer ServiceInternships Available*  Sounds great, but you don't have any previous marketing experience? No Problem! Due to the rapid expansion of our client portfolio, we have a few immediate openings and will provide complete training for the right candidate.  If you think your personality fits our qualifications below, we encourage you to apply: Excellent Communication SkillsMotivated Self-StarterAmbitious with Strong Work EthicAbility to work in a High-Energy environmentOutgoingLeader with great problem solving skillsWilling to learn all aspects of the company   We Offer: Paid TrainingOptional TravelWeekly Base Pay/Incentives/BonusesEndless opportunities for growthFun, exciting, fast-paced environmentInternship Opportunities    RequirementsNo experience is required. Certain backgrounds or experiences are beneficial. The following college degrees and experiences are preferable: 2 - 4 Years of Military ExperienceBusinessBusiness AdministrationCollegiate Athletic ExperienceCollege GraduatesCommunicationsFood ServerManagementMarketingRestaurantSalesSports Management   Apply today for immediate consideration!!!  For immediate consideration, submit your resume to careers@wearephoenixatl.com  Google Us https://www.google.com/search?q=google&oq=goo&aqs=chrome.0.69i59j69i60l3j69i65l2.511j0j7&sourceid=chrome&ie=UTF-8#q=%23wearephoenixatl   Check Out Our Latest News! Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants Adds New Client http://finance.yahoo.com/news/phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-adds-182709812.html  After Quarterly Review, Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants Promotes New Market Managers http://www.einpresswire.com/article/311432421/after-quarterly-review-phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-promotes-new-market-managers  Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants Gets 2016 Nomination for Atlanta's Best and Brightest http://finance.yahoo.com/news/phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-adds-182709812.html  Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants' Manager Speaks at Dallas Leadership Expo http://finance.yahoo.com/news/phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-manager-185651081.html  Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants Supports National Networking Opportunities http://www.marketwired.com/press-release/phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-supports-national-networking-opportunities-2060782.htm   Visit UsWebsite ",Manager in Training - Entry Level Account Management - Paid Training Job in Atlanta,"Full Time , Employee","Atlanta, GA 30342",Advertising and PR Services Management Consulting Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-in-training-entry-level-account-management-paid-training-job-atlanta-ga-us-167652005.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=18,,Business/Strategic Management,17193bffe59b828a8a49f246db1bf784
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:08:45:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description: Open Positions for Career-Minded People. Ready to raise the bar on customer satisfaction? Are you ready to start your career with a company that offers growth, challenge and a commitment to excellence? Raymour & Flanigan is a leading furniture retailer in the U.S. and is searching for a career- minded facility technician who can make a difference in the customer shopping experience. Many of our successful long-term associates started in entry level positions. As a Raymour & Flanigan warehouse associate, you must be responsible, dependable and able to provide general facility support functions, including loading and unloading trailers. You must have excellent listening skills and the ability to work independently and with a team. Here is where you can demonstrate your customer service skills and learn the furniture retail business. Apply today for the start of your successful future! Expectations: Commitment to Raymour & Flanigan's safety policies and procedures. Offloading and loading of furniture on trailers, into bins and within floor locations. Ability to become certified on material handing equipment, including order picker and electric pallet jack. Ability to work independently and with a team. Excellent listening skills. Perform additional functions that may be assigned at the discretion of management. Qualifications: High school diploma or equivalent. Experience operating an order picker and electric pallet jack is preferred. Experience with warehouse management systems is preferred. Physical Requirements: Lift, lower, push and pull all sizes of furniture up to and in excess of 100 lbs. Safely lift furniture merchandise while elevated on warehouse equipment at heights of 30-40 feet above the ground. At Raymour & Flanigan, we recognize and appreciate all of our team members' hard work and dedication. We pride ourselves on being a long term, privately held company that takes care of its associates by recognizing each individual's potential and investing in their future success!    Raymour & Flanigan provides a full range of comprehensive benefit programs to help you achieve your wellness and financial goals which include: Health Insurance (Up to 80% of premium paid) and Prescription Drug Coverage Dental and Vision Coverage Company paid Life Insurance Company paid Short-term Disability 401(k) Retirement Plan w/ Company Match & Profit Sharing Voluntary Life and Long-term Disability Insurance Flexible Spending Account Employee Assistance Program Other Great Benefits: Weekly Pay Paid Vacation and Holidays Training and Development Tuition Reimbursement Program Generous Merchandise Discount Raymour & Flanigan proudly supports a drug free and smoke free work environment. Raymour & Flanigan is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that does not discriminate against any associate or applicant on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), age, national origin, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, marital or familial status, genetic information or other basis protected by law.     *CB",Warehouse Associate Job in Central Nj,Full Time / Employee,"Central Nj, NJ 07728",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-job-central-nj-nj-us-167356459.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,12862e38f0381b80703bafa8b932d249
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:06:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"ENTRY LEVEL POSITIONS NEEDED FOR EXPANDING FIRM**FULL TRAINING IS PROVIDED**READY TO START YOUR CAREER?Have you been told you DON'T HAVE ENOUGH EXPERIENCE? Peak Enterprises Corp is an innovative company that is transforming the marketing & advertising industry. Peak Enterprises Corp was founded by dedicated people looking to push the envelope by using cost-effective marketing campaigns and advertising strategies. Our goal is to provide the same advertising as the standard firm but at a fraction of the price. Enterprises Corp's success and rapid growth has set new industry standards.Peak Enterprises Corp is actively seeking Entry Level Professionals for our sales & marketing teams!  These are competitive positions that start on the ground floor but offer rapid advancement towards a management role. Since we consider ourselves an up and coming leader in the area, we are looking for fast paced, high energy, competitive minded professionals to cross train in all areas. Marketing and SalesAdvertising and Public RelationsEntry Level ManagementCustomer ServicePromotions   **NO EXPERIENCE NEEDED HERE** WE PREFER TO TRAIN & DEVELOP OUR EMPLOYEES FOR MAXIMUM PERFORMANCERequirementsRequirements:Ability to start right awayHigh School degree or higherGreat Communication skillsReliable transportation to the office on a daily basis ***PLEASE NOTE THIS IS NOT AN ADMINISTRATION OR CUSTOMER SERVICE POSITION***For Immediate Consideration, Please email your resume!!!College Students Welcome! THANK YOU FOR YOUR INTEREST IN OUR COMPANY AND GOOD LUCK!   **After the review of your resume you will be contacted through email by our HR Department. Please be on the lookout for this email as it will be sent to you shortly if selected by our management team for a possible interview.                                                                                                                    Apply if you have the following experience: entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, accounting, entrepreneur, summer job, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail, restaurant, hospitality, home improvement, construction, management, administrative, administrative assistant, business development, business, internship, advertising, human resources, receptionist, entry level, retail, insurance, education, outside sales, strategy-planning, project manager, part-time, server, summer employment, promotions, pr, customer service, full-time, restaurant, quality control, assistant, secretary, public relations, summer, salesman, hotel, safety, executive assistant, summer work, communications, training, human resources, office manager, media, general, social services, sales manager, pharmaceutical sales, food services, jobs, summer, recruiter, sales, bartender, general business, project management, hospitality, server, collections, bookkeeper, intern, management trainee, purchasing, full time, part time, bilingual, inventory, recruiter, counselor, travel, teaching, help desk, law enforcement, trainer, media, professional, trainee, data entry, internship, administration, new graduate, hostess, executive assistant, hostess, sales management, coordinator, cashier, medical sales, distribution, financial, manager, sports, entertainment, international, consultant, real estate, telecommunications, general, retail, business, sports, entertainment, marketing, sports marketing, customer serviceKeywords: - entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, accounting, entrepreneur, summer job, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail, restaurant, hospitality, home improvement, construction, management, administrative, administrative assistant, business development, business, internship, advertising, human resources, receptionist, entry level, retail, insurance, education, outside sales, strategy-planning, project manager, part-time, server, summer employment, promotions, pr, customer service, full-time, restaurant, quality control, assistant, secretary, public relations, summer, salesman, office, hotel, safety, executive assistant, summer work, communications, training, human resources, office manager, media, general, social services, sales manager, pharmaceutical sales, buyer, food services, jobs, summer, recruiter, sales, bartender, general business, project management, hospitality, server, intern, management trainee, purchasing, full time, part time, bilingual, inventory, recruiter, counselor, travel, teaching, help desk, law enforcement, trainer, media, professional, trainee, data entry, internship, administration, new graduate, hostess, executive assistant, hostess, sales management, coordinator, cashier, medical sales, distribution, financial, manager, sports, entertainment, international, consultant, real estate, telecommunications, general, retail, business, sports, entertainment, marketing, sports marketing, customer service ",BRAND NEW OFFICE HIRING FOR ENTRY LEVEL POSITIONS! *Will Train* Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30319",Telecommunications Services Advertising and PR Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/brand-new-office-hiring-for-entry-level-positions!-will-train-job-atlanta-ga-us-167042814.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,Customer Support/Client Care,1cc64959617f4259b3db5a2fa4a9f3bb
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:07:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.DistTech, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking a Class A CDL Driver out of New Castle, DE.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!$2000.00 Sign On Bonus!!!!Company DriversLocal Regional Mix Dedicated Account Get Home 2-3 Nights + Weekend Tank Experience Required Excellent Benefits Including: Medical, Dental and Vision Plans Paid Vacations and Holidays 401K With Company Match Paid Training On Safe Driving and Product Handling Driver Referral Incentive Pay Safety Bonus And So Much More!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with DistTech.We require Class A CDL with18 months recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.Call 800-871-4581Option #3 Dawn/Recruiter for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.Kenan Advantage Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Class A CDL Driver - DTI Job in New Castle,Full Time Employee,"New Castle, DE",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-dti-job-new-castle-de-us-167320771.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,2cd4d2a16420a52b3f5e0fb49f553208
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:09:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Dover, DE",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-dover-de-us-159709941.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,6d6dd5b75888fc8866d727f5e362c78c
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:13:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"WHO WE ARE Gourmet Foods International was built on a true passion for fine food which has driven our company to become a leading specialty food supplier in the nation. Started in 1967 by Russell McCall, Gourmet Foods was no more than a single cheese and wine shop. We now have warehouses nationwide to help achieve our goal of aligning communities through food.Our philosophy is based on the idea that food is a universal connector. We have worked to keep a strong focus on supporting small producers and bringing their hand-crafted, healthy, and environmentally conscious products to consumers across the nation.OUR PRODUCTS A remarkable specialty food program features top quality products, offered with extraordinary freshness and variety. We distribute over 10,000 gourmet products across the US with strong leadership in most specialty cheese categories. Gourmet Foods prides itself on cultivating strong relationships with vendors which include many small producers and traditional cheesemakers. Our product selection includes a large number of artisan goods from all across the country as well as imported items from around the world.CORE VALUES Through our values we strive to develop customer and employee loyalty while generating long-term profitable and sustainable growth.• We create a bridge between producers, customers, and consumers by bringing quality products to new and expanding markets • We promote an energetic climate of purpose and innovation. • We recognize our social responsibility to give back to our communities through outreach and sustainable business practices.HOW WE TAKE CARE OF OUR TEAM MEMBERS We have long believed in sharing success with people who help create it by offering excellent benefits to our team members.Insurance BenefitsMedical InsuranceDental InsuranceVision InsuranceLife InsuranceShort Term and Long Term DisabilityRetirement Investment Plans401(k) and Roth 401(k) with matching contributionsProfit SharingCompetitive SalariesFlexible Paid Time Off(PTO)Professional DevelopmentTuition ReimbursementProfessional Development ProgramsOpportunity to Grow within the CompanyRelocationSUMMARYResponsible for overseeing the day to day operations and managing employees on shipping shift. RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES include the following. Other duties may be assigned.Ensure daily activities are completed.Ensure all personnel are adhering to warehouse procedures. Ensure all personnel are adhering to company procedures, proper material handling techniques, proper rotation practices and safety requirementsEnsure scheduled dispatch times are metMaintain employees hours daily - monitor overtime, PTO, attendance guidelines.Ensure working areas are maintained for next shift.Maintain the safety, quality, and legality of food products.   WORKSKILLS: Excellent communication skills, ability to follow directions and meet deadlines and be able to work under minimal supervision. EXPERIENCE: Must have a complete understanding of all aspects of shift operation.  Pallet jack certification and forklift certification are recommended QUALIFICATIONS: Microsoft Office EDUCATION: High School Diploma or GED preferred PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Must be able to lift up to 50 lbs. and able to work in cold environment for an extended period of timeWORK ENVIRONMENT: Warehouse environment",Shipping Manager - Night Shift Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30303",,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-manager-night-shift-job-atlanta-ga-us-163477291.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=11,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),0d100486fc295fd168ae15aad0683e5f
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:13:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Licensed Practical NurseJob SummaryWe are looking for driven and experienced Licensed Practical Nurse to provide personal care and related services to our healthcare residents.  QualificationsHigh school diploma or GEDCurrent Licensed Practical Nurse in the State of GAGood standing with the Georgia Board of NursingCPR certifiedExcellent technical assessment, documentation skills and leadership skills Current Openings:Part time:  6:45 a.m. - 3:15 p.m., every other Monday, Friday and Saturday, Sunday Part time:  2:45 p.m. - 11:15 p.m., every other Monday, Friday and Saturday, SundayBenefits:Lenbrook offers a competitive salary and benefits which includes:401(k) with employer matchTo complete your application, please visit our website at www.lenbrook-atlanta.org.  Go to Careers and select Job Listings. EOE and drug-free workplace",Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) Job in Atlanta,Part Time,"Atlanta, GA 30319",All,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-practical-nurse-lpn-job-atlanta-ga-us-167074654.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0cc2b977ceaf959854dd34b5f7375b16
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:20:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />",Class B Route Driver Job in San Jose,Full Time Employee,"San Jose, CA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/class-b-route-driver-job-san-jose-ca-us-167856346.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=10,,Logistics/Transportation,e59ffbdf79013dbc927e71e5b84453c5
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:22:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Mountain View,Full Time Employee,"Mountain View, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-mountain-view-ca-us-167323598.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=15,,Logistics/Transportation,b70c4455aa790f0eab555c3049c18481
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:33:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Santa Rosa,Full Time Employee,"Santa Rosa, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-santa-rosa-ca-us-167323501.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=19,,Logistics/Transportation,7d90c35982bed49a4090f781790d3114
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:35:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"CDL Shuttle Driver, Savannah, GADuties: Must have Class A CDL-* Prepares vehicle by conducting operator maintenance; cleaning interior and exterior; arranging for maintenance; reporting operating problems.*Must be over 21 years of age.* Plans route and requirements by studying schedule or special request; determining delivery requirements; checking road conditions; estimating travel times; arranging temporary and long-term parking.* Transports materials, by loading and unloading product driving the vehicle.* Fulfills special requests by picking up and delivering items.* Maintains product confidence by keeping information confidential.* Documents actions by completing travel logs and maintenance records.*  Accomplishes transportation and organization mission by completing related results as needed.* High School Diploma or GED Equivalent.  Skills/Qualifications:Dependability, Safety Management, Energy Level, Customer Service, Customer Focus, Client Relationships, Map Reading, Acute Vision, Professionalism, Confidentiality, Teamwork",CDL Shuttle Driver,"Full Time, Employee","State College, GA 31404",,http://jobview.monster.com/cdl-shuttle-driver-savannah-ga-job-state-college-ga-us-167888234.aspx?mescoid=5301047001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,463e120a76cc047e4c8e11049933cc9d
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:35:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Yakima, WA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-yakima-wa-us-159710108.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=14,,Logistics/Transportation,0ba4d6336102b5700ecf6c52ece49122
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:43:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Feb 3 Technical Solutions Representative* Shared Services United States US US - GA - Atlanta Position Description and Required Skills: General Summary: The Technical Solutions Representative  is responsible for answering technical support questions and providing clients with technical guidance on the use of computer technology in dental practices. The Technical Support Representative also applies a general working knowledge of computer software, hardware and troubleshooting skills to resolve a substantial number of client problems independently.Technical Solutions Representatives are a geographic resource that primarily provide technical support to Carestream customers, field personnel, dealers, and 3rd parties. The primary goal is to minimize the impact to our customer by resolving an incident or request as quickly as possible and escalating as necessary to restore customer business operations. The TSR role is a technical generalist able to independently diagnose and resolve issues utilizing knowledge systems and technical resources as required.Required Skills and Experience:• Demonstrated skills in problem analysis, customer relations, organizational abilities, telephone etiquette, and in effective working relationships with other service/support groups• Demonstrates the ability to solve common problems and to provide immediate solutions• Associate’s degree or above in technical area or a minimum of eighteen months experience in technical related field• One (1) year experience in a technical service-related field preferred• Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to make decisions independently• Language requirements are defined by Geography• Software Product Family positions will require working knowledge of SQL, Citrix, Windows, networking…..• Require demonstrated aptitude for logic and screen human harmony. Business Unit: U.S. Digital Dental Position Type Regular Does this position have direct reports? No Expected Extent of Travel <1% (1-3 days/year) Company-Sponsored Relocation No Company-Sponsored Immigration No Req ID 6728BR",Technical Solutions Representative* Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta , GA",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-solutions-representative-job-atlanta-ga-us-167774865.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,8211705a2fb9eac6fc1f7d4c7809cde9
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:44:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS Supply Chain Solutions is currently seeking a Customs Brokerage Representative II. The ideal candidate will have a minimum of one year Customs Brokerage / Import / Export experience and will be familiar with HTS, customs regulations and OGA clearances.  The candidate will also have the knowledge and skills usually gained through a minimum of two years of general office or customer service experience.The Customs Brokerage Representative II responsibilities include but are not limited to the following: Preparation of customs entries and forwarding freight to designated locations. This may involve interface with international and domestic carriers, overseas offices, and importers.Prepare Customs entries and follow-up with the clearance process on all entries prepared.Communicate documentation discrepancies to client and supervisor.Coordinate freight delivery to designated locations.Resolve finance and accounting reconciliation exchange issues.Responsible for filing entries to customs via the Brokerage System in a timely and accurate manner.Responsibilities may include scanning entries into the SDIS system meeting allotted and sensitive time requirements.Administrative responsibilities include preparation of reports/presentations and analysis using various software packages and databases.Document review and assessment of accuracy, verifying country of origin/export, IOR, terms of sale and value to ensure that compliance and federal regulation requirements are achieved.Daily follow up on documentation discrepancy issues which requires the ability to troubleshoot and communicate effectively, both verbally and in writing with customers and foreign origins.Establish and maintain client relationships.All other task as assigned by supervisor and or manager.Position may require a weekend schedule on a department rotation basis and not limited to working a holiday schedule based on the needs of the operation and requirements of the account.This job description is intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by persons assigned to this classification. It is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all job responsibilities, duties and skills required for this position.  Minimum Requirements: At least two years of customer service, general office, or data entry experience.High School diploma or equivalentProficiency in Microsoft OfficeAccurate and rapid data entryStrong attention to detailExcellent verbal and written communications skillsProven organizational skillsAt least one year of Customs Brokerage or Import/Export experienceAbility to multi-task.Team oriented playerThe ability to project a professional image to the customer and to represent UPS SCS in a positive manner.US Customs Classification and BOSS (program) experience is desirable.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Customs Broker Rep II-Sun p-p,,"Buffalo, NY 14227",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-customs-broker-rep-ii-sun-1p-930p-m-th-330p-12a-job-buffalo-ny-us-167815351.aspx?mescoid=1300096001001&jobPosition=14,,Logistics/Transportation,eac86222084f880965448f147da20951
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:46:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Onshore Informatica Lead DeveloperYour IT skills are needed just about anywhere. But is it where you want to go? Imagine working for one of the nation's most respected companies. Making a strategic contribution. Receiving the rewards and recognition you deserve. Whether you are pursuing a contract or permanent placement, Experis knows how and where to get you where you want to go.In this Onshore Informatica Lead Developer position, you will have the opportunity to work in roles requiring direct client interaction by serving as the link between the technical and the business views of the system by ensuring that the technical solutions being developed will satisfy the needs of the business.Are you interested? The ideal Onshore Informatica Lead Developer candidate will possess the following experience:Informatica Power CenterTeradataSSISOracle 11 gYou can see it. More challenging work. A more interesting work environment. The opportunity to use your finely honed skills to make a real difference. And to collect pay that reflects your talent and expertise. If this is what you see for yourself, you need to talk to Experis.Through our reach and resources, Experis brings you career options you couldn't find on your own. We're experts at placing each of our candidates into his/her ""dream job"" - one perfectly matched to skills, ambition and lifestyle.We've got the right opportunity. Tell us why you're the right person. Apply today!Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Onshore Informatica Lead Developer Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Onshore Informatica Lead Developer,"Atlanta, GA",http://jobview.monster.com/onshore-informatica-lead-developer-job-atlanta-ga-us-168025863.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=10,,IT/Software Development,63600376f42236a180344e1a8936a29d
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:09:47:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Palo Alto,Full Time Employee,"Palo Alto, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-palo-alto-ca-us-167322958.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,0923fb24d0994e80ba132467ae091c9c
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:10:17:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Larson-Juhl, LLC.  Production / Warehouse Lead West Caldwell, NJ Join the Leading Manufacturer and Distributor of Custom Framing Products Our Company: Larson-Juhl US LLC, a subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway; designs, manufactures, and distributes framing products in the United States and Canada. As the world's leading manufacturer and distributor of custom framing products we are a company committed to our Values: Customer always comes first.Fair and honest in all dealings.Respect for the individual.Excellence in products and service.Rewards tie to performance.Leadership by example. Our Opportunity:  We are seeking a Production Lead to join our team. You will have primary responsibility in a single area of the warehouse and must assist in other areas of the Distribution Center as required.Key Responsibilities:• Pull and process incoming orders - Mats/ length/ supplies. • Will Call - distribute pick-up orders - overall service of our customers. • Quality Assurance - inspect orders for shipping. • Receiving - replenishment of inventory and process. • Shag - pulling & preparing orders for saw operators. • Chop - Inspect moulding and mitre cut moulding with state-of-the-art equipment. • Maintain clean work area.Key Requirements:• Production/warehouse experience required. • Can read and recognize product variations. • Strong customer service orientation. • High School diploma or GED required.  • Ability to perform multiple tasks. • Ability to lift up to 50 lbs. • High attention to detail. • Basic computer skills.Our team members enjoy rewarding career opportunities and a comprehensive benefits program: Health, life, and dental insurance.A company matched 401(k) plan.Short and long-term disability coverage.Paid vacations, paid personal time and paid holidays.A scholarship program, educational assistance and profit sharing. Additional Information / How to Reply:  Ready to Join Us! Click the Apply Now Button for the next steps towards becoming a team member. Have Questions? Contact our dedicated recruiting team directly @ 1.866.748.8722 for assistance.  Larson-Juhl is proud to be an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer dedicated to a policy of non-discrimination in our employment practices on any basis protected by federal, state or local law including race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment sustance abuse testing and background verification checks.  We are excited to partner with the HR Professionals at Instigate, Inc. to support our recruitment efforts. All responses will be processed promptly on behalf of our hiring team by TalentAssist. Please submit your resumes, applications or questions directly to TalentAssist by Instigate for consideration - No agencies, walk-ins or direct calls to distribution centers please. Thank you for your interest in joining our team.See Job Description",Production / Warehouse Lead Job in West Caldwell,Full Time,"West Caldwell, NJ 07006",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/production-warehouse-lead-job-west-caldwell-nj-us-167858087.aspx?mescoid=5301033001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cd8cf7645d07f4915c1ded5c94e7e71c
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:10:19:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you.  (NYSE: XPO) Join XPO Logistics for the respect you deserve on day one and career opportunities moving forward.   At XPO Logistics, our rewarding culture is built on teamwork and respect. Safety is our #1 core value, so we maintain a fleet which includes new Freightliner®Cascadia® tractors with state-of-the-art technology. Each is equipped with Drive Safe Systems™ (DSS) which alerts drivers to potential safety risks and helps them respond. XPO Logistics trucks were also recently rated as best-maintained in the industry by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.   As a Driver Sales Representative (DSR) you can help us serve our customers better while you help yourself with many opportunities to advance your career. Great pay and benefits complete the package that makes XPO Logistics a rewarding culture. All this, and you’ll get to go home every day.   XPO Logistics goes the extra mile for you: Our DSRs are recognized among the best in the industry. Every day, you’ll be supported by a friendly team and state-of-the-art technology. Your ideas will be heard. You will have real opportunities to advance your career. You’ll get great pay, great benefits and the pride that comes from a rewarding career. XPO Logistics invests in safety: New Freightliner® Cascadia® tractors with the latest technologies. The first and only major LTL carrier to deploy significant safety technology as an integrated system across the entire fleet. More National Truck Driving Championship Champions than any other LTL carrier. Our drivers have recorded over 2 billion miles of safe driving. Five XPO Logistics DSRs have driven over three million miles without an accident.  Description of Essential Job Functions: Drive (under both the DOT regulations and in the opinion of the company); unload & load freight off/on trailers; lift freight and other objects of various shapes, sizes and weights (up to 50 lbs frequently and greater than 75 lbs occasionally); safely operate heavy equipment; move, position and connect/disconnect a converter dolly with an average weight/pull force of approximately 128 lbs; safely climb in and out of a tractor cab and trailer; sit for extended periods of time in a truck tractor and/or forklift; safely walk and stand for extended periods of time on various surfaces that may be uneven or slippery; operate a tractor/trailer combination up to 11 consecutive hours, in all types of weather, while safely transporting hazardous/non-hazardous materials; and safely walk, reach (including above your head), bend, climb, push, pull, twist, squat & kneel as necessary to perform the job duties.  Safely operate tractor-trailer combination, including doubles (and triples, where applicable). Perform vehicle inspections required under section 396.13 of the Federal Motor Carriers Safety Regulations. Maintain a current Class A CDL with Hazardous Materials, Doubles/Triples  and Tanker Vehicle (Tanker) endorsements. Operate and maintain records in accordance with Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations (FMCSR), Department of Transportation (DOT) and company policies as required. Provide service excellence to customers including generating sales leads to appropriate personnel. Able to work a flexible schedule and as many as 12-14 hours in a day, including any of the shifts (day, evening, night and weekend). Prompt, daily attendance at assigned work location. Perform other duties as assigned. Compensation & Benefits:   Pay starts at $21.30 per hour and may also include the opportunity for overtime and an annual company bonus. Benefit plans are based on length of employment, beginning with 401k eligibility and expanding up to full medical, dental, vision, prescription, life insurance and disability. XPO Logistics is a great opportunity for a challenging career with tremendous growth potential and the flexibility to be home every day.   Skills & Experience: Possess and maintain a valid Class A Commercial driver's license. Hazardous materials endorsement required. Doubles/Triples endorsement required. Tank Vehicle endorsement (Tankers) required. Must be 21 years of age or older. Forklift experience preferred. Safe driving record and history. Pass DOT drug test and have no prior positive tests or refusals. Pass a company paid DOT physical. Pass a company paid Post Offer Pre-Hire screen (physical essential functions) test.    “We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.”  ",Truck Driver Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30354",,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-job-atlanta-ga-us-167848536.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,,Logistics/Transportation,b066e8f809423295c15c561c225df1b2
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:10:22:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"**BEGIN A REWARDING CAREER TODAY** Peak Enterprises is a leading brand management and advertising company that offers limitless opportunities and growth potential to all dedicated and motivated individuals. No matter the work history, we may be the last stop in your career search with our sales management training program! Currently, we are seeking qualified candidates interested in personal and professional growth to aid us in our goals of expansion and client diversification within our sales and marketing departments. WHAT WE DO:Our clients hire us as a marketing, promotions, and sales office without the headaches, expenses, and overhead that come with doing it themselves. We guarantee results and deliver them with efficiency and integrity. Our company holds itself to the highest standards, working only with industry leaders who share our values. OUR APPROACH:Our method is simple: we apply a customer friendly, face-to-face approach to our promotions and sales strategies. By directly meeting with business customers we can dramatically increase our clients’ sales without dramatically increasing their budget. Our technique is proven to be the most effective way to penetrate a target market and acquire new, profitable customers.  RequirementsRequirements:At this moment, we are looking for 4 energetic, career minded individuals to assist us with our expansion goals. These candidates will be hired as entry level employees but with rapid advancement opportunities into a management position. Our development program is designed to cross-train the right candidate in all facets of a Marketing/Sales Firm. No experience is necessary due to our paid training program. The focus is to prepare them for a position as the general manager of a branch; locally or nationally!• Generate sales leads through direct face-to-face contact with customers• Meet, develop relationships and maintain great customer service• Utilize your customer service skills to prepare and present competitive sales proposals• Account Management• Business development• Territory Management• Unique Marketing/Sales training• Work closely with a variety of individuals to accomplish your goals• Competitive sales team environment We offer GREAT benefits, including:• Uncapped earnings with competitive cash incentives and long term residual income• Attend our sales/marketing training seminars• Phenomenal support through networking opportunities and conference calls• Ongoing training to bring out all individuals' maximum potential• Multiple awards, honors and contests throughout the year• Professional, hands-on, one-on-one training• No out of pocket expenses• Recession-proof, growth industry• NO SENIORITY!  ",Assistant Manager - Entry Level Management - Full Training Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30319",Advertising and PR Services Management Consulting Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-manager-entry-level-management-full-training-job-atlanta-ga-us-167042809.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=2,,Project/Program Management,03637013e748171fb3cf24849cd14c65
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:10:41:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Our Organization Composites One LLC is a family-owned distributor with over 60 years of composites experience. Our network of 32 local distribution centers is dedicated to serving the composites manufacturing industry. With more than 30,000 products from over 400 supplier partners reaching over 9,000 customers, Composites One is the leading distributor of composites materials in North America. Visit us at www.compositesone.com.Responsible for accurately and professionally transporting and delivering hazardous and non-hazardous materials in a safe and compliant manner.  This is a full-time position with local runs that will allow you to be home nights and weekends, plus the luxury of using late model state of the art equipment.Position Requirements: Must be at least 25 years old. HS Diploma or GED required. Current Class A CDL drivers license with the following endorsements: general knowledge, air brakes and combination vehicle.  A minimum of 3 years related experience with operating tractor/trailer equipment. Experience delivering hazardous materials is preferred. General knowledge and understanding of OSHA requirements, safety awareness and hazardous material shipping is required.   Ability to pass all of the DOT driver qualification standards. No serious traffic violations in the last 3 years; this would include NEVER being convicted of the following: reckless/careless driving; driving while intoxicated or under the influence of drugs; hit & run, leaving the scene of an accident or failure to report an accident; excessive speeding 20 mph or more over the posted limits.Physical Requirements: Ability to independently lift up to 75 pounds. Ability to walk and/or stand for entire length of shift; regularly required to stoop, kneel, crouch, bend or crawl; may be required to sometimes sit, climb or balance. Ability to reach, grasp, push and pull with hands and arms. Close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision and ability to adjust focus; hand-eye coordination. May be exposed to a wide range of temperatures. Noise level is moderate to loud. This is a full-time position working Monday through Friday; typical hours vary by location.Benefits Include: Health Insurance (Medical, Dental, Vision), 401K Plan with Company Match and Profit Sharing, Paid Time Off, Flexible Spending Accounts (Health and Dependent Care), Employee Assistance Program, Educational Assistance Program.Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) Qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, or other protected classification as defined by applicable law and regulation.ADA Accommodations Accommodations are available for applicants with disabilities in all phases of the application and employment process. To request an accommodation please contact the ADA Coordinator by email at ADACoordinator@compositesone.com.PI93999453Apply Here",Commercial Truck Driver Job in Arlington,Full Time,"Arlington, WA 98223",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-truck-driver-job-arlington-wa-us-167352028.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,Hourly Wage,,5c536a83dfa11855a49a22baad5aa2bd
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:10:53:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Drivers Needed for Medical Specimen Route COMPANY: Expedite Delivery System We are currently looking for a courier driver with fuel efficient car for a specimen route. No experience required. Must be professional, courteous, reliable. Good with people and be able to communicate. Must speak fluent english.Requirements:At least 21 years oldSocial Security CardDriving Record 3 yearsDriver's LicenseInsurance Coverage 100/300/50Registration of VehiclePass Background check and drug screenMust have a smart phone.Respond online for more information.  Respond online today.​ Location: Waldorf, MD Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 21732 Vehicle Type: Any, Car Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Waldorf,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Drivers Needed for Medical Specimen Route COMPANY: Expedite Delivery System We are currently looking for a courier driver with fuel efficient car for a specimen route. No experience required. Must be professional, courteous, reliable. Good with people and be able to communicate. Must speak fluent english.Requirements:At least 21 years oldSocial Security CardDriving Record 3 yearsDriver's LicenseInsurance Coverage 100/300/50Registration of VehiclePass Background check and drug screenMust have a smart phone.Respond online for more information.  Respond online today.​ Location: Waldorf, MD Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 21732 Vehicle Type: Any, Car Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-waldorf-md-us-167818780.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=1,,Logistics/Transportation,5b330bf4791eec801e5bafcd6970d356
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:03:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Senior Helpdesk Support in Atlanta, GA.Essential Functions: Provides Level 1 and Level 2 support Helpdesk needs include phone support, handling minor triage issues with basic troubleshooting and escalating all other issues to Level 2 and 3 support Responsibilities include maintaining, developing and supporting personal computers, servers, local and wide area network, software, and data communications technologies throughout the Firm, to maximize Firm-wide productivity and minimize system downtime Assists with Helpdesk duties and installs hardware and softwareREQUIREMENTS: Must have relevant skills and experience in a helpdesk support role",Senior Helpdesk Support Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30309",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-helpdesk-support-job-atlanta-ga-us-167709031.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),05221d8c8816a83361437f62bf4e35c1
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:04:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Overview: XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you.  (NYSE: XPO) Job Summary: Supervise a staff of employees during various inbound, city, and/or outbound freight operations. Ensure production goals are met by managing tonnage, payroll and other administrative functions. Description Essential Job Functions: Available to work a variety of shifts, including days, evenings, nights and weekends. Effectively manage the inbound/outbound processing of various freight. Consistently meet or exceed productivity goals. Ability to lift up to 50 pounds frequently and greater than 75 lbs. occasionally. Supervise and manage personnel operations to ensure efficient loading, unloading, and processing of customer shipments. Supervise and plan hourly employee schedules to meet daily operations goals. Enforce all company, FMCSR, OSHA and DOT policies, rules, regulations and laws as required. Ensure customer's freight is delivered and picked-up timely and damage free. Coach, train and develop employees consistent with company policy. Standing and walking on non-climate controlled loading dock area for several hours at a time. Safely climb in and out of a tractor cab & trailer. Safely walk, reach (including above your head), bend, climb, push, pull, twist, squat & kneel as necessary to perform the job duties. Prompt, daily attendance at assigned work location. Perform other duties as assigned.  BS/BA degree (equivalent military or other work experience may substitute). Transportation/Distribution/Logistics degree programs preferred.  Two years of supervisory experience preferred. LTL (less than truckload) industry experience preferred. Demonstrate leadership, communication and administrative skills. Knowledge of the less-than-truckload industry, hazardous materials regulations, and Department of Transportation rules and regulations. Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, Word, and Outlook). Proven ability to lead others in a fast paced environment. Excellent oral and written communication skills. Ability to balance multiple tasks while positively motivating, coaching and communicating clear instructions to others. Forklift experience preferred. “We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.” Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 5%",Freight Operations Supervisor Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30301",,http://jobview.monster.com/freight-operations-supervisor-job-atlanta-ga-us-167025086.aspx?mescoid=5301032001001&jobPosition=5,,Business/Strategic Management,317de096bc71d528a3b706a678301767
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:07:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Buffalo, NY",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-buffalo-ny-us-159710050.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=19,,Logistics/Transportation,23aa5d3861f27dfed839b0736bfd04b5
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:07:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in Texas Job in Lockhart,Full Time Employee,"Lockhart, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-texas-job-lockhart-tx-us-167323158.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=10,,Logistics/Transportation,925fc8e309387ee487ec0ff2fe4684ab
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:08:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Businesses that partner with Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants come in all shapes, sizes and market caps. Our tried and true sales and marketing system works for them all.   You’re new to the work force but you’re ambitious and looking to hit the ground running. Your communication skills and leadership abilities shapes how new and existing business grows. You leverage your entrepreneurial drive to target, educate and persuade new customers to embrace our client’s latest services and technologies. Using your influencing and relationship-building skills, you provide caliber client service and team building initiatives. You anticipate how decisions are made, understand the details of individual campaigns and persistently explore and uncover the business needs of key clients and the Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants team. Working with them, you set the vision of the business development strategy.  Be at the heart of Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants' future business, managing cutting edge sales and marketing campaigns with your inordinate talent of multitasking efficiency. What you love most is delivering success, exceeding expectations around such tasks as optimal sales campaign delivery, team building, solution consultations, turnarounds, and get excited when new, never been done before challenges fall into your lap!  Responsibilities Execute day to day sales, marketing, and campaign managementExcel in our management training program working from Entry Level to Senior ManagementThis job involves one on one sales interaction with customersManage the implementation and delivery of a key client’s activity, maximizing performance, return on investment, and identifying opportunity to expandOwn all problem solving, troubleshooting, client campaign requests, media planning and key implementationsBuild client relationships through service excellence and balance their campaign needs with your proactive approachGet your hands dirty with team building, growth, and expansion effortsThis position offers a compensation structure where pay is based upon individual performance  **This is an entry level position with advancement opportunities into senior management**  RequirementsMinimum qualifications BA/BS degree or equivalent practical experience.Relevant experience in a leadership roleAbility to speak English fluently and idiomatically.  Preferred qualifications Internship experience in sales, marketing and account management.Interest in developing customer partnerships.Detail oriented with the ability to prioritize, plan, and organize sales activity.  If you're up for the challenge and fit these qualifications send us your resume!   Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants is looking for people with skills in: sales, entry level management, sales or account management, retail sales, sales representative, full time entry level sales, communication, sales techniques, marketing, full time account manager, full time management, managing a sales team, full time inside sales, entry level field sales, telephone sales, IT sales, entry level sales, sales analyst, national account manager, software sales, entry level medical sales, full time advertising sales, entry level management, full time distribution sales, full time sales management, inside sales, entry level inside sales, full time sales and marketing, retail sales, retail management  At  Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants, we enjoy every minute with our colleagues, friends and family. It is our passion to provide a fun and relaxed atmosphere filled with games throughout the workweek.  We think of it as an extension of college until it is time to get to work and that is why we are expanding and growing into new markets each year.   Submit your resume to careers@wearephoenixatl.com     Google Us https://www.google.com/search?q=google&oq=goo&aqs=chrome.0.69i59j69i60l3j69i65l2.511j0j7&sourceid=chrome&ie=UTF-8#q=%23wearephoenixatl   Check Out Our Latest News!Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants Adds New Client http://finance.yahoo.com/news/phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-adds-182709812.html After Quarterly Review, Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants Promotes New Market Managers http://www.einpresswire.com/article/311432421/after-quarterly-review-phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-promotes-new-market-managers Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants Gets 2016 Nomination for Atlanta's Best and Brightest http://finance.yahoo.com/news/phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-gets-200554466.html Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants' Manager Speaks at Dallas Leadership Expo http://finance.yahoo.com/news/phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-manager-185651081.html Phoenix Integrated Store Consultants Supports National Networking Opportunities http://www.marketwired.com/press-release/phoenix-integrated-store-consultants-supports-national-networking-opportunities-2060782.htm  Visit UsWebsite Social MediaLinkedIn / Facebook     ",Account Manager (Sales,"Full Time , Employee","Atlanta, GA 30342",Advertising and PR Services Management Consulting Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/account-manager-sales-marketing-business-development-entry-level-job-atlanta-ga-us-167667678.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,30b995bcf40cea2b4141fabbd61960b5
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:08:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"In this important and visible role, you will oversee a team of 2-3 individuals in the delivery of Alternative Dispute Resolution (ADR) services by managing an assigned arbitration and mediation caseload, manage a team of staff members and promote a collaborative environment. Demonstrating a high level of ADR knowledge and expertise, you'll also provide external client services by managing the party experience with the AAA, and will serve as the primary contact for clients, arbitrators and mediators. The American Arbitration Association is proud to offer a comprehensive benefits program, which includes health, dental (w/ortho) and vision insurance, healthcare FSA, 403(b) retirement plan w/company match, paid time off, paid holidays, disability and life insurance, Corporate FitBit Wellness Program, EAP and a pre-tax commuter benefit plan.Is the primary point of contact for clients and arbitrators on an assigned caseload; conducts administrative conference calls; facilitates and proactively participates in preliminary hearing conferences fostering and promoting the AAA brand of services, and is a resource for clients and arbitrators.Delivers the highest level of professional client services engaging the assistance of staff at all levels; manages cases in accordance with the AAA rules and procedures maximizing efficiencies through the use of the AAA's proprietary software applications.Ensures the delivery of alternative dispute resolution process is managed effectively, meeting deadlines, enforcing AAA timelines, maintaining neutrality during all interactions with clients, ensuring the integrity of the process, and proactively identifying potential roadblocks and implementing processes to avoid or resolve them.Proactively identifies expectations regarding the case management process facilitated by the AAA and works with staff, clients and neutrals to design an appropriate process for the resolution of the dispute; and encourages the use of mediation as an effective way for parties to resolve disputes.Reviews all newly assigned cases and contacts filing party to resolve any deficient filings.Prioritizes and assesses workload making appropriate assignments to staff to ensure work is completed efficiently using available system data and metrics.Resolves issues independently utilizing all resources available such as; collaborating with other managers are using the institutional knowledge and AAA Rules; escalates case management issues to direct supervisor only after all avenues have been exhausted.Advise arbitrators on procedural hearing management, jurisdiction and related issues and assists in monitoring case management skills of arbitrators.Develops and sustains client relationships to ensure trust and respect for AAA and its services.Collaborates with regional staff to provide feedback regarding the Roster of Neutrals.Collaborates with case management centers and regional offices to identify trends in Dispute Resolution in order to improve the process for clients.Participates in educational opportunities within the ADR community and meets annual training expectations set by the Association. Education & Experience: Bachelor's degree in business or related discipline; 5 or more years prior work experience involving comprehensive customer service management in a law office or judicial industry; with at least 2 years of experience in a leadership or supervisory role; or an equivalent combination of education and work experience.Technical Skills: Intermediate proficiency with Microsoft Excel and Word, intermediate proficiency with web-based case management system preferred.Language Skills: Ability to read and interpret documents such as legal files, business correspondence and procedure manuals; ability to write routine reports and business correspondence; ability to speak effectively, both in person and by telephone, to customers, attorneys, arbitrators, mediators and employees of the organization.Mathematical Skills: Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals; ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs; ability to understand and interpret statistical reports, financial/fee schedules, data charts and graphs.Reasoning Ability: Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists; ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram or schedule form. The American Arbitration Association is an equal opportunity employer (EEO) and considers all employees and applicants for positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, marital status, or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state and local lawsPI94373014Apply Here",Manager of ADR Services Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30345",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-of-adr-services-job-atlanta-ga-us-167848945.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,"47,500.00 - 53,500.00 $ /yearYearly Salary",,d27b9cb2520eb22603a4dfb840058066
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:08:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Manufacturing – Change Career to - Truck Driver – Entry Level,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/manufacturing-%E2%80%93-change-career-to-truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-no-experience-full-time-job-atlanta-ga-us-165015603.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=15,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,ffa58e0e079ede04d533b195f3c66746
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:09:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Senior Manager of Clinical Operations is responsible for recruitment, growth, and development of Clinical Operations employees in a defined region which also includes successful delivery of organization’s project deliverables, on time with high quality.In addition, the Senior Manager is responsible for the following: Managing staff in accordance with organization’s policies and applicable regulations. Responsibilities include planning, assigning, and directing work; appraising performance and guiding professional development; rewarding and disciplining employees; addressing employee relations issues and resolving problems. Mentoring and developing employees to expand employee performance levels and assure retention of high performing PAREXEL employees Developing plans to support growth and career development of assigned Clinical Operations employees as well as managing the delivery of quality performance in line with their job description. Ensuring staff development and performance feedback are provided through activities such as mentorship and career development Communicating team and individual goals and expectations to ensure direct reports understand their responsibilities Promoting a positive and professional work environment that attracts and retains the best talent and delivers services that exceed customer expectations. Ensuring direct reports meet departmental and project productivity and quality metrics by efficient execution of their project in line with project plan Building teamwork and improving process and productivity by working within and across functional areas Maintaining appropriate resources to achieve maximum staff billability and adhering to quality management practices. Providing leadership in the implementation of PAREXEL’s quality and strategic initiatives as well as business processes Collaborating with Project Resource Office, Clinical Operations Management, and Project Leadership to ensure client projects are resourced with suitably developed professionals Contributing to the development and ongoing review of Controlled Documents, implementing process improvements in response to client and team feedback and quality audits. Serving as departmental representative to clients Promoting new business by contributing to new project proposals and client presentations. Providing expertise and consultation to project teams. Serve as departmental representative to clients Participating in client presentations and/ or bid defense meetings, as required QualificationsQualifications:Undergraduate degree in clinical science or health-related field from an accredited institution, or equivalent work experience requiredSubstantial experience supervising or managing professional staff in a clinical research environment required to include past managing functional line managers. Extensive experience using computerized information systems required; experience with PC-Windows, word processing, and electronic spreadsheets requiredSubstantial clinical trials development experience is requiredThorough knowledge of ICH and local regulatory authority regulations regarding drug research and development is requiredPrevious experience in a CRO environment is preferredKnowledge, Skills, and Abilities:Excellent verbal and written communication skillsExcellent organizational, record retention, and time management skillsExcellent working knowledge of ICH-GCP, applicable law (local and country) and regulatory requirementsSolid understanding of the drug development process with a special emphasis on clinical developmentAbility to handle multiple tasks as well as to proactive identify and resolve complex problems and issuesAbility to participate in initiatives, and create and implement new processesExcellent Leadership skills with ability to lead and facilitate cross-functional working groups andteams.EEO DisclaimerPAREXEL complies with all applicable federal, state, and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.",Senior Manager,Full Time Employee,Home Based,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-manager-clinical-operations-southeast-job-atlanta-ga-us-167718876.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),79bba024a920877e1544a419539f1259
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:10:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Basic Function Summary:Process purchase orders and document folders in accordance with PAE procurement manual and FAR regulations to support needs of the program.Review requisitions and confirming documents to establish basis for submitting request for quotes to suppliers.Review, place and process requests for aircraft parts and other supplies and repair services, and handle rental, maintenance, and lease-purchase agreements. These activities involve routine, non-routine, and emergency requests. Requests for equipment use involves a determination of whether rental or lease-purchase is appropriate. Equipment maintenance and repair involves research of alternatives with factory representatives.Buyers must demonstrate continuous effort to improve operations, decrease turnaround times, streamline work processes, and work cooperatively and jointly to provide quality seamless customer service.Must be customer oriented.Essential Duties & Accountabilities:-  Source, negotiate and create procurements and document procurement folders in accordance with CPSR and company guidelines in a timely manner.- Conduct research, evaluate findings, and make decisions on procurement matters.- Interpret and evaluate contract provisions.- Organize, update, and retain product information files and purchase order records.- Track purchases to verify all billings are correct and accurate.- Provide feedback to manager including approval priority and completion status.-Ensure time of delivery or service completions is within acceptable timescales.- Maximize cost efficiency and effectiveness.- Interview vendors and evaluate their products and capabilities as a supplier.- Perform common business practices relating to the purchase, pricing, terms, shipment, taxes, and payments for commodities and services.- Communicate orally in the English language with customers, co-workers, vendors, and the public in face-to-face settings, or using the telephone.- Work cooperatively with other employees and customers.- Serve as a liaison between departments and vendors.- May be required to perform other duties as directed to meet company needs.Qualification Standards:- 4 year degree preferred- 3 to 5 years of buying experience - Knowledge of source selection and price/cost analysis techniques.- Familiarity with FAR/DFARS regulations.- Strong communications and organizational skills and attention to detail.- Ability to work in a fast pace environment.- Computer skills in enterprise (Costpoint preferred) and MS office applications.- Degree can be substituted for experience requirements if degree is in a related field.- Must be U.S. citizen and pass background investigation.",Buyer Job in Greenville,Employee,"Greenville, SC 29615",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/buyer-job-greenville-sc-us-167789821.aspx?mescoid=1300068001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,3e9ec0bd3b3301b3b8e33f4f6fa3582a
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:28:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Fremont,Full Time Employee,"Fremont, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-fremont-ca-us-167323486.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=18,,Logistics/Transportation,59945d49829ec31ab10cea11abba0a66
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:29:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in San Leandro,Full Time Employee,"San Leandro, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-san-leandro-ca-us-167323576.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,1d0189eb7833e62246f3cf32060e5d95
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:11:30:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in San Bruno,Full Time Employee,"San Bruno, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-san-bruno-ca-us-167323027.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,41a4406def9dc77ecb5224d9bbb3bd71
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:12:01:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary In support of one of our growing California clients, ABM is currently taking applications for Prospective Bakery Distributors.   Our client, a California subsidiary of a leading producer and marketer of packaged bakery foods in the United States, is rapidly expanding its California presence. This leading baking company, through over 40 U.S. subsidiaries, currently produces breads, buns, rolls, snack cakes and pastries, which are distributed fresh to foodservice and retail customers in the Southeast, Mid-Atlantic, and Southwest, as well as select markets in California and Nevada. The distribution is accomplished in large part through direct-store-delivery (DSD) service by over 3,500 independent distributors who own the rights to distribute certain brands of fresh packaged bakery products in their geographic territories (independent distributorships).   If owning your own business is appealing to you, then consider an opportunity as a Prospective Bakery Distributor.      ABM will be conducting the initial screening and will employ those successful candidates during their paid training period. After this process is complete, our client will determine who to offer the opportunity to purchase an independent distributorship.  Functions and Responsibilities: The key functions of a Prospective Bakery Distributor will be to deliver, display, and sell company products on assigned sales routes in accordance with established merchandising programs and standards. Additional responsibilities include but are not limited to: Learn and use the basic fundamentals of a DSD system including:        Display / Merchandising / Ordering Products        Time schedule / Callbacks / Operating Handheld Device        Customer Relations Know your customers by name, their store policies that affect you, and their basic wants and needs. Establish a sound, professional relationship with key personnel. Maintain a neat professional appearance. Perform other duties as assigned. *Job duties may be modified at any time. Job Requirements:We are looking for individuals with: A desire to own and run your own business A self-motivated and sales-focused mind-set Excellent organizational skills A natural ability to deliver excellent customer service A good driving record and the ability to finance a bakery delivery vehicle   THIS IS NOT AN OFFER TO SELL OR A SOLICITATION OF AN OFFER TO BUY A FRANCHISE NOR SHOULD IT BE CONSTRUED AS SUCH.   No franchise will be sold in any state requiring registration unless such franchise has been registered and deemed effective or exempted from registration, and all applicable disclosure documents delivered to the prospective franchisee. High School or GED equivalent minimum education",Bread Route Sales Driver Job in San Jose,Full Time Employee,"San Jose, CA 95131",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/bread-route-sales-driver-job-san-jose-ca-us-167360915.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=14,,Logistics/Transportation,bdab36842a414dea830b5ddec1b93d45
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:12:02:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Brentwood,Full Time Employee,"Brentwood, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-brentwood-ca-us-167322996.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=14,,Logistics/Transportation,2cc69b8ad98f8769413bee5b10b3864b
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:12:02:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Financial Advisor Northwestern MutualOur financial advisory firm is seeking new Financial Advisors to join growing practice. Strong applicants will have exceptional interpersonal skills, have a history of personal success, and have a demonstrated interest in business, finance, or entrepreneurism.Financial Advisors provide expert guidance and innovative solutions for the planning needs of individuals and businesses in the areas of retirement planning, insurance and investment services, estate planning, business planning, education funding, and employee benefits. They strive to understand their clients' goals and dreams in order to develop comprehensive financial solutions that will help their clients reach financial success Financial Advisors are given the flexibility to build their own practice while receiving support from our firm’s exceptional network of financial specialists, training and educational programs, and mentoring opportunities.Desired Skills and Experience 4-year College Degree preferred Minimum 2 years of Managerial or Executive experience referred Prior financial services experience not needed-- extensive training providedWe want people with different backgrounds and work experience, including but not limited to: Financial management, insurance, and financial services Executive leadership Community influencers Former athletes Military background Candidate must be an accomplished communicator with strong verbal and written skills Prior sales and/or business experience preferredIt’s also a plus if you have strong interpersonal management skills, and are a self-starter who is motivated to become an executive and has had personal success and professional success.A career with Northwestern Mutual not only provides outstanding income potential, but will provide you the opportunity of impacting the lives of others in a professional setting that emphasizes and values relationships and integrity.Additionally, Northwestern Mutual is committed to offering its Financial Advisors a comprehensive compensation and benefits program which includes: Exceptional Income Potential Leadership Opportunities Sponsorship of Licensing/Credentialing Development Stipends Expense Allowance Comprehensive Medical Coverage Retirement Package; Pension Plan Group Life and Disability Income InsuranceAs a financial representative, a typical day may include: Digging deep with clients and prospects to help formulate financial strategies Developing tailored solutions for each client Training and coaching from people who know their stuff, who are experts in management and executives in the financial field Managerial team meetings to set goals Making calls to prospective clientsDevotion to its policy owners has led Northwestern Mutual through 160 years of industry success. Some of our accolades include: #109 on Fortune 500 in 2015 ""World's Most Admired"" Company in our Industry by Fortune in 2015 Top 125 Companies for Training & Development (2009-2015) Top 10 Independent Broker Dealer by Financial Planning Magazine ('05-'14) Top 50 Companies to Launch a Career With by Business Week from ('06-'13) Named one of the “50 Best Companies to Sell For” by Selling Power magazine Named one of the ""50 Best Places to Launch a Career"" by BusinessWeek magazine Top 10 independent broker-dealersNorthwestern Mutual has always received the highest possible financial strength ratings from the four major ratings agencies: A.M. Best: A++ Fitch Ratings: AAA Standard & Poor’s: AAA Moody’s Investors Service: AaaIf you are interested in exploring a career with us, we welcome your application.",Financial Advisor / Financial Sales Representative- Full Time Sales,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-advisor-financial-sales-representative-full-time-sales-we-train-no-experience-needed-job-atlanta-ga-us-166892790.aspx?mescoid=4100676001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,6f91a45d3e326b383b9a7aaa7640c4d1
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:12:02:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"ENTRY LEVEL MANAGEMENT / MARKETING / ADVERTISING / SALES  Junior Marketing Associate- MARKETING/ADVERTISING EXPANSION Begin an Exciting Career TODAY!   We are seeking a Telecommunications Junior Marketing Associate for a premier firm providing marketing, advertising and consulting services to large corporations on local and national levels.  This position would work closely with Marketing Specialists to identify and develop new streams of revenue for the AT&T campaign through UNIQUE advertising strategies including sales, promotions, and innovative marketing solutions.  The Junior Marketing Associate would create and execute these campaigns and convey the promotions to each respective target market within a dynamic team environment.This is a career opportunity that pays weekly with an uncapped commission. We are looking for both entry level marketing associate as well as experienced sales account managers that are motivated by account growth and management opportunities. We are hiring for part-time or full-time positions. MAJOR RESPONSIBILITY AREAS:Implementation of marketing plans, including product positioning, campaign strategies, and market strategy insights.Discovery of strategic business opportunities through cross function collaboration with sales, HR, etc. Marketing opportunity for revenueProvide product/service support in order to establish proper channels of information and communication. Responsible for branding, advertising,company events and promotional collateralWork with management on projects dealing with media relations, business communications, success stories RequirementsWe are eager to hear from you if you fit the following description:No experience is necessary but professionalism and integrity are a must!Ambition, strong work ethic, and open to new ideasAre sports minded and have a do what it takes mentalityA positive and winning attitudeStrong interpersonal skillsDesire an opportunity for managementDesire to start a new opportunity in the marketing and sales departmentExcellent communication skillsLeadership experienceAbility to work in a high energy environmentBe a self starter with problem solving skillsBe a career oriented individual searching for rapid growth        People from all backgrounds seeking part time or full time opportunities in the following areas are encouraged to inquire about our program: sales, customer service, sales representative, internships, part time, manager, management, purchasing, part time, restaurant, assistant, hotel, supervisor, general, advertising, communications, sales manager, project management, editor, hospitality, professional, bartender, call center, inventory, photography, bilingual, sports, cashier, clerk, distribution, sales management, shipping, waiter, waitress.  Apply if you have the following experience: entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, accounting, entrepreneur, summer job, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail, restaurant, hospitality, management, administrative, business development, business, internship, advertising, entry level, retail, insurance, education, outside sales, strategy-planning, project manager, part-time, server, summer  employment, promotions, pr, customer service, full-time, restaurant, quality control, assistant, secretary, public relations, summer, salesman, hotel, safety, executive assistant, summer work, communications, training, human resources, office manager, media, general, social services, sales manager, pharmaceutical sales, food services, jobs, summer, recruiter, sales, bartender, general business,  project management, hospitality, server, collections, bookkeeper, intern, management trainee, purchasing, full time, part time, bilingual, inventory, recruiter, counselor, travel, teaching, trainer, media, professional, trainee, data entry, internship, administration, new graduate, hostess, executive assistant, hostess, sales management, coordinator, cashier,  medical sales, distribution, financial, manager, sports, entertainment, international, consultant, real estate, telecommunications, general, retail, business, sports, entertainment, marketing, sports marketing, customer service",Telecommunications Marketing Associate: Atlanta Market Expansion! Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30319",Telecommunications Services Advertising and PR Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/telecommunications-marketing-associate-atlanta-market-expansion!-job-atlanta-ga-us-167042813.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=20,,Marketing/Product,add228d7417899369b4d7ceba1e778a5
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:12:20:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director of Quality and Safety Essential Duties and Responsibilities: * Responsible for organizational wide direction, development and implementation of quality initiatives set forth with Chief Medical Director primarily focused upon interventional vascular surgery within an extension of practice model. * Utilizes, integrates, and interprets data to assist organization in its improvement efforts, and promote optimal patient outcomes. Works collaboratively with Chief Medical Director, Senior Management to develop strategic quality initiatives. * Leads organizational performance efforts for JCAHO, core quality measures, COP and regulatory and all other accrediting and regulatory agencies. Ensures compliance with JCAHO, and all legal, regulatory and accrediting agency requirements are met. * Ensures responsibility for organizational wide occurrence reporting system; analyzes and reports trends and identifies appropriate interventions to reduce risk and liability to the organization. * Develops and implements educational programs for employees, medical staff and board members on analysis of risk assessment, historical and concurrent occurrence and claims data and national trends. * Facilitates and directs organizational wide risk management program to ensure compliance with statutory mandates, regulatory requirements and accreditation standards of professional organizations, i.e., JCAHO, OSHA, etc. * Participates in and provides leadership for organizational disaster preparedness and patient safety initiatives. Director of Quality and Safety Continued: * Actively contributes to and works toward improvement in meeting core measures, patient safety and service excellence goals * Continuously evaluates work process and design; understands role in ensuring * Quality/performance improvement, productivity, and service delivery to meet stakeholder needs. * Performs duties in accordance with departmental policies and procedures, and recognized professional, quality, patient safety, environmental and infection control standards. * Ensures the coordination of communication regarding activities of quality improvement teams and projects throughout the organization. Provides relevant and timely feedback to clinical managers to improve services and processes. * Acts as an expert resource to executives, Physicians, and all members of the healthcare team regarding study design, data collection and interpretation, CQI quality model, team process and group dynamics. Serves as organizational liaison between executive management and clinical and physician staff. * Demonstrates responsibility and accountability in managing clinical standards. Continuously evaluates and assesses clinical process/design to enhance productivity and service delivery to meet executive expectations and business goals. * Responsible for all onboarding for clinical staff, coordinating orientation, and education for new hires, as well as oversee continuous training. * Provides leadership of the Quality Management and maintains and monitors utilization of resources, physical space, equipment, department protocols, standards, policies, and practices. * Manages staff performance through regular audit review, real time feedback, and performance planning. Actively coaches and mentors clinical staff. * Attends and participates in staff meetings, patient conferences and in-service presentations as appropriate. Completes annual competency training, including but not limited to, radiation safety, infection control, patient safety, quality improvement, MSDS, and OSHA standards (PPE, First Aid and Blood-borne Pathogens, Hazard Communications, Emergency Procedures and Job Safety). Director of Quality and Safety Continued: * Works cohesively with PVG Chief Medical Officer, corporate finance, and operations to oversee, monitor and manage meaningful use requirements and PQRS measurements and reporting through advanced MD EHR system at each PVG managed facility. * Audit meaningful use and PQRS measurements on a daily, weekly ad monthly basis to ensure compliance and report findings to appropriate PVG personnel and facility medical directors as appropriate. * Investigate, manage, monitor and report quality incident reporting per company policy. * Oversee, coordinate and manage clinical quality manual policies and procedures, 8 sections, all procedures. * Oversee, coordinate and manage technical manual including Radiation safety manual, Facility safety manual, and Staff competency manual. * Oversee and manage level 1, level 2 and level 3 internal documents using company document tracking system and update on company server as necessary. * Champion and manage any state or federal quality audit or licensing requirements as appropriate. * Identifies outstanding compliance issues and oversees proper implementation of business requirements. Demonstrates knowledge of how own area links to other key areas of the company and identifies new ways of doing business. * Define clinical roles and responsibilities for RN and operating room personnel job classifications. * Report monthly on any and all activities as appropriate. Qualifications * Bachelor's Degree in Nursing; RN required, Post Graduate Degree in Nursing or Healthcare related field required or in process * Minimum 5 years of experience in critical care, operating room, emergency room and risk management, and/or administrative arenas. * Experience with project management required. * Familiarity with EHR systems * Knowledge of State, Federal, and JCAHO regulations. * Current licensure as a Registered Nurse. * CPHQ (Certified Professional in Healthcare Quality) OR CHCQM (Diplomat in American Board of Quality Assurance and Utilization Review Physicians) a plus * Individuals without CPHQ or ABQUARP will be granted an 18 month grace period to obtain CPHQ or ABQAURP to obtain, if all other qualifications are met. Now Work Environment: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.",RN Director of Quality and Safety Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-director-of-quality-safety-job-atlanta-ga-us-167763744.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=14,,,eddb24ff12866db756b67f1714852b58
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:12:20:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"GHA Technologies is GROWING! We are now hiring experienced money motivated B2B OutsideSales Executives,nationwide (US.) Successful Resellers, Sales Professionals, Sales Engineers and National Account Managers are encouraged to apply!  Bring your experience, sales skills, and education to GHA Technologies for theHIGHEST commission rate and best compensation plan in the industry! We Offer Our Sales Executives: Uncapped Commission (40% - 100% of GP) + Bonuses Health and Dental Insurance Plans401K Company Stock Ownership Plan Industry Leading Promotional Offers! As our Sales Executive, you will be calling on businesses to sell our extensive technical services and product lines.  Products and brands that you will be representing include: Apple, HP, IBM, Lenovo, Dell, VMWare, NetApp, Adobe, QLogic, EMC, Fujitsu, Microsoft, Intel, Cisco, all the hottest Data Center, Virtualization, Energy Conservation, Cloud, Storage, Security, Wireless, Video, Telephony and Identification technologies, as well as, toner, computer supplies, hardware, software, networking, cables, fiber optics, video conferencing, document Imaging,power protection, point of sale, RFID, ID badges, digital signage, IT infrastructure, and IT services! Requirements:Two or more years of recent technology sales experience is required (computers, wireless, telephony, security, data center, virtualization, energy conservation, video, copier/imaging.)Special consideration and Bonus Incentives for Sales Professionals with the following Certifications:  Cisco CCNA/CCDA, VMWare, IBM, Symantec, HP, Dell Microsoft, EMC, Palo Alto, Fire Eye, and Barracuda. Must have a clean driving record (and adequate liability insurance coverage) since Outside Sales is involved. If you meet the required experience, you know how to make outside sales calls and sell, we invite you to apply today, raise your commissions and bonus, and enjoy the ride as we grow to become a $500 million dollar corporate success story!To Apply:Please respond by e-mail (Resume attached as a Word file preferred, or you may paste your Resume into the body of your e-mail). Send resume by: Fax, Mail, or e-mail to (no calls please): GHA Technologies Attn: Company Recruiter 8998 E. Raintree Dr.Scottsdale, AZ 85260 Fax:   630-563-9138 or 480-951-6956 e-mail: resumeseast@gha-associates.comDuring this phase of our recruiting effort we will not be able to accept telephone calls, but we would like to receive your resume. Candidates only, no Recruiters/Agencies please.GHA Technologies is an Equal Opportunity EmployerAbout Us:GHA Technologies, Inc. is a nationally expanding network, computer reseller and systems integrator with offices nationwide. GHA is listed as the 18th largest private corporation in Arizona and #166 on the Var 500 for the entire USA. We sell HP, Dell, IBM, Lenovo, Nimble, EMC, NetApp, Sony, Apple, VMware, Samsung, Fujitsu, APC, Symantec, Panasonic, Microsoft, Intel, Cisco, and all the latest storage, datacenter, virtualization, cloud, security, VoIP, wireless, video and identification technologies. We also specialize in mission-critical product procurement and integration services for some of the largest corporate, government, and educational clients in the US. Our client base is a Who's Who of Corporate America.  Currently, GHA has over 170 employees with annual sales of approximately $150 million and growing at a rate of 20%. GHA continues to hire 10 to 15 new sales professionals every five weeks nationwide. GHA has highly motivated and talented salespeople who provide the highest level of service to their customers.",Sales - Computer and Technology Solutions Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee",GHA Technologies,,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-computer-technology-solutions-job-atlanta-ga-us-163991397.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,"60,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,bb078e308e83944f02ba5d281b723f1d
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:12:25:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Well established Galleria area law firm has an immediate need for a Commercial Real Estate Legal Administrative Assistant. This is a direct hire, permanent position in a family friendly law firm with an outstanding reputation and benefits that can't be beat!CRE Legal Secretary candidates must have at least four years of experience in a law firm. Legal secretary will assist with the assembly of closing binders, document production related to commercial real estate transactions, filing, client interaction, scheduling meetings, managing calendars and other related administrative duties.To be considered, commercial real estate legal secretary candidates must have superior organizational skills, attention to detail and the ability to prioritize and multitask - this is a busy desk working with a nationally known team. Typing at least 65 WPM and a high level of proficiency with MS Word, Excel and Outlook is required. We are seeking someone with a high level of professionalism, and strong interpersonal skills with a friendly, ""can do"" attitude to provide clients with a high level of customer service.This firm offers a friendly work environment, excellent benefits, competitive salary and free parking. If you are a commercial real estate legal secretary with the required skills and background, please apply today for immediate and confidential consideration!Find Us on Facebook!Follow BeaconHillLegal on Twitter!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile:Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com.We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Commercial Real Estate Legal Assistant Job in Vinings,Full Time Employee,ViningsGA,Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-real-estate-legal-assistant-job-vinings-ga-us-167510908.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=17,"50,000.00 - 62,000.00 $ /year",Legal,0cb8d5efe0da1322ea4330663c3b7e08
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:12:53:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Hollister,Full Time Employee,"Hollister, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-hollister-ca-us-167323051.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=1,,Logistics/Transportation,b7558f8c86c1bf62bd94d29f6d81f406
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:12:53:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"1 of 100's of Engineering jobs we have. View all at www.CareerBrokers.com Now, about this job...Our client is a premier innovative manufacturer looking for a Process Controls Engineer to join their team. They are a top-tier organization and an industry leader in their product line. Our client is stable, profitable, and rapidly growing into 2017. They will provide full-relocation, excellent benefits, and a highly competitive base salary.Description:Manage and observe contract employees, process analysis, and oversee capital projects.SOP, GMP, SAP, P&ID, PFD drawings, and technical support.System modifications, change controls, electrical controls, electrical design, and AC/DC.Project management, process improvement, and validation.Requirements:BS in Electrical, Mechanical, or Chemical Engineering8 or more years of experience with chemical plant controls and systems5 or more years of experience with Honeywell Experion DCS configuration1 or more years of experience with reading and following equipment and construction drawings such as P&ID’s, loop sheets, and motor schematicsHeavy PLC experience in Allen BradleyVery stable job history (no consultants or excess contract work)=====================Career Brokers is an Executive Search firm with clients/affiliates located throughout the USA. We have been leveraging careers since 1991 and our services are free to job seekers (clients pay our fees). WHY WE ARE DIFFERENT - Our web site lists jobs from our firm and our 400+ affiliates. This translates into thousands of, real, jobs for you across most industries (Information Technology, Engineering, Healthcare, Sales, Marketing, Manufacturing, Accounting, Finance, Human Resources, and many more). When you apply to a job on our site, your resume is sent, directly, to the Recruiter in charge of that search. Please note that if the job belongs to one of our affiliates, it is up to them to contact you. If you know anyone looking for a job, please have them apply on our web site, set up ""Search Alerts"" (for future jobs), and let us put more Americans to work. God bless the USA.",Process Control Engineer - Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",All,http://jobview.monster.com/process-control-engineer-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-167684278.aspx?mescoid=1700195001001&jobPosition=14,"100,000.00 - 125,000.00 $ /year+ bonus + relocation",Experienced (Non-Manager),147a1692d52fcda04ef3f628b16ef376
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:13:05:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Mgr Website Design 1Requisition ID:16011264Location:United States-Georgia-AtlantaUS Citizenship Required for this Position:NoShift:1st ShiftTravel:NoDescriptionAre you interested in the opportunity to work for an industry-leading company whose work with cutting-edge technology is driven by something human: the lives our technology protects?  If so, Northrop Grumman may be the place for you.  It’s not the systems that drive us: it’s the soldier our systems bring home. It’s not just the equipment that motivates us: it’s the people our equipment protects. It’s not the innovation that gets us up in the morning: it’s whom those innovations serve. We’re united by our work to help people and protect the world. And that mission makes our team even stronger. When you join Northrop Grumman, you’ll have the opportunity to connect with coworkers in an environment that’s uniquely caring, diverse, and respectful. Employees share experiences, insights, perspectives, and creative solutions with some of the best minds in the industry. We collaborate through integrated product teams, cross-functional teams, and employee resource groups, while thriving through the support of training and development, mentors and every day coaching, along with extensive health and work/life benefits. We’re committed to our employees’ professional and personal development and success.Northrop Grumman recruits top talent with traditional and non-traditional backgrounds in order to ensure our team is united, connected, skilled, focused and innovative. An inclusive workplace of people with diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives is the key to our performance. At Northrop Grumman, we want our employees to bring their whole self to work.  All your different sides are welcome here, as we believe they make our team, our products and our services, that much better.Roles and Responsibilities:This position will manage a team of website designer/developers and content managers, providing leadership in all phases of website development, including project management, technical direction, and problem solving.  The position will also oversee web production support which includes daily posting and updating of content, materials, and web pages to internal and external-facing web sites.  The qualified applicant will have strong project management and people leadership skills. Serves as Northrop Grumman primary point of contact to the customer team lead.  Interacts with client to understand project requirements, timelines, resources available, and existing assets to leverage. Manages hiring and team performance including goal setting and performance evaluations.Reviews status of projects and budgets, manages schedules and prepares status reports, assesses project issues and risks and develops resolutions to meet productivity, quality, and client-satisfaction goals and objectives.   Develops estimates on size and duration of work required for individuals or team to deliver client requirements.Assigns tasks to team members, monitors progress and reports to customer and manager. Manages workload across the team by assigning site ownership, project work, and other team tasks. Manages staff schedule to ensure coverage for business hours and/or disease outbreak support.Ensures team is cross-trained as appropriate and that documentation is developed and maintained for team work functions.Ensures quality of team's work and on-time completion. Serves as mentor and primary point of contact for team members to coordinate and resolve issues.Keeps inventory of web sites and status of changes and projects.Creates metrics reports and/or performs metrics analysis on team performance.Attends web team meetings and provides valuable input and maintains strong, positive interoffice and client relations.  Represents team in cross-organizational workgroups, communities of practice, project teams, etc.  Represents team on new projects and strategic initiatives for both the customer and internal work.Oversees 508 compliant images and PDFs for the web using Adobe Creative SuiteOversees migration of existing web content from old to new templates and implements template upgrades. Performs QA reviews and all applicable testing before returning to client for final review, approval, and clearance.Provide input to the preparation of task order proposals, business plans, work statements and specifications, operating budgets and other management work products.Provides status and monthly reports regarding the tracking and presentation of project deliverables.Collaborates with the customer and internal/external stakeholders to ensure client-satisfaction regarding project goals and objectives and strategic initiatives.QualificationsBasic Qualifications:Bachelor’s degree in Graphic Design, Web Design, Computer Science, Information Technology,  or related field with a minimum of 10 years of experience.6 years of demonstrated software development lifecycle, including diverse experience in website design and development, integration, operations and/or maintenance of complex systems and technologies from inception through completion.6 years technical and project management experience, including planning, organizing, staffing, reporting, coordinating, and directing all aspects of a project2 years of experience leading development teams and managing customer relationships2 years of direct supervisory people management responsibility in a project setting.Familiarity with Search Engine Optimization (SEO) and web analytics.Familiarity with social media channels, website analytics, metrics, and information architecture.Extremely detail-oriented and skilled in quality assurance of output.Ability to respond effectively to changing events and competing priorities.Effective oral and written communications skills, capable of  translating and presenting complex technical and project management concepts to management and customers, through presentations and other written formats.Preferred Qualifications:Experience supporting Healthcare, Public Health, or science-based projects.Experience using Web Content Management Systems (WCMS).Experience in Website Programming and maintenance- CSS3, HTML5, JavaScript, jQuery, Responsive Design.Experience in Graphic Design - Fireworks, Illustrator.Experience in designing, developing, and remediating 508 compliant sites, documents, and graphics.Experience with SharePoint (as a user).Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.#jobBodyContent h2, #jobBodyContent h1 { display:inline !important; }",Mgr Website Design  Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Mgr Website Design 1Requisition ID:16011264Location:United States-Georgia-AtlantaUS Citizenship Required for this Position:NoShift:1st ShiftTravel:NoDescriptionAre you interested in the opportunity to work for an industry-leading company whose work with cutting-edge technology is driven by something human: the lives our technology protects?  If so, Northrop Grumman may be the place for you.  It’s not the systems that drive us: it’s the soldier our systems bring home. It’s not just the equipment that motivates us: it’s the people our equipment protects. It’s not the innovation that gets us up in the morning: it’s whom those innovations serve. We’re united by our work to help people and protect the world. And that mission makes our team even stronger. When you join Northrop Grumman, you’ll have the opportunity to connect with coworkers in an environment that’s uniquely caring, diverse, and respectful. Employees share experiences, insights, perspectives, and creative solutions with some of the best minds in the industry. We collaborate through integrated product teams, cross-functional teams, and employee resource groups, while thriving through the support of training and development, mentors and every day coaching, along with extensive health and work/life benefits. We’re committed to our employees’ professional and personal development and success.Northrop Grumman recruits top talent with traditional and non-traditional backgrounds in order to ensure our team is united, connected, skilled, focused and innovative. An inclusive workplace of people with diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives is the key to our performance. At Northrop Grumman, we want our employees to bring their whole self to work.  All your different sides are welcome here, as we believe they make our team, our products and our services, that much better.Roles and Responsibilities:This position will manage a team of website designer/developers and content managers, providing leadership in all phases of website development, including project management, technical direction, and problem solving.  The position will also oversee web production support which includes daily posting and updating of content, materials, and web pages to internal and external-facing web sites.  The qualified applicant will have strong project management and people leadership skills. Serves as Northrop Grumman primary point of contact to the customer team lead.  Interacts with client to understand project requirements, timelines, resources available, and existing assets to leverage. Manages hiring and team performance including goal setting and performance evaluations.Reviews status of projects and budgets, manages schedules and prepares status reports, assesses project issues and risks and develops resolutions to meet productivity, quality, and client-satisfaction goals and objectives.   Develops estimates on size and duration of work required for individuals or team to deliver client requirements.Assigns tasks to team members, monitors progress and reports to customer and manager. Manages workload across the team by assigning site ownership, project work, and other team tasks. Manages staff schedule to ensure coverage for business hours and/or disease outbreak support.Ensures team is cross-trained as appropriate and that documentation is developed and maintained for team work functions.Ensures quality of team's work and on-time completion. Serves as mentor and primary point of contact for team members to coordinate and resolve issues.Keeps inventory of web sites and status of changes and projects.Creates metrics reports and/or performs metrics analysis on team performance.Attends web team meetings and provides valuable input and maintains strong, positive interoffice and client relations.  Represents team in cross-organizational workgroups, communities of practice, project teams, etc.  Represents team on new projects and strategic initiatives for both the customer and internal work.Oversees 508 compliant images and PDFs for the web using Adobe Creative SuiteOversees migration of existing web content from old to new templates and implements template upgrades. Performs QA reviews and all applicable testing before returning to client for final review, approval, and clearance.Provide input to the preparation of task order proposals, business plans, work statements and specifications, operating budgets and other management work products.Provides status and monthly reports regarding the tracking and presentation of project deliverables.Collaborates with the customer and internal/external stakeholders to ensure client-satisfaction regarding project goals and objectives and strategic initiatives.QualificationsBasic Qualifications:Bachelor’s degree in Graphic Design, Web Design, Computer Science, Information Technology,  or related field with a minimum of 10 years of experience.6 years of demonstrated software development lifecycle, including diverse experience in website design and development, integration, operations and/or maintenance of complex systems and technologies from inception through completion.6 years technical and project management experience, including planning, organizing, staffing, reporting, coordinating, and directing all aspects of a project2 years of experience leading development teams and managing customer relationships2 years of direct supervisory people management responsibility in a project setting.Familiarity with Search Engine Optimization (SEO) and web analytics.Familiarity with social media channels, website analytics, metrics, and information architecture.Extremely detail-oriented and skilled in quality assurance of output.Ability to respond effectively to changing events and competing priorities.Effective oral and written communications skills, capable of  translating and presenting complex technical and project management concepts to management and customers, through presentations and other written formats.Preferred Qualifications:Experience supporting Healthcare, Public Health, or science-based projects.Experience using Web Content Management Systems (WCMS).Experience in Website Programming and maintenance- CSS3, HTML5, JavaScript, jQuery, Responsive Design.Experience in Graphic Design - Fireworks, Illustrator.Experience in designing, developing, and remediating 508 compliant sites, documents, and graphics.Experience with SharePoint (as a user).Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.#jobBodyContent h2, #jobBodyContent h1 { display:inline !important; }",,http://jobview.monster.com/mgr-website-design-1-job-atlanta-ga-us-167626885.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=9,,IT/Software Development,892fe6b6619c6e9c1818b541abff1ae3
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:13:07:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Direct Care Professional, I, II & III - Multiple Locations!!Atlanta, GA Georgia Community Support Solutions Employment TypeDirect Care Professionals Needed! - Austell, Marietta, Mableton, Cartersville, Tucker, Marietta, Conyers, Atlanta, Rome, Paulding, Rockdale, Loganville, Newton, NorcrossLevel III - Direct Care Professionals Needed in Rome for Part time Weekend Work Hours Sat & Sun 7am to 7pm and 7pm to 7amType: Full-Time and Part-timeExperience: AssociateFunction: Health Care ProviderLocation:Various Areas GA, United StatesDirect Care Professionals provide an array of services which are necessary to service individuals and their families with needs related to disabilities, mental health and aging to live in community settings and provide companionship services of fellowship, care and protection. Such services may include household work related to care such as meal preparation, bed-making, washing clothes and other similar services.o Must have a minimum of six months of Direct Care experience specializing in the    developmentally disabled population for DCP I and II and must have a minimum of 3 years of Direct Care experience specializing in the developmentally disabled population for DCP III o Must be detailed-oriented, organized and possess excellent leadership skills o Must have a desire to work with the developmentally disabled o Must possess a Driver’s License o Must be able to work in Gwinnett, DeKalb, Carroll, &/or Cobb countiesJob Overview:In this role the Direct Care Professional (DCP) provides support in activities and companionship services for daily living, such as cooking, bathing, dressing, grooming, feeding, toileting, transferring, and other similar tasks. The DCP accompanies and transports to participate in visits for recreation, medical and dental care appointments, therapies, personal shopping and other community activities. The DCP keeps accurate daily documentation of activities, fire/ disaster drills, Behavior Support Plans, medications, ISP tracking, as well as other documentation and enters into the documentation system as required. House cleaning and laundry are also DCP duties. The DCP communicates professionally and treat the individuals we support, including parents and Support Coordinators, with respect.Mild DCP, Level ICNA certification is not required; capable of assisting with general ADLs and companionship duties, Capable of assisting with transfers (pivot), Capable of assisting with choking precautionsModerate DCP, Level IICNA is required.; Capable of assisting with general ADLs and companionship duties, Capable of assisting with transfers (pivot), Capable of assisting with choking precautions, Capable of tracking information such as moods, vital signs and meal consumptions of the individual, Capable of providing recreational activities for the individual i.e. community outings, Capable of operating a Hoya Lift, Capable of checking blood sugarsREQUIREMENTSMust be 18 years of age or older, possess a valid driver’s license, valid insurance and specific plan for transportation, if required.QUALIFICATIONSTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable employees with disabilities to perform the essential functions.EDUCATION/EXPERIENCEExperience in the area of developmental disabilities, mental health, or aging, preferably with the focus being in community based programs and knowledge of family systems, person centered programs and structures. Level I requires a minimum of 6 months experience; Level II requires a minimum of one year experience. Consideration for employment includes personal and/or volunteer ",Monster,,"Direct Care Professional, I, II & III - Multiple Locations!!Atlanta, GA Georgia Community Support Solutions Employment TypeDirect Care Professionals Needed! - Austell, Marietta, Mableton, Cartersville, Tucker, Marietta, Conyers, Atlanta, Rome, Paulding, Rockdale, Loganville, Newton, NorcrossLevel III - Direct Care Professionals Needed in Rome for Part time Weekend Work Hours Sat & Sun 7am to 7pm and 7pm to 7amType: Full-Time and Part-timeExperience: AssociateFunction: Health Care ProviderLocation:Various Areas GA, United StatesDirect Care Professionals provide an array of services which are necessary to service individuals and their families with needs related to disabilities, mental health and aging to live in community settings and provide companionship services of fellowship, care and protection. Such services may include household work related to care such as meal preparation, bed-making, washing clothes and other similar services.o Must have a minimum of six months of Direct Care experience specializing in the    developmentally disabled population for DCP I and II and must have a minimum of 3 years of Direct Care experience specializing in the developmentally disabled population for DCP III o Must be detailed-oriented, organized and possess excellent leadership skills o Must have a desire to work with the developmentally disabled o Must possess a Driver’s License o Must be able to work in Gwinnett, DeKalb, Carroll, &/or Cobb countiesJob Overview:In this role the Direct Care Professional (DCP) provides support in activities and companionship services for daily living, such as cooking, bathing, dressing, grooming, feeding, toileting, transferring, and other similar tasks. The DCP accompanies and transports to participate in visits for recreation, medical and dental care appointments, therapies, personal shopping and other community activities. The DCP keeps accurate daily documentation of activities, fire/ disaster drills, Behavior Support Plans, medications, ISP tracking, as well as other documentation and enters into the documentation system as required. House cleaning and laundry are also DCP duties. The DCP communicates professionally and treat the individuals we support, including parents and Support Coordinators, with respect.Mild DCP, Level ICNA certification is not required; capable of assisting with general ADLs and companionship duties, Capable of assisting with transfers (pivot), Capable of assisting with choking precautionsModerate DCP, Level IICNA is required.; Capable of assisting with general ADLs and companionship duties, Capable of assisting with transfers (pivot), Capable of assisting with choking precautions, Capable of tracking information such as moods, vital signs and meal consumptions of the individual, Capable of providing recreational activities for the individual i.e. community outings, Capable of operating a Hoya Lift, Capable of checking blood sugarsREQUIREMENTSMust be 18 years of age or older, possess a valid driver’s license, valid insurance and specific plan for transportation, if required.QUALIFICATIONSTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable employees with disabilities to perform the essential functions.EDUCATION/EXPERIENCEExperience in the area of developmental disabilities, mental health, or aging, preferably with the focus being in community based programs and knowledge of family systems, person centered programs and structures. Level I requires a minimum of 6 months experience; Level II requires a minimum of one year experience. Consideration for employment includes personal and/or volunteer ",,http://jobview.monster.com/direct-care-professional-multiple-locations-job-atlanta-ga-us-167841864.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=2,,,6a78ee00c96da69ade40a78e6f3b0d86
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:13:07:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Cornerstone Staffing Solutions is looking for quality loaders for a well-known water company in South Sacramento.  This position requires someone who is in good shape, hard-working, shows initiative, and goes above and beyond job expectations.  Basic duties include loading and unloading trucks, carrying water jugs, palletizing, inventory, working production when needed, sweeping, cleaning, and other basic warehouse duties.  This is a temporary to permanent opportunity starting at $11 an hour.  If you are interested, apply now! www.cornerstone-staffing.com  Job Requi·         Must have a valid Driver's License·         Must have open availability·         Must be able to lift/carry 50 lbs. consistently in a 8-12 hr period·         Must be able to move around and be on your feet 8-12 hours·         Must have at least 1 year previous shipping/receiving experience·         Must have a high school diploma or equivalent·         Must have clean background & drug screen·         Overtime is REQUIRED",Loader Job in Sacramento,Full Time Employee,"Sacramento, CA 95828",All,http://jobview.monster.com/loader-job-sacramento-ca-us-167861609.aspx?mescoid=5301089001001&jobPosition=16,11.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,Logistics/Transportation,b37f38cdd23117f7811f25b8c94851c1
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:14:00:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in Texas Job in Leander,Full Time Employee,"Leander, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-texas-job-leander-tx-us-167323733.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,c9a26890bbfd5c4a705458d9b421952e
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:14:06:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description: Open Positions for Career-Minded People. Ready to raise the bar on customer satisfaction? If you enjoy building things and have a desire to work for a successful company where you can use your artistic and technical skills, then Furniture Repair Technician may be just the role for your career ambitions!  As a warehouse Furniture Repair Technician, you will be responsible for setting the standard of excellence for the quality of the merchandise our customers will receive. Expectations: Assessing damages and choose appropriate methods of repair for upholstery. Maintain a neat and safe work environment. Ability to work in a fast paced environment. Must be comfortable working with hands and displays an aptitude for craftsmanship, artistic and/or carpentry services. Meet standards to complete furniture ""deluxing"" process. Commitment to Raymour & Flanigan's safety policies and procedures and ability to promote awareness. Demonstrate high level of attention to detail and professionalism at all times. Possess excellent organizational skills. Excellent listening skills and the ability to work independently and with a team. Perform additional functions that may be assigned at the discretion of management. Qualifications: Two years experience working with upholstery. Color matching & blending Upholstery repairs including structural/mechanism replacements. Excellent time management skills and attention to detail. High School Diploma or equivalent. Physical Requirements: Lift, lower, push and pull all sizes of furniture up to and in excess of 100 lbs. Raymour & Flanigan offers opportunities for advancement, plus a comprehensive benefits package that includes 401(k) with company match and profit sharing, health, dental and vision benefits, paid vacation, short- and long-term disability, associate merchandise discount, and paid life insurance. Raymour & Flanigan proudly supports a drug free and smoke free work environment. Raymour & Flanigan is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that does not discriminate against any associate or applicant on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), age, national origin, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, marital or familial status, genetic information or other basis protected by law.   *CB",Warehouse Furniture Repair Technician Job in Malvern,Full Time / Employee,"Malvern, PA 19355",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-furniture-repair-technician-job-malvern-pa-us-167356471.aspx?mescoid=5100976001001&jobPosition=8,,Logistics/Transportation,d7df2fed0b9144e9aad17eb217f4bfac
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:14:56:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"My customer urgently requires a number of Nokia Field Technicians for a long term project in the Georgia area. Candidates should be familiar with Nokia LTE, UMTS & GSM Flexi equipment and should be proficient with performing installs, commissioning, integrations and site audits.  ",Field Technician Job in Atlanta,,JOB SUMMARY,,http://jobview.monster.com/field-technician-job-atlanta-ga-us-167714554.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=4,,,a9bfe42455116389fb937014e5fa3151
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:14:57:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Management: Entry Level PositionsWe are a dynamic group of young business professionals! We operate the same way athletes do on a competitive sports team--our core values being leadership, integrity, team work, and accountability.As a business, we highlight customer focus. Our team is trained daily on customer service techniques and retention. Building a strong rapport with the customers in our territories is the very thing that makes our company and our clients achieve success.Responsibilities: Receives and Processes customer purchase orders Enters orders received via telephone or on a provided tabletEnters electronic, paper and manual orders online Verifies & Confirms customer orders and delivery expectations. Quotes prices according to uniform pricing strategy and current market pricing. Tracks order exceptions and maintains as needed.Sales with Preferred CustomersDirect Customer Service with new and current customersTeamwork: collaborates with team members :Seeks good communication and cooperation within Trademark's organization Coordinates all routine aspects of customer orders, requests, and inquiries Identifies and uses internal resources as needed to complete tasks Supports team goals Is receptive/flexible/adaptable to change Understands, generally, about competitors and their services   RequirementsQualifications: Customer service, customer solutions and/or sales experience. Leadership role without formal authorityEffective decision makingDisplays effective interpersonal & communication skills (internal/external) Delivers timely and accurate information to customers & internal business partners both verbally and in writing. Achieves mutual understanding by summarizing & reviewing agreements Actively listens. Demonstrates understanding of our clients products and services Recognizes and responds to new/additional opportunities at existing customers Education/Training: Bachelor’s degree preferred Customer Service experience preferred People from all backgrounds seeking part time or full time opportunities in the following areas are encouraged to inquire about our program: sales, customer service, sales representative, internships, part time, manager, management, purchasing, part time, restaurant, assistant, hotel, supervisor, general, advertising, communications, sales manager, project management, editor, hospitality, professional, bartender, call center, inventory, photography, bilingual, sports, cashier, clerk, distribution, sales management, shipping, waiter, waitress.  Apply if you have the following experience: entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, accounting, entrepreneur, summer job, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail, restaurant, hospitality, management, administrative, business development, business, internship, advertising, entry level, retail, insurance, education, outside sales, strategy-planning, project manager, part-time, server, summer  employment, promotions, pr, customer service, full-time, restaurant, quality control, assistant, secretary, public relations, summer, salesman, hotel, safety, executive assistant, summer work, communications, training, human resources, office manager, media, general, social services, sales manager, pharmaceutical sales, food services, jobs, summer, recruiter, sales, bartender, general business,  project management, hospitality, server, collections, bookkeeper, intern, management trainee, purchasing, full time, part time, bilingual, inventory, recruiter, counselor, travel, teaching, trainer, media, professional, trainee, data entry, internship, administration, new graduate, hostess, executive assistant, hostess, sales management, coordinator, cashier,  medical sales, distribution, financial, manager, sports, entertainment, international, consultant, real estate, telecommunications, general, retail, business, sports, entertainment, marketing, sports marketing, customer service",Entry Level Management - College Grads Welcome! Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30319",Telecommunications Services Advertising and PR Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-management-college-grads-welcome!-job-atlanta-ga-us-167042812.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=1,,Business/Strategic Management,dc5a3011766b71738872972ca41e2cd9
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:16:04:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Engineering Technician – Atlanta, GA area                Are you an Engineer looking for an opportunity to put your skills to use? Would you like to help develop concepts and create drawings of your designs?  If you enjoy participating in projects and mentoring other young engineers, then you could be a great fit for this Project Engineer position! Responsibilities – Engineering TechAssist Project Engineers from concept to completionEngineering analysisDesign detailed 3D drawings per customer specifications Requirements – Engineering Tech5+ years’ experience Experience doing structural calculationsAutoCAD/3D software BenefitsHealthDentalVisionLife insurance401(k) plan with competitive company matchHoliday PayVacations About the companyOur client offers innovative products to customers across the United States as well as overseas.  They are an integral part of projects of all sizes and complexity. With multiple plants and a nationwide footprint, they are in an unrivaled position to be successful in their industry.",Engineering Technician Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/engineering-technician-job-atlanta-ga-us-167900773.aspx?mescoid=1700221001001&jobPosition=11, 17.00 - 23.00 $ /hour,Engineering,4bf32db1d94cf9af34586de54ca82bcb
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:16:05:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Antioch,Full Time Employee,"Antioch, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-antioch-ca-us-167323552.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,3c043cbdffdc3e397fed21e6903fe59e
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:16:14:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Cupertino,Full Time Employee,"Cupertino, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-cupertino-ca-us-167322976.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=18,,Logistics/Transportation,ed180873a4aad0542de91acb5a6ebc21
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:16:41:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Watsonville,Full Time Employee,"Watsonville, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-watsonville-ca-us-167322999.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,f8a282664e9e2140d1c9165b0cbda3ce
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:16:48:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Novato,Full Time Employee,"Novato, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-novato-ca-us-167322994.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=15,,Logistics/Transportation,1b6c88b1da3bafc8ee9d914bfd2c0144
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:17:13:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have a great onsite freelance opportunity for a Production Artist with a client that works on wide format graphics! This person will be responsible for getting all the graphics ready for prepress. He/she may need to make small tweaks to the design and should be able to design in ArtiosCAD. The right person will have a strong understanding of packaging, printing on a flat bed, and cutting on a cutting table.This is an onsite freelance opportunity.",Pre-Press Specialist - ArtiosCAD Skills Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/pre-press-specialist-artioscad-skills-job-atlanta-ga-us-167794493.aspx?mescoid=5100957001001&jobPosition=7,,Creative/Design,b3644f0af214c9eebb1c952896d45867
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:17:14:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"DevOps Engineer - Linux, AWS, Bash, Chef Job in Atlanta 30303, Georgia US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders DevOps Engineer Apply Atlanta, GA Full-Time $70,000 - $150,000 Job Details Do you have solid Linux Administration experience and looking to make a break into a Devops type role? If so, this might be the job for you. Title: DevOps EngineerAlternate Titles: Linux Systems Administrator, DevOps EngineerLocation: Atlanta, GASalary: $100k-$140kJob Summary: Implementation and support of production hosting environments for all projects. Tasked with the implementation and maintenance of development services. Designing and building robust, flexible, scalable backend systems.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Amazing mentorship- Learn from the best!- Work for a well-known company who's product is used by billions across the world- Cutting Edge Technologies- Work on large scalable enterprise applications- Large room for advancement within the companyWhat You Will Be Doing- Implement a cloud-based hosting solution.- Help to define the design, implementation and support of infrastructure & operational aspects. This includes: cloud-based hosting, traditional on-premise hosting environments, development infrastructure (Linux, Apache, LDAP, JBoss, Tomcat, MySQL, Oracle, Postgres, Git and others).- Evaluate different technologies & determine strengths and weaknesses of technology architecture, implementation and suitability.- Support our 24 x7 Production cloud environment.What You Need for this Position- Computer Science Degree or related.- Linux System Administration- Networking background ideally with Load Balancers- Scripting Skills: Bash, Perl, Python, Ruby, or PHPPluses:- Experience deploying applications to the cloud- Understanding of MOST of the following: Virtualization, High Availability, Dabase Scaling & Failover, Upgrades/Patching, Backups- Experience working with a cloud management & Automation tool such as: Rightscale, Scalr, Enstratus- Exposure to Chef, Puppet, or Salt, or related- Exposure to application monitoring tools such as: Splunk, Zabbix, Nagios, OpenNMS, Cacti, etc. - Exposure/experience supporting Databases such as Postgres, Oracle, or MySQL, ETC- RHEL, OEL, Centos- BIP/F5- DBA ExperienceWhat's In It for You- Amazing Health Benefits- Strong Vacation Policy- Strong 401k - Education Reimbursement- Many others as well!So, if you are a Linux Systems Administrator with relevant experience, please apply today! Or simply send your resume to: Lauren@Cybercoders.com Are you a good fit for this position? Lauren Formby is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: LF2-1290898 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Lauren.Formby@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: LF2-1290898 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Lauren Formby | Recruiting Manager | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",DevOps Engineer,,"DevOps Engineer - Linux, AWS, Bash, Chef Job in Atlanta 30303, Georgia US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders DevOps Engineer Apply Atlanta, GA Full-Time $70,000 - $150,000 Job Details Do you have solid Linux Administration experience and looking to make a break into a Devops type role? If so, this might be the job for you. Title: DevOps EngineerAlternate Titles: Linux Systems Administrator, DevOps EngineerLocation: Atlanta, GASalary: $100k-$140kJob Summary: Implementation and support of production hosting environments for all projects. Tasked with the implementation and maintenance of development services. Designing and building robust, flexible, scalable backend systems.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Amazing mentorship- Learn from the best!- Work for a well-known company who's product is used by billions across the world- Cutting Edge Technologies- Work on large scalable enterprise applications- Large room for advancement within the companyWhat You Will Be Doing- Implement a cloud-based hosting solution.- Help to define the design, implementation and support of infrastructure & operational aspects. This includes: cloud-based hosting, traditional on-premise hosting environments, development infrastructure (Linux, Apache, LDAP, JBoss, Tomcat, MySQL, Oracle, Postgres, Git and others).- Evaluate different technologies & determine strengths and weaknesses of technology architecture, implementation and suitability.- Support our 24 x7 Production cloud environment.What You Need for this Position- Computer Science Degree or related.- Linux System Administration- Networking background ideally with Load Balancers- Scripting Skills: Bash, Perl, Python, Ruby, or PHPPluses:- Experience deploying applications to the cloud- Understanding of MOST of the following: Virtualization, High Availability, Dabase Scaling & Failover, Upgrades/Patching, Backups- Experience working with a cloud management & Automation tool such as: Rightscale, Scalr, Enstratus- Exposure to Chef, Puppet, or Salt, or related- Exposure to application monitoring tools such as: Splunk, Zabbix, Nagios, OpenNMS, Cacti, etc. - Exposure/experience supporting Databases such as Postgres, Oracle, or MySQL, ETC- RHEL, OEL, Centos- BIP/F5- DBA ExperienceWhat's In It for You- Amazing Health Benefits- Strong Vacation Policy- Strong 401k - Education Reimbursement- Many others as well!So, if you are a Linux Systems Administrator with relevant experience, please apply today! Or simply send your resume to: Lauren@Cybercoders.com Are you a good fit for this position? Lauren Formby is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: LF2-1290898 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Lauren.Formby@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: LF2-1290898 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Lauren Formby | Recruiting Manager | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/devops-engineer-linux-aws-bash-chef-job-atlanta-ga-us-168046661.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=14,,,8cb700c15004c7ee1cc2f769284745a1
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:17:14:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Territory Sales Manager - USLocation: Gulf Coast or South Eastern US ZCL Composites Inc. is North America’s leading manufacturer of Fiberglass Reinforced Plastic (FRP) storage solutions for the petroleum, water, and industrial corrosion industries. We pride ourselves on creating high quality, environmentally safe products for the storage and handling of fuel, water, chemicals, and other hazardous liquids. ZCL, through the ZCL Dualam and ZCL Troy brands, designs, manufactures and installs reinforced plastic (FRP) and dual laminate tanks, pipe, ductwork and fittings for corrosion resistant applications in the chemical processing, mining, hydrometallurgy, petrochemical, chemical and power generation sectors.ZCL is currently recruiting to the full-time position of Territory Sales Manager - US. The location of this position is flexible based upon the successful candidate; however, significant travel (>35%) will be required in this role.Responsibilities:Reporting to the Vice President Sales & Marketing – Corrosion Products, the Territory Sales Manager – US is responsible for achieving sales volume and profitability in the industrial corrosion markets through planning, control, and execution of ZCL’s sales goals and objectives. Responsibilities include:Establishing and pursuing territory target accounts, by calling directly on owners, end users, and/or engineering companies in the industrial corrosion markets to develop demand for ZCL products; Responding to and following-up on all sales leads; Leading the process to complete RFQ’s to meet customer deadline; Assisting in establishing and maintaining competitive pricing strategies for the industrial corrosion market and participating in market development by providing current, competitive field information to management; Completing required sales documentation and reporting, including weekly sales forecasts, quarterly sales activity reports, sales goals and objectives, and sales account plans; Monitoring industrial corrosion sales budgets and regulatory activity within the given territory and briefing the sales team as appropriate; Participating in trade associations, planning trade shows, planning presentations and other related activities as applicable; Establishing and maintaining close working relationships with internal stakeholders including engineering, manufacturing, customer service, and accounting; Submitting weekly reports summarizing sales activities and progress to close sales; Monitoring federal, provincial and local legislation that may affect the sale or installation of ZCL products; Performing special projects and other administrative responsibilities as required. Required Qualifications:Diploma or Degree in a related field (e.g. marketing or a technical discipline); Eight to ten years’ experience in a direct sales role. Preference will be given to candidates with industry experience selling and managing customer accounts in the following industries: Specialty chemicals, Municipal (WTP, WWTP or Odor control), Chlor-Alkali, Power (coal), Agriculture, Industrial or Pharmaceutical. Strong computer skills including and good knowledge of Word, Excel, and Outlook; Technical background (training/experience) is a definite asset. This includes the ability to read drawings. Excellent analytical, decision making, and negotiating skills; Strong organizational skills and time management skills including the ability to handle multiple and competing tasks while still meeting deadlines; Strong attention to detail; Strong interpersonal, communication and presentation skills with the ability to develop positive working relationships with both internal and external customers; A self-starter who takes a proactive approach and has a strong work ethic and desire to win; Knowledge of ZCL’s manufacturing process & products would be an asset; Valid driver’s license and passport, and ability to travel 35% of time; Successful candidates may be required to undergo drug and alcohol tests as well as background checks to access customer sites. To apply for this position, please click on the link - http://applynow.net.au/jobs/ZCL235-territory-sales-manager-us . This position is ideal for a candidate who is looking for a long-term career in sales and/or the composites industry.There is an immediate opening for this position and applications will be reviewed as they are received. Applications will be accepted until a suitable candidate is found. We thank all applicants for their interest, but only those candidates selected for an interview will be contacted.Please visit www.zcl.com for more information about our company and our products.ZCL is an equal opportunity employer",Territory Sales Manager - US Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/territory-sales-manager-us-job-atlanta-ga-us-166983310.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=20,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),60fc7cd1bf49442eb079dd24d0cfac42
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:18:16:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description: Open Positions for Career-Minded People. Ready to raise the bar on customer satisfaction? Are you ready to join a company that offers growth, challenge and commitment to excellence? Our Customer Delivery Inspectors have a talent for assembly and quality control. They are responsible for setting the standard for the quality of the merchandise our customers will receive to meet our goal of total customer satisfaction! Expectations: Commitment to Raymour & Flanigan's safety practices, promote awareness and maintaining a neat and safe work area. Exceptional attention to detail. Proven talent to inspect and assemble large volumes of furniture. Work in a fast pace environment. Demonstrate a high level of urgency to ensure properly prepared product. Enhance our customer shopping experience. Must be able to stand for prolonged periods of time. Mechanically inclined with the ability to fix mechanical and structural repairs. You must have excellent listening skills and the ability to work independently and with a team. Perform additional functions that may be assigned at the discretion of management. Qualifications: Ability to work with hand tools. High School Diploma or equivalent. Physical Requirements: Lift, lower, push, or pull all sizes of furniture up to and in excess of 100 lbs. At Raymour & Flanigan, we recognize and appreciate all of our team members' hard work and dedication. We pride ourselves on being a long term, privately held company that takes care of its associates by recognizing each individual's potential and investing in their future success!    Raymour & Flanigan provides a full range of comprehensive benefit programs to help you achieve your wellness and financial goals which include: Health Insurance (Up to 80% of premium paid) and Prescription Drug Coverage Dental and Vision Coverage Company paid Life Insurance Company paid Short-term Disability 401(k) Retirement Plan w/ Company Match & Profit Sharing Voluntary Life and Long-term Disability Insurance Flexible Spending Account Employee Assistance Program Other Great Benefits: Weekly Pay Paid Vacation and Holidays Training and Development Tuition Reimbursement Program Generous Merchandise Discount Raymour & Flanigan proudly supports a drug free and smoke free work environment. Raymour & Flanigan is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that does not discriminate against any associate or applicant on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), age, national origin, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, marital or familial status, genetic information or other basis protected by law.",Customer Delivery Inspector Job in Niskayuna,Full Time / Employee,"Niskayuna, NY 12304",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-delivery-inspector-job-niskayuna-ny-us-167356187.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=10,,Logistics/Transportation,8827b44805efca34d4e57894085ac986
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:18:17:09,No,jobs.monster.com," Shipping & ReceivingDes Moines, Iowa Responsibilities:          Daily shipping and receiving tasks          Picking and packing orders          Inventory management including daily and weekly inventory counts         Schedule daily vendor orders         Process any returned products          Assist in additional tasks as needed from the distribution team Qualifications:          Experience in shipping, receiving and/or distribution          Familiar with FedEx or UPS systems          Experience with JIT inventory is a plus         Ability to multi-task and work well in a fast-paced environment          Attention to detail          Strong communication skills          Computer experience – with Word, Excel or Outlook e-mail          High School Diploma (or equivalent)  Hours:Full-time11am-8pmMonday – Friday Benefits:Paid Time Off, Holiday Pay, 401K, Health, Dental, Vision, Disability, Life  Location:Des Moines, Iowa  Prism Medical Products has a reputation of excellence for our dedicated service to our patients and health care professionals.  A third-party service provider for DME (Durable Medical Equipment), Prism provides a seamless home delivery service of wound care, urological and ostomy supplies.  Prism is the fastest growing company in our industry! Prism continues to expand to new markets across the country.  Prism is seeking top talent to further contribute to our thriving culture.  Establish a growing and successful career with Prism!",Monster,," Shipping & ReceivingDes Moines, Iowa Responsibilities:          Daily shipping and receiving tasks          Picking and packing orders          Inventory management including daily and weekly inventory counts         Schedule daily vendor orders         Process any returned products          Assist in additional tasks as needed from the distribution team Qualifications:          Experience in shipping, receiving and/or distribution          Familiar with FedEx or UPS systems          Experience with JIT inventory is a plus         Ability to multi-task and work well in a fast-paced environment          Attention to detail          Strong communication skills          Computer experience – with Word, Excel or Outlook e-mail          High School Diploma (or equivalent)  Hours:Full-time11am-8pmMonday – Friday Benefits:Paid Time Off, Holiday Pay, 401K, Health, Dental, Vision, Disability, Life  Location:Des Moines, Iowa  Prism Medical Products has a reputation of excellence for our dedicated service to our patients and health care professionals.  A third-party service provider for DME (Durable Medical Equipment), Prism provides a seamless home delivery service of wound care, urological and ostomy supplies.  Prism is the fastest growing company in our industry! Prism continues to expand to new markets across the country.  Prism is seeking top talent to further contribute to our thriving culture.  Establish a growing and successful career with Prism!",,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-receiving-inventory-job-des-moines-ia-us-167895635.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=8,,,0f5920ee200c80b0cf20b753ffc34c59
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:18:25:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in Texas Job in Fredericksburg,Full Time Employee,"Fredericksburg, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-texas-job-fredericksburg-tx-us-167323080.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,a4d7910f463776ae5f534826304fb7b0
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:18:53:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Role: Sr Healthcare RecruiterLocation: Sandy Springs, GAPosition type: Full Time Permanent DESCRIPTIONResponsible for full cycle talent acquisition for exempt and non-exempt staff to include RN's, PT's, OT's and other clinical and non-clinical professionals. 3 to 5 years of recent recruitment experience, preferably in healthcare. ·         Sources potential candidates from applicant tracking database, internal candidates and external sources. Effectively utilizes media sources (LinkedIn) to target passive recruits. Maintains database of potential and inactive sources. ·         Reviews all resumes/applications and submits to Hiring Manager, when appropriate, within 48 hours of receipt. ·         Responds to candidate inquiries within 48 hours, including internal candidates interested in transferring to another department. Sends response card and/or email to all candidates. ·         Coordinates recruitment efforts for VN to include advertising for open positions through the most economical and effective methods. Coordinates the use of temporary staff as needed.·         Communicates with hiring manager to ensure positions are identified as priority 1 or priority 2 positions.  Clearly understands and verifies requirements of open positions with hiring manager. Individuals with demonstrated success at recruiting passive candidates a plus. Prior sales experience working in a staffing agency also preferred.Licensure/Certifications: PHR preferred",Monster,,"Role: Sr Healthcare RecruiterLocation: Sandy Springs, GAPosition type: Full Time Permanent DESCRIPTIONResponsible for full cycle talent acquisition for exempt and non-exempt staff to include RN's, PT's, OT's and other clinical and non-clinical professionals. 3 to 5 years of recent recruitment experience, preferably in healthcare. ·         Sources potential candidates from applicant tracking database, internal candidates and external sources. Effectively utilizes media sources (LinkedIn) to target passive recruits. Maintains database of potential and inactive sources. ·         Reviews all resumes/applications and submits to Hiring Manager, when appropriate, within 48 hours of receipt. ·         Responds to candidate inquiries within 48 hours, including internal candidates interested in transferring to another department. Sends response card and/or email to all candidates. ·         Coordinates recruitment efforts for VN to include advertising for open positions through the most economical and effective methods. Coordinates the use of temporary staff as needed.·         Communicates with hiring manager to ensure positions are identified as priority 1 or priority 2 positions.  Clearly understands and verifies requirements of open positions with hiring manager. Individuals with demonstrated success at recruiting passive candidates a plus. Prior sales experience working in a staffing agency also preferred.Licensure/Certifications: PHR preferred",,http://jobview.monster.com/health-care-recruiter-job-sandy-springs-ga-us-167309023.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=6,,,63a1442a8b8fe776e7c6050fa6b64110
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:18:53:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Chicago Heights, IL.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Co. Chemical Division has developed into a premium tank truck carrier over the past 60 plus years of offering outstanding service to the chemical industry handling both liquid and dry bulk chemicals. Transport Service Co. has a reputation of meeting the unique needs for customer's equipment and service requirements.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division is now offering premium pay to drivers with tank experience. ** Company Drivers:Local, Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Owner-Operators:Local, Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Competitive pay - mileage or percentage contract Loading and unloading pay Zone pay for local work Health insurance plans available 100% of Fuel Surcharge paid to Owner-Operator 100% of Billable Pump or Compressor Charge paid to Owner-Operator Paid Orientation and Training Paid Weekly Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay *Independent contractors referring their own lease drivers are not eligible for referral payments And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.** Premium pay requires Class A CDL with a minimum of 5 years recent, verifiable tank experience. Call 800-871-4581 Option #3 Dawn/Recruiterfor more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Chicago Heights,Full Time Employee,"Chicago Heights, IL",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-chicago-heights-il-us-167862545.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=5,,Logistics/Transportation,44470fd0c6bb853aa670acd33acbe78f
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:19:27:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />",Local Route Service Driver Job in Wilkes-Barre,Full Time Employee,"Wilkes-Barre, PA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/local-route-service-driver-job-wilkes-barre-pa-us-167863279.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,51c252f804707b18b3a52eba3e18e952
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:19:27:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"With Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment.Warehouse/Distribution Positions AvailableStaff Management | SMX is searching for the best candidates to work for us at our client's distribution facility in East Point, GA. This is a distribution facility that services a variety of customers across the southeast. Learn how we support this customer and how they deliver superior and timely service for their customers! Great pay and benefits for those that qualify!Freight Handlers Job Responsibilities:Perform production duties such as manual lifting, packaging, taping, labeling operations and sorting.Maintain the work area and equipment in a clean and orderly condition.Follow prescribed safety regulations.Execute and document quality inspections per SOP.Perform related duties as required by supervision.Break down cardboard for recycling.Part TimeFull Time1st and 2nd Shifts Now AvailableGeneral Labor Requirements:HS Diploma or GEDAble to Lift 60 poundsDrug Test RequiredStand for Shift DurationMust be at least 18 years oldBackground Check RequiredGeneral Labor Benefits:Direct Deposit or Cash Card pay optionsWeekly paychecks$9.00 starting payApply Online 24/7!Work LocationCEVA - Atlanta, GA-07733201 Centre ParkwayEast Point, GA 30344FOLLOW US ON FACEBOOK SEARCH: STAFF MANAGEMENT / SMX & TWITTER: #SMXJOBSNOW EOE",Freight Handler/General Labor Job in East Point,Full Time,"East Point, GA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/freight-handler-general-labor-job-east-point-ga-us-167566712.aspx?mescoid=5301089001001&jobPosition=10,9.00 - 9.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,2cc911a31c782d065576af7e564f4e73
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:19:30:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Aflac - Benefits Sales Consultant Job in Marietta,Full Time,"Marietta, GA 30060",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-benefits-sales-consultant-job-marietta-ga-us-167809127.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=14,,Customer Support/Client Care,cfa20cf26095fc89306097331d04fc77
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:19:30:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Route Sales Driver Location: Charleston, SC Reports to: Route Sales Supervisor Position Summary: Responsible for sales of milk products to retail stores, driving truck over established route to deliver and sell products or render services by performing the following duties. Role Responsibilities: Safely loads and unloads products onto route delivery truck. Drives truck over established route to deliver and sell such items as milk, dairy products, flavored drinks, etc. Writes customer order and instructions. Establish and maintain relationships with all customers to retain and increase sales. Informs regular customers of new products or services. Listens to and resolves service complaints. Rotates and places stock on shelves or racks. Sets up merchandise and sales promotion displays or issues sales promotion materials to customers. Collects or picks up empty containers, rejected or unsold merchandise and loads into truck. Completes daily inventory, orders and paperwork properly. Obtains cash/check from customer: accountable for final tally. Cleans inside of truck. Performs routine maintenance on truck. Performs MVI's (Motor Vehicle Inspections) on truck to conform to D.O.T. regulations and company policy. Regular and predictable attendance is required. Must be courteous toward customers, be able to work cooperatively with co-workers and supervisors, maintain neat appearance and follow established policies and directions of supervisor. Must be able to work safely in a constant state of alertness. Qualifications and Experience: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Minimum age- 21 years Verifiable experience in route sales is preferred, but not mandatory. D.O.T Class B CDL with Air Brake endorsement- 1 year verifiable experience in license class Ability to read, write, communicate and perform general math, computer and analysis skills Successfully pass D.O.T. required physical and drug screen. Acceptable driving record in accordance with Company's Insurance standards. Borden Dairy is an Equal Opportunity Employer PI94304943Apply Here",Route Sales Driver Job in N Charleston,Full Time,"N Charleston, SC 29406",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/route-sales-driver-job-n-charleston-sc-us-167788004.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=11,Yearly Salary,,865e720101e0baeaed2007a529ad025f
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:20:25:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary The Part-time Representative addresses security and the quality of services that impact UPS and its customers. He/she monitors and audits security policies and procedures, assists with the conduction of investigations, and assist with ensuring compliance with government regulations. This position may supervises administrative personnel, high value package clerks. A primary responsibility of this position is to audit and analyze both physical and operational security conditions. This involves inspecting physical assets (e.g., buildings, vehicles, etc.) to identify potential security issues, and reviewing service failure reports to identify employee dishonesty incidents and procedural breakdowns. The Part-time Security Representative also observes the workforce to verify employee integrity and ensure compliance with company processes and procedures, and identifies the causes of procedural and employee integrity issues to determine appropriate responses. Another core responsibility is conducting security investigations and presenting findings. The Part-time Security Representative investigates losses, damages, compliance violations, and possible criminal activity. He/she analyzes research and surveillance data, interviews investigation subjects to obtain written incident statements, and prepares accurate and thorough case files. Finally, the Part-time Security Representative presents investigation findings to management and government agencies to ensure appropriate incident responses. This position also develops, implements, and enforces security policies and procedures. This includes creating training and materials on security and loss prevention practices, and conducting research on best practices. Other Duties Audit quality and integrity policies and procedures to ensure complianceMonitor employee disciplinary data to ensure corrective action is takenAnalyze investigation results and the root cause of losses to determine preventive measuresAttend meetings and consult with UPS departments about security and procedural issuesDevelop customized security procedures for external customersDetermine employee training needs to produce continuous development plansProvide feedback and supportConduct performance evaluations and resolve individual and group performance issues Preferred Competencies Applies knowledge of local, state, and federal laws and regulations to guide workforce behaviorApplies legal, regulatory and safety compliance knowledge to reduce company riskApplies an understanding of policies and procedures to situations and operations in a business areaCoaches and develops others using career development processes and toolsConducts research by gathering internal and external information (e.g., similar cases, facts, opinions, trends, needs, impact, benefits, best practices, and risks), and summarizes/communicates findingsInvestigates incidents and responds to requests, problems, crises and critical situations. Identifies causes, documents findings, and determines responses/next stepsManages routine inspections of buildings, grounds, equipment, supplies, and/or compliance documents to ensure safety, regulatory compliance and service lifeManages projects and programs including allocating people and resources, organizing logistics and implementation, monitoring progress, adapting plans, and identifying and resolving rollout issuesManages protection of physical property by directing inspections and patrols to safeguard against fire, theft, vandalism and illegal entryUPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS PT Security Supervisor Job in San Francisco,,"San Francisco, CA 94103",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-pt-security-supervisor-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167857308.aspx?mescoid=3300570001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,c68968b8700fc55604ea1c3934a340b5
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:20:27:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"I believe that better care begins at home.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families.As an Executive Director, you will:Responsible for the overall clinical and financial operations of a home care branch.Maintain full responsibility of the overall functions of the financial areas and cost controls, adhere to financial and accounting policies and procedure and manage expenditures in a fiscally responsible manner.Take action, make decisions and shape team priorities to achieve branch clinical and operational goals.Ensure effective and on-going, on-the-job training of team members, evaluate, record individual and team performance, provide coaching and counseling and make appropriate developmental recommendations.Establish criteria and/or work procedures to achieve a high level of quality, productivity or service. Meet or exceed budgeted revenue and EBITDA on a monthly, quarterly and annual basis.Ensure compliance with local, state and federal laws, Medicare regulations and the Company's policies and procedures.Partner with the Sales Leadership Team to develop approaches that best position products, services or ideas in the marketplace.Partner with Area/Regional Leadership Teams to develop and implement comprehensive business development plans for the branch.Organize information/data to identify/explain major trends, problems and causes; Compare and combine information to identify underlying issues.  Generate actions to achieve long-range goals.Keep abreast of industry trends and regulatory requirements through activities such as participating in State Associations, attending courses and reviewing industry publications.QualificationsBachelors Degree or the equivalentMinimum of eight years healthcare administration experienceMinimum of 3 years in home health operations managementCurrent or recent experience managing a minimum of 1M in healthcare revenuePrior experience with budgetary responsibilities including budget development and monitoringBroad knowledge of home health federal and state regulations/administrationOutstanding leadership, managerial skillsExcellent organizational, interpersonal and communication skillsExcellent problem-solving, decision-making and assertiveness skillskeywords: registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, home care manager, homecare manager, home health manager, home care supervisor, homecare supervisor, home health supervisor, home care director, homecare director, home health director, clinical director, clinical manager, clinical supervisor, RN clinical director, RN clinical manager, RN clinical supervisor, nurse clinical manager, nurse clinical director, nurse clinical supervisor, clinical administrator, nurse administrator, RN administrator, patient care manager, patient care director, patient care supervisor, director of nursing, manager of nursing, supervisor of nursing, DON, DOCS, director of clinical services, field case manager, RN manager, RN supervisor, RN director, registered nurse director, registered nurse manager, registered nurse supervisor, nurse management, home health management, homecare management, home care management, hospice manager, hospice director, hospice supervisor, hospice nursing, hospice management, hospice RN manager, hospice RN director, hospice RN supervisor, home health management job, home health management jobs, homecare management job, homecare management jobs, home care management job, home care management jobs ~MON~All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.",Executive Director - Home Health Operations Job in Stockbridge,"Full Time, Employee","Stockbridge, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-director-home-health-operations-job-stockbridge-ga-us-167805803.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,68f0fae2c344780005191fcc443d96f0
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:21:01:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide.  We are  looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require.   The position of Senior Operations Manager, will be responsible for ensuring our nationwide set of hubs and spokes achieves every responsibility and expectation be performed in accordance with the company’s values and within the framework of our Lean Operating System.  This Senior Operations manager will be responsible for creating a highly engaged workforce and creating recognized value for the company’s clients through, cost controls, achievement  of  contract operating and service metrics. The SOM is accountable to ensure each operation within the position’s authority meet all company financial and operational metric expectations.     Essential Functions: 1.            Defines strategies and initiatives to meet customer performance and cost expectations 2.            Supports ongoing operations team(s) to ensure service level standards are met 3.            Develops warehousing and/or transportation management solutions that establish business controls to ensure policy and regulatory compliance 4.            Identifies and deploys cost savings initiatives through standardized improvement processes 5.            Identifies growth opportunities with current customers by promoting a service and/or cost to the customer that is of greater value than what is currently being provided 6.            Listens to employee feedback and develops actions to improve engagement scores 7.             Creates a cultures that fosters an employee’s willingness to positively contribute to the success of the operation 8.            Manages the employee life cycle for direct reports including; interviewing, hiring, on-boarding, expectations setting, training and development, performance reviews, and Leads Human Resource development efforts through appropriate training, development and succession planning 9.             Executes supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization’s policies and applicable laws 10.        Ensures all employees have access to a healthy and safe work environment free of harassment and discrimination 11.        Manages costs, mitigates risk, and creates value for the client in order to achieve net revenue and operating income goals. **Position can be located in Atlanta, Georgia; Kansas City, Kansas; Austin, Texas or High Pointe, North Carolina** Scope and Accountability: Responsible for providing strategic leadership and direction for area; manages multiple teams with related activities that represent or significantly impact a sub-function; oversees operations that directly impact business profitability and initiates business plans to support the business unit strategy; or responsible for multiple teams or a large warehouse/service center. Participates in business unit or corporate development of methods, techniques and evaluation criteria for projects, programs and people. Typically reports to head of a sub-function.   Qualification Requirements:Knowledge:. Bachelor's degree or equivalent. Skills: o    Financial Management  o    Warehouse Knowledgeo    Transportation Knowledgeo    Lean Operating Knowledgeo    Safety & Securityo    Business Managemento    Strategic Planningo    Project Managemento    Quality Managemento    HR Technical Skillso    HR Business Integrationo    Computer Skillso    Customer Relationship Experience: 8 or more years of professional experience.   Physical Demands and Work Environment:Physical Demands:  While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands or finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk and hear.  The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. Work Environment:  The duties of this job are performed in both an office environment and a light industrial environment, thereby experiencing some minor to moderate level of noise due to office equipment and industrial equipment.    Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 25%",Sr Manager Operations Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30301",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-manager-operations-job-atlanta-ga-us-167481964.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=6,,Logistics/Transportation,ba11586091a483a9cd6ed9e76167fa37
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:21:02:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Google Search Appliance (GSA) Consultant in Atlanta, Georgia (GA). This is a contract opportunity.REQUIREMENTS: Experience with the development, configuration, implementation, deployment and optimization of Google Search Appliances (GSA) Must have experience in everything from installation and configuring the GSA devices to connectors Required to have the unit function with the client's environment including connector for file systems (windows), active directory, SharePoint, Search Box and Jive",Google Search Appliance Consultant - GSA Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30300",,http://jobview.monster.com/google-search-appliance-consultant-gsa-job-atlanta-ga-us-167890934.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b396416de7884b67510725f94ee77032
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:21:05:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />",Local Vacuum Driver Job in Roanoke,Full Time Employee,"Roanoke, VA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/local-vacuum-driver-job-roanoke-va-us-167863289.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=1,,Logistics/Transportation,7a9ee34e6edb0ef32e57a17d2c0ba976
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:21:05:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Great sales are the result of strong purpose, conviction and pride - pride in your ability and your product. UnitedHealth Group offers a portfolio of products that are greatly improving the life of others. Bring along your passion and do your life's best work.(sm)  Under the direction of the Regional Sales Director, the Sales Specialist is responsible for the sale of AxelaCare products, programs and services in assigned geographical areas to specific target groups. The Sales Specialist leverages specialized knowledge, skills, and services of the organization to assist with coordination of infusion care for patients with complex health care needs to provide a comprehensive, coherent, and continuous response to a patient's unique care needs. To facilitate the appropriate delivery of health care services, this role works with internal and external resources needed to carry out all required patient care activities, and is often managed by the exchange of information among participants responsible for different aspects of care.  Primary Responsibilities:Identifies prospective, high volume clients in target groups for assigned area.  Secures appointments and qualifies these accountsIn conjunction with AxelaCare's overall marketing plan, makes a sales plan with specific target accounts and sales objectivesUpon approval of the plan, is responsible for the successful accomplishment of this plan including representing AHS and achieving budgetary goals set forthInsures that branch staff are informed of all target accounts and specific client needs in order to insure proper servicing of the clientConducts follow-up on all maintenance accounts to ascertain continued satisfaction with AHS Infusion Services and identify areas to increase businessResponsible for problem-solving issues with referral sources and other hospital or clinic-based programs related to the delivery of home infusion and all related support servicesShares in the responsibility for administrative management of system-wide quality assurance monitoring programs, including managing of clinical database information and related workServe as liaison between the account and the branch to facilitate communication and resolve problems if they occurRoutinely conducts quality assurance activities through reviews, meetings, reports and observation of results, according to professional practice standards and regulatory complianceEvaluates and monitors program needs, identifies unmet needs and works with referral source and internal partners to revise services as program needs change.  Provides feedback to AxelaCare management on sales issues, customer and patient satisfaction / complaints, etc.Refers all prospects outside of assigned geographical area to the VP of Sales for potential reassignmentJoins and attends key professional organizations to increase visibility of AxelaCare and increase business opportunitiesProvides in-services to accounts as neededAttends training classes and reads current professional articles on both clinical and sales issuesAttends weekly sales and staff meetings and participates in sales conference callsParticipates in exhibits and seminars to promote AxelaCareRoutine use of CRM systemsWeekly sales reports when required by ManagerMonthly marketing reportsQualifications:Required Qualifications: 2+ years of Business to Business or Medical Sales experience Associate's Degree or higherAccess to reliable transportation that will enable you to travel to client and / or patient sites within a designated areaPreferred Qualifications:Bachelor’s degree in business or healthExperience calling Physician's offices Careers with AxelaCare. Discover a health services career that encourages your professional growth while delivering steadfast commitment to exceptional patient care. That's what you discover at AxelaCare. We were founded by a close group of medical professionals in Lenexa, KS to provide patient-focused, state of the art home infusion services for acute, hemophilia and Intravenous Immune Globulin (IVIg) therapies. Today we collaborate with leading doctors to develop breakthrough technologies for patient outcomes assessment; and we recently joined Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of companies. It all reinforces our commitment to empowering people in the pursuit and delivery of exceptional patient care, and creating personalized career paths to discovering your life's best work.(sm)   Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.     Job Keywords: IG, Immunoglobulin, Infusion Sales, Medical Sales, B2B, Infusion, AxelaCare, Atlanta, GA, Georgia  Travel: No CitizenshipStatus: Other Visa Accepted Function: OptumHealth SalesBusinessSegment: OptumRx Division: OptumRx AxelaCare DeliveryModel: Platinum ContestNumber: 656908 Shift: Day Job OvertimeStatus: Exempt",IG / Infusion Sales Specialist - Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ig-infusion-sales-specialist-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-167521712.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f8c419f608f1471a4c62c98f519b0ee8
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:21:21:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Youngstown, OH",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-youngstown-oh-us-159710064.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=20,,Logistics/Transportation,d7d7c3d14661ddf4afcd3dbd2ae60bad
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:21:40:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Santa Barbara,Full Time Employee,"Santa Barbara, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-santa-barbara-ca-us-167323572.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=3,,Logistics/Transportation,0fa23109d7f40197835ca8f79293d2f5
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:21:44:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Commercial Vehicle Group is currently recruiting for a Quality Technician at our Vonore, Tennessee facility. Candidate responsibilities include: ·         Addressing quality concerns related to all parts and materials; conduct regular quality inspections.·         Creating, issuing, and tracking 8D Problem reports and assuring timely and proper closure within the PSR/Plex electronic systems.·         Sorting and reworking of Purchased and CVG made parts and materials.·         Assuring timely identification, segregation, and disposition of non-conforming and reworked materials.  ·         Maintaining inventory control of items in Quality lab and Quality hold.·         Performing Supplier, Customer, and Internal PPAPs and layouts in a timely manner using a variety of measurement systems while maintaining appropriate electronic records in an organized manner.·         Performing gauge and measurement system calibrations and maintaining appropriate records in the electronic GagePack calibration system.·         Conducting Validations of Weld, Assembly, and Test Fixtures.·         Conducting regular inspection test on purchased and internal produced assemblies including welded parts.·         Creating detailed and concise electronic reports in a variety of software formats.·         Directly contacting suppliers, vendors, and customers via phone and email for scheduling activities, reporting results, and gathering information.·         Uses a variety of measuring tools that include but not limited to calipers, micrometers, gage pins, hardness testers, pull testers, torque measurement, electrical testers, and Coordinate Measuring Machines. ·         Performs Product/Process/System Audits relative to the ISO/TS 16949 and ISO14001 standards.  ·         Maintain 5s of the QA lab, Quality Hold Cage, and other Quality work areas.·         Assist with other quality related activities as directed by Quality Manager or Quality Engineers. Candidate requirements include:·         HS Diploma or equivalent with 3 years manufacturing experience with some prior Quality or Technical job experience preferred.  ·         Prior experience in Blue print reading and GD&T·         Working knowledge of Programmable Logic controller (PLC)·         Practical experience with a variety of measurement tools and systems and calibration experience are preferred. ·         Excellent written and verbal communication skills; high level organizational skills.·         Proficient in MS Word, Excel, Picture Manager, Power Point, and Outlook.·         Ability to generate concise reports with supporting documentation.  CVG, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions without regard to race, gender, disability, or protected status.",Quality Technician Job in Vonore,Full Time Employee,"Vonore, TN 37885",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-technician-job-vonore-tn-us-179104162.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=13,,Quality Assurance/Safety,cc45f17f20f3e7e2fa13b1837a9f902d
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:22:31:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Why Join Altec? Building on 87 years of growth and success, Altec specializes in the design, manufacture, sale, and service of aerial devices, digger derricks, cranes, telecom, and specialty equipment.  We are the leading equipment and service provider for the electric utility, telecommunications, tree care, lights and signs, and contractor markets, supporting customers in over 100 countries throughout the world!   Join the thousands who have made Altec their career decision ● Customer First ● Enjoyment of Work ● Family ● Financial Stability ● Integrity ● People Are Our Greatest Strength ● Quality ● Spiritual Development ● Teamwork ● There is an opening for a  Safety Coordinator in St. Joseph, Missouri. The Safety Technician ensures the organization complies with all current safety regulations. Works to develop, implement, monitor, and manage safety programs, policies, and procedures.  Evaluates procedures, facilities &  equipment to identify compliance with regulations and Altec policies, programs, and unsafe  conditions that need improvement. Identifies & evaluates detrimental working conditions & makes adjustments to safeguard associate health. Responsible for maintenance of safety and accident records. Qualifications: Four year Bachelor’s degree required. Prefer Occupational and Safety or Environmental Science (will consider applicants anticipating a December 2016/May 2017 graduation) Ten years Environmental & Safety experience at an Altec facility can be used in lieu of a Bachelor’s degree. Excellent communication skills required. Minimum three years proven experience in Occupational Safety preferred.  One to three years environmental regulations experience at a local, state, or federal agency preferred. Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within the safety arena. Responsibilities:  Conduct safety training and education programs, and demonstrate the use of safety equipment. Serves as primary contact person with OSHA regulatory agency. Involved in accident investigations Conducts Job Safety Analysis (JSA’s) Maintains all Safety Governmental records. Manages and administers the Altec APSMS system  Manages DOT Drug Testing for the facility. Leads and coordinates Safety Compliance and Worker’s Compensation RCI events. Participates in safety orientation and training for new associates. Develop & maintain industrial hygiene programs such as noise surveys, continuous atmosphere monitoring, and ventilation surveys. Develop and maintain medical monitoring programs for associates. Inspect and evaluate workplace environments, equipment, and practices, in order to ensure compliance with safety standards and government regulations. Completes and files all Safety regulatory reports and submits required governmental reports for OSHA compliance. Inspect specified areas to ensure the presence of fire prevention equipment, safety equipment, and first-aid supplies. Investigate accidents to identify causes and to determine how such accidents might be prevented in the future. Maintain and update emergency response plans and procedures. Order suspension of activities that pose potential exposure to workers' health, safety, and/or potential impact to the environment or ecosystems where the facility is located. Provide new-employee health and safety orientations, and develop materials for these presentations. Altec offers a competitive salary that rewards performance and dedication, along with a comprehensive benefits package that includes: Medical, Dental and Prescription Drug Program Retirement 401(k) Program Vacation and Holidays Flexible Spending Accounts  Tuition Assistance Program Employee Assistance and Mental Health/Substance Abuse Program Life Insurance, Accidental Death and Dismemberment Insurance Altec Industries, Inc. and its affiliates are equal opportunity employers and maintain affirmative action plans to recruit, retain, develop, and promote qualified individuals without unlawful consideration of race, gender, color, religion, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, citizenship status, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. Altec strives to maintain a work environment free from unlawful discrimination and harassment, where associates are treated with respect and dignity.",Safety Coordinator Job in St Joseph,Full Time,"St Joseph, MO",Altec Industries,http://jobview.monster.com/safety-coordinator-job-st-joseph-mo-us-178572807.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),66b67fd000c65f8d8ebd4f48e7dec3f1
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:22:49:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job This prestigious full service engineering consulting firm is a leader in sustainable building design.Their growth has created an opportunity for an Electrical Design Engineer in their Austin office.In this role, you will prepare preliminary electrical design layouts and calculations and provide support to Project Managers and Project Engineers on complex building design projects.This is a high-visibility position with strong career potential, and offers a competitive salary and excellent company benefits.Job requirements:BS in Electrical EngineeringCertification as an EIT preferred2 to 5 years' experience in building design engineeringExperience in the design of electrical building systems (such as power, lighting, fire alarm, and telecommunications)Experience in use of 2D/3D modeling software (such as AutoCAD and Revit)Proficiency with building and electrical codes and standardsThis client prefers a candidate who currently resides in the greater Austin area. We are an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics. Report","Company Confidential Job Application for Electrical Design Engineer - MEP - Direct Hire - Austin | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Confidential,Architectural and Design Services; Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office; Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/electrical-design-engineer-mep-direct-hire-austin-job-austin-tx-us-178811576.aspx?mescoid=1700169001001&jobPosition=6,,,8b19486a8b898ea039d76fb47989ff39
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:23:00:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: EMCOR Government Services offers an experienced single-source solution for meeting the routine and mission-critical needs of federal, state, local and other government organizations. By combining our expert professional technicians, commercial best practices, extensive facilities knowledge and strong commitment to reliable, responsive service, we enable our government clients to achieve consistently high-performance facilities, on-time projects and long-term value. Job Title: Project Manager - Healthcare Facility Job Summary: EMCOR Government Services has an immediate need for a Project Manager at Walter Reed National Military Medical Center in Bethesda, Maryland. The incumbent is responsible for technical management and oversight of a Government medical operations and maintenance contract. This position involves planning, organizing, coordinating, directing and controlling all contract functions between EGS and the Client. The incumbent is responsible for daily operations and maintenance, and reimbursable projects under the contract. Oversees the contract budget; supervision of project personnel, supervision of new construction and remodeling of facilities; repair and maintenance, and systematic inspection, planning, and accomplishing repairs to facilities. Reporting to a regional operations leader, the program objectives will be to ensure that all personnel, facilities, equipment, material, supplies and services are available to satisfy the terms of the contract and deliver best-in-class services. The incumbent will draw from corporate capabilities to support and enhance contract performance. The incumbent must provide energetic and innovative leadership to promote facilities management excellence, achieve operating efficiencies and attain the highest standards of contract performance in all areas. Also must apply customer and commercial best practices, address life-cycle operations and achieve cost savings and efficiencies. All Quality Control and Safety programs to meet the hospital and contract requirements must be met and managed. Finally, must build and continually improve partnerships with customer, employees, labor, subcontractors and the community in fostering teamwork, integration and cooperation. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Fully responsible for the successful completion of all aspects of the assigned contract between EGS and the Client. Prepares quarterly financial forecasts and monthly updates. Ensures that the contract is managed in a manner that meets all contractual requirements and EFS financial goals. Responsible for maintaining a strong, trained and disciplined workforce. Manages the overall operations of the contract, including: the performance of daily operations, scheduled maintenance; IDIQ construction and renovations; administration of subcontracts for facilities work. Evaluate and insure the efficient operation of the project, controlling operational expenses at a minimum level which is consistent with sound maintenance practices and contractual requirements. Provide administrative and technical direction and supervision to staff in completing work assignments. Supervise the negotiation and bids for IDIQ construction and renovation contracts. Discuss, plan, and delegate major project assignments to supervisory staff; determine building and maintenance priorities that are of significant scope. In consultation with the Regional Manager, make recommendations concerning the hiring, promotion and termination of plant staff. Advise, discuss, and inform hospital staff members on physical plant matters and problem areas. Ensures proper upkeep of facilities to include heating, ventilation, sanitation, general appearance of buildings and grounds and emergency situations affecting the facilities. Coordinates purchase of necessary supplies, equipment and services from appropriate sources and maintains proper inventory control, maintenance and consumable supplies. Maintains liaison with architects, engineers and contractors/ subcontractors engaged in plant expansion, renovation, or other major projects. Maintains sufficient records, files, controls, procedures to insure management and work production. Manages Quality Control and Safety program for contract meeting all requirements and providing all deliverable reports. Develop training sessions for employees who require them. Maintains a strong safety program within EGS Guidelines. Ensures that all employees follow the EFS Business System and ISO standards. Qualifications: The Project Manager shall have health care supervisory engineering experience, preferably at a large hospital of similar scope and complexity. A Bachelor's degree plus working knowledge of engineering management, engineering systems, budgeting and EOC/JCAHO compliance is also mandatory. Seven (7) years of demonstrated experience in facilities operations or maintenance of healthcare buildings. Experience in supervision of a diversified work force responsible for operations, maintenance, and repair of medical facility systems. Experience with maintenance and/or repair of medical mechanical/electrical/plumbing systems. Complete knowledge of the Joint Commission and demonstrated experience with successful JC audits. Working experience with NFPA, OSHA, and EPA codes and standards. Must have knowledge of submitting written proposals, scopes of work, scheduling and coordinating site contractors and other assigned personnel. A thorough understanding of medical facility preventive maintenance schedules and operations and the ability to meet demanding customer requirements. Demonstrated experience in leading contract startup operations for Government and commercial medical facilities operations and maintenance contracts Strong experience with Windows and MS Office; experience w/RS Means and MAXIMO. Strong customer service skills and excellent communication skills both oral and written. Supervisory experience and familiarity with Government and Commercial Contracting procedures. Basic knowledge of office administration, plant management, reporting, budgeting and control, and business operations, blueprints, buildings, grounds, equipment, housekeeping, construction, repair, maintenance, purchasing, inventory control, fire, safety management, BOCA & OSHA codes. We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled Click here to apply online",Project Manager Job in Maryland US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Location:,Real Estate/Property ManagementHealthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-md-us-179110073.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=20,,Project/Program Management,ae30b3c3924922f8af77f2dc855b65d0
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:23:11:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our growing client in Fort Worth, TX is looking for a Financial Analyst on a long term contract basis with the possibility of being hired. Company Profile:Founded in 1955Company provides support to the US government, its partners and international organizationsCompany portfolio includes aviation, building and stabilization, infrastructure, logistics, information management solutions, security solutions, and enterprise-level technology products/softwareFeatures and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of Client:Medical/Dental/Vision – company pays 60%-70%Life Insurance401K with company match2 weeks PTO5 sick days7 paid holidays and 3 floating holidaysEasy going, relaxed team environmentPositive and busy work environmentFinancial Analyst Role:The Financial Analyst will be responsible for contract management, sales, EBIT, cash goals, financial analysis, billing, assistance in proposal development and pricing, cost control processes, government funds management, program financial reporting, and month-end closingConducts accounting operations, budgeting, cost statement preparation, project code management, contract preparation and negotiation, and preparation of bids and bid processesReview project costs and expenditures and report variances, executes cost tracking and reconciliations and prepares reports and analysis as neededWill be the primary reviewer of all billing detail to ensure invoices are accurate and completeCompletes supporting schedule for applicable CLINsHandles all billing and Project AnalysisMaintains and develops CDRLs in accordance with the contract for review and submissionHelps organize data for proposals, contract status reports, and budgetsAP/AR, General Ledgers, Compliance and Business LawFinancial Analyst Profile:Must have a Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting from an accredited universityMust have at least 3 years or more strong accounting experienceOne year business analyst and/or financial analyst experience preferredHigh degree of ingenuity, creativity, and innovationAbility to be self-initiated and motivated and work virtually self-supervisedStrong understanding of MS Office Suite – emphasis on Excel and PowerPointStrong attention to detail and ability to execute on multiple priorities in a fast-paced environmentUnderstanding and/or familiarity with Government CR, T&M, FFP, IDIQ contracts, FAR a plusDeltek, Docs4Deltek, Costpoint, Cognos, and knowledge in other ERP systems a plus Please visit us at www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/ft.-worth.html www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/accounting-finance.html   Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Financial Analyst/Accountant Job in Fort Worth,"Full Time, Employee","Fort Worth, TX",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-accountant-job-fort-worth-tx-us-171788712.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=8,"45,000.00 - 60,000.00 /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,698d4e2da7cb1550e1919ed88ac43f04
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:23:12:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition ID 17373BR Job Title Project Manager Location Louisiana - Shreveport Office Location Shreveport, LA (Project Office) Why CDM Smith? CDM Smith provides lasting and integrated solutions in water, environment, transportation, energy and facilities to public and private clients worldwide. As a full-service consulting, engineering, construction, and operations firm, we deliver exceptional client service, quality results and enduring value across the entire project life cycle. Job Description CDM Smith is one of the world’s top program management and construction management (PM/CM) firms, providing innovative and creative solutions for our clients and assisting them in achieving successful outcomes on their most important programs. We currently provide PM/CM services around the world with over 300 working full-time professionals who use world-class program controls, processes, and tools.Our Program Management team in Shreveport, LA is seeking a Project Manager to provide the following services for the City of Shreveport (City), for projects requiring pre-design, design, bidding and/or construction. The Project Manager will provide services for City’s Capital Improvement Program (CIP), including Consent Decree wastewater projects and other water and wastewater projects. In addition, the Project Manager may be involved with reviewing, editing, and updating the City’s standard specifications, standard details, and design manual; tracking Program compliance with Consent Decree requirements; and/or maintaining CIP projects’ coordination with utilities and other City departments.Responsibilities include: Oversight of Architectural/ Engineering (A/E) Services Assisting City staff with moving construction contracts from bid opening through contract award and execution Design scope development and design oversight:Document preparationConstruction cost estimatesDesign Standards Assisting with the identification of necessary permits and review A/Es’ documentation for applicable permits Review of A/E contract payment applications Review of project schedules/ establishment of program and project milestones Construction phase servicesGeneral administration of construction contractsVisits to site and observation of constructionReview and recommendations regarding:Field orders and requests for informationChange orders and work change directivesShop drawingsSubstitutionsInspections and testsApplications for paymentContractors’ completion documentsFinal notice of acceptability of the workRecord drawingsFinal inspections of completed construction/ close-out procedures Compliance with CIP electronic and hard copy document management system. CDM Smith provides Program and Project Management services nationally and globally. This position requires approximately 20% of travel, and you may be asked to take short term assignments in a different location than your home office. Minimum Qualifications Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Civil Engineering, Environmental Engineering, Construction, or related field and seven years of work experience in the job offered or related field of civil engineering, environmental engineering or construction; OR, in the alternative, a Master’s degree or equivalent and 6 years of work experience. Registration as a Professional Engineer is required, and becoming registered in the State of Louisiana will be necessary if not currently registered there. Assignment Category Fulltime-Regular Amount of Travel Required 20% EEO Statement We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate—as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. Agency Disclaimer All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.",Project Manager Job in Shreveport,,"Shreveport, LA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-shreveport-la-us-172349139.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,,,886640ca78db84eed7f47bd58b3f28c3
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:23:23:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Immediate need for loan servicing specialist. Functions include: answering questions pertaining to all areas of loan servicing including payment research, taxes, insurance, loan modifications and assumptions, prepayments, payoffs, adjustable rate loans, credit reporting, and lien perfection; researching and analyzing problems and recommending solutions; conducting periodic audits of files; may also coordinate property inspections, lien priority and loan disbursements in accordance with loan documentation; may perform procedures related to advances and pay downs, funds wiring and disbursement process for Banking and Consumer Lending company. This organization offers opportunity for advancement in a professional environment. Apply for this great position as a loan servicing specialist today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1071878 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Loan Servicing Specialist - Job in Frederick,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Frederick, MD 21701",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/loan-servicing-specialist-job-frederick-md-us-172131032.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c83f5f29b3fd1f8bace3aa538de48f44
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:23:25:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Kansas City, MO that is searching for an Associate Accountant.Summary:This position will be a member of the Financial Controls team, performing the accounting, analysis and deliverables associated with financial controls. Responsibilities will include assisting in daily and month-end account reconciliations, completing reconciliations, providing detail in support of audit requests and research on outstanding account balances. This role will work closely with other departments, specifically the Premium Administration Department and Finance.REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance or related major 3 - 6 years of experience in accounting, financial reporting and analysis preferably in the financial services or insurance industries Commitment to meeting deadlines and ability to manage conflicting demands Strong proficiency in Microsoft Office, specifically with a strong knowledge of ExcelKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Associate Accountant Job in Kansas City,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Kansas City, MO 64108",,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-accountant-job-kansas-city-mo-us-172314646.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),51344a86035170f3c9c243ef53cf455b
United States of America,US,07/Nov/2015:23:33:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Prospects for new customers via phone, interactively and in-person within relevant industries to present and close on commercial pest control services and products. Creates new business at the local and regional levels, and follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction, increase existing business and obtain referrals. Collaborates with internal departments to deliver solutions and provide quality service to new and existing customers. Responsibilities 1. Prospects for new customers via phone interactively through tip groups, networking, cross-selling and referrals, and by canvassing for large potential customers in industries such as food grade, food processing, distribution/logistics, healthcare, manufacturing, and companies with multiple physical locations. 2. Presents commercial pest control services and products to potential customers through in-person presentations and electronic communications. 3. Creates new business at the local and regional and national levels through creative calls, leads, prospecting, networking, cross-selling and referrals. 4. Follows up with customers after the sale to ensure satisfaction of service and products and to obtain referrals for new business. 5. Collaborates with the National Accounts department to deliver solutions to multi-unit locations assigned as contract leads. 6. Works with Branch Managers, Sales Managers, Service Managers, Region Managers and service professionals to ensure quality service delivery to new and existing customers; assists in resolving customer issues. Education and Experience Requirements • High School Diploma or GED equivalent • Associate’s or Bachelor’s degree preferred, or equivalent combination of education and experience • Two or more years experience in business-to-business (B2B) sales; proven sales history with increasing sales amounts year after year Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Demonstrated knowledge of selling techniques (prospecting, overcoming objections, presentation skills, gaining commitment, negotiation) • Skill in taking independent action and being a self-starter • Skill in written and verbal communication • Ability to build customer relationships and provide appropriate levels of customer service • Business acumen and the ability to calculate numbers and amounts • Skill with Microsoft Office software applications (Word, Outlook, Excel, PowerPoint) • Skill in adapting to new company software and using the internet to research target industries and specific businesses • Ability to travel locally on an extensive basis Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Business Development Rep / BB Sales / Outside Sales Job in Pooler,"Full Time, Employee","Pooler, GA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-development-rep-b2b-sales-outside-sales-job-pooler-ga-us-172148841.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=18,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,2ff6f513c029f4ba3475ce1c29ccded6
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:00:07:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is actively seeking a Billing Quality Analyst for a behavioral health software company located in the Rockville, MD area. This position is full time and permanent! This job will have the following responsibilities:Work with partnered agencies to determine any billing inconsistencies/discrepancies Help develop a work plan to correct any billing issues Assist Billing Manager with improving all internal processes and increase checks and balances to reduce billing errors Ensure compliance with documentation standards Qualifications & Requirements:Bachelors degree preferred CPC certification preferred Direct knowledge of CPT/ICD-9/ICD-10 coding systems At least 3 years experience with medical billing Experience in quality review/auditing ALL INTERESTED AND QUALIFIED CANDIDATES PLEASE SEND YOUR MOST UPDATED RESUME TO MARGARET BAGNELL AT MBAGNELL@JUDGE.COM OR CONTACT MARGARET DIRECTLY AT (610)617-1528. THANK YOU!",Billing Quality Analyst Job in Rockville,"Full Time, Employee","Rockville, MD",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/billing-quality-analyst-job-rockville-md-us-171867708.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=3,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,5f245b3491674195eddaa05b0c856df3
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:00:24:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is currently searching for an experienced Collections/Credit Representative to work with a company in the NW part of San Antonio, TX. The primary purpose of the job is to collect funds due and provide documentation to establish credit for the customers.Job Duties: Calls customers for past due payments primarily related to product sales, services and storage; reconciles customer's account to resolve discrepancies; works with Accounting, Cash, Marketing and Operations to correct customer's account if necessary May arrange credit with suppliers for hotel reservations and conferences, parts suppliers, and other service industries; works with Legal and Purchasing May work to correct and collect invoices issued to our customers; this usually requires numerous calls to obtain invoice support and payment from the customer Assists with scanning customer credit applications and other customer correspondence, etc; scanning involves placing the scanned document(s) into the appropriate customer sub-fileREQUIREMENTS: High School diploma or GED required Minimum 5 years of collections or credit experience Use of Microsoft Word and Excel preferred Must have good verbal skills and be able to interface effectively with internal and external sourcesKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Collections/Credit Representative Job in San Antonio,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Antonio, TX 78257",,http://jobview.monster.com/collections-credit-representative-job-san-antonio-tx-us-171796600.aspx?mescoid=1300112001001&jobPosition=8,17.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),e52e7c97f39aac1e7e74372a74336166
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:00:25:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Cambridge, Massachusetts (MA) that is seeking a Senior Accounts Payable Specialist. The ideal candidate will process a high volume of payment requests ensuring submitted documents are in compliance with established policies and procedures.Primary Responsibilities: Review and audit payment requests for appropriate documentation, accurate coding, proper approvals, and compliance to corporate policies Perform multi-currency data entry for PO match and non-matching payment requests and provide assistance to team member with more complicated processing issues Apply technology to accounting and internal control processes to ensure the most efficient and effective processes Regular and timely communication with internal and external customers regarding payment inquires and resolving related issues/matters Provide first-level counseling to internal customers regarding policies and procedures; escalate as appropriate Prepare daily and monthly account reconciliations as necessary Assist with month-end closing process Perform other projects as requestedREQUIREMENTS: Prefer 4+ years of experience in PO matching and working with the full cycle of accounts payable processes Requires a background of processing high volume of invoices A background that includes handling Time and Expense Reports/Travel Advances, etc would be a plus Excellent computer skills including the Microsoft Office Suite with a particular expertise in Excel Strong analytical and problem solving skills Solid knowledge of an ERP System, preferably Oracle (or PeopleSoft) Outstanding organizational and oral/written communication skills Superior customer service skills and the ability to work in a team setting with a diverse group of employees, managers, and outside customers Need to be detailed oriented and exceptionally organized, with some basic understanding of accounting Organized and highly motivated team player with strong initiative, an overall understanding of full cycle Accounts Payable processes and the ability to perform reconciliations Must have the ability and desire to work in a fast-paced environment, handle multiple projects and competing priorities at onceKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Senior Accounts Payable Specialist Job in Cambridge,Full Time Employee,"Cambridge, MA 02138",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accounts-payable-specialist-job-cambridge-ma-us-171902499.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=9,"52,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),c91fc1f68c9d8edd91b81477369e362c
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:01:48:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client, a leading provider in the healthcare industry, seeking a Senior Accountant who is motivated to excel and expand in their career. Headquartered in Needham, MA, this publicly traded company is easily accessible from both the city and its outskirts. With more than $1B in revenue, our client offers both stability and an excellent opportunity for learning and growth.The team is full of great mentors who are excited to bring in a new member to work in an interesting, complex and technical environment. With the opportunity to work closely with excellent leadership, this position is ideal for someone who is a fast learner and will be able to continue to grow with the company as it expands. The position also offers bonus potential based on performance as well as tuition reimbursement.Key Responsibilities Include: Month-end close and consolidated SME area close processes Monthly processes, including (but not limited to) journal entries, reconciliations, review and analyses of community level income statements Support tax department Manage financial records in accordance with GAAP Assist with audit and compliance responsibilities Train corporate accountants and/or operations personnel on day-to-day accounting related matters Develop and implement new procedures for increased effectiveness and efficiencyREQUIREMENTS: BA in Accounting/Finance 3-5+ years of related accounting operations and/or audit experience Public accounting experience and CPA preferred but not required Mid-size SEC and/or privately held business experience a plus Staff supervision experience preferred Knowledge of PeopleSoft a plus Excellent communication and interpersonal skills Strong attention to detail Ability to work under pressure in a dynamic environment Proficiency in Microsoft OfficeKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Senior Accountant Job in Needham,Full Time Employee,"Needham, MA 02492",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-needham-ma-us-171719380.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=11,"65,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),411aedb7ec1cd341a5a1ff4e1bac9351
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:01:48:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe Revenue Growth Mgmt Analyst will support the company’s effort to achieve efficiency in trade management. This role will use a fact-based approach to drive highly effective forecasting & optimization of trade marketing funds. Assist in the development of the Clearview promotion budget, customer planning process, brand guidelines and trade promotion management system.Job FunctionsAnalyzes the company’s trade fund(s) to drive profitable incremental sales revenue.Conducts retailer event post performance analysis.Creates and maintains trade reporting and key performance indicators from multiple internal reporting systems in a concise, easily digestible format.Monitors compliance and maintenance of the company’s trade promotion management (TPM) software and advance analytic modeling tools.Collaborates with Finance on proper trade expenditure execution, ie invoicing, accruals, deduction management and proof of performance.Power user of IRI to build effective consumption based analysis.May perform other duties as required. Scope of ResponsibilityThis position will provide analytical support in the development of trade fund strategies and trade budgets for the Clearview business unit. This position will help the Clearview business unit improve the accuracy of planning and reporting total trade spending.RequirementsBachelor’s degree 5+ years of experience in sales analysis, category management analysis, trade marketing, finance and/or brand marketing analysis required.Strong knowledge and use of syndicated data resources (IRI & AC Nielsen).Working knowledge of trade funds management and trade promotion post performance analysis.Strong analytical and technical skills such as all Microsoft applications, specifically to include pivot tables, formulas and graphs.Financial acumen is a plus.Experience in consumer goods and/or industry, sales, brand or category management.Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.20% travel is required.",Revenue Growth Management Analyst Job in Charlotte,"Full Time, Employee","Charlotte, NC",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/revenue-growth-management-analyst-job-charlotte-nc-us-171867917.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,83304d61d681ff2bce4dd64dcda90a72
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:01:48:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:We are currently recruiting for a dedicated, innovative and experienced Accounts Payable Specialist. This position works within a fast paced and upbeat company that encourages self-development and growth for all employees. Responsibilities for the AP Specialist include record transactions, creating reports, tracking income, expenses and check figures for accuracy.You already excel at the following: High attention to detail Professional attitude Thoroughness, organization, and analyzing information Microsoft Office SuiteQualification include: Bachelor?s Degree 3+ years of prior AP ExperienceLet?s discuss your qualification and further about this position. Apply Today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1069571 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Accounts Payable Specialist - Up to $,Full Time Employee,"San Diego, CA 92108",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-specialist-up-to-48-000-job-san-diego-ca-us-171807220.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c2fcabc314ba44f54857725290926a34
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:02:06:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learns how to conduct inspections to identify infestations or conditions conducive to infestations of wood destroying organisms and/or insects, birds, or other vertebrate pests for the purpose of making proposals and presentations to obtain sales contracts. Responsibilities • Attends company training programs and accompany other associates or managers during ride-alongs in order to learn job skills such as: • Recording accurate measurements and writing correct descriptions of property and/or other areas inspected • Preparing appropriate specs and treating instructions in accordance with existing laws, regulations, and company policy • Calculating job treating costs from company pricing instructions • Executing contracts on behalf of the company, observing company policy pertaining to credit terms of sale • Maintaining equipment, vehicle, and personal safety equipment in clean, working order • Learning sales techniques and product knowledge in order to sell termite control protection and renewals and/or monthly pest control protection to owners or agents of homes, stores, or industry • Gaining experience in dealing courteously with customers, leaving customers' premises and furnishings clean and as found • Passes all state licensing and/or company requirements • Attends call sessions to learn how to effectively collect on delinquent accounts of personal sales contracts • Contacts customers after service is performed to ensure satisfaction and develop additional prospects • Develops termite and/or pest control sales leads for each respective office lead furnished Education and Experience Requirements • High school education or general education degree (GED) required • Six to twelve months related experience and/or training in sales and dealing with the public or equivalent combination of education and experience is strongly preferred • Valid driver’s license from current state of residence required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals • Ability to calculate rate, ratio, and percent, and to draw and interpret bar graphs Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability 100713",Sales Rep / Outside Sales / Territory Sales Job in Benton,"Full Time, Employee","Benton, IL",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-outside-sales-territory-sales-job-benton-il-us-171864989.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,966e7296e90a1b8f07adb2e80f41d8f9
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:02:08:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is searching for a HR Craft Recruiter in Saint Louis, MO.Responsibilities: Create job descriptions with input from hiring managers Post newly open positions through various recruiting sources Track and move job applicants through applicant tracking system Employ proper interviewing and hiring processes to ensure adherence to all Federal/State regulations Perform reference checks on applicants Extend employment offers Ensure background check authorizations forms are completed as required by each job site File and maintain employment records for future referencesREQUIREMENTS: Must have a minimum of 4 years of experience recruiting craft professionals in the industrial construction or maintenance market Must be proficient in Microsoft Office (Excel, PowerPoint, Word and Outlook) Must be able to work independently with a high degree of customer service Must have outstanding written and oral communication skills enabling effective communication at all levels of the business Willing to travel via plane and/or carKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Human Resource Craft Recruiter Job in Saint Louis,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Saint Louis, MO 63011",,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resource-craft-recruiter-job-saint-louis-mo-us-171912382.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4239611f103a1733076cedee001c701e
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:02:11:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"The position summary states the general nature and purpose of the job. Overall accountabilities are defined in this section. This position supports the plant controller in directing the accounting support to the production facility. Responsibilities include cost accounting, inventory control, accounts payable, payroll, billing, and preparation of plant financial and other control reports. Supports the maintenance of manufacturing, inventory, and finished goods ledgers and cost accounting activities. Compiles and analyzes operating performance reports. Prepares and analyzes unusual items on financial reports. Responsibilities and tasks are written as follows: 30% Operations TeamworkParticipate in plant management meetings as well as core product review meetings; assist plant management in preparation of quarterly review graphs and routine items; assist in preparing materials for meetings; assist plant management in operations improvement activities; provide SAP, ADC, and other related system training and support; proactively identify opportunities that can make a contribution outside traditional sphere of influence; work actively with purchasing and maintenance departments to reduce inventory balances and free up capital.30% ControllershipResponsible for the protection of company assets (meat, packaging, maintenance supplies, fixed assets, etc.); ensure inventory results and balances are reconciled and valued accurately per corporate policy; ensure compliance with SOX and annual internal auditing; responsible for Internal Order (IO) administration (capital and expense projects); adherence to GAAP; audit payroll distribution, and routinely review general ledger accounts to ensure consistency and accuracy (at least monthly).30% Cost AccountingAdminister the bill of materials (BOM audits and corrections as well as creating and deleting and BOM's); distribute material and labor variances to plant personnel on a daily basis; report variances to plant and corporate personnel monthly; report monthly to corporate slow moving inventory (MRO and Pkg); spend time on production floor in order to enhance understanding of processes; reporting general ledger entries by 1st preliminary cutoff.10% Human Resource ManagementEffectively communicate with staff; manage staff performance; develop staff and cross train; and manage overtime.Other DutiesThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.May perform other duties as assigned.To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals to perform the essential functions. Bachelor's degree in Accounting or related field and 5+ years of professional accounting experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.Strong leadership skills, solid understanding of cost accounting concepts, attention to detail and well organized.Exceptional written and oral communication skills.Requires flexibility and willingness to work as part of a team.Solid mathematical and analytical skills.Knowledge of Accounting software, Contact Management systems, Inventory software, Manufacturing software, Word Processing software, and Internet.Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Excel including use of Pivot Tables and analytical tools.SAP experience (preferred).Must be able to travel up to 10% of the time. PI95244156Apply Here",Assistant Plant Controller (Fresh Plants) Job in Smithfield-North Plant,Full Time Employee,"Smithfield-North Plant, VA 23430",Accounting and Auditing ServicesFood and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-plant-controller-fresh-plants-job-smithfield-north-plant-va-us-171743350.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=1,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ffb1c93fc8ccbcc39a4438ad5d0c983f
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:02:13:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis Finance in NE Ohio has an immediate need a locally-based Internal Auditor in the Cleveland/Akron area. Experis works with many prominent client companies, ranging from Fortune 500 to mid-size companies, who utilize our consultants for both project solutions and talent resourcing (staffing) opportunities. Project Assignments often have the potential to transition into full-time positions with our clients. Requirements: * 5+ years of experience with Internal Auditing. * CIA, CISA, CFE certifications would be a plus. Successful candidates will have performed some of the following: * Risk Assessments. * Audit planning and execution. * SOX testing. * Process and Control Reviews. * Financial Audits. * Operations Audits. If you feel you are qualified and interested in this opportunity, please include both an email address and a phone number with your resume and application. LOCAL NE OHIO-BASED CANDIDATES ONLY PLEASE. For further information, contact: Michael Spiro, Director of Recruiting Experis Finance Phone: 216-901-8616 ********************************************************************* Experis - Who We Are As a leader in project solutions and professional talent resourcing, Experis matches professionals to rewarding Finance, IT, and Engineering engagements with industry leading organizations helping accelerate careers, while delivering excellent results to our clients. Experis is part of ManpowerGroup, the world leader in innovative workforce solutions. Learn more at www.experis.com Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Internal Auditor Job in Seven Hills,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Internal Auditor,"Seven Hills, OH 44131",http://jobview.monster.com/internal-auditor-job-seven-hills-oh-us-171747112.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,6364c4bc5c71ff862dd67e593ae48aa3
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:02:58:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsReal estate investment company focusing on single family residences.TitleReal estate investor-Not AgentDescriptionMake over $ 4000.00/ per WEEK Flipping Houses!! No Experience or Funding Needed ( Memphis and suburbs ONLY)The leader in Real Estate Education is willing to train you so you can get in on the action FOR FREE. The Memphis market is full of deals just waiting to be done but we can't do them alone, which is why we're adding to our team. If you are a motivated, serious, determined individual ready to change life and financial future give me a call and we'll get started immediately.Being on our team you will:- Receive FREE Training. you'll learn EVERYTHING you need to know to flip a house.- YOU WILL FLIP YOUR OWN HOUSES WITH OUR MONEY- Have access to Funding-We fund deals FOR YOU!!- Set your own schedule: we are not here to micromanage you. you're an adult-Work when YOU want.- Have access to out innovative Marketing strategies. We'll even market your properties for you to ensure they get sold quickly so You get PAID.- Unlimited Income possibilities: You can make $ 4000.00/ week EASILY.Education• High School Diploma (or equivalent)Qualifications• Provincial/Territorial license• State licenseSkills• Basic computer skills• Customer-oriented• Excellent communication skills• Good math skills• Good negotiation skills • Listens effectively• Shows initiative• Solves problems effectively• Works well with othersPosition TypeFull-Time",Real Estate Investor Job in Memphis,Full Time,"Memphis, TN 38139",All,http://jobview.monster.com/real-estate-investor-job-memphis-tn-us-171252989.aspx?mescoid=1100058001001&jobPosition=14,,Entry Level,c515b4f7fd131f6385b03518894459cd
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:03:15:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Parker + Lynch has a Divisional Controller job in Irving, TX. The client is looking for a Certified Public Accountant who has a minimum of seven years’ experience. You will play a key role in ensuring that the actual and forecast numbers and commentary are robust, relevant and insightful. We are seeking someone who has advanced Oracle skills. Key Responsibilities:• Controlling and issuing monthly internal financial reports and variance analysis• Journal Entries and reports for monthly and annual financial reports• Ensure the completion of ad hoc, daily and/or month-end reports relating to the division• Ensure the proper file maintenance of documents for audit verification• Monthly revenue and forecasting for the division• Assist division in building and maintaining models to determine customer profitability• Financial liaison between division and corporate• Provide financial/analytical/accounting support to division• Annual budget preparation for division• Process Improvement, automation and documentation Qualifications:• Bachelor degree in Accounting • CPA • Minimum of seven years of experience• Excellent communication skills• Oracle Financials experience a plus If you meet the requirements for this Divisional Controller job, please email your resume to: Patrick.Louden@parkerlynch.com  Also, like and follow us on Facebook and Twitter to stay up to date on our latest available opportunities:https://www.facebook.com/ParkerandLynchhttp://twitter.com/#!/ParkerLynch Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled    ",Divisional Controller Job in Irving,Full Time Employee,"Irving, TX 75063",,http://jobview.monster.com/divisional-controller-job-irving-tx-us-171861768.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=14,"90,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,2e550e9445f5efcb52ac9674537a1e09
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:03:16:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., one of the world's largest insurance brokers, provides a full range of retail and wholesale property/casualty (P/C) brokerage and alternative risk transfer services globally, as well as employee benefit brokerage, consulting, and actuarial services in the United States. We also offer claims and information management, risk control consulting, and appraisal services to clients around the world.   Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc. is the U.S. retail property/casualty brokerage division of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Our advisors specialize by industry and coverage types—developing solutions uniquely tailored to individual client requirements. We deliver a full range of insurance and risk management products and services, including traditional and loss-sensitive coverages, captives, alternative risk solutions, and financial products to clients around the world. For additional information, please refer to Career Opportunities with Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Position Summary: The Branch Client Service Manager is accountable for delivering high quality and efficient service to both internal and external clients through the day-to-day account management of an assigned group of accounts within a Branch.  This role reports directly into either the Branch Client Service Director or the Branch Client Service Supervisor.  The Branch Client Service Manager directly contributes to key business outcomes such as client retention, client satisfaction, enhancing AJG's value to our clients and prospects, achieving operating/margin targets and fostering a culture of performance and continuous improvement. Successfully and profitably manages an assigned group of accounts. Builds and solidifies relationships with existing clients by providing exceptional ongoing care.  In partnership with the Production team, takes a leadership role in the renewal process, ensuring that the best possible solution is delivered to the client in a high-quality & timely manner.  Secures existing business and drives the sale of additional services and lines of coverage.  Cultivates relationships with the buyer in the client organization as well as with day-to-day client representatives and buyers. Additional Considerations:  Required:Bachelor's degree with 3+ years client service and/or claims management experience –OR– High School degree/GED with 8+ years client service and/or claims management experience. Producer's License Ability to travel up to 25% of the time Proficiency in Microsoft OfficeDesired: Previous insurance knowledge and experience managing client relationships.Work Traits: Proficient in using technology as a tool to maximize productivity and quality.   Strong written and verbal communication skills.U.S. Eligibility Requirements:Interested candidates must submit an application and resume/CV online to be considered Must be 18 years of age or older Must be willing to submit to a background investigation; any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a background investigation Must have unrestricted work authorization to work in the United States.  For U.S. employment opportunities, Gallagher hires U.S. citizens, permanent residents, asylees, refugees, and temporary residents. Temporary residence does not include those with non-immigrant work authorization (F, J, H or L visas), such as students in practical training status. Exceptions to these requirements will be determined based on shortage of qualified candidates with a particular skill. Gallagher will require proof of work authorization Must be willing to execute Gallagher's Employee Agreement or Confidentiality and Non-Disclosure Agreement which requires, among other things, post-employment obligations relating to non-solicitation, confidentiality and non-disclosure Gallagher offers competitive salaries and benefits, including: medical/dental/vision plans, life and accident insurance, 401(K), employee stock purchase plan, educational expense reimbursement, employee assistance program, flexible work hours (availability varies by office and job function) training programs, matching gift program, and more.   Gallagher believes that all persons are entitled to equal employment opportunity and does not discriminate against nor favor any applicant because of race, color, religion, sex, age, veteran status, disability, national origin, or any other legally protected status.  Equal employment opportunity will be extended in all aspects of the employer-employee relationship, including, but not limited to, recruitment, hiring, training, promotion, transfer, demotion, compensation, benefits, layoff, and termination.  In addition, Gallagher will make reasonable accommodations to known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified applicant with a disability, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship on the operation of our business. ",Client Service Manager Job in Estes Park,Full Time Employee,"Estes Park, CO 80511",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/client-service-manager-job-estes-park-co-us-171617191.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=9,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,5fde046a46bf3c8a2ec0934222a9bfd4
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:03:40:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our client, a leading insurance company, is currently seeking a Workers' Compensation Claims Adjuster to handle Indemnity claims out of their Kansas City, KS office.Required Qualifications:3+ years of experience handling Workers' Compensation Claims from inception to closePrevious experience handling Wisconsin Indemnity ClaimsAbility to work in a team environmentExcellent communication skillsPreferred Qualifications:Bachelors DegreeAbout TheBestIRS:TheBestIRS, Insurance Recruiting Specialists, is the leading provider of insurance jobs in Kansas for Claims Adjusters concentrating in Workers’ Compensation, Property, Commercial Lines, Personal Lines and Catastrophe. TheBestIRS have been placing insurance professionals in direct hire, temporary and temp-to-hire opportunities with insurance carriers, self-insurance companies and third party administrators for nearly 2 decades and are adding new clients every day. Apply for one of our insurance jobs in KS and find out why TheBestIRS is the best choice for your insurance career.",Claims Adjuster - Workers Compensation Job in Kansas City,Full Time Employee,"Kansas City, KS 66101",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-adjuster-workers-compensation-job-kansas-city-ks-us-171913448.aspx?mescoid=1300071001001&jobPosition=7,"60,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,7ae66c8abf7abdaa90e23ad915207c6a
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:04:14:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Columbus ID  49743 Posted Date  10/15/2015 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and the ability to work in a team environment Excellent customer service Minimum 1½ years experience in the food service industry as a cook The ability to safely operate all kitchen equipment The ability to read and follow recipes Desired Qualifications: Serve Safe Certified High School Education or equivalent More than 3 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Cook-Columbus College of Art & Design Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/cook-columbus-college-of-art-design-job-columbus-oh-us-171817631.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=1,,Food Services/Hospitality,d36cd30ec48ba5c482f4d82bdfdb387a
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:04:15:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: The Sales Associate position is a key part-time position and will act as the point of contact for customers. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Stock merchandise adequately. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes; store merchandise in stock room or move directly to sales floor. Build merchandise displays. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves. Restock recovered merchandise. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Comply with company policies and procedures. Greet customers. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Assist with ordering merchandise using hand-held scanners, as needed. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays when necessary.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Effective interpersonal and oral communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. Knowledge of basic cash handling procedures. Basic mathematical skills. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",SALES ASSOCIATE Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-associate-job-columbus-oh-us-171880147.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),316b0d5d5495b5b45d5636f32c6cd66a
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:04:58:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE -The Transportation Supervisor will lead an hourly team and influence the entire distribution team to complete the work required to run the distribution center in an efficient, safe and productive manner. Supervisor will be responsible for management of the team members under his/her supervision. Role is responsible for ensuring prompt, efficient and accurate handling of merchandise and development and implementation of team goals. Role is responsible for hiring, evaluation, development, discipline, and termination of hourly associates. Supervisor has management responsibility for 20 top to 30 hourly associates. MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES -45% Managing Process: Executes transportation functions of the facility in according to budgetary cost goals, operating standards, and performance metrics. Manages dedicated fleet and one way carrier execution. Plans,executes store delivery routes. Partners with outbound operations to ensure load schedule is met. Responsible for yard management, customer service performance, including communication with stores. Analyzes service to store results, Voice of Customer results, and creates action plans to improve performance. Evaluates, analyzes current work methods to identify opportunities for efficiencies;partners with Operations Manager or AGM to drive solutions.25% Coaching /Developing Associates: Guides associates in daily operations, and monitors to ensure productivity, safety, service and quality. Trains and provides feedback of hourly associates; performs regular evaluations of associates regarding job performance, and methods of performing job tasks. Resolves associate relations issues in assigned functional area. Responsible for hiring, compensation, discipline and termination of hourly associates in assigned department. Investigates operational errors to determine the cause and recommends corrective action where needed.15% Drive Results: Manage execution of on time service to stores, trailer cube utilization and financial goals. Review daily, weekly, monthly, and quarterly metric reporting, including financial analysis, to identify actions needs on negative trends; works to improve positive trends. Ensure transportation projects and pilots are on track with project timelines and results.15% Business Planning: Coordinates and monitors transportation plan to ensure key performance metrics are consistent with business plan, including budget and on time delivery. Reviews reports and metrics to plan transportation needs. Additional Responsibilities: Other duties as assigned by Operations Manager, Assistant General Manager and General Manager.NATURE AND SCOPE -Reports to the Operations ManagerAccountable for direct supervision of the work activities of others. Planning, monitoring and reviewing work of subordinates is required. This may include direct supervision of a shift or the coordination of multiple work groups. Makes recommendations concerning selection, termination, performance appraisal and professional development.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS -Must be eighteen years of age.Must pass the Drug Test.Must pass the Background Check.Must pass pre-employment tests if applicable.EDUCATION REQUIRED -The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diplomas and/or GED.YEARS OF RELEVANT WORK EXPERIENCE - 2 PHYSICAL JOB REQUIREMENTS -Requires intermittent periods during which continuous physical exertion is required, such as walking, standing, stooping, climbing, lifting material or equipment, some of which may be heavy or awkward. Flexibility to work various shifts. Ability to relocate. PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS -Bachelor's Degree in Supply Chain or related field.Supply Chain Experience.Experience with Warehouse Management Systems, Transportation Management Systems.3 + years supervisory experience in a related field.Experience with managing a dedicated fleet.KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES AND COMPETENCIES -People Management: Assess skills and manage the work and productivity of others while coaching and developing talent.Financial Acumen: Utilize fundamental concepts of finance to assist with managing budgets, forecasting labor, and provide information to account for the financial impact of decision making.Creative Thinking: Demonstrates originality and imagination in thinking while developing a solution to a problem.Business Communication: Writes, speaks, and presents clearly and succinctly across a variety of communication settings and adjusts communication style to the audience.Conflict Management: Views conflict as an opportunity to find common ground and gain cooperation from all parties. Reads situations quickly, actively listens, and settles disagreements and disputes equitably.Operations Systems: Understands and uses systems and tools used for day to day operation of a facility. Navigates the various DC operations systems in order to retrieve data accurately and effectively. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Transportation Area Supervisor Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/transportation-area-supervisor-job-dallas-tx-us-171753919.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=15,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e45f7a51f794c6bb96c754eded3e57cb
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:04:58:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: The Sales Associate position is a key part-time position and will act as the point of contact for customers. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Stock merchandise adequately. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes; store merchandise in stock room or move directly to sales floor. Build merchandise displays. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves. Restock recovered merchandise. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Comply with company policies and procedures. Greet customers. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Assist with ordering merchandise using hand-held scanners, as needed. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays when necessary.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Effective interpersonal and oral communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. Knowledge of basic cash handling procedures. Basic mathematical skills. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",SALES ASSOCIATE Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-associate-job-columbus-oh-us-171884087.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),39c92cdfef669daa6029d61aa3f1f13d
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:05:05:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"var leftVal = (screen.width - 800) / 2; var topVal = (screen.height - 550) / 2; var winOpts = ""resizable=yes,scrollbars=yes,width=1000,height=550,left="" + leftVal + "",top="" + topVal; var winOpts2 = 'resizeable=yes,scrollbars=yes,width=500,height=600'; function popUp(pPage) { var popUpWin = window.open(pPage, 'popWin', winOpts); popUpWin.focus(); } function popUp2(pPage) { popUpWin = window.open(pPage, 'popWin', winOpts2); popUpWin.focus(); } var addthis_config = {""data_track_addressbar"":true}; Job Description About ACTIVE: ACTIVE Network® is the leading global marketplace for activities and events, connecting participants and activity organizers, while offering unparalleled business intelligence through our industry-leading data solutions and insights platform that helps organizers drive increased participation and revenue. ACTIVE Network annually processes nearly 100 million registrations and more than $3B in payments for over 42,000 organizers and 650,000 activities and events worldwide. Our enterprise-level ACTIVEWorks® platform offers organizers leading-edge SaaS technology that streamlines the administration of activities and events.  Our ACTIVE Network Activity Cloud™ platform combines data analytics and business intelligence tools to provide actionable insights that help organizers better manage their events and increase participation.  Founded in 1999, ACTIVE Network is headquartered in Dallas, Texas, with offices throughout North America, Europe, Asia and Australia.  For more information, please visit ACTIVEnetwork.com and follow us on Twitter.   Job Summary: We are looking for a Payroll Specialist, Supervisor that will ensure accurate processing and recording of company’s payroll, provide timely and accurate financial information, participate in daily data entry Payroll processing. This position will impact a rapidly growing organization and offers career development opportunities for the right candidate. Responsibilities: Perform daily payroll department operations Manage workflow to ensure all payroll transactions are processed accurately and timely Reconcile payroll prior to transmission and validate confirmed reports Understand proper taxation of employer paid benefits Process correct garnishment calculations and compliance Process accurate and timely year-end reporting when necessary (W-2, W-2c, etc) Develop ad hoc financial and operational reporting as needed Process manual check and relocation metric’s Respond to payroll related inquiries   Skills & Requirements Bachelor's Degree Required CPP preferred but not required. 4-6 years experience processing multi-state and International payroll. Working knowledge of payroll best practices. Strong knowledge of federal and state regulations. Strong PC skills including proficiency in Excel. Working knowledge of ADP. Strong work ethic and team player. High degree of professionalism. Ability to deal sensitively with confidential material Strong interpersonal (verbal and written) communication skills. Ability to communicate with various levels of management. Decision-making, problem-solving, and analytical skills. Organizational, multi-tasking, and prioritizing skills. ACTIVE Network Perks & Benefits Competitive Benefits State-of-the-art office space in Downtown Dallas including an indoor park, tavern, ACTIVE Tech Shop and more! On-site yoga classes, groups runs, Daily Dose workouts/training programs and Morning Milers through our ACTIVEx Corporate Wellness Program Hookups and discounts for races, events, tickets, activity gear, bike purchase program and more! Give back with our ACTIVEx Charity Challenge partnership benefitting Kids in the Game Active Network is an equal opportunity employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.   ",Payroll Supervisor Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-supervisor-job-dallas-tx-us-171838574.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e1f5f5c63a4fb9c30dba0c99c80031ab
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:05:11:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job This Fortune 500 client has been in the health care industry for over 180 years, delivering vital medicines, medical supplies and information technology solutions that touch the lives of patients in every health care setting. Old? Yes, but they remain at the forefront of technology and launch initiatives and solutions aimed at reshaping health care.  They are currently in need of an experienced SAP Project Manager. The SAP Project Manager will be responsible for managing end-to-end implementation of medium to large size SAP enhancement projects in SD / MM /FI and Non SAP areas in the ITSM delivery model. The PM will interact with Delivery (SCRUM) team and Solution Management to scope business requests into tasks for delivery (design, build & QA) teams, scheduled by the Release Management team.   The PM will interact with business customers to ensure the integrity of the customers’ project objective is maintained throughout the project, as well as to provide financial/ project status as well as scope control, risk/issue escalation, stakeholder engagement, project transition & closure.   Skill Set·        12+ years of overall SAP experience in a functional/technical/user role ·        Must have worked on 2 or more projects with HANA migration ·        3+ End-to-End SAP ERP Implementation projects with one or more core SAP modules, FI, CO, MM, PP, SD and PS·        10+ years of SAP Delivery/ Project Management experience in an on-shore/off-shore engagement model·        Must demonstrate action-oriented leadership when faced with a project roadblock·        Excellent communication and interpersonal skills required to be successful·        Must have good understanding of business processes, particularly financial shared services·        Must have excellent customer facing and soft skills, solution oriented, looking for win-win opportunities·        Must have experience in managing multiple initiatives·        Experience in integration with BW/BO/HANA is highly required·        Experience with ITSM delivery model is highly desirable·        Experience with Tier-1 consulting or SAP implementation partners is desirable·        Experience in Pharmaceutical or medical industry is desirable·        Experience with Clarity is desirable What’s in it for you?·        Competitive pay ·        Excellent facilities and great location ·        Great opportunity to enhance or solidify your skills with an excellent and experienced team with solid expertise in this area  Position logistics:·        Location: Carrollton, TX·        Contract: 6 Months About the Client:This client plays an integral role in health care and has a unique vision for its future. Their software, distribution, and business services play an essential role in order to address and overcome challenges faced today by health care organizations to help them run better and support better health.  About Maxonic:Since 2002 Maxonic has been at the forefront of connecting candidate strengths to client challenges.  Our award winning, dedicated team of recruiting professionals are specialized by technology, are great listeners, and will seek to find a position that meets the long term career needs of our candidates.  We take pride in the over 5,000 candidates that we have placed, and the repeat business that we earn from our satisfied clients. Interested in Applying?Send us your resume, ASAP!  Feel free to email Deepali ref JO: 12443 on (deepali@maxonic.com) or call 408-739-4900 x 120. Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","This Fortune 500 client has been in the health care industry for over 180 years, delivering vital medicines, medical supplies and information technology solutions that touch the lives of patients in every health care setting. Old? Yes, but they remain at the forefront of technology and launch initiatives and solutions aimed at reshaping health care.  They are currently in need of an experienced SAP Project Manager. The SAP Project Manager will be responsible for managing end-to-end implementation of medium to large size SAP enhancement projects in SD / MM /FI and Non SAP areas in the ITSM delivery model. The PM will interact with Delivery (SCRUM) team and Solution Management to scope business requests into tasks for delivery (design, build & QA) teams, scheduled by the Release Management team.   The PM will interact with business customers to ensure the integrity of the customers’ project objective is maintained throughout the project, as well as to provide financial/ project status as well as scope control, risk/issue escalation, stakeholder engagement, project transition & closure.   Skill Set·        12+ years of overall SAP experience in a functional/technical/user role ·        Must have worked on 2 or more projects with HANA migration ·        3+ End-to-End SAP ERP Implementation projects with one or more core SAP modules, FI, CO, MM, PP, SD and PS·        10+ years of SAP Delivery/ Project Management experience in an on-shore/off-shore engagement model·        Must demonstrate action-oriented leadership when faced with a project roadblock·        Excellent communication and interpersonal skills required to be successful·        Must have good understanding of business processes, particularly financial shared services·        Must have excellent customer facing and soft skills, solution oriented, looking for win-win opportunities·        Must have experience in managing multiple initiatives·        Experience in integration with BW/BO/HANA is highly required·        Experience with ITSM delivery model is highly desirable·        Experience with Tier-1 consulting or SAP implementation partners is desirable·        Experience in Pharmaceutical or medical industry is desirable·        Experience with Clarity is desirable What’s in it for you?·        Competitive pay ·        Excellent facilities and great location ·        Great opportunity to enhance or solidify your skills with an excellent and experienced team with solid expertise in this area  Position logistics:·        Location: Carrollton, TX·        Contract: 6 Months About the Client:This client plays an integral role in health care and has a unique vision for its future. Their software, distribution, and business services play an essential role in order to address and overcome challenges faced today by health care organizations to help them run better and support better health.  About Maxonic:Since 2002 Maxonic has been at the forefront of connecting candidate strengths to client challenges.  Our award winning, dedicated team of recruiting professionals are specialized by technology, are great listeners, and will seek to find a position that meets the long term career needs of our candidates.  We take pride in the over 5,000 candidates that we have placed, and the repeat business that we earn from our satisfied clients. Interested in Applying?Send us your resume, ASAP!  Feel free to email Deepali ref JO: 12443 on (deepali@maxonic.com) or call 408-739-4900 x 120.",,http://jobview.monster.com/sap-project-manager-hana-2-0-12443-job-carrollton-tx-us-171544031.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=10,,,cfcd2f404ddf4c314dbc47d94ab81981
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:05:19:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:With a role as a Counter Manager in the Macy's Cosmetics Department, you will be responsible for supervising the complete operations of a cosmetics line, including developing a team of highly productive Beauty Advisors. Additionally, you will make one-on-one connections with customers to learn their sense of beauty and style, develop your artistic side through customer consultation and make-up and product application, and attain a sense of accomplishment when your skills combine with your passion for beauty to reach personal and team sales goals. Performs other duties as assigned.The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here.Essential Functions:- Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaboration- Recruit, train, coach, motivate and develop new and incumbent associates on company policies and procedures, product knowledge, and personal/department productivity goals- Alert Sales Manager of needs and concerns of the business and staff- Communicate regularly with vendors, planners, distributors, and buyers regarding stock needs, customer preferences, and special events- Develop and implement business-driving events and ensure proper execution to achieve counter productivity goals- Review and analyze business performance of daily, weekly, monthly, seasonal, and annual sales results- Regular, dependable attendance & punctualityQualifications:Education/Experience:- High school diploma or equivalent.- A minimum of one year of previous selling experience required, preferably in Cosmetics.- Previous supervisory experience preferredCommunication Skills:- Ability to read, write, and interpret general business reports and labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products.- Ability to effectively communicate with and present information to customers, vendors, buyers, peers, and all levels of managementMathematical Skills:- Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division.- Able to use a calculator and calculate percentages and ratios.- Must be able to make change in American monetary unitsOther Skills:- Superior organizational and time management skills.- Must be able to build relationships and influence others.- Ability to set and achieve goals. Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment.- Must posses a strong sense of urgency and a thirst for knowledge.- Must be able to lead by exampleWork Hours:- Ability to work a flexible schedule including days, nights, weekends, holidays, and sales events, based on department and store/company needsThis job description is not all inclusive. Macy's Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",**Retail Cosmetics Sales - Counter Manager Estee Lauder** Full Time: Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-cosmetics-sales-counter-manager-estee-lauder-full-time-columbus-oh-macy%E2%80%99s-polaris-fa-job-columbus-oh-us-171454725.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,720917acfdf73b78d916d90d98ee9f79
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:05:51:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: Supervise store employees. Assist with efficient management of inventory and effective presentation of merchandise. Ensure a safe working environment while providing for the protection of company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Open the store a minimum of two days per week; close the store a minimum of two days per week. Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; deposit money in bank. Assist in ensuring the financial integrity of the store through strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Manage store in Store Manager's absence. Assist Store Manager, as directed, with scheduling employees; enter payroll information into computer. Assist Store Manager, as directed, in providing adequate training for employees. Review operating statements to identify business trends (including sales, profitability, and turn), expense control opportunities, potential shrink, and errors. Order drop-shipments and other areas of store as designated by store manager. Follow prescribed ordering practices to ensure the meeting or exceeding of in-stock targets; review ordering plan, seasonal direction and inventory management issues on a weekly basis. Assist with the efficient staging, stocking and storage of merchandise; unload trucks. Ensure that merchandise is presented according to established practices and Store Manager direction; utilize merchandise fixtures properly including presentation, product pricing and signage. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist in maintaining accurate inventory levels by controlling damages, markdowns, scanning, paperwork, and facility controls. Conduct safety meetings; help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Assist Store Manager in ensuring employee compliance Complete all paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to read and interpret documents such as diagrams, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedures manuals. Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to learn and perform IBM cash register functions to generate reports. Knowledge of inventory management and merchandising practices. Effective oral and written communication skills. Effective interpersonal skills. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices (deposits, store keys, SAFE program, etc.) Good organization skills with attention to detail. Ability to solve problems and deal with a variety of situations where limited standardization exists. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent strongly preferred. One year of experience in a retail environment and six months supervisory experience preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",ASST STORE MGR Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/asst-store-mgr-job-columbus-oh-us-171714514.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8d90b3f3cf45911eb92f80df8f10e83f
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:06:06:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Real Estate Attorney (Jobs) - Dallas, TX  Special Counsel needs experienced real estate attorneys in the Dallas/Fort Worth area.  We are looking for attorneys that are able to work on a contractual basis.   Exceptional candidates should have experience with leasing issues as well as title and survey review. Requirements • Real Estate Attorney to review title for pending transactions • Licensed and good standing (eligible to practice)• At least 3-5 years' recent experience working in real estate, closings, title, survey, and leases. • Experience preparing objections to title.  Duties• Review title and survey for pending transactions• Write, and prepare objections on issues.• Work with counsel on entity formation documentation and filings. If you would like to apply for or learn more about our Real Estate Attorney position, please email your resume to dallas@specialcounsel.com  or contact the Special Counsel Dallas, TX office via our website www.specialcounsel.com . Follow us on Facebook at https://www.facebook.com/SpecialCounselDallas and Twitter @Discov_Projects  . Equal Opportunity Employer/ Minorities/ Women/ Veterans/ Disabled ",Real Estate Attorney Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/real-estate-attorney-job-dallas-tx-us-171090136.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=14,,Legal,1a96fb577dde361ae6b43b60110042fa
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:06:49:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We have the below CLOUD Architect with our client in Plano, TX! Location: Plano, TXStart Date: Sep 1Duration: 2-6 MonthsRate: $ 65/Hr Basic:•      At least 8-10 years of overall technical architecture experience in defining high security, high availability solutions.•      Experience of designing and delivering secure cloud solutions on Azure or AWS with extensive knowledge about various cloud services.•      Hands-on experience in designing deployment strategies for cloud/virtualization and implementation best practices.•      Experience of designing solutions using SaaS, PaaS•      AWS or Azure Cloud Architect certification. Preferred:•      Experience in doing comparative study between various technology options through market research, competitive analysis, pricing, in alignment with the project requirements.•      Experience in agile development•      Excellent Analytical, interpersonal and Communication skills •      Talent management and thought leadership Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","We have the below CLOUD Architect with our client in Plano, TX! Location: Plano, TXStart Date: Sep 1Duration: 2-6 MonthsRate: $ 65/Hr Basic:•      At least 8-10 years of overall technical architecture experience in defining high security, high availability solutions.•      Experience of designing and delivering secure cloud solutions on Azure or AWS with extensive knowledge about various cloud services.•      Hands-on experience in designing deployment strategies for cloud/virtualization and implementation best practices.•      Experience of designing solutions using SaaS, PaaS•      AWS or Azure Cloud Architect certification. Preferred:•      Experience in doing comparative study between various technology options through market research, competitive analysis, pricing, in alignment with the project requirements.•      Experience in agile development•      Excellent Analytical, interpersonal and Communication skills •      Talent management and thought leadership",All,http://jobview.monster.com/cloud-architect-azure-or-aws-saas-paas-position-with-our-client-in-plano-tx-!-job-plano-tx-us-169954046.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=13,,,0d1b6ff0242085784f54c9a2cb6654bc
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:07:01:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Overview:The Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Detective's primary responsibility is to prevent the loss of company property while maintaining a safe business environment. Support store's efforts in providing the best customer service within a controlled environment so as to ensure maximum sales at the highest profit rate attainable. Under general supervision and established procedures, the Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Detective detects and apprehends shoplifters and dishonest employees.Essential Functions:- Respond to customer and associate incidents to facilitate first aid and minimize company liability- Recover stolen merchandise and apprehend shoplifters and other people who commit fraud or other criminal acts against the company- Investigate criminal violations against the person or property of any customer or associate that is committed on company premises- Prepare prompt and complete reports relative to all theft incidents, merchandise recoveries, accident investigations, audits, and other activities as assigned by the Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Manager- Have knowledge of and maintain strict compliance with the law and company policies concerning apprehensions, searches and seizures, and the preservation of evidence- Promote shortage awareness and theft deterrence among associates by conducting meetings and participating in training events- Successfully complete all Asset Protection / Loss Prevention training requirements including CPR and First Aid and maintain personal certifications as required by law- Conduct audits to ensure sales department compliance to merchandise exposure standards and asset protection policies- Testify in court concerning any case, criminal or civil, wherein the company is a party of interest to which the Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Detective is summoned- Works on special assignments, investigations, and surveillance as directed by Store Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Manager- Responds to alarm conditions at assigned store- Perform other duties as necessary- Follow shortage programs and procedures- Perform these functions in an efficient manner, as directed by the Supervisor- Regular, dependable attendance and punctualityQualifications:- Education/Experience: High School Diploma or equivalent. Some college is desirable. Completion of Store Detective Training program required upon assignment to position.- Communication Skills: Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.- Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator.- Reasoning Ability: Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.- Physical Demands: This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.- Other skills: Must be able to operate cameras and other surveillance equipment. Ability to think and act clearly in possible stressful and hostile situations. Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.- Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays.This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",**Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Detective** Part Time: Columbus,Part Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/asset-protection-loss-prevention-detective-part-time-columbus-oh-macy%E2%80%99s-polaris-fashion-pla-job-columbus-oh-us-171690404.aspx?mescoid=3300600001001&jobPosition=5,,Security/Protective Services,2a54dc0b35f5d4046c0cfff09d2b978a
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:07:02:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Overview:The Seasonal Retail Merchandising Associate is responsible for providing a great shopping experience, and driving sales and profit through customer service, proper merchandising on the sales floor and accurate merchandise movement throughout the building. Duties include placement of new receipts and floor moves, stockroom organization and replenishment, fulfillment, reverse logistics, RFID, POS transactions and other duties as needed.Essential Functions:- Provide an exceptional customer shopping experience by ensuring both the in store and online customer are always the #1 priority- Service the customer in a helpful and friendly manner including POS transactions, credit and Plenti enrollment, and helping her to find what she is looking for- Collaborate with Managers, Leads and Associates throughout the store to deliver a clean, neat and easy-to-shop store environment; maintain sales floor and fitting room recovery standards to include checking fitting room stalls, sorting merchandise and ensuring merchandise is worked back to sales floor immediately as time permits- Support Omni Channel initiatives- Perform all functions in an efficient manner; flex between tasks as directed by Supervisor- Participate in the physical inventory process and ensure that shortage prevention initiatives are executed- Adhere to Asset Protection and inventory control and compliance procedures- Regular, dependable attendance and punctuality- Collaborate with peers to coordinate merchandise movement needs with other tasks (floor moves, seasonal sets, fixture needs, etc.)- Execute merchandising, fulfillment, RFID and reverse logistics tasks timely and accurately to include placement of merchandise to standards (zone-o-gram, directives, fixtures, ADA compliance and visual guidelines), movement of fixtures and merchandise for seasonal sets, stockroom maintenance and organization, replenishment to the sales floor, collection and transport of picked fulfillment orders to appropriate processing areas; preparing and returning BOPS/SDD orders; RFID tag up events, cycle counts, display audits and tagging standards; processing and packing of damages, non-congruent transfers, store initiated transfers, return to vendor and mark out of stock merchandise- Assist in other tasks as needed (pricing, signing)Qualifications:Education/Experience:- No specific educational accomplishments are necessary.Communication Skills:- Excellent written and verbal communication skills.- Ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.Mathematical Skills:- Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division.- Able to use a calculator.Reasoning Ability:- Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.Physical Demands:- This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other Skills:- Possess strong merchandising skills.- Possess vision and creativity.- Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team.- Must possess a strong sense of urgency.- Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.Work Hours:- Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays, based on department and store/company needs.This job description is not all inclusive. Macy's Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",Macy's **Seasonal Holiday Retail Merchandising** Part Time: Polaris Fashion Place Job in Columbus,Part Time Seasonal,"Columbus, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/macy's-seasonal-holiday-retail-merchandising-part-time-polaris-fashion-place-job-columbus-oh-us-171803276.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=2,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,db39b23472c4a64e0ec4a4ddc1f75129
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:07:50:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities    DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:  Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.   Qualifications  KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-FT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-ft-job-columbus-oh-us-171688232.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2e2dfee6dfd69d8c780e4d61dc1b4ff9
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:08:20:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities       DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.     Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-PT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-pt-job-columbus-oh-us-171689485.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8c2e36c19f48c17ceb9e720de1395f12
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:08:21:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: The Sales Associate position is a key part-time position and will act as the point of contact for customers. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Stock merchandise adequately. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes; store merchandise in stock room or move directly to sales floor. Build merchandise displays. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves. Restock recovered merchandise. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Comply with company policies and procedures. Greet customers. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Assist with ordering merchandise using hand-held scanners, as needed. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays when necessary.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Effective interpersonal and oral communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. Knowledge of basic cash handling procedures. Basic mathematical skills. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",SALES ASSOCIATE Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-associate-job-columbus-oh-us-171887806.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),743e5c7f56d7a3b089512c2acac2058c
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:09:21:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: The Sales Associate position is a key part-time position and will act as the point of contact for customers. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Stock merchandise adequately. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes; store merchandise in stock room or move directly to sales floor. Build merchandise displays. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves. Restock recovered merchandise. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Comply with company policies and procedures. Greet customers. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Assist with ordering merchandise using hand-held scanners, as needed. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays when necessary.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Effective interpersonal and oral communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. Knowledge of basic cash handling procedures. Basic mathematical skills. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",SALES ASSOCIATE Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-associate-job-columbus-oh-us-171708537.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bd44698443168e94cfad29d9d8b43fd8
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:09:22:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  690763Title: Security/Infrastructure Project ManagerLocation: Columbus, OHLength: 6 months open endedApex Systems is currently seeking a Project Managers for 6 months open ended contract in Columbus, OH.Roles & Responsibilities:- Ability to manage both large (10,000+ hours) and smaller projects- Manages all project communication and reporting- Coordinates efforts across multiple IT and Line of Business organizations- Establishes and maintains project schedules and reports progress against the schedules- Manages all project issues and risks- Facilitates project meetings and associated logistics (scheduling, agendas, minutes, action items)- Assigns tasks and performs follow-up with project team members- Facilitates the review and approval of all project deliverablesRequirements:- 7+ years of Project Management experience. Background must include leading a full project from scoping through implementation to support.- In depth experience managing multiple projects within an application development technology environment- Leadership and relationship building skills- PMP certification is preferred, but not required.- Previous experience with Clarity or PPM will be a huge plus.- Banking/Financial experience is ideal- Infrastructure/security background is required- Proven ability to manage multiple projects at one time.- Any background in development is highly preferred.If you are interested in applying please contact Brittany Mullen: Bmullen@apexsystemsinc.com 614-467-4200EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Project Manager Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  690763Title: Security/Infrastructure Project ManagerLocation: Columbus, OHLength: 6 months open endedApex Systems is currently seeking a Project Managers for 6 months open ended contract in Columbus, OH.Roles & Responsibilities:- Ability to manage both large (10,000+ hours) and smaller projects- Manages all project communication and reporting- Coordinates efforts across multiple IT and Line of Business organizations- Establishes and maintains project schedules and reports progress against the schedules- Manages all project issues and risks- Facilitates project meetings and associated logistics (scheduling, agendas, minutes, action items)- Assigns tasks and performs follow-up with project team members- Facilitates the review and approval of all project deliverablesRequirements:- 7+ years of Project Management experience. Background must include leading a full project from scoping through implementation to support.- In depth experience managing multiple projects within an application development technology environment- Leadership and relationship building skills- PMP certification is preferred, but not required.- Previous experience with Clarity or PPM will be a huge plus.- Banking/Financial experience is ideal- Infrastructure/security background is required- Proven ability to manage multiple projects at one time.- Any background in development is highly preferred.If you are interested in applying please contact Brittany Mullen: Bmullen@apexsystemsinc.com 614-467-4200EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-columbus-oh-us-171813794.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),74a4e44e42a53dd99c10df0504fe1634
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:10:16:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Participate as a technical expert in design, development, testing, and debugging new system modules or enhancements to existing applicationAnalyze problems and provides recommendations for application improvementsHelp design and develop solutions to solve problems considering software/hardware capacity and limitations, operating time and desired resultsWork with infrastructure and peers to determine implementation details for enhancements and applicationsPartner with business to come up with application/solution designsWork with a team to create project estimates based on business requirementsExpected to provide a work breakdown of projects and enhancementsExpected to participate in complete project lifecycle up to and including project implementation and work well within a team environmentProvide technical guidance as needed in the requirements, planning, modeling, development, deployment and support of the systemEstablish and maintain working relationships with internal business customers, internal IT support groups and vendors to achieve project goalsRequirements- ·         Extensive experience in HTML5, ES5, Javascript, CSS3, JQuery, Angular JS, JSON, Bootstrap·         Proficient understanding of client-side scripting and JavaScript frameworks, including jQuery·         A proven track record  of UI Skills along with RWD and adaptive design.·         Experience in application development, including analyzing stories, writing code, contributing to release and developing the working practices of the team·         Knowledge of HTML development/technologies.·         Experience of Agile team working and globally deployed applications working across a Wide Area Network·         Proficient understanding of cross-browser compatibility issues and ways to work around them.·         (Nice to have) Knowledge and implementation experience in Siebel Open UI enabled applications.",Sr. UI Developer Job in Fort Worth,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Fort Worth, TX 76155",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-ui-developer-job-fort-worth-tx-us-171910287.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,13bdef478a4f17cf1e372fa2690d9473
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:10:17:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: Supervise store employees. Assist with efficient management of inventory and effective presentation of merchandise. Ensure a safe working environment while providing for the protection of company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Open the store a minimum of two days per week; close the store a minimum of two days per week. Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; deposit money in bank. Assist in ensuring the financial integrity of the store through strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Manage store in Store Manager's absence. Assist Store Manager, as directed, with scheduling employees; enter payroll information into computer. Assist Store Manager, as directed, in providing adequate training for employees. Review operating statements to identify business trends (including sales, profitability, and turn), expense control opportunities, potential shrink, and errors. Order drop-shipments and other areas of store as designated by store manager. Follow prescribed ordering practices to ensure the meeting or exceeding of in-stock targets; review ordering plan, seasonal direction and inventory management issues on a weekly basis. Assist with the efficient staging, stocking and storage of merchandise; unload trucks. Ensure that merchandise is presented according to established practices and Store Manager direction; utilize merchandise fixtures properly including presentation, product pricing and signage. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist in maintaining accurate inventory levels by controlling damages, markdowns, scanning, paperwork, and facility controls. Conduct safety meetings; help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Assist Store Manager in ensuring employee compliance Complete all paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to read and interpret documents such as diagrams, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedures manuals. Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to learn and perform IBM cash register functions to generate reports. Knowledge of inventory management and merchandising practices. Effective oral and written communication skills. Effective interpersonal skills. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices (deposits, store keys, SAFE program, etc.) Good organization skills with attention to detail. Ability to solve problems and deal with a variety of situations where limited standardization exists. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent strongly preferred. One year of experience in a retail environment and six months supervisory experience preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",ASST STORE MGR Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/asst-store-mgr-job-columbus-oh-us-171719967.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cdbb9fcc4af284860b9261fef650010e
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:10:45:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Foreclosure Specialist professionals, let Workway help you to grow your career by connecting you with some of the nation’s leading organizations. We are a professional specialty staffing firm, working with top companies across the country to place exceptional candidates. We work with national clients across a variety of market sectors and we have great assignments for Foreclosure professionals. Let one of our recruiters assist you in finding and preparing for interviews with our clients. Whether you are interested in a direct hire, temp-to-hire or temporary position, Workway can help you to put your best foot forward. Contact us today! Job Responsibilities The Foreclosure Specialist handles and maintains portfolios or matters as assigned while mitigating loss and legal risk for the Company’s clients by accurately managing the foreclosure process.Your specific duties in this role will include: Proof data entered against source documents to ensure accuracy in processing and clearance for Notice of Sale postingInterface with appropriate contacts to resolve questions, inconsistencies, or missing dataReview and interpret all documents including recorded Deed of Trusts, Property Title, dockets, pleadings, etc.Responsible for all functions involved in ordering, receiving, analyzing, and processing of title for conventional and home equity liensIdentify title issues including, but not limited to IRS, junior liens, deceased borrower(s), and Home Owner's Association duesEnsure the required notices and motions are prepared, received, audited, mailed and/or recorded in accordance with client, company, investor and, state and government agency guidelinesRespond to routine inquiries from clients, debtors and debtors’ attorneys, vendors, and staff regarding internal and external processesCalculation of figures relating to borrower request and reinstatement inquiries and bidding for saleOwnership of processes and procedures relating to sale calendar timing of eventsAnalysis of close/hold/restart/resumption of casesReceipt, review and response to external inquiries via phone, email, mail and faxUpdate client systems with documents or message detail per client work standardsAssess actions to correct internal procedural problems related to client system updatesPromptly determine when attorney action is requiredPerform other duties as assignedJob Requirements Excellent oral and written communication skills with ability to communicate at all levelsStrong organizational and time management skillsAbility to manage priorities and workflow in a high-volume production environmentDemonstrates initiative in coordination of eventsMinimum of 1-3 years of Foreclosure and/or Mortgage Servicing Experience Benefits As a Foreclosure Specialist with Workway, you will be working through an established staffing agency with the networking power of a national organization and the personalized family feel of a smaller firm. You will be assigned a dedicated recruiter who will provide you with assistance in crafting an effective resume, preparing for interviews and searching for jobs outside of our organization. Employment with Workway, Inc. also comes with some exciting benefits:  medical coverage, life insurance (with medical plan enrollment), direct deposit, weekly pay, and paid sick time (CA employees only).  Further details regarding these benefits can be provided by your recruiter.Let Workway help you to build a better career!Apply Now!",Foreclosure Specialist Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75254",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/foreclosure-specialist-job-dallas-tx-us-171616826.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=13,15.00 - 18.00 $ /year,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,51248db0eb152b5f0986b01e9bfb2920
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:12:14:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Front End DeveloperLocation: Irving, TXDuration: 9 months+Compensation: $55.00 - $70.00 per hourWork Requirements: US Citizen, GC Holders or Authorized to Work in theUS Overview: TekPartners offers the most soughtafter Information Technology positions with some of the most well-knowncompanies in the world. Our client is a global organization that is oneof today's most trusted, well known brands in the security industry. They servemore than six million customers, making them the largest company of their kindin both the U.S. and Canada.  Responsibilities Develop new user-facing features Build reusable code and libraries for future use Ensure the technical feasibility of UI/UX designs Optimize application for maximum speed and scalability Assure that all user input is validated before submitting to back-end Collaborate with other team members and stakeholders Requirements: Education: Four (4) year degree Experience: 3 - 5 yrs RequiredTechnical Skills: Proficient understanding of HTML5/CSS3 Basic understanding of server-side CSS pre-processing platforms, such as LESS and SASS Proficient understanding of client-side scripting and JavaScript frameworks, including jQuery AJAX/RESTful services MV* Frameworks such as Angular.js or Knockout.js Experience building single-page applications AdditionalTechnical Skills: Knockout JS Coffee Script Object oriented Javascript Experience with Java/J2EE Our benefits package includes:  Comprehensive Medical Benefit  Competitive Pay 401K Retirement Plan And Much More About TekPartners: TekPartners is one of the fastestgrowing private staffing firms in the United States. We are a premier providerof highly qualified IT talent, Workforce Solutions and Business IntelligenceSolutions to many enterprise organizations across the nation. As experts in theindustry, our team continues to match proven talent to the right jobopportunity every day. TekPartners is an Equal OpportunityEmployer. ",Front End Developer Job in Irving,Full Time,"Irving, TX 75014",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/front-end-developer-job-irving-tx-us-171551665.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=18,,IT/Software Development,f3371b24fd4172f6cccaf4ce96fe94b8
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:12:24:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"At AT&T, our job is to deliver the future before anyone else. We do this with people. People who want to create and deliver new technology that can transform the lives of our customers, our communities and our society. Our professionals innovate every day, whether they are working on upgrading our wireless and broadband infrastructure or delivering new possibilities for our consumer and business customers. They make the impossible, possible. The TDP-Network Operations program is a development program that provides the opportunity for participants to collaborate with project teams while gaining broad experience across the AT&T Network Operations organization. This program will allow you to gain the professional development and peer/leadership support that will help you jump start your career with AT&T. Being part of this program will help you build your technical, problem-solving, communication, and analytical skills to achieve real impact at a much earlier stage than many of your peers. It will also give you the ability to have plenty of networking opportunities that include key executive leadership sessions, business area and industry overview presentations, volunteer and social activities and Individual team member responsibilities. After the initial training, you will continue to showcase your skills on a variety of technical platforms, disciplines and strategic project areas and support key strategic initiatives across Network Operations. Specifically, as a Manager OSP Planning & Engrg Design, your primary responsibilities will be for planning, design and analysis of the outside plant facilities/network in an individual contributor role. Candidate will perform detailed design for all required feeder facility relief Central Office transfers, major undertakings and or routine activities after closely coordinating with the Planning Group. Willing to learn loop electronics engr/coordination and transmission equipment. Candidate should have a good understanding of Outside plant telecommunications engineering and good communication skills. Analysis/Problem solving skills with a desire to learn. AT&T will not sponsor applicants for work visas of any kind for this positionQualify on an Engineering Selection Module (ESM) aptitude test or hold 4 year Engineering Degree. Experience with computer aided design CAD. Strong experience with Mircosoft office applications. AT&T will not sponsor applicants for work visas of any kind for this position",Mgr OSP Plng & Engrg Design+ TDP Network Operations Job in Plano,,"Plano, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/mgr-osp-plng-engrg-design-tdp-network-operations-job-plano-tx-us-171904239.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=4,,,79d823d4435ffaabf357b52a1c0f181a
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:12:24:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Direct Placement is searching for an Electrical Maintenance and Controls Engineering Manager for a Fortune 500 Manufacturing company in Columbus, OH area. The successful candidate will have experience with electrical maintenance and programming controls.MUST HAVEA minimum of 3 years of Maintenance Management experience in a manufacturing environment Undergraduate degree Electrical Engineering or Related fieldMUST HAVE Experience with:-  Electrical Reliability Maintenance. -  Supervising employees in a union -  Predictive maintenance -  CMMS (SAP Preferred)-  Root Cause Analysis-  Process Improvements Programs RESPONSIBILITIES-  Lead maintenance and operations teams-  Plan for maintenance needs and perform equipment analysis -  Root Cause procedures analysis-  Maintain predictive maintenance programs-  Supervise maintenance employees -  Supervise outside contractors-  Manage capital projects and plant improvements -  Auditing and delineate daily work schedules -  Maintain Inventory in SAP -  Plan for and implement process improvements-  Utilize Six Sigma methodologies  -  Utilize predictive maintenance tools to improve overall equipment reliability EducationUndergraduate degree Electrical Engineering or Related field",Electrical Controls and Maintenance Manager Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/electrical-controls-maintenance-manager-job-columbus-oh-us-171751278.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=14,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,2fd9abaebb54ce42c973826a15076930
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:12:24:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: Supervise store employees. Assist with efficient management of inventory and effective presentation of merchandise. Ensure a safe working environment while providing for the protection of company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Open the store a minimum of two days per week; close the store a minimum of two days per week. Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; deposit money in bank. Assist in ensuring the financial integrity of the store through strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Manage store in Store Manager's absence. Assist Store Manager, as directed, with scheduling employees; enter payroll information into computer. Assist Store Manager, as directed, in providing adequate training for employees. Review operating statements to identify business trends (including sales, profitability, and turn), expense control opportunities, potential shrink, and errors. Order drop-shipments and other areas of store as designated by store manager. Follow prescribed ordering practices to ensure the meeting or exceeding of in-stock targets; review ordering plan, seasonal direction and inventory management issues on a weekly basis. Assist with the efficient staging, stocking and storage of merchandise; unload trucks. Ensure that merchandise is presented according to established practices and Store Manager direction; utilize merchandise fixtures properly including presentation, product pricing and signage. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist in maintaining accurate inventory levels by controlling damages, markdowns, scanning, paperwork, and facility controls. Conduct safety meetings; help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Assist Store Manager in ensuring employee compliance Complete all paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to read and interpret documents such as diagrams, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedures manuals. Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to learn and perform IBM cash register functions to generate reports. Knowledge of inventory management and merchandising practices. Effective oral and written communication skills. Effective interpersonal skills. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices (deposits, store keys, SAFE program, etc.) Good organization skills with attention to detail. Ability to solve problems and deal with a variety of situations where limited standardization exists. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent strongly preferred. One year of experience in a retail environment and six months supervisory experience preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",ASST STORE MGR Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/asst-store-mgr-job-columbus-oh-us-171519433.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),01e9a4ce3fa6408db90678db0773d938
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:12:37:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T: So Much More of What You Work For Looking for an opportunity where you can put your energy and enthusiasm to work to create unlimited earning potential? Of course you are. How about a chance to learn, grow and advance with the number one wireless company in America? Even better. We're AT&T, and the only thing we enjoy more than pioneering and selling the latest devices is helping people make the most of them. Our retail opportunities are among the best, offering you great pay, strong benefits, advancement potential and a work environment full of fast-paced fun. Opportunity, Security and Great People Find out what it's like to work in an industry that's not about to slow down- with a company that has a legacy of successful innovation. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $47,175.00 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $55,521 per year. Add a full benefits package, including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), tuition reimbursement, paid time off, work/life resources and discounts on AT&T products and services Round out your experience with training on the latest technologies and devices today, tomorrow and for as long as you work with us As you learn and succeed, you'll be eligible for new opportunities and financial rewards And every day, you'll work in a fast-paced environment with customers and colleagues that appreciate your energy and assistance JOB DESCRIPTION Develop and attain customer experience and sales objectives for store. Sell all products and services offered by the Company. Meet all sales objectives. Handle all administrative aspects of the sale including: completing customer contracts and warranties, pulling products from inventory, accepting customer payments and filing the completed orders. Maintain strong knowledge of all products, accessories, pricing plans, promotions and service features. Maintain knowledge of competitive offers and provide critical market feedback to the Store Manager regarding local competition and product/service needs. Handle service inquiries from customers. Provide efficient, courteous customer service and assist in all aspects of product offerings and services. Ensure an extraordinary customer experience. Position may be commissioned and quota based.With this position you need the flexibility to potentially work one of the stores within 15 miles as the needs of the business dictate (Lewis Center, Polaris Town, Polaris Fashion Place Mall). GENERAL DUTIES The essential functions listed below are representative of duties performed by this job title. Duties generally include but are not limited to the following: GENERAL ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS WHICH ARE NORMALLY REQUIRED: Possess a competitive spirit and desire to meet and exceed sales goals Stay up-to-date on the latest data/entertainment technology and devices, such as Wi-Fi, data devices, TV entertainment tools Understand customers' needs and help them discover how our products meet those needs Multi-task in a fast paced team environment Educate and engage customers through product demonstrations Interact with customers and provide prompt and courteous customer service to all customers The successful candidate will be able to perform the following with or without reasonable accommodation: Ability to work flexible hours, including evenings, weekends and holidays Ability to stand for long periods of time Ability to complete all paperwork completely, accurately, in a timely manner Ability to lift up to 25 pounds Ability to operate a personal computer, wireless equipment, copier and fax Ability to work in other locations as the needs of the business dictate may be required. Complete all aspects of opening and closing the store in accordance with written procedures. Submit all transaction journals on a daily basis. Assists with inventory maintenance May be required to wear a uniform Desired Qualifications: 1-3 years retail/customer facing/sales experience preferred. Retail Sales Consultants are paid a competitive hourly rate and can earn additional monthly commission dollars by meeting and/or exceeding sales objectives! Provisions listed in these job descriptions may be changed or modified by AT&T Mobility without prior notice at any time, at the Company's sole discretion.",Retail Sales Consultant Columbus OH (Columbus North) Job in Lewis Center,,"Lewis Center, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-columbus-oh-columbus-north-job-lewis-center-oh-us-171909005.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=15,,,39ceb39f21f4e7d2842b46f3ab54fced
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:13:00:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title District Service Manager - UniFirst Location: This field is mandatory MESQUITE, TX 75149 US (Primary) Category Service Management Education High School Job Type Full-time Career Level Manager Shift Type First Shift Job Description Where will a UniFirst Career take you? As an industry leader in the rental, lease and sale of uniforms and facility services products, UniFirst Corporation has grown to become one of the largest companies in the garment services industry. UniFirst is recognized on the Forbes “Platinum 400 - Best Big Companies” List. With over 11,000 employee Team Partners and more than 220 facilities throughout the United States, Canada, Mexico and Europe, you are never just a number when you work for UniFirst. What sets us apart from all other companies is that we still function as a family run business. When you work for UniFirst, you’re family! UniFirst Corporation has a strong history of promoting from within. In fact, most of UniFirst's Senior Managers have come from within the Company. Opportunities are endless for those individuals who possess a strong work ethic, a commitment to quality, and above all else, a passion for delivering quality customer service, both internally and externally. Our culture is what makes UniFirst an organization that stands out from the rest. Are you interested in loving your job? Find out just how far a career with UniFirst can take you. We are in need of a DISTRICT SERVICE MANAGER to manage our existing customers and expand our route volume. The District Service Manager should have previous experience in a route-oriented industry and be totally committed to superior customer service. We are looking for energetic individuals with the desire to grow within a great organization. The ideal candidate will be customer oriented, able to lead by example, a strong team player, and have excellent verbal and communication skills. UniFirst offers a Fleet of Benefits, 50+ to be exact! · 401K with Company Match · Profit Sharing · Health Insurance · Employee Assistance Program · Life Insurance · Supplemental Life Insurance · Long Term Disability · Vacation · Sick Time · Paid Holidays · Direct Payroll Deposit · Tuition Reimbursement · 30% Employee Discount · Employee Referral Program Job Requirements College or equivalent experience Valid drivers license Prior customer service experience Data Entry Microsoft office (word, excel, power-point)   UniFirst Corporation is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer   M-F-Disability-Vet",District Service Manager - UniFirst Job in Mesquite,"Full Time, Employee","Mesquite, TX 75149",,http://jobview.monster.com/district-service-manager-unifirst-job-mesquite-tx-us-171357289.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),285eb201e1e1d17a91abe0a2627658bc
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:13:30:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: The Sales Associate position is a key part-time position and will act as the point of contact for customers. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Stock merchandise adequately. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes; store merchandise in stock room or move directly to sales floor. Build merchandise displays. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves. Restock recovered merchandise. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Comply with company policies and procedures. Greet customers. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Assist with ordering merchandise using hand-held scanners, as needed. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays when necessary.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Effective interpersonal and oral communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. Knowledge of basic cash handling procedures. Basic mathematical skills. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",SALES ASSOCIATE Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-associate-job-columbus-oh-us-171714519.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e771305daa90d8b337ebb26130735aa1
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:14:27:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  681943Job Title: ERP ETL DeveloperLength: 2+ year contractLocation: Columbus, OhioApex Systems, the nation’s largest publicly traded IT Staffing organization, has an immediate and high profile opportunity for an ERP ETL Developer to work for a nationally renowned education organization in Columbus, Ohio.Applicants must have 3+ years of experience, and ideally have familiarity with ERP implementations/migrations. If interested in this or similar positions in Columbus, send a resume to Jacob at jsantille@apexsystemsinc.com  If you’d like to receive Job Alerts from Apex that match your specific criteria, visit itcareers.apexsystemsinc.com. Project Details:Our client is migrating their ERP platform for financial information from PeopleSoft to Workday. This is a multi-year initiative spreading across both their university and medical organizations. The initiative is currently in a planning and design phase, and will go live next year. Several groups have been stood up and several others have been absorbed for this project, and it will continue to grow and offer great visibility and technical growth.Responsibilities of ERP ETL Developer:Develop data flow for PeopleSoft to Workday migrationBuild out data analysis structureRequirements for ETL Developer:5+ years of ERP ETL Development Experience (tools to be determined)Experience/Exposure with ERP implementation or migrationsExperience working across a large environment preferredExperience with Workday Financials – or financial models of other ERP tools*Please note that as a contract employee of Apex Systems, you’d be eligible for Health, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance; Short Term Disability; Hospitalization Coverage; Direct Deposit; Weekly Pay Periods; Training and Development Programs; Corporate Discounts/Perks and our Referral Program.*EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",ERP ETL Developer Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  681943Job Title: ERP ETL DeveloperLength: 2+ year contractLocation: Columbus, OhioApex Systems, the nation’s largest publicly traded IT Staffing organization, has an immediate and high profile opportunity for an ERP ETL Developer to work for a nationally renowned education organization in Columbus, Ohio.Applicants must have 3+ years of experience, and ideally have familiarity with ERP implementations/migrations. If interested in this or similar positions in Columbus, send a resume to Jacob at jsantille@apexsystemsinc.com  If you’d like to receive Job Alerts from Apex that match your specific criteria, visit itcareers.apexsystemsinc.com. Project Details:Our client is migrating their ERP platform for financial information from PeopleSoft to Workday. This is a multi-year initiative spreading across both their university and medical organizations. The initiative is currently in a planning and design phase, and will go live next year. Several groups have been stood up and several others have been absorbed for this project, and it will continue to grow and offer great visibility and technical growth.Responsibilities of ERP ETL Developer:Develop data flow for PeopleSoft to Workday migrationBuild out data analysis structureRequirements for ETL Developer:5+ years of ERP ETL Development Experience (tools to be determined)Experience/Exposure with ERP implementation or migrationsExperience working across a large environment preferredExperience with Workday Financials – or financial models of other ERP tools*Please note that as a contract employee of Apex Systems, you’d be eligible for Health, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance; Short Term Disability; Hospitalization Coverage; Direct Deposit; Weekly Pay Periods; Training and Development Programs; Corporate Discounts/Perks and our Referral Program.*EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/erp-etl-developer-job-columbus-oh-us-171814177.aspx?mescoid=1500143001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c7b648c4336966208ea36b4068b4637a
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:14:28:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: Supervise store employees. Assist with efficient management of inventory and effective presentation of merchandise. Ensure a safe working environment while providing for the protection of company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Open the store a minimum of two days per week; close the store a minimum of two days per week. Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; deposit money in bank. Assist in ensuring the financial integrity of the store through strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Manage store in Store Manager's absence. Assist Store Manager, as directed, with scheduling employees; enter payroll information into computer. Assist Store Manager, as directed, in providing adequate training for employees. Review operating statements to identify business trends (including sales, profitability, and turn), expense control opportunities, potential shrink, and errors. Order drop-shipments and other areas of store as designated by store manager. Follow prescribed ordering practices to ensure the meeting or exceeding of in-stock targets; review ordering plan, seasonal direction and inventory management issues on a weekly basis. Assist with the efficient staging, stocking and storage of merchandise; unload trucks. Ensure that merchandise is presented according to established practices and Store Manager direction; utilize merchandise fixtures properly including presentation, product pricing and signage. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist in maintaining accurate inventory levels by controlling damages, markdowns, scanning, paperwork, and facility controls. Conduct safety meetings; help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Assist Store Manager in ensuring employee compliance Complete all paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to read and interpret documents such as diagrams, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedures manuals. Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to learn and perform IBM cash register functions to generate reports. Knowledge of inventory management and merchandising practices. Effective oral and written communication skills. Effective interpersonal skills. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices (deposits, store keys, SAFE program, etc.) Good organization skills with attention to detail. Ability to solve problems and deal with a variety of situations where limited standardization exists. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent strongly preferred. One year of experience in a retail environment and six months supervisory experience preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",ASST STORE MGR Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/asst-store-mgr-job-columbus-oh-us-171716637.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e707e3c96191d26abae56bf7b5725ca6
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:14:50:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description If you are an experienced Application Support Analyst looking for a position with a leading company, Bartech can help! We are a leading staffing firm and our clients include some of the nation’s biggest companies. Our client has a need for an Application Support Analyst. This is a contract position; however it is not uncommon for assignments to transition into permanent positions with our client companies.  If you have the background we are looking for, and you are interested in an opportunity to get your foot in the door with leading company, we want to talk with you!                                                Application Support Analyst       Job Responsibilities                                                                                                                         Your specific duties as an Application Support Analyst will include:    Provide Production Support for LEIS, CCP, CLLINET, Venue and PRS applications.Deploy application code/packages in Production and Non-Production environments and join Task Plan review calls and follow Change Management Process and Procedures.Work with Application Development, Middleware, Command Center, VDSI, System Administrators and other teams to coordinate for all activities and work to debug issues as needed.As part of job requirement, resource may be working after normal business hours and some weekends as scheduled.Need to work closely with all teams, respond to emails and be able to join calls and attend CMDs (Outage Bridge) as needed.Provide resolution to issues and mitigate problems and be able to work proactively.Perform installation of code releases and patches and write scripts or programs for IT applicationsAssist in the implementation and maintenance of databases and systems       Application Support Analyst     Job Requirements As an Application Support Analyst you must represent our company well by being responsible, punctual and motivated to go above and beyond the call of duty. You must also be highly detail-oriented and organized with excellent analytic and problem-solving abilities. It is also important that you display excellent verbal and written communication and interpersonal skills. Basic Unix/Linux environment familiarity (shells, command line utilities, etc.)Communication protocols and utilities (SSH, SSL/TLS, TCP/UDP, etc.)Windows 2008/2012 server System Administration concepts/familiarity.Microsoft middleware experience (IIS 7.x, .NET, etc.)Communication protocols and utilities (SSH, SSL/TLS, TCP/UDP, etc.)Windows system based diagnostics/troubleshooting, able to work with System Administrator teams to identify/fix OS/Network/GPO, hardware/software issues.Basic Unix/Linux environment familiarity (shells, command line utilities, etc.)Desired Skills:Former technical support experienceCitrix XenApp/XenDesktop experienceSQL Server 2008 and above familiarityPowershell scriptingAdditional Job Information:Work Schedule – Job is typically 7am – 4pm Central time with understanding that resource may be working after normal business hours and weekends as scheduled.  Application Support Analyst   Benefits    As an Application Support Analyst with Bartech, you will be working through an established and respected staffing organization with 39 years of serving as a trusted partner to our client companies. We are dedicated to providing our talent with personal, responsive attention, and will assign an employee care representative to answer any questions or concerns that you might have. Depending upon the client, the assignment and your performance, you can find potential opportunities for direct employment. Your hard work and professional dedication will be rewarded with competitive compensation, including benefits. Available benefits for Application Support Analyst position include (but are not limited to:                                                                          Exceptional medical, dental, and vision Paid time off, including holidaysLife and disability insurance Make the most of your experience!Apply now!  Applicant must be eligible to work in the US for immediate opening.           Keywords: Technical Support, Network Support, System Administration, Windows 2008/2012 Server, UNIX/Linux, TCP   ",Application Support Analyst Job in Irving,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Irving, TX",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/application-support-analyst-job-irving-tx-us-171444540.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,71642d2c69fcc5c21f81aa2073d83d70
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:15:48:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title: Senior QA Automation TesterRequired Skills:7+ years of experience as a QA tester3+ years of experience utilizing Ruby/Cucumber for automation testingExperience in an Agile environmentExperience writing test & use cases from scratchExperience testing of web-based & mobile applicationsExperience with load testing scenarios and executing performance tests &Experience working within different frameworks (SoapUI/LoadUI, LoadRunner or NeoRunner)Must have excellent written and verbal communication skillsMust have a passion for testing and the ability to work well with othersDesired Skills: Prior Lead experience would a preferredBachelor's Degree in Computer Science or similar field of studyExperience in a retail environmentDescription of Role/Responsibilities: We are looking for a Senior QA Automation Tester to join a well-known organization based in the middle of Columbus, Ohio. This group is responsible for the development of all ""customer-facing"" applications and mobile application development. This is an Agile environment and Ruby/Cucumber is utilized for Automation testing. Ideal candidates will have extensive Ruby/Cucumber experience and have the ability to work well in a team environment. This is an opportunity to join a quickly growing group that acts as a ""start-up"" group backed by a National, enterprise organization. If you are passionate about Automation Testing and looking for a new challenge, then this is the next career move for you!Find Us on Facebook!Follow Us on Twitter!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile:Beacon Hill Technologies, a premier National Information Technology Staffing Group, provides world class technology talent across all industries on a contract, direct (permanent), contract-to-direct and project basis. Beacon Hill Technologies' dedicated team of recruiting and staffing experts consistently delivers quality IT professionals to solve our customers' technical and business needs. Beacon Hill Technologies covers a broad spectrum of IT positions, including Project Management and Business Analysis, Programming/Development, Database, Infrastructure, Quality Assurance, Production/Support and ERP roles.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Automation QA Tester-Ruby/Cucumber-Contract To Hire!! Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,ColumbusOH,Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/automation-qa-tester-ruby-cucumber-contract-to-hire!!-job-columbus-oh-us-171786443.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=9,,IT/Software Development,23433bacb2146db1c5fe0a44877a1f87
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:03:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB OVERVIEW:The Seasonal Visual Merchandiser is responsible for arranging and maintaining attractive visual presentation in windows, on ledges, shelves, and fashion panels throughout the store. May follow a floor plan to re-merchandise an area in preparation for special events or season changes. Performs other duties as assigned.As a Seasonal Visual Merchandising Associate, you will be an integral part of bringing the magic of Macy's to life during the fast-paced holiday season. Associates in this role perform a number of functions that are critical to offering our customers the best experience when they shop in our store. While all seasonal positions require working as part of a team to meet department and store objectives, your individual responsibilities include creating the customer's first impression of Macy's. We will rely on you to not only implement corporate visual standards, but also add your own unique and innovative visual flair. Seasonal Visual Merchandising Associates are an integral part of Macy's success, giving us the ability to maintain our iconic merchandising standards, recognized as among the best in the industry.In order to present our customers with the best seasonal shopping experience, many of our Seasonal Visual Merchandising Associates arrive prior to store opening and remain after closing to ensure we are ready to make Macy's magic. Seasonal associates will have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a temporary basis, which may include early mornings, evenings, weekends and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving and the day after Christmas. And don't forget - just in time for seasonal shopping, you will receive an employee discount of up to 20% starting your first day!Essential Functions:- Pull merchandise to set-up visual representations using the loan book to check merchandise into and out of departments- Construct, paint, set-up, and install signs, sale banners, panels, and other items required for special events, clearance events, and fashion shows- Set-up and maintain fixtures using hand or power tools, such as saws, dykes, hammers, screwdrivers, staple guns, ladders, mannequin units, scissors, nails, spray paint, spray glue, and knives- Maintain and present visual displays in a compelling and exciting manner in accordance with company directives- Understand customer preferences and exercise judgment when deviating from company directives to appeal to specific customer base- Regular, dependable attendance and punctualityQualifications:Education/Experience:High School Diploma or equivalent. Additional education training in art or merchandising is preferred. Merchandise presentation or visual presentation experience is preferred.Communication Skills:Effective written and verbal skills, ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.Physical Demands:This position Involves heavy lifting, constant moving, standing, and reaching with arms and hands. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours, lift at least 30 lbs. Will involve stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other skills:Must possess vision and creativity. Basic knowledge of art, design, fashion, and interior decoration. Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.Work Hours:Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays.___________________________________________________________________________________________________________This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an EqualOpportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",**Seasonal Retail Visual Merchandiser** Part Time: Macy’s Polaris Fashion Place Job in Columbus,Part Time Seasonal,"Columbus, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-retail-visual-merchandiser-part-time-macy%E2%80%99s-polaris-fashion-place-job-columbus-oh-us-171452515.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=18,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,0be9cc167516a72764201fa313a0d7d7
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:03:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: Supervise store employees. Assist with efficient management of inventory and effective presentation of merchandise. Ensure a safe working environment while providing for the protection of company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Open the store a minimum of two days per week; close the store a minimum of two days per week. Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; deposit money in bank. Assist in ensuring the financial integrity of the store through strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Manage store in Store Manager's absence. Assist Store Manager, as directed, with scheduling employees; enter payroll information into computer. Assist Store Manager, as directed, in providing adequate training for employees. Review operating statements to identify business trends (including sales, profitability, and turn), expense control opportunities, potential shrink, and errors. Order drop-shipments and other areas of store as designated by store manager. Follow prescribed ordering practices to ensure the meeting or exceeding of in-stock targets; review ordering plan, seasonal direction and inventory management issues on a weekly basis. Assist with the efficient staging, stocking and storage of merchandise; unload trucks. Ensure that merchandise is presented according to established practices and Store Manager direction; utilize merchandise fixtures properly including presentation, product pricing and signage. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist in maintaining accurate inventory levels by controlling damages, markdowns, scanning, paperwork, and facility controls. Conduct safety meetings; help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Assist Store Manager in ensuring employee compliance Complete all paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to read and interpret documents such as diagrams, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedures manuals. Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to learn and perform IBM cash register functions to generate reports. Knowledge of inventory management and merchandising practices. Effective oral and written communication skills. Effective interpersonal skills. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices (deposits, store keys, SAFE program, etc.) Good organization skills with attention to detail. Ability to solve problems and deal with a variety of situations where limited standardization exists. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent strongly preferred. One year of experience in a retail environment and six months supervisory experience preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",ASST STORE MGR Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/asst-store-mgr-job-columbus-oh-us-171887802.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ffbe82661a23f4be4349b2bae67453db
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:04:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Parker + Lynch has a Divisional Controller job in Irving, TX. The client is looking for a Certified Public Accountant who has a minimum of seven years’ experience. You will play a key role in ensuring that the actual and forecast numbers and commentary are robust, relevant and insightful. We are seeking someone who has advanced Oracle skills. Key Responsibilities:• Controlling and issuing monthly internal financial reports and variance analysis• Journal Entries and reports for monthly and annual financial reports• Ensure the completion of ad hoc, daily and/or month-end reports relating to the division• Ensure the proper file maintenance of documents for audit verification• Monthly revenue and forecasting for the division• Assist division in building and maintaining models to determine customer profitability• Financial liaison between division and corporate• Provide financial/analytical/accounting support to division• Annual budget preparation for division• Process Improvement, automation and documentation Qualifications:• Bachelor degree in Accounting • CPA • Minimum of seven years of experience• Excellent communication skills• Oracle Financials experience a plus If you meet the requirements for this Divisional Controller job, please email your resume to: Patrick.Louden@parkerlynch.com  Also, like and follow us on Facebook and Twitter to stay up to date on our latest available opportunities:https://www.facebook.com/ParkerandLynchhttp://twitter.com/#!/ParkerLynch Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled    ",Divisional Controller Job in Irving,Full Time Employee,"Irving, TX 75063",,http://jobview.monster.com/divisional-controller-job-irving-tx-us-171861768.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=6,"90,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,683ec15fe6da507f343eafadb0d10dce
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:04:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sports-Minded Sales and Marketing CoordinatorAt WM&C, the Sales and Marketing Coordinator's primary role and responsibility is to create, develop, harness and execute strategic sales and marketing for our clients.We have found that individuals who have a passion for sports / sports background achieve promotions in our sales and marketing departments quickly due to their tenacity & competitive team based mentalityWe were nominated one of Columbus’s Best Places to Work!Also 101 BEST AND BRIGHTEST COMPANIES TO WORK FOR!Entry Level / Sales and Marketing Coordinator's will be trained and developed to grow business relations assigned by the managing partner to whom they will directly report.  Our firm is currently seeking go-getter, sport minded individuals who excel in relationship and team building. We are seeking individuals who are interested in full time employment and have a interest in being cross trained into management.Sales and Marketing Coordinator's would be trained in and responsible for :Sales and marketingOne on one sales based interactions with customers (NO residential door to door or telemarketing/ cold calling will be conducted)Entry level management / Client relationship managementSales, marketing and team managementHuman resourcesManaging business relationships, marketing campaigns, marketing researchAchieve strategic sales / marketing targetsField program development and sales supportAccount management and liaison between client and customersThe sales, marketing and management team cross-trains all employees within leadership development which includes:Human ResourcesTrainingSales TrainingTeam buildingEmployee retentionCulture and EnvironmentThe sales, management and marketing team offers a team based and structured environment, however employees are expected to be self-disciplined in managing their own time and work schedule. Fun, team building environmentRecognition for top performers in sales and leadershipHigh energy meetings and marketing campaignsTraining in basic selling, value based selling, sales induction, core sales skills and finance for sales, marketing development, marketing research, marketing strategies and marketing theoryPaid Travel opportunities (for professional/ leadership development and business vacations)Leadership workshops and developmentTraining in sales, marketing and managementFinancial management, business and time managementTraining in direct sales, marketing & internet marketingPhilanthropy events- a chance to give back to the communityAdvancement into management and marketing roles based on performanceRequirementsQualified candidates for our sales / marketing positions must possess excellent interpersonal communication skills and high level of professionalism and integrity. Public speaking skills for presenting to groups are a plus.Must possess excellent interpersonal communication skillsMaintain a high level of professionalism and integrityExperience with public speaking for presenting to groups is a plus1-2 years of customer service, direct sales, sales and marketing development or marketing campaigns, public relations or management experience preferredPrior sports or competitive-based organizational involvement is a plusDemonstrated leadership abilityDemonstrated critical thinking and problem solving skills*former athletes have been seen to thrive in our culture due to the similarities on performance: we promote from a no-seniority based culture, individuals advance into management as a result of their work ethic on a black and white performance based metric in areas not only in sales, but leadership achievements People who have the following experience are encouraged to apply: Sales, marketing, sports, management, supervisor, full time, entry level, human resources, direct sales, marketing sales, campaign development, management   For consideration, please send resumes!  Management will review all resumes submitted, but will only contact those they are interested in meeting with for an interview.",Sports-Minded Sales and Marketing Coordinator Job in Dublin,Full Time Employee,"Dublin, OH 43017",All,http://jobview.monster.com/sports-minded-sales-marketing-coordinator-job-dublin-oh-us-171333817.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,bb14399cfb54687bc70fce53fbff8c65
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:24:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"TruGreen is committed to providing personalized attention for our associates. We focus on developing our people by building proud, dynamic teams while helping associates reach their personal and professional goals. We continuously strive to make TruGreen an employer of choice and ""a great place to work!""You're independent, driven by performance, and looking for more than a job. We Are TruGreen, and as the nation's largest and most comprehensive provider of lawn services, we have bigger opportunities for people like you.We're seeking Residential Outside Sales Representatives, offering a guaranteed base plus commission to prospect and generate sales.  This isn't your ordinary sales job. With TruGreen, you'll learn the essential skills to launch a successful career in sales Responsibilities: • Sells programs and services to current and prospective customers through traveling around assigned territory. • Conducts follow-up of leads and customer retention/service calls through means of telephone and person-to-person contact to identify customer needs. • Develops customized solutions based on customer needs, using the TruGreen suite of lawn care products and services. As a TruGreen Employee, you'll enjoy: • Guaranteed base plus commission  • Top performers earn $65K in the first year • Paid vacation time and holidays • Medical, dental, vision and prescription plans • 401(k) with company matching At TruGreen we value our employees just as much as our customers. The result? Almost forty years of careers centered around the people who matter most -- You. Apply Now. TruGreen is committed to Diversity and Inclusion.  We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position.We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer - Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with DisabilitiesTo learn more copy and paste this URL into your browser: http://www.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdfTruGreen performs pre-employment testing.Job Code- 100677",Sales Representative Job in Lewis Center,Full Time Employee,"Lewis Center, OH",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-job-lewis-center-oh-us-171469549.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,498fa7e564a0212408b2a33dd540e309
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:25:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Assistant ManagerDepartment: Remote-Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerFLSA Classification: Non-ExemptDirect Reports: YesLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Assistant Manager will be responsible for supervising a range of store duties which includes overseeing the registers, visual aesthetic of store, loss prevention, launches, newly hired Associates, and the training for leaders on duty. In accordance with company-defined practices and processes, the Assistant Manager will also administer all aspects of facility issues, loss prevention audits, safety trainings and administrative duties to ensure the highest quality in-store experience for both our store team and customers. Deliverables: Actively participate in store walkthroughs with the Store Manager and District leaders to ensure consistency in the quality of service, operation and visual executionLead overall store earnings by driving top line sales and managing controllable contribution. This includes educating Associates on ways to drive sales through promoting service standards, product knowledge, etc.Support daily merchandising, floor set planning and execution, replenishment, launches, updates, planning and execution, shipment, zero selling reports, loss prevention, and serviceMonitor daily payroll planner, adjusting schedules accordingly, and completing register audits as necessaryEnsure all delivery information is accurately reported to verify all shipment‐related paperwork meet audit requirementsIdentify and execute training decisions to maximize business opportunities per the company strategyFollow up closely with the Store Manager on a daily basis for any current or upcoming open positionAssist the Store Manager with ensuring that talent management is achieved. This includes recruiting, onboarding, networking, new hire documents, training, engagement, retention, and recognition initiatives for the storeTrain, coach and direct Associates on merchandise handling, shipment processing, merchandise presentation, and visual techniques as neededCommunicate training assessments with corporate organization and utilize the development and implementation of training courses. This includes identifying and arranging suitable training solutions for employeesCollaborate and help execute with the leadership team to make product placement adjustments based on selling, inventory ownership, store design type, assortment levels, and merchandising reportKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years old with a high school diploma or equivalent. College degree or relevant technical or vocational training preferred.Must have at least 2 years of retail experience. Prior supervisory or management experience preferred.Must be skilled in coaching and training, sales generation, strategic planning, and customer service.Must have excellent communication, organizational and time management skills.Must be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicals.Must be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shifts.At Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 22625 Division : Field - Region : Central Location : 0130 - F21 - Mall at Tuttle Crossing, Dublin OH US 43016 % of Travel Required : None",Assistant Manager - Mall at Tuttle Crossing # Job in Dublin,"Full Time , Employee","Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Assistant ManagerDepartment: Remote-Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerFLSA Classification: Non-ExemptDirect Reports: YesLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Assistant Manager will be responsible for supervising a range of store duties which includes overseeing the registers, visual aesthetic of store, loss prevention, launches, newly hired Associates, and the training for leaders on duty. In accordance with company-defined practices and processes, the Assistant Manager will also administer all aspects of facility issues, loss prevention audits, safety trainings and administrative duties to ensure the highest quality in-store experience for both our store team and customers. Deliverables: Actively participate in store walkthroughs with the Store Manager and District leaders to ensure consistency in the quality of service, operation and visual executionLead overall store earnings by driving top line sales and managing controllable contribution. This includes educating Associates on ways to drive sales through promoting service standards, product knowledge, etc.Support daily merchandising, floor set planning and execution, replenishment, launches, updates, planning and execution, shipment, zero selling reports, loss prevention, and serviceMonitor daily payroll planner, adjusting schedules accordingly, and completing register audits as necessaryEnsure all delivery information is accurately reported to verify all shipment‐related paperwork meet audit requirementsIdentify and execute training decisions to maximize business opportunities per the company strategyFollow up closely with the Store Manager on a daily basis for any current or upcoming open positionAssist the Store Manager with ensuring that talent management is achieved. This includes recruiting, onboarding, networking, new hire documents, training, engagement, retention, and recognition initiatives for the storeTrain, coach and direct Associates on merchandise handling, shipment processing, merchandise presentation, and visual techniques as neededCommunicate training assessments with corporate organization and utilize the development and implementation of training courses. This includes identifying and arranging suitable training solutions for employeesCollaborate and help execute with the leadership team to make product placement adjustments based on selling, inventory ownership, store design type, assortment levels, and merchandising reportKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years old with a high school diploma or equivalent. College degree or relevant technical or vocational training preferred.Must have at least 2 years of retail experience. Prior supervisory or management experience preferred.Must be skilled in coaching and training, sales generation, strategic planning, and customer service.Must have excellent communication, organizational and time management skills.Must be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicals.Must be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shifts.At Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 22625 Division : Field - Region : Central Location : 0130 - F21 - Mall at Tuttle Crossing, Dublin OH US 43016 % of Travel Required : None",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-manager-mall-at-tuttle-crossing-130-job-dublin-oh-us-170942361.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0363bda2632fdcc647e391129a8f1398
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:26:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"KinderCare Education is the nation’s leader in early childhood education. We nourish curiosity through purposeful experiences to create a future full of lifelong learners. From our National Support Center, to the classrooms where learning comes to life, we’re united by a passion to create a world of learning, joy and adventure for more than 161,000 children ages six-weeks through 12 years every day.   Our Teachers bring warmth, patience, and understanding to the classroom every day, encouraging children to learn and grow. They inspire children to be lifelong learners using our nationally recognized curriculum that promotes social, physical, verbal, and cognitive development. Our Teachers are committed to making their center successful and know that creating meaningful relationships with children, families, and their team play a crucial role in that success. When you join our team as an Assistant Teacher you will: Assist teachers with the implementation of KCE’s curriculum in a way that is consistent with the unique needs of each child Create a safe, nurturing environment where children can play and learn.   Partner with parents with a shared desire to provide the best care and education for their children Support your center’s success by partnering with center staff and leadership to achieve goals around enrollment, accreditation, and engagement Cultivate positive relationships with families, teachers, state licensing authorities, community contacts and corporate partners Required Skills and Experience: A love for children and a strong desire to make a difference every day Ability to build relationships with families and coworkers and create a dynamic environment where play and discovery go hand-in-hand Outstanding customer service skills CPR and First Aid Certification or willingness to obtain Must meet state specific guidelines for the role Must be physically able to use a computer with basic proficiency, lift a minimum of 40 pounds, and work indoors or outdoors.  Must be able to assume postures in low levels to allow physical and visual contact with children, see and hear well enough to keep children safe, and engage in physical activity with children. Ability to speak, read, and write English.   The benefits our career professionals enjoy: In addition to a rewarding career where you help shape children's futures, KinderCare Education provides a competitive compensation package. Benefits include: Medical, dental and vision Discounted child care Generous paid time off Education assistance and reimbursement Medical expense reimbursement/ Life insurance/Disability benefits/ Health and wellness programs 401(k) savings and investment plan with employer match   KinderCare Education employs more than 32,000 team members across 1,700 locations nationwide. Our devoted family of education providers leads the nation in accreditation and includes KinderCare® Learning Centers, CCLC®, Champions® Before- and After-School Programs, Cambridge Schools™, Knowledge Beginnings® and The Grove School®.   KinderCare Education is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, age, sex, religion, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military or veteran status, gender identity or expression, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal law.",Assistant School Age Teacher Job in Dublin,Full Time Employee,"Dublin, OH 43017",All,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-school-age-teacher-job-dublin-oh-us-170885881.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=17,,Education/Training,da8643d8ef9fb27002c0d3b58fca40bb
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:27:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities    DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:  Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.   Qualifications  KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-FT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-ft-job-columbus-oh-us-171523959.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bd563dfc60495190108eee7829bd3a87
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:27:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Overview:As a Retail Associate, you will be an integral part of bringing the magic of Macy's to life. Sales Associates provide outstanding customer service, meet hourly sales and Star Rewards goals on a personal and departmental basis, and demonstrate superior product knowledge to customers. To create a shopping experience that will make the customer feel welcome and comfortable. Performs other duties as assigned.The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here.Essential Functions:- Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaboration- Determine customer needs based on personal features and other customer preference related factors- Demonstrate knowledge of store products and services to build sales and minimize returns- Maintain a professional attitude with sincerity and enthusiasm reflecting Macy's commitment to our customer the most important person in our stores- Be knowledgeable of and perform sales support functions related to POS procedures- Regular, dependable attendance & punctualityQualifications:Education /ExperienceNo specific educational accomplishment is required. Previous retail experience preferred, but not required.Communication SkillsAbility to read, write, and interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to effectively communicate with customers, peers, and management. Able to communicate on the telephone with proper etiquette.Mathematical SkillsBasic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American Monetary units.Other SkillsMust enjoy meeting and interacting with customers. Possess strong sense of urgency and a thirst for learning.Work HoursAbility to work a flexible schedule, including mornings, evenings, and weekends, and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving, special Big Event days, and the day after Christmas, based on department and store/company needs.This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",**Retail Sales** Full Time: Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Dublin, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-full-time-columbus-oh-macy%E2%80%99s-tuttle-crossing-job-dublin-oh-us-171297799.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=7,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,db06ef088230a16b578e60d9efe6071e
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:35:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Department Supervisors train, coach and develop associates in each department to ensure customers receive excellent service and can easily find the merchandise they need. In addition they provide valuable input into merchandising decisions to the Store Management Team and Operations Team. Department Supervisors have strong product knowledge and the ability to lead and develop others. Specific store departments may include Building Materials, Décor, Electrical, Flooring, Gardening, Hardware, Kitchen & Bath, Lumber, Millwork, Paint, Plumbing, Pro Account Sales, Tool Rental, Front End, Freight, Receiving, Associate Support, Special Services, and Merchandising Execution.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Supervise the work activities of Associates within his/her areaCommunicate store objectives to Associates using the appropriate programs and toolsTrain and develop Associates within the work team, through the management of training calendar and curriculumEngage in coaching for the development of AssociatesParticipate in the interview process for hiring of new Associates and partner with store management on recommendationsProvide input into appropriate discipline decisions related to AssociatesProvide input to the Associates on performance appraisals and make recommendations on promotion of associates in his/her areaNature and Scope:Accountable for direct supervision of the work activities of subordinates, which requires planning, monitoring and review of workDirect supervision of a shift or the coordination of multiple work groupsMakes recommendations concerning selection, termination, performance appraisal and professional developmentDue to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service: Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge: Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions: Seeks to fully understand the customers needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed; until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills - Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customers concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Department Supervisor Job in Powell,Full Time,"Powell, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/department-supervisor-job-powell-oh-us-170853449.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5c5cf50a38ebe6d12a8819b0ba9cd52f
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:35:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities       DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.     Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-PT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-pt-job-columbus-oh-us-171719520.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),74d88e45e869249bcc372035cda658ef
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:42:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"TruGreen is committed to providing personalized attention for our associates. We focus on developing our people by building proud, dynamic teams while helping associates reach their personal and professional goals. We continuously strive to make TruGreen an employer of choice and ""a great place to work!""Position OverviewResponsible for managing the activities and improving the sales performance of two (2) or more neighborhood sales associates. Leads the team in prospecting, developing and closing sales in defined geographic areas. Coaches and mentors sales team efforts. Collaborates with sales team members to acquire new customers and retain existing customers.Responsibilities1. Assists in recruiting and selecting the appropriate personnel to efficiently staff the sales function and provides for their on-going training and development.2. Assists in determining work procedures, prepares work schedules and expedites workflow.3. Assists in evaluating associate performance, makes salary recommendations and administers disciplinary actions consistent with company policy.4. Assists in establishing sales goals with each sales representative and monitors progress toward goals. Ensures marketing/sales calls are performed to meet sales goals as established by branch sales plans and retention standards.5. Ensures individual and team productivity and sales results are accurately recorded daily. Monitors results of sales plans and takes immediate corrective action when results fall short of sales goals. Communicates results and activities daily to Branch Sales Manager.6. Studies and standardizes procedures to improve efficiency of subordinates. Ensures effective work environment adjusting for errors and complaints.7. Performs or assists subordinates in performing duties by selling programs and services to existing and prospective customers through means of traveling around assigned territory.8. Conducts lawn analysis, advises customers of problems with lawn and landscape and determines appropriate solution. Determines pricing by measuring and calculating square footage to branch price list.9. Estimates date of service to customer based on knowledge of branch production and service schedules.10. Conducts follow-up of leads through means of person-to-person contact to identify customer needs.Education and Experience Requirements• High School Diploma or general education degree (GED) or four or more (4) years senior level or lead experience or equivalent combination of education and experience• Bachelors Degree preferred• Two (2) to three (3) years experience in outside sales preferred• Certification as required by federal, state or local lawKnowledge, Skills, and Abilities• Ability to lead and influence others• General knowledge of the industry, organization, products, and/or services• Knowledge of selling techniques (prospecting, cold-calling, overcoming objections, closing sales, etc.)• Ability to find and assess potential sales opportunities• Ability to build customer relationships and provide appropriate levels of customer service• Demonstrated success in building and leading a sales team• Strong communication (verbal and written) skills• Ability to travel locally on an extensive basisTruGreen is committed to Diversity and Inclusion.  We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position.We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer - Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with DisabilitiesTo learn more copy and paste this URL into your browser: http://www.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdfTruGreen performs pre-employment testing.DisclaimerThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed.",Field Sales Supervisor Job in Plano,Full Time Employee,"Plano, TX",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/field-sales-supervisor-job-plano-tx-us-171469062.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,82e7746aef2d851ce2732a891b977280
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:16:45:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Change Management Professional for the following long-term position:Provides Organizational Change Management analysis and guidance on The Financials Project, one of the most visible and complex initiatives and projects being undertaken by the university.  Responsible for: •Leading the Organizational Change initiatives for the specific Workday Financials functional areas in which they are assigned including attending the Process Design sessions, identifying and documenting business process changes and impacts on users, developing strategies to address these changes and working closely with the functional team to implement these strategies. •Develop readiness workshop materials and training materials for their specific Workday functional or technical area(s) •Collaborate with functional team members to assist in identifying process changes, learning future state processes and system functionality, documenting future state business process work flows  •Assist the Readiness Lead in documenting a well-structured Readiness Plan •Conduct readiness workshops and train-the –trainer sessions in partnership with the Business Process Team•Support the units as needed for their specific functional area •Document detailed change impacts for their functional area(s) and recommend mitigation for gaps •Contribute to the Architect Phase Impact Analysis deliverable for the OCM work stream •Develop end user training materials for their functional areas and serve as a resource to the Training Lead for content and review •Support Communications Lead with content for communications content specific to their functional areaWork Experience5-6+ years of Organizational Change Management (OCM) experience, including Financials business process mapping, training development and delivery. Ideal candidate will have OCM and functional experience in Financial ERP implementation and PROSCI certification. Experience with Workday is a plus.Additional Information5-6+ years of experience in role where candidate provided OCM analysis and delivery in large scale ERP or Financials implementation project. Experience in facilitating workshops and training and mapping workshops. Experience collecting and measuring change impacts. Demonstrated OCM analysis skills with the ability to multitask and ability to communicate effectively and professionally with employees, peers, leadership, customers, vendors, technical team members and others.  Demonstrated expertise of building consensus across their team, and influencing successful outcomes.  Ideally have understanding of financials processes and/or higher ed. Able to integrate well as a member of a functional team. A successful candidate is an excellent communicator, critical thinker, motivated with a positive attitude, and able to work independently to gather and evaluate data.",Organizational Change Management SME Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/organizational-change-management-sme-job-columbus-oh-us-171548405.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,9d4880fec7ec4ffc97576a6fb18f5da3
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:17:10:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Associate: Help Desk Technician - Dallas, TX Requisition ID: 16004BW Job Category: Technical Support Services Job Type: Regular Primary Location: USA-TX: TEXAS-DALLAS Schedule: Full-time Remote Work Authorized: No Relocation Assistance: Not Available Travel: Yes, 5 % of the Time Clearance Level: Public Trust Employee Status: Regular Posting Date Aug 29, 2016 Description As the largest pure-play IT services provider serving the U.S. government sector, CSRA is where you can come to be successful. Join a collaborative team, solving customer issues and accessing an array of resources for your success. Take advantage of tremendous opportunities as you help us chart our path to industry leadership, and tap into our collective 90+ year heritage. With combined FY15 revenues of approximately $5.5 billion and nearly 19,000 employees, CSRA represents the coming together – figuratively and literally – of two outstanding companies: the North American Public Sector business of CSC, and SRA. Join us and watch your career take flight. http://csra.com/ The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation [FDIC] mission is to preserve and promote public confidence in the U.S. financial systems by insuring deposits in banks and thrift institutions for up to $250,000; by identifying, monitoring, and addressing risks to the deposit insurance funds; and by limiting the effect on the account and the financial system when a bank or thrift institution fails. CSRA provides the day-to-day operational services to FDIC in support of infrastructure, facilities, hardware, software, and systems. CSRA supports operational security, client support/help desk, data center operations, asset management, and systems engineering service areas. We are seeking an Associate Helpdesk Technician for the CSRA/FDIC Infrastructure team. Responsibilities: Provide technical support to users for computer-related technical problems on assigned account(s). Provide back-up assistance on other accounts as needed. Provide technical support to users for computer-related technical problems on assigned account(s). Provide back-up assistance on other accounts as needed. Answer help desk telephones for assigned account(s) and respond to customer inquiries to ensure customer needs are met. Assist customers in resolving technical problems on assigned by providing guidance regarding software and hardware problems. Resolve and/or refer more complex technical problems through a defined escalation process. Follow up with customers to ensure that their inquiries are resolved within the contracted or agreed upon timeframe. Log and track inquiries using a problem management database and maintain history records and related problem documentation. Identify, evaluate, and prioritize customer problems and complaints to ensure that inquiries are resolved appropriately. Required skills: Customer service. Excellent communication skills. Client is moving from Remedy to ServiceNow Desired certification: Microsoft Office A+ Network+ Qualifications Basic Qualifications High school diploma or G.E.D. Two or more years of technical training Four or more years of technical or customer support experience Experience working with company products and operating systems Experience with solving computer-related problems Experience working with company escalation policy Other Qualifications Interpersonal skills for interacting with team members and clients Communications skills Organization skills to balance and prioritize work Analytical and problem solving skills Leadership skills to mentor and provide guidance to less experienced personnel Ability to work in a team environment CSRA is committed to creating a diverse environment and is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",Associate: Help Desk Technician - Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Job Title: Associate: Help Desk Technician - Dallas, TX Requisition ID: 16004BW Job Category: Technical Support Services Job Type: Regular Primary Location: USA-TX: TEXAS-DALLAS Schedule: Full-time Remote Work Authorized: No Relocation Assistance: Not Available Travel: Yes, 5 % of the Time Clearance Level: Public Trust Employee Status: Regular Posting Date Aug 29, 2016 Description As the largest pure-play IT services provider serving the U.S. government sector, CSRA is where you can come to be successful. Join a collaborative team, solving customer issues and accessing an array of resources for your success. Take advantage of tremendous opportunities as you help us chart our path to industry leadership, and tap into our collective 90+ year heritage. With combined FY15 revenues of approximately $5.5 billion and nearly 19,000 employees, CSRA represents the coming together – figuratively and literally – of two outstanding companies: the North American Public Sector business of CSC, and SRA. Join us and watch your career take flight. http://csra.com/ The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation [FDIC] mission is to preserve and promote public confidence in the U.S. financial systems by insuring deposits in banks and thrift institutions for up to $250,000; by identifying, monitoring, and addressing risks to the deposit insurance funds; and by limiting the effect on the account and the financial system when a bank or thrift institution fails. CSRA provides the day-to-day operational services to FDIC in support of infrastructure, facilities, hardware, software, and systems. CSRA supports operational security, client support/help desk, data center operations, asset management, and systems engineering service areas. We are seeking an Associate Helpdesk Technician for the CSRA/FDIC Infrastructure team. Responsibilities: Provide technical support to users for computer-related technical problems on assigned account(s). Provide back-up assistance on other accounts as needed. Provide technical support to users for computer-related technical problems on assigned account(s). Provide back-up assistance on other accounts as needed. Answer help desk telephones for assigned account(s) and respond to customer inquiries to ensure customer needs are met. Assist customers in resolving technical problems on assigned by providing guidance regarding software and hardware problems. Resolve and/or refer more complex technical problems through a defined escalation process. Follow up with customers to ensure that their inquiries are resolved within the contracted or agreed upon timeframe. Log and track inquiries using a problem management database and maintain history records and related problem documentation. Identify, evaluate, and prioritize customer problems and complaints to ensure that inquiries are resolved appropriately. Required skills: Customer service. Excellent communication skills. Client is moving from Remedy to ServiceNow Desired certification: Microsoft Office A+ Network+ Qualifications Basic Qualifications High school diploma or G.E.D. Two or more years of technical training Four or more years of technical or customer support experience Experience working with company products and operating systems Experience with solving computer-related problems Experience working with company escalation policy Other Qualifications Interpersonal skills for interacting with team members and clients Communications skills Organization skills to balance and prioritize work Analytical and problem solving skills Leadership skills to mentor and provide guidance to less experienced personnel Ability to work in a team environment CSRA is committed to creating a diverse environment and is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-help-desk-technician-dallas-tx-job-dallas-tx-us-171763070.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=2,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,8423ec09599d42e7b55a542485dfb4b9
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:17:11:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.   Qualifications  KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-FT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-ft-job-columbus-oh-us-171652540.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4bba5d635f70b14c7f2d62b1e3583e69
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:17:53:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  681890Contract Analyst IIIApex systems is currently seeking a Contract Analyst for a year long contract in Columbus Ohio. Aids in the preparation of contractual provisions and the administration of contract proposals.Responsible for preparing bids and negotiating specifications and contractual provisions.Requires a bachelor's degree and 4 years of experience in the field or in a related area.Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within a particular field.Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.Performs a variety of tasks, including some administrative and clerical work.Works under direct supervision; typically reports to a manager.If interested please contact Anna Murphy at amruphy@apexsystemsinc.com or 614-467-4200.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Contract Analyst III Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/contract-analyst-iii-job-columbus-oh-us-171870175.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7e449cd037839668e978cea428599b93
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:08:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: The Sales Associate position is a key part-time position and will act as the point of contact for customers. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Stock merchandise adequately. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes; store merchandise in stock room or move directly to sales floor. Build merchandise displays. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves. Restock recovered merchandise. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Comply with company policies and procedures. Greet customers. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Assist with ordering merchandise using hand-held scanners, as needed. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays when necessary.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Effective interpersonal and oral communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. Knowledge of basic cash handling procedures. Basic mathematical skills. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",SALES ASSOCIATE Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-associate-job-columbus-oh-us-171709259.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),62307038391c81d1b22393f85420699c
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:08:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Service AdvisorThe Service Advisor sells and schedules needed service work on commercial trucks and equipment for the dealership service department.Rush Enterprises is a premier provider of quality products and services to commercial equipment users. We are customer-focused, people-oriented, and financially motivated to deliver excellent outcomes for customers, shareholders, vendors and our people.We offer a rewarding career with a leader in the transportation industry. Grow with us as we continue to expand our network of locations and services. Rush Enterprises is always looking for good people to join our team.Responsibilities1. Write up customer's vehicle problems accurately and clearly on a service input card, verify customer information. Obtain customer's signature.2. Establish customer's method of payment. Obtain credit approval, if necessary.3. Create repair order in the business system, create repair order file and secure service input card with customer signatures in standardized repair order jacket.4. Notify foreman of incoming work, repair order status, and comments in Sparcs.5. Ensure that vehicles are parked in assigned areas. Make sure they are locked and all keys are marked and put away correctly using standardized key tags.6. Communicate updates from customer to foreman via comments in Sparcs.7. Check on progress of repair throughout the day. Contact customers regarding any changes in the estimate or promised time, explains cost and time requirements in detail, and gets proper authorization before any additional repairs are performed.8. Handle telephone inquiries regarding inbound work and work in process.9. Review repair orders to ensure that work is completed and additional work and authorization is noted. Close repair order as appropriate.BenefitsWe offer exceptional compensation and benefits, 401K and stock purchase, incentives for performance, training, and opportunity for advancement - all in a culture that appreciates and rewards excellence, a positive attitude and integrity.",Service Advisor Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/service-advisor-job-columbus-oh-us-171535046.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=15,,Logistics/Transportation,12b66294bec578a099891ab77598b927
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:08:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale Muirfield 7220 Muirfield Drive, Dublin, OH 43017Job #: COTAdubOH067156Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a full time Certified Occupational Therapy Assistant to work between our locations the Brookdale Marysville in Maryville and the Brookdale Muirfield in Dublin, OH.A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Performs basic assessments of patient condition at pre-admission, admission and ongoing through the course of treatment* Provides instruction, guidance, and treatment to patients under supervision of Occupational Therapist* Informs patient, family, and team members of the patient's needs based upon the assessment and/or treatmentRequired skills and qualifications:* Associate's Degree in Occupational Therapy from an accredited college* State Occupational Therapy Assistant (COTA) licensure required* One year occupational therapy experience If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Occupational Therapy Assistant Job in Dublin,Full Time Employee,"Dublin, OH 43017",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/occupational-therapy-assistant-job-dublin-oh-us-171538647.aspx?mescoid=3100550001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,4ccdb377459f19ae93f0ee1d804e51f5
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:08:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.   Qualifications  KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-FT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-ft-job-columbus-oh-us-171649380.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7aa62969c0b6ac185cb2df37e53da3f6
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:08:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  683789Security Engineer IIApex Systems, the nation’s 2nd largest IT Workforce Solutions organization, has an immediate and exciting opportunity for several Security Engineer II roles for one the largest Financial firms in Columbus, Ohio.  These opportunities are for a direct permanent position.Applicants must have 5+ years of Security Engineering experience in an enterprise level environment. If you’d like to receive Job Alerts from Apex that match your specific criteria, visit itcareers.apexsystemsinc.com.Company & Group Details of the Security Engineer II: The Security Engineer II will work as part of a collaborative team in a fast paced enterprise environment. The individual will need to be able to troubleshoot high level issues, have a self-starter mentality while being able to be a team player, and a willingness to learn and utilize new technologies.Work for one of the region’s Top Financial Firms.The organization offers several perks including but not limited to: training opportunities, great benefits, an onsite café and Starbucks, heavily involved with the community and philanthropy.Requirements for Security Engineer II:Triage escalated security issues within the network and security infrastructure which includes: routers, switches, firewalls, VPN, proxy servers, Linux, UNIX and Windows Servers, makes corrective break/fix actions when applicable, following documented procedures, change control guidelines and polices.Experience working across multiple projects and able to engage multiple teams to coordinate on time and within budget delivery.Assists in installations and must be able to troubleshoot escalated enterprise branch networks.Have a self-starter mentality while being a team player with impeccable communication skills.Technologies for Security Engineer II:Education or equivalent -- Bachelor's degree preferredCertification -- preferred CCNA (CCENT & CCT), Network+, Security+, CISSP, CISSM4+ years of Security Engineering experience with previous experience within Network or Server Engineering.Hands on experience with Splunk, Cisco IPS or Sourcefire IPS, and/or Symatec DLP.Having working knowledge or experience with IBM Guardium, Blue Coat SSD, FireEye, and/or Qualys.Scripting with Python, Java or Perl.*Please note that as a contract employee of Apex Systems, you’d be eligible for Health, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance; Short Term Disability; Hospitalization Coverage; Direct Deposit; Weekly Pay Periods; Training and Development Programs; Corporate Discounts/Perks and our Referral Program.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Security Engineer II Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/security-engineer-ii-job-columbus-oh-us-171869706.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),42134d6f074a4de3519b45a93815ee47
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:08:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Associates in Office/Store Support positions are responsible for a variety of functions including administrative services, safety and environmental program compliance, cash management, financial record reporting, pricing regulation compliance, labor and pricing adjustments and maintenance, and theft prevention. They work closely with store management, keeping them informed on compliance or risk issues, scheduling activities, and store operational and financial transaction reports. They must demonstrate a high level of integrity at all times, respond to operational concerns of all associates and remain focused on store specific business objectives while supporting key operational responsibilities. Specific Office/Store Support positions may include: Office Associate, Pricing Associate, Pricing Change Associate, and Schedule Writer.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Ensuring that all accounting transactions are complete and error freeHandling troubleshooting issues quickly, accurately and professionallyFacilitating the maintenance and repair of certain computer system related equipment such as cash registers, scanners, scan guns, monitors, signature capture pads, computer room equipment, store network (LAN) equipment, electronic article surveillance (EAS) equipment, time clocks, phone hardware, store PCs, printers, fax machines and copy machinesOrdering supplies and spare parts for common equipment problemsIdentifying possible product knowledge (PK) training needs for AssociatesBuilding associate scheduling to optimize customer service ratings using the Scheduling system softwareMaintaining associate data in automated system to record associate default department assignments and the days and time they are regularly available to workProducing and interpreting performance graphs from the Labor Management system to review recent scheduling effectiveness on a department by department basisActively monitor and price any unpriced merchandise requiring individual item pricingMonitor and correct signage to accurately display the description of a product and its price Conduct audits to ensure price accuracy of scanners, if available, shelf labels and individual price tagsDrive execution of store safety programs and validate compliance with company standards and policies. Validate environmental compliance to company standardsDrive execution of the Company's internal and external theft and fraud strategy. Identify and process customers and suppliers who commit theft and fraud. Maximize merchandise recoveries. Adhere to all Company policies governing apprehensions. Minimize risk of injuries during apprehensionsNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements:Environment:Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odorsTravel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or older Must be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-20 pounds) Additional Qualifications:Physical Job RequirementsBending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items- Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessaryResponding to public address system announcements Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Attention to Detail: Concentrates for an extended period of time; catches errors before completing assignments; maintains high quality standards for his/her work Customer Driven: Provides outstanding customer service (to both internal and external customers); follows through on responsibilities to customers; recovers from any errors made and leaves customer satisfied Gets Things Done: Demonstrates the ability to get results despite a large workload, competing demands and a fast-paced environment Acts with Integrity: Demonstrates responsible and honest behavior in all Home Depot roles",Office/Store Support Job in Dublin,Full Time,"Dublin, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/office-store-support-job-dublin-oh-us-170921485.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2244c4829268b087d30005e339cbb13f
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:09:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Vejars technologies is a part of IT staffing industry from past Nine years. We are glad to manage our image and reputation as one of the largest growing consulting organizations, we work with several prime vendors, vendors and direct clients were we place our consultants, Vejars technologies located in Coppell, Texas.We are having huge openings on Java with our direct clients to place you as soon as possible. Looking for Green card holders, Citizens, H1B Transfer, H4 EAD, L1 & L2 EAD. Please find below contact details to assist you further.Contact: Mr. PardhaSaradhiNumber: 972-544-6786 Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee",Phone 972-544-6786,Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/excellent-marketing-on-java-for-green-cards-citizens-job-coppell-tx-us-170979726.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=1,,,482a4aad16796736f27e2cf142b1f910
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:09:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-Plano ID  85728 Category  Nutrition/Dietetics Posted Date  8/31/2016 Employment Type  Parttime-Regular Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Aramark was ranked number one in its industry in the 2007 FORTUNE 500 survey and has consistently ranked since 1998 as one of the top three in its industry among FORTUNE's ""America's Most Admired Companies.""    Understanding that clinical excellence and the environment are interdependent, Aramark Healthcare makes an impact by helping nearly 1,300 partners across North America deliver the optimal healthcare experience for patients and their families and the physicians and nurses who care for them.      As a Clinical Dietitian you will provide overall nutrition care to patients. You will assure that the nutritional needs of the individual patients are being met and that all documentation as it relates to the patients nutritional status is complete and accurate.  Plans and administers activities related to resident/patient nutrition care, complying with the standards established by Aramark Healthcare, regulatory agencies, and client. Establishes and maintains effective multidisciplinary relationships to provide a unified approach to patient/resident care.    Key Responsibilities Maintain dietetic registration, state-required credentials and/or licensure and continuing education requirements. Conduct patient nutrition assessment on a population of lower acuity patients. Scope of practice may include both In-Patients (hospitalized) and Out-Patients (community/clinic-based). Manage the development and implementation plan for nutrition intervention in accordance with the Nutrition Care Process. Conduct rounding to drive patient satisfaction. Assess educational needs and the presence of barriers to learning. Provide nutrition counseling for individuals and groups, taking into consideration any adaptations to teaching methods necessary to meet patient learning needs. Utilize assessment and evaluation techniques that consider the varied needs of age-specific populations as well as cultural, religious, and ethnic concerns. Evaluate achievement of learning objectives by the patient and/or family. Provide appropriate follow-ups in accordance with the patient’s treatment goals, referring patients for outpatient counseling, community, or home health services as appropriate. Deliver strong operational performance by executing against Aramark Healthcare and regulatory agency standards and programs, continually monitoring operations, and completing assessments and necessary action plans to provide optimal nutrition care and meal service to patients/residents. Work cooperatively with medical staff as well as food & nutrition services staff to assure conformance to prescribed nutrition care orders. Provide education that ensures compliance with food safety, sanitation, and overall workplace safety standards. Provide appropriate and timely documentation that summarizes the nutrition care plan in a patient’s medical record, including nutrition assessment, diagnosis, plan, implementation, and progress towards goals. Maintain clinical productivity standards and accurate record keeping of daily clinical activities, including information for scheduling and billing. Demonstrate accountability for the proper use of patients’ protected health information. Aramark was ranked number one in its industry in the 2007 FORTUNE 500 survey and has consistently ranked since 1998 as one of the top three in its industry among FORTUNE's ""America's Most Admired Companies.""    Understanding that clinical excellence and the environment are interdependent, Aramark Healthcare makes an impact by helping nearly 1,300 partners across North America deliver the optimal healthcare experience for patients and their families and the physicians and nurses who care for them.      As a Clinical Dietitian you will provide overall nutrition care to patients. You will assure that the nutritional needs of the individual patients are being met and that all documentation as it relates to the patients nutritional status is complete and accurate.  Plans and administers activities related to resident/patient nutrition care, complying with the standards established by Aramark Healthcare, regulatory agencies, and client. Establishes and maintains effective multidisciplinary relationships to provide a unified approach to patient/resident care.    Key Responsibilities Maintain dietetic registration, state-required credentials and/or licensure and continuing education requirements. Conduct patient nutrition assessment on a population of lower acuity patients. Scope of practice may include both In-Patients (hospitalized) and Out-Patients (community/clinic-based). Manage the development and implementation plan for nutrition intervention in accordance with the Nutrition Care Process. Conduct rounding to drive patient satisfaction. Assess educational needs and the presence of barriers to learning. Provide nutrition counseling for individuals and groups, taking into consideration any adaptations to teaching methods necessary to meet patient learning needs. Utilize assessment and evaluation techniques that consider the varied needs of age-specific populations as well as cultural, religious, and ethnic concerns. Evaluate achievement of learning objectives by the patient and/or family. Provide appropriate follow-ups in accordance with the patient’s treatment goals, referring patients for outpatient counseling, community, or home health services as appropriate. Deliver strong operational performance by executing against Aramark Healthcare and regulatory agency standards and programs, continually monitoring operations, and completing assessments and necessary action plans to provide optimal nutrition care and meal service to patients/residents. Work cooperatively with medical staff as well as food & nutrition services staff to assure conformance to prescribed nutrition care orders. Provide education that ensures compliance with food safety, sanitation, and overall workplace safety standards. Provide appropriate and timely documentation that summarizes the nutrition care plan in a patient’s medical record, including nutrition assessment, diagnosis, plan, implementation, and progress towards goals. Maintain clinical productivity standards and accurate record keeping of daily clinical activities, including information for scheduling and billing. Demonstrate accountability for the proper use of patients’ protected health information. The position is considered Entry Level, and requires a Bachelor’s Degree and eligibility to practice dietetics in the state of employ.   Minimum Requirements Completed a minimum of a bachelor’s degree at a US regionally accredited university or college and course work accredited or approved by the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and Dietetics (ACEND) of the Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics. Completed an ACEND-accredited supervised practice program at a health-care facility, community agency, or a foodservice corporation or combined with undergraduate or graduate studies.  Pass a national examination administered by the Commission on Dietetic Registration (CDR). Obtain / Maintain required state licensure to practice dietetics. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Part Time Consulting Dietitian - Plano Job in Plano,"Part Time, Employee","Plano, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-consulting-dietitian-plano-job-plano-tx-us-171626137.aspx?mescoid=2900460001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,8375cb64dc9fc9e4e0b28e68f8f9eea5
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:12:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: The Sales Associate position is a key part-time position and will act as the point of contact for customers. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Stock merchandise adequately. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes; store merchandise in stock room or move directly to sales floor. Build merchandise displays. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves. Restock recovered merchandise. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Comply with company policies and procedures. Greet customers. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Assist with ordering merchandise using hand-held scanners, as needed. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays when necessary.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Effective interpersonal and oral communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. Knowledge of basic cash handling procedures. Basic mathematical skills. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",SALES ASSOCIATE Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-associate-job-columbus-oh-us-171719971.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a7271978288ae685477b053b56d71a45
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:23:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job **Manager, Cash Management 2****Requisition ID: 16018766****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Columbus****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: Yes, 10 % of the Time**Northrop Grumman Corporate Treasury is seeking a Manager of Cash Management for their Columbus, Ohio location\. This office serves as the corporate liaison to the many Defense Finance and Accounting Service \(DFAS\) Payment Offices and other governmental agencies to accelerate cash flow for the company\. This position works closely with all sectors in company and with our government customers and industry partners\.Principal Responsibilities+ Responsible for the direct supervision of up to five employees in the NG Ohio Treasury office\.+ Works with various Department of Defense payment offices, sector personnel and other governmental representatives to resolve contract and payment issues and problems to expedite payments to improve the company’s cash flow+ Works many projects and initiatives with the sectors related to government contracting and payment\. Provides advice and training as needed to sector personnel regarding contract structure, billings and payment+ Oversees the production of various daily and weekly status reports \(myInvoice\) to hundreds of sector personnel+ Responsible for overseeing the data, report design, training and user manual on the MOCAS Data Access system, which has over 1,000 users in all sectors of the company\.+ Manages the generation of various metrics reports and oversees the preparation of PowerPoint charts for distribution to sector management+ Oversees the balancing of sector cash receipts in our bank records to those from the government; notify sectors of changes and make updates to our records and data base systems as appropriate+ Represents the company on various industry association committees and working groups such as the Defense Industry Leaders, Aerospace Industries Association Cash Flow Committee and Integrated Award Environment Committee+ Participates in the preparation of the annual budget for the NG Ohio Treasury office+ Monitors and reviews monthly office expenditures to ensure they are charged to the correct account+ Works with internal IT Department to oversee the installation and operation of telecommunications equipment, copier, computer hardware, network and workstations as well as applicable software and software upgrades\. Works on office lease+ Responsible for overseeing the corporate resource for working with Dun & Bradstreet, government entities and sector personnel regarding System for Award Management and the Integrated Award Environment for the company’s DUNS, cage codes and other corporate information+ Serves as one of the industry representatives on the Wide Area Work Flow eBusiness program development team+ Helps to oversee the workers compensation program for current Ohio employees and claims for previously owned companies+ Works bus related product liability, claims and cases by working with the corporate law department, former Flexible employees and outside counsel\.+ Oversees corporate records storage+ Writes office policy and procedures and as needed+ Other assignments as required**Basic Qualifications:**+ Bachelor's Degree in Accounting, Finance, or Business Administration or related degree plus 10 years management experience+ Knowledge of the MOCAS and other vendor pay government services entitlement systems+ Familiarity with Federal FAR/DFARS, particular focus on regulations related to contract invoicing and payment\. Must be able to review proposed changes to government policy issues & regulations with other industry partners and sector personnel and circulates throughout the company/industry+ Working knowledge of major weapons systems government contracting, billing and invoicing+ Experienced with computer hardware and software, and a good working knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint+ Experience leading government/industry committees and providing training to sectors on latest government changes+ Knowledge of accounting and budgets+ Able to travel occasionally**Preferred Qualifications:**+ Good analytical, leadership, and organizational skills+ Strong written and oral communications skills+ Work style that lends itself to diligent monitoring and ability to facilitate corrective action+ Positive thought leader who has a proven record of handling multiple projects and tasks in a leadership role+ Has outstanding people skills and the ability to work well with personnel within the department, at all levels of the company, with our peer companies and with our government partnersNorthrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Manager, Cash Management 2_**Location:** _Ohio\-Columbus_**Requisition ID:** _16018766_ Report",Northrop Grumman Job Application for Manager,"Full Time, Employee","**Manager, Cash Management 2****Requisition ID: 16018766****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Columbus****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: Yes, 10 % of the Time**Northrop Grumman Corporate Treasury is seeking a Manager of Cash Management for their Columbus, Ohio location\. This office serves as the corporate liaison to the many Defense Finance and Accounting Service \(DFAS\) Payment Offices and other governmental agencies to accelerate cash flow for the company\. This position works closely with all sectors in company and with our government customers and industry partners\.Principal Responsibilities+ Responsible for the direct supervision of up to five employees in the NG Ohio Treasury office\.+ Works with various Department of Defense payment offices, sector personnel and other governmental representatives to resolve contract and payment issues and problems to expedite payments to improve the company’s cash flow+ Works many projects and initiatives with the sectors related to government contracting and payment\. Provides advice and training as needed to sector personnel regarding contract structure, billings and payment+ Oversees the production of various daily and weekly status reports \(myInvoice\) to hundreds of sector personnel+ Responsible for overseeing the data, report design, training and user manual on the MOCAS Data Access system, which has over 1,000 users in all sectors of the company\.+ Manages the generation of various metrics reports and oversees the preparation of PowerPoint charts for distribution to sector management+ Oversees the balancing of sector cash receipts in our bank records to those from the government; notify sectors of changes and make updates to our records and data base systems as appropriate+ Represents the company on various industry association committees and working groups such as the Defense Industry Leaders, Aerospace Industries Association Cash Flow Committee and Integrated Award Environment Committee+ Participates in the preparation of the annual budget for the NG Ohio Treasury office+ Monitors and reviews monthly office expenditures to ensure they are charged to the correct account+ Works with internal IT Department to oversee the installation and operation of telecommunications equipment, copier, computer hardware, network and workstations as well as applicable software and software upgrades\. Works on office lease+ Responsible for overseeing the corporate resource for working with Dun & Bradstreet, government entities and sector personnel regarding System for Award Management and the Integrated Award Environment for the company’s DUNS, cage codes and other corporate information+ Serves as one of the industry representatives on the Wide Area Work Flow eBusiness program development team+ Helps to oversee the workers compensation program for current Ohio employees and claims for previously owned companies+ Works bus related product liability, claims and cases by working with the corporate law department, former Flexible employees and outside counsel\.+ Oversees corporate records storage+ Writes office policy and procedures and as needed+ Other assignments as required**Basic Qualifications:**+ Bachelor's Degree in Accounting, Finance, or Business Administration or related degree plus 10 years management experience+ Knowledge of the MOCAS and other vendor pay government services entitlement systems+ Familiarity with Federal FAR/DFARS, particular focus on regulations related to contract invoicing and payment\. Must be able to review proposed changes to government policy issues & regulations with other industry partners and sector personnel and circulates throughout the company/industry+ Working knowledge of major weapons systems government contracting, billing and invoicing+ Experienced with computer hardware and software, and a good working knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint+ Experience leading government/industry committees and providing training to sectors on latest government changes+ Knowledge of accounting and budgets+ Able to travel occasionally**Preferred Qualifications:**+ Good analytical, leadership, and organizational skills+ Strong written and oral communications skills+ Work style that lends itself to diligent monitoring and ability to facilitate corrective action+ Positive thought leader who has a proven record of handling multiple projects and tasks in a leadership role+ Has outstanding people skills and the ability to work well with personnel within the department, at all levels of the company, with our peer companies and with our government partnersNorthrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Manager, Cash Management 2_**Location:** _Ohio\-Columbus_**Requisition ID:** _16018766_",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-cash-management-2-job-columbus-oh-us-171239017.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=3,,,d92bccac053a660bb095d0f8b5c18893
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:18:25:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Designers support three primary store priorities: Customers First, In Stock, and Store Appearance. Designers support Customers First by providing fast, thorough, and friendly service to customers. Designers interact with customers by welcoming them to the store, assessing their kitchen and/or bath project needs, providing showroom tours, setting them up for kitchen and/or bath measures, meeting with them to go over room designs and make purchasing recommendations. Designers support In Stock initiatives by assessing stock levels of samples and brochures and restocking them as necessary. Designers support the Store Appearance priority by ensuring special order displays and showrooms promote a shopping environment that is appealing and safe. By supporting these three priorities, Designers drive sales to support department and store goals.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provide fast, friendly serviceActively seek out customers in the aislesOffer a friendly greeting. Smile, and make eye contact with customersAsk open ended questions about customer's projects in order to determine their needs and level of expertiseShow enthusiasm with the customerWhen necessary, handle several customers at onceThank customers for shopping at The Home DepotFollow up with customers via telephone when appropriateIs knowledgeable about products and services offered by The Home DepotAnswer questions about merchandise for the customer's level of expertiseDescribe features and benefits of merchandiseExplain the steps needed to complete projects and the products neededAssist customers with special orders and installed salesNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience 2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions Seeks to fully understand the customer's needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customer's concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Kitchen/Bath Designer Job in Powell,Full Time,"Powell, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/kitchen-bath-designer-job-powell-oh-us-170914459.aspx?mescoid=2700411001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),96afffbea8794b12592320f6e45dd903
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:19:25:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-PT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-pt-job-columbus-oh-us-171883025.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7d31295538fb4eb7fd1c939e8a3dd9a0
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:19:27:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities       DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.     Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-PT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-pt-job-columbus-oh-us-171731965.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),878fccbd7b9bc09b64b71904efee66a3
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:19:32:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities       DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.     Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-PT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-pt-job-columbus-oh-us-171714510.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d8a6729f95102e46aa1186fe15acf419
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:19:45:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: Supervise store employees. Assist with efficient management of inventory and effective presentation of merchandise. Ensure a safe working environment while providing for the protection of company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Open the store a minimum of two days per week; close the store a minimum of two days per week. Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; deposit money in bank. Assist in ensuring the financial integrity of the store through strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Manage store in Store Manager's absence. Assist Store Manager, as directed, with scheduling employees; enter payroll information into computer. Assist Store Manager, as directed, in providing adequate training for employees. Review operating statements to identify business trends (including sales, profitability, and turn), expense control opportunities, potential shrink, and errors. Order drop-shipments and other areas of store as designated by store manager. Follow prescribed ordering practices to ensure the meeting or exceeding of in-stock targets; review ordering plan, seasonal direction and inventory management issues on a weekly basis. Assist with the efficient staging, stocking and storage of merchandise; unload trucks. Ensure that merchandise is presented according to established practices and Store Manager direction; utilize merchandise fixtures properly including presentation, product pricing and signage. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist in maintaining accurate inventory levels by controlling damages, markdowns, scanning, paperwork, and facility controls. Conduct safety meetings; help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Assist Store Manager in ensuring employee compliance Complete all paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to read and interpret documents such as diagrams, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedures manuals. Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to learn and perform IBM cash register functions to generate reports. Knowledge of inventory management and merchandising practices. Effective oral and written communication skills. Effective interpersonal skills. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices (deposits, store keys, SAFE program, etc.) Good organization skills with attention to detail. Ability to solve problems and deal with a variety of situations where limited standardization exists. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent strongly preferred. One year of experience in a retail environment and six months supervisory experience preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",ASST STORE MGR Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/asst-store-mgr-job-columbus-oh-us-171731970.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),83146fc30f7d133af250f439f0f4f2d2
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:29:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary EVENT Specialist PART TIME SALES   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our Advantage Solutions winning team as a retail event demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store brand ambassador job influences the buyer’s behavior through customer education, engagement, and enthusiastically promoting and demonstrating the product.      Responsibilities: Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which creates a positive shoppers experience and generates enthusiasm for the product and event Purposefully move around the event area to actively engage shoppers Responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines  Qualifications: High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales _PSS Job in Lewis Center,Part Time Employee,"Lewis Center, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-_pss-job-lewis-center-oh-us-171849151.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=16,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,b11390d085ea4a1faa672500fce73b3d
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:30:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Night Shift Vault Clerk opportunity in Dallas with leading national bank. Warehouse experience preferred, but not required. This is a 12-month contract-to-hire, and they would hire on permanently based on performance, attendance, etc. The pay for the initial contract is $11/hr. In order to get submitted you MUST be able to Skype/Facetime/Google Hangout with your recruiter. If you do not have a smart phone/computer with a video camera or access to one, please do not apply as this is MANDATORY. Description:Schedules between 3:30PM – Midnight, M-F In a Fast Paced Warehouse Operations Environment• Mortgage document handling background preferred• Physical standing, walking, reaching, lifting is required• Lifting up to 50 LBs• Ability to climb up and down on secure ladders throughout the day• Ability to read and match numbers, letters and specific data on documents / files (great attention to detail)• Experience in a production based, goal oriented environment• Attention to detail with the ability to process quickly and accurately• Ability to work on Saturdays or OT hours on short notice• Ability to meet minimum individual production standards• Ability to meet minimum quality standards• Team orientation• Excellent timeliness and attendance is required   If you're interested in this role and the night shift, apply ASAP!   ",Night Shift Vault Clerk Opportunity in Dallas with Leading National Bank Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Dallas, TX 75212",,http://jobview.monster.com/night-shift-vault-clerk-opportunity-in-dallas-with-leading-national-bank-job-dallas-tx-us-171224809.aspx?mescoid=4300728001001&jobPosition=4,,Customer Support/Client Care,9b09829ee6ab89c2b8772a4cb807a46e
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:30:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PROFILEProvides operations functions in one or all of the following areas: operates high volume duplicating equipment, performs associated copying tasks, operates high volume document scanning equipment, operate high volume mail processing equipment. Ships and receives product and supplies, sorts, distributes and handles incoming and outgoing mail/faxes, as well as applies necessary postage. Provides copier maintenance and/or repair of customer site equipment. May also perform one of the following at entry level: bindery, QC and final check, housekeeping, file services, call center representative, etc. This position reports directly to the Site Manager, Site Supervisor or Assistant Site Manager, depending on site personnel configuration.JOB DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESRuns high volume copy machines and performs binding and finishing work.Operate high volume scanners.Operate image handling softwareOperate MS Office and Email systemsEnsures convenience copiers are working properly, checking for quality via daily inspections. Clears paper jams and informs technicians of specific problems.Maintains records for management reports and inventories of supplies needed.Distributes office supplies, fax transmissions and mail to company personnel and/or designated drop-off points as required.Calculates charges for jobs performed and maintains some billing logs.Responds to and coordinates all service calls required by customer.May perform filing duties in conjunction with specific customer requests.Delivers completed jobs to pre-determined customer locations within and outside of the site.Maintains daily meter and service logs.May travel between customer's buildings.Answers customer questions regarding status or feasibility of job requests.Ensures upkeep of convenience copier areas by keeping neat and well stocked.Performs duties related to the shipping and/or receiving of materials.Uses shrink-wrap machine, paper cutter, hole driller, bindery equipment, jogger, tape machine, stackers, electric stapler and scales in completion of various jobs contracted.Uses all copier equipment, calculator, fax machine, postage meter and some PC.Performs filing duties, which may include 'purging' and archiving old documents.Performs other duties as assigned.QUALIFICATIONS (Education, Experience, and Certifications)Typically Required:Requires high school diploma, GED, or equivalent work experience.Some related copy job experience is preferred.May require a valid driver's license and minimum levels of auto insurance coverage per Ricoh policy.Demonstrated competency in basic computer skills including proficiency in MS Office Suite.Ricoh is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer -- Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled.",Copy and Mail Center Specialist Job in Columbus,Full Time/ Employee,"Copy and Mail Center Specialist Job in Columbus 43240, Ohio US",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/copy-mail-center-specialist-job-columbus-oh-us-171785051.aspx?mescoid=4300759001001&jobPosition=6,,Customer Support/Client Care,9932cd402bd6cebf0dce676afed55496
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:30:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities       DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.     Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-PT Job in Jefferson,Full Time,"Jefferson, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-pt-job-jefferson-oh-us-171709002.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),34e8eb6f88a120364a79e93cccbd48fe
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:30:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Body Shop Technician Level 5A Body Shop Technician will repair or replace damaged body parts back to Pre-Accident Condition with factory and dealership specifications. Quality repair need to meet or exceed the original factory fit and finish. The end result should be an invisible repair.Rush Enterprises is a premier provider of quality products and services to commercial equipment users. We are customer-focused, people-oriented, and financially motivated to deliver excellent outcomes for customers, shareholders, vendors and our people.We offer a rewarding career with a leader in the transportation industry. Grow with us as we continue to expand our network of locations and services. Rush Enterprises is always looking for good people to join our team.Responsibilities1. Review each repair order, work order, and estimator's notes to understand repairs needed prior to beginning work on the vehicle.2. All repairs must be completed according to the documentation on the repair order or the supplement.3. Knowledge of the manufacturer's and technical repair process.4. Ability to use frame and measuring equipment per vendor procedures.5. Perform initial teardown of vehicle.6. Identify parts for cut-in and edging.7. Perform all repair procedures according to factory specifications and company policy. I-Car Standard.8. Perform and sign-off on all quality check before sending vehicle to paint department.9. Re-assemble painted vehicle and painted parts.10. Perform a final quality check and review of work order prior to sending the vehicle to the detail department.11. Work with apprentice or lesser skilled technicians in developing repair skills.BenefitsWe offer exceptional compensation and benefits, 401K and stock purchase, incentives for performance, training, and opportunity for advancement - all in a culture that appreciates and rewards excellence, a positive attitude and integrity.",Body Shop Technician Level  Job in Irving,Full Time Employee,"Irving, TX","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials Automotive Sales and Repair Services",http://jobview.monster.com/body-shop-technician-level-5-job-irving-tx-us-171808483.aspx?mescoid=4900866001001&jobPosition=7,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c36ecdb7efaead242af006b6c576e7fc
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:30:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-PT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-pt-job-columbus-oh-us-171681451.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),baf2ee1071903a9ac964c953ef7e65fb
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:31:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T: So Much More of What You Work For Looking for an opportunity where you can put your energy and enthusiasm to work to create unlimited earning potential? Of course you are. How about a chance to learn, grow and advance with the number one wireless company in America? Even better. We're AT&T, and the only thing we enjoy more than pioneering and selling the latest devices is helping people make the most of them. Our retail opportunities are among the best, offering you great pay, strong benefits, advancement potential and a work environment full of fast-paced fun. Opportunity, Security and Great People Find out what it's like to work in an industry that's not about to slow down- with a company that has a legacy of successful innovation. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $47,175.00 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $55,521 per year. Round out your experience with training on the latest technologies and devices today, tomorrow and for as long as you work with us As you learn and succeed, you'll be eligible for new opportunities and financial rewards And every day, you'll work in a fast-paced environment with customers and colleagues that appreciate your energy and assistance JOB DESCRIPTION Develop and attain customer experience and sales objectives for store. Sell all products and services offered by the Company. Meet all sales objectives. Handle all administrative aspects of the sale including: completing customer contracts and warranties, pulling products from inventory, accepting customer payments and filing the completed orders. Maintain strong knowledge of all products, accessories, pricing plans, promotions and service features. Maintain knowledge of competitive offers and provide critical market feedback to the Store Manager regarding local competition and product/service needs. Handle service inquiries from customers. Provide efficient, courteous customer service and assist in all aspects of product offerings and services. Ensure an extraordinary customer experience. Position may be commissioned and quota based. With this position you need the flexibility to potentially work one of the stores within 15 miles as the needs of the business dictate. GENERAL DUTIES The essential functions listed below are representative of duties performed by this job title. Duties generally include but are not limited to the following: GENERAL ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS WHICH ARE NORMALLY REQUIRED: Possess a competitive spirit and desire to meet and exceed sales goals Stay up-to-date on the latest data/entertainment technology and devices, such as Wi-Fi, data devices, TV entertainment tools Understand customers' needs and help them discover how our products meet those needs Multi-task in a fast paced team environment Educate and engage customers through product demonstrations Interact with customers and provide prompt and courteous customer service to all customers The successful candidate will be able to perform the following with or without reasonable accommodation: Ability to work flexible hours, including evenings, weekends and holidays Ability to stand for long periods of time Ability to complete all paperwork completely, accurately, in a timely manner Ability to lift up to 25 pounds Ability to operate a personal computer, wireless equipment, copier and fax Ability to work in other locations as the needs of the business dictate may be required. Complete all aspects of opening and closing the store in accordance with written procedures. Submit all transaction journals on a daily basis. Assists with inventory maintenance May be required to wear a uniform This Requisition is for the following locations 13710 Dallas Parkway, Dallas TX 75240 17489 Preston Road, Dallas TX 75252 Desired Qualifications: 1-3 years retail/customer facing/sales experience preferred. Retail Sales Consultants are paid a competitive hourly rate and can earn additional monthly commission dollars by meeting and/or exceeding sales objectives! Provisions listed in these job descriptions may be changed or modified by AT&T Mobility without prior notice at any time, at the Company's sole discretion.",Retail Sales Consultant North Dallas TX (Alpha and South Preston) Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-north-dallas-tx-alpha-south-preston-job-dallas-tx-us-171910614.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=20,,,ef4b5872040207e00c042bc6de40f188
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:57:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"At AT&T, our job is to deliver the future before anyone else. We do this with people. People who want to create and deliver new technology that can transform the lives of our customers, our communities and our society. Our professionals innovate every day, whether they are working on upgrading our wireless and broadband infrastructure or delivering new possibilities for our consumer and business customers. They make the impossible, possible. The TDP-Network Operations program is a development program that provides the opportunity for participants to collaborate with project teams while gaining broad experience across the AT&T Network Operations organization. This program will allow you to gain the professional development and peer/leadership support that will help you jump start your career with AT&T. Being part of this program will help you build your technical, problem-solving, communication, and analytical skills to achieve real impact at a much earlier stage than many of your peers. It will also give you the ability to have plenty of networking opportunities that include key executive leadership sessions, business area and industry overview presentations, volunteer and social activities and Individual team member responsibilities. After the initial training, you will continue to showcase your skills on a variety of technical platforms, disciplines and strategic project areas and support key strategic initiatives across Network Operations. Specifically, as a Manager Quality/M&P/Process, your primary responsibilities will include possessing the ablity to build customer-facing self service tools based on strong iOS, Android, and HTML5 skill base. Ideal candidate is a thought leader who has experience with UI/UX, shows creative thinking, and possesses the ability to identify digital care customer improvement solutions and trends. This person is open to new ideas and can present technical high-level concepts and solutions to internal and external teams. Has experience with knowledge base workflow-driven solutions. This candidate is responsible for the ideation and development of digital care tools and applications as well as improvig the User Interface and Experience to the tools. AT&T will not sponsor applicants for work visas of any kind for this position.Bachelor Degree or related experience preferred Experience; Computer science experience. Excellent problem solving. User Interface, Creative design, and excellent PC and communication skills. AT&T will not sponsor applicants for work visas of any kind for this position.",Manager Quality\M&P\Process TDP Network Operations Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-quality-m-p-process-tdp-network-operations-job-dallas-tx-us-171904215.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=5,,,c84ba6096d56d1523368583c18bc3a14
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:58:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-Plano ID  79225 Posted Date  7/11/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Oversee and assist in preparation of food items for the day and dating products Oversee and assist in setting up and breaking down of stations designated by the manager Cook and otherwise prepare foods according to recipes and directions Responsible for use of correct portions when preparing and serving items on the line Maintain daily temperature logs Responsible for taking samples of all food items on the line prior to serving the customers Alert management and pull food items that do not meet quality expectations Complete opening and closing station checklists Greet customers as they approach and leave the serving line Ask customers about the quality of their service and handle any complaints (with assistance from the manager on duty) while maintaining a positive attitude and smile Oversee and assist in maintaining a clean work station (including floors, work areas, equipment, walls, refrigerators, and meat blocks) Ensures that all work areas and serving utensils are cleaned and sanitized Responsible for proper disposal of waste from the service line Transfers supplies and equipment between storage and work areas by hand or by cart Assist with daily STEP observations and report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Additional Job Functions: Cross-train in areas as required by your manager Able to work in concessions, catering, and special events required by your manager Perform task as requested by your manager on a weekly, bi-weekly or monthly basis Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Supervisory Responsibilities: Oversee and direct the employees working on the line to ensure timely and effective service of the customers. Request support from utility workers for sanitation issues of the line as needed. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Oversee and assist in preparation of food items for the day and dating products Oversee and assist in setting up and breaking down of stations designated by the manager Cook and otherwise prepare foods according to recipes and directions Responsible for use of correct portions when preparing and serving items on the line Maintain daily temperature logs Responsible for taking samples of all food items on the line prior to serving the customers Alert management and pull food items that do not meet quality expectations Complete opening and closing station checklists Greet customers as they approach and leave the serving line Ask customers about the quality of their service and handle any complaints (with assistance from the manager on duty) while maintaining a positive attitude and smile Oversee and assist in maintaining a clean work station (including floors, work areas, equipment, walls, refrigerators, and meat blocks) Ensures that all work areas and serving utensils are cleaned and sanitized Responsible for proper disposal of waste from the service line Transfers supplies and equipment between storage and work areas by hand or by cart Assist with daily STEP observations and report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Additional Job Functions: Cross-train in areas as required by your manager Able to work in concessions, catering, and special events required by your manager Perform task as requested by your manager on a weekly, bi-weekly or monthly basis Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Supervisory Responsibilities: Oversee and direct the employees working on the line to ensure timely and effective service of the customers. Request support from utility workers for sanitation issues of the line as needed. Required Qualifications: Great customer service and communication skills Strong leadership and supervisory skills Ability to work in a team environment Serve Safe Certification Ability to follow detailed written and verbal instructions Desired Qualifications: Food service experience High school education or equivalent Work Environment: Most often works in front-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, loud noise, chemicals and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Food Service Lead Worker - Texas Heart Hospital Nutrition Services Job in Plano,"Full Time, Employee","Plano, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/food-service-lead-worker-texas-heart-hospital-nutrition-services-job-plano-tx-us-170968082.aspx?mescoid=3500611001001&jobPosition=3,,Food Services/Hospitality,23d697e2dbc66be9414cac6a002fb231
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:20:59:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Vault Clerk opportunity in Dallas with leading national bank. Warehouse experience preferred, but not required. This is a 12-month contract-to-hire, and they would hire on permanently based on performance, attendance, etc. The pay for the initial contract is $11/hr. In order to get submitted you MUST be able to Skype/Facetime/Google Hangout with your recruiter. If you do not have a smart phone/computer with a video camera or access to one, please do not apply as this is MANDATORY. Description:Schedules between 9AM-6PM, M-F In a Fast Paced Warehouse Operations Environment• Mortgage document handling background preferred• Physical standing, walking, reaching, lifting is required• Lifting up to 50 LBs• Ability to climb up and down on secure ladders throughout the day• Ability to read and match numbers, letters and specific data on documents / files (great attention to detail)• Experience in a production based, goal oriented environment• Attention to detail with the ability to process quickly and accurately• Ability to work on Saturdays or OT hours on short notice• Ability to meet minimum individual production standards• Ability to meet minimum quality standards• Team orientation• Excellent timeliness and attendance is required   If you're interested in this role, apply ASAP!  ",Vault Clerk (Day Shift) Opportunity in Dallas with Leading National Bank Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Dallas, TX 75212",,http://jobview.monster.com/vault-clerk-day-shift-opportunity-in-dallas-with-leading-national-bank-job-dallas-tx-us-171224577.aspx?mescoid=4300728001001&jobPosition=5,,Customer Support/Client Care,050f232f4fe632ad02b2a89645bda7b5
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:21:54:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Business Analyst Lead. This job will have the following responsibilitiesBusiness Analyst LeadAbility to evaluate the business need and produce technical explanations to IT partners (functional design). Ability to write user stories including acceptance criteria.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.ToolsBlueprint experience a plus.JIRA experience a plus.ALM experience a plus.Qualifications & Requirements:5-7 yrs experience as an IT Business Analyst Excellent communication skillsBe able to validate functional design, create technical design, technical capability recommendations to help backlog prioritizationMaintain the developer backlog, tracking developer worksheet progress, running auto code review, performing code reviews",Business Analyst Lead Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-analyst-lead-job-columbus-oh-us-171810628.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,57e81fc2710ec6ce7a26d1e898d55755
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:21:55:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company: Top Tier Financial related CompanyPosition: AWS Cloud Security ArchitectLocation: Dallas, TX or Tampa, FLDuration: Contract or Contract to hireC2C ok. Note: If you have the required skills, please apply direct to ckelly@judge.com and put ""AWS Architect"" on the subject line. I assure you a prompt response and opportunity to interview with our client.Thank you!Position Summary:  Responsible for providing highly advanced technical and analytical skills to the Technology Risk Management (Information Security) Office.  Under the supervision of the Director, Security Architecture, will assist in the collection of requirements and contribute Subject Matter Expertise (SME) advice in the areas of Cloud security architectures, designs, policies, and control standards with a special emphasis on Amazon Web Services (AWS) Proactively engages staff throughout to communicate cloud security standards, guidelines and strategies.  Works with project teams to ensure technical quality of cloud security focused deliverables and adherence to security standards, governance and controls practices.  Considered a security and technical expert in cloud security technology, architecture, designs, systems implementation and integration, with deep, specialized knowledge of Amazon Web Services.  Conducts technical research when necessary to contribute to setting cloud security direction and strategy. Assists others on own team, or other teams where applicable, on cloud security projects or security-relevant tasks on technical projects. Principal Responsibilities:•           Provides Cloud Security SME advice and guidance related to all activities including Information as a Service (IaaS), Platform as a Service (PaaS), and Software as a Service (SaaS) initiatives, projects, plans, and reviews with a specialized focus on Amazon Web Services (AWS).•           Contributes subject matter expertise advice in the areas of Cloud security at both the enterprise and project level with a focus towards cloud security•           Works with teams to evolve cloud based products to adherence Information Security Policies and Control Standards•           Assists project teams during system design with the drafting of logical architectural and design models with a focus on cloud security•           Assists project teams during system design to promote the efficient deployment of IT assets to cloud environments in a secure and policy compliant manner.•           Advises project teams during system development to ensure compliance with security policies, guidelines, standards, controls, and governance•           Shares cloud security vision with key stakeholders by organizing discussions and formal presentations •           Participates in working groups of subject matter experts for definition and review of security standards, guidelines,  principles, governance and controls•           Actively contributes SME advice  to TRM members of the Cloud Hosting Evaluation Council•           Actively contributes SME advice  to TRM members of the Architecture Steering Committee and appropriate architecture roundtable meetings•           Works closely with Chief Information Security Architect to ensure a shared vision across for cloud architecture and security•           Provides technical guidance to cross-functional application development teams•           Contributes to the technology strategy, vision, requirements, and solutions for enterprise cloud  initiatives•           Designs, develops, and implements new cloud security technologies as necessary to support business and technology solutions•           Consults with application development teams to determine cloud security requirements and for planning            and delivering cloud based business solutions•           Assists in the development of estimates for cloud security for cloud hosted projects•           Contributes to defining time tables and project plans•           Assists in the definition of milestones and progress tracking•           Defines, publishes and maintains processes for security governance (i.e. compliance to principles, guidelines and standards)•           Coordinates the monitoring of the life cycle of specific cloud security assets•           Identifies, understands and documents extensions to, and variants from, cloud security and architecture standards Experience:•           Minimum of 5 years’ experience in cloud security architecture, designs, integration, and large enterprise cloud migrations Knowledge and Skills Required:•           Possesses and maintains deep knowledge and experience of cloud computing infrastructure, application development methodologies, best practices, and available and emergent services in several cloud provider environments including Amazon Web Services (AWS) •           Maintains current knowledge of cloud security technologies and architecture marketplace •           Advanced analytical skills•           Advanced technical skills – both breadth and depth•           Bachelors Degree in a technical discipline or related experience preferred•           Excellent communications skills (written and verbal)•           Excellent collaborative skills Education, Training &/or Certification:  Bachelors degree in a technical discipline or related experience preferred",Cloud Architect (AWS) Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/cloud-architect-aws-job-dallas-tx-us-171838048.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=13,,IT/Software Development,7bcf60e55810ae360362e3f26065461f
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:09:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: Supervise store employees. Assist with efficient management of inventory and effective presentation of merchandise. Ensure a safe working environment while providing for the protection of company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Open the store a minimum of two days per week; close the store a minimum of two days per week. Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; deposit money in bank. Assist in ensuring the financial integrity of the store through strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Manage store in Store Manager's absence. Assist Store Manager, as directed, with scheduling employees; enter payroll information into computer. Assist Store Manager, as directed, in providing adequate training for employees. Review operating statements to identify business trends (including sales, profitability, and turn), expense control opportunities, potential shrink, and errors. Order drop-shipments and other areas of store as designated by store manager. Follow prescribed ordering practices to ensure the meeting or exceeding of in-stock targets; review ordering plan, seasonal direction and inventory management issues on a weekly basis. Assist with the efficient staging, stocking and storage of merchandise; unload trucks. Ensure that merchandise is presented according to established practices and Store Manager direction; utilize merchandise fixtures properly including presentation, product pricing and signage. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist in maintaining accurate inventory levels by controlling damages, markdowns, scanning, paperwork, and facility controls. Conduct safety meetings; help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Assist Store Manager in ensuring employee compliance Complete all paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to read and interpret documents such as diagrams, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedures manuals. Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to learn and perform IBM cash register functions to generate reports. Knowledge of inventory management and merchandising practices. Effective oral and written communication skills. Effective interpersonal skills. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices (deposits, store keys, SAFE program, etc.) Good organization skills with attention to detail. Ability to solve problems and deal with a variety of situations where limited standardization exists. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent strongly preferred. One year of experience in a retail environment and six months supervisory experience preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",ASST STORE MGR Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/asst-store-mgr-job-columbus-oh-us-171697858.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),091411505778c8ce81c4bd19dc20668f
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:09:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview   Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: This Lead Sales Associate position is a full-time Key Carrier position, based on the store operating needs and will function as a Cashier and/or Stocker and act in a lead capacity in the absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager. Assist in setting and maintaining plan-o-grams and programs. Provide exemplary customer service. Perform other duties as necessary to maximize profitability, customer satisfaction, and teamwork, while protecting company assets and reducing losses.   Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Unload trucks according to the prescribed process for the store. Follow company work processes to receive, open and unpack cartons and totes. Stock merchandise; rotate and face merchandise on shelves and build merchandise displays. Restock returned and recovered merchandise. Order zones and drop shipment categories, following prescribed ordering practices, as assigned by the Store Manager. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist customers by locating merchandise. Bail cardboard and take out trash; dust and mop store floors; clean restroom and stockroom. Greet customers as they enter the store. Maintain register countertops and bags; implement register countertop plan-o-grams. Operate cash register and flatbed scanner to itemize and total customer's purchase; bag merchandise. Collect payment from customer and make change. Clean front end of store and help set up sidewalk displays. Help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Open and/or close the store under specific direction of the Area Manager. In the Absence of the Store Manager or Assistant Store Manager: Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; make bank deposits. Assist in maintaining strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Monitor cash levels and make appropriate drawer pulls as directed by the Store Manager. Monitor cameras for unusual activities (customers and employees), if applicable. Supply cashiers with change when needed. Complete all required paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines as assigned.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS:  Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to perform IBM cash register functions. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices. Effective interpersonal and oral & written communication skills. Understanding of safety policies and practices. Ability to read and follow plan-o-gram and merchandise presentation guidance. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent and six months of supervisory experience (or related experience/training) preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",LEAD SALES ASSOCIATE-PT Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-sales-associate-pt-job-columbus-oh-us-171679091.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),146f03126ad8fabdc6b0c7e28cd3d027
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:22:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Digital Siteminder Engineer. No C2C or Third Party Vendors.  This job will have the following responsibilities:Responsible for Siteminder product specific to Digital implementation. Proficient in updating and managing siteminder configurations and policy serversProficient in troubleshooting issues with siteminder agents and policy serversAbility to perform analysis of policy performanceCapable of managing large complex enterprise infrastructuresProvide performance tuning and evaluation on siteminder policy server and web agentsIdentify areas for improving efficiency of repeatable processes, and develop software solutions (Workflow Engines, RPM, Java, BASH/Shell Script, etc) Create, implement, and adhere to operational and technical standards, best practices, processes and procedures.Gather and document requirements for in-scope development work and changesIdentify and recommend changes to established practices and policiesWork closely with engineers and other SME to deliver proactive services such as patch management and software upgradesWork with all stages of SDLC, including rapid deployment of infrastructure components to development, and promotion to production environments.Coordinate with performance engineers, application development teams, GTI architects and subject matter experts to conduct and coordinate performance testing analysis of infrastructure and platform componentsUnderstand operational support model and work with the Support team during implementation and rollout of new services, upgrades, products and configurations, as appropriateProvide technical assistance with the most challenging issues that span multiple systems, or show recurring trends that have not been successfully resolved",Digital Siteminder Engineer Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/digital-siteminder-engineer-job-columbus-oh-us-171914597.aspx?mescoid=1700170001001&jobPosition=18,,IT/Software Development,c166064d270ef4fb2cf9b963d2695a8d
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:24:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ciber Inc., is seeking a Infor / Lawson Installation/System Administration Consultant, located in the United States.   Requirements:Bachelor’s Degree5+ years of hands on Infor / Lawson experience. Ability to manage multiple client assignments, tasks and priorities, and work independentlyExcellent time management and organizational skillsExceptional verbal and written communication skillsAbility to travel up to 50%Desired Skills:LSF Installer for Core Infor Windows Environment – version 10LSF Installer for Core Infor Unix Environment – version 10Landmark installationIPA installationMing.le installationMobile Supply Chain Management (MSCM) InstallerWebSphere Certified TechnicianLawson Security/Landmark Security This position requires the successful completion of a background investigation and/or drug screen.  Ciber, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities. Learn.     Ciber’s Infor practice is one of Infor’s largest system integration partners. We were also named the Alliance Partner of the Year in 2014. We provide everything from project strategy to implementation to managed services. Our deep-rooted relationship with this trusted partner gives us unmatched functional and technical experience and knowledge of the latest Infor products.   Play. Keep discovering! Click here. Grow. For more than 40 years, Ciber has delivered the technical savvy and IT solutions that help businesses achieve strategic goals. A global IT consulting company with some 6,500 people, Ciber has offices on four continents and in 15 countries. Founded in 1974, Ciber remains client focused and results driven. The company trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE: CBR). For more information, visit www.ciber.com.",Infor / Lawson Installation/System Administration Consultant Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/infor-lawson-installation-system-administration-consultant-job-dallas-tx-us-170912494.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,22427ba58ffa71bc50d13a378f3edaef
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:25:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title Building Engineer (Plano, TX) Auto Req ID 42574BR Job Description OVERVIEW The Operating Engineer provides maintenance engineering and equipment reliability services for mid-rise office buildings. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS Provide maintenance, preventative maintenance, and troubleshooting on office building and garage. Specific knowledge of commercial, roof top, HVAC package units preferred. Ensure preventative maintenance procedures are implemented and followed throughout the properties. Provide day-to-day maintenance support for equipment reliability issues. Ensure maintenance instructions and spare parts lists are accurate. Identify opportunities to improve the reliability of his/her assigned systems, recommend solutions, and manage implementation. Effectively communicate with Chief Engineer and Property Manager regarding equipment reliability and maintenance activities. Provide hands-on support to troubleshoot, identify, and resolve equipment issues. Support may be required outside of normal shift including nights, weekends and holidays. This position is on-call nights and weekends for building emergencies. Other tasks as assigned.  EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE Some college or technical school education is required. A Bachelor’s of Science degree from accredited institution is preferred. An Electrician’s License, SMA designation, or Refrigerant license is preferred. A minimum of five years of engineering experience, including experience with mechanical testing / maintenance and requesting and analyzing bids from service providers. A minimum of three to five years of utility systems / management and / or facilities / plant management and maintenance. One to three years of hands-on experience working with office building mechanical, plumbing, electrical, and fire systems.  KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES The ability to Develop and or change PM’s strategies, add / remove or update assets within the work order system. Comprehensive knowledge of engineering principles applied to design, operation and maintenance of building structures, and mechanical and electrical equipment for buildings. A working knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Project and Outlook) to correspond, type reports and prepare bid comparisons. Full/Part Time Full-Time Regular/Temporary Regular Org Marketing Statement About JLLJLL (NYSE: JLL) is a professional services and investment management firm offering specialized real estate services to clients seeking increased value by owning, occupying and investing in real estate. A Fortune 500 company with annual fee revenue of $5.2 billion and gross revenue of $6.0 billion, JLL has more than 280 corporate offices, operates in more than 80 countries and has a global workforce of more than 60,000. On behalf of its clients, the firm provides management and real estate outsourcing services for a property portfolio of 4.0 billion square feet, or 372 million square meters, and completed $138 billion in sales, acquisitions and finance transactions in 2015. Its investment management business, LaSalle Investment Management, has $59.1 billion of real estate assets under management. JLL is the brand name, and a registered trademark, of Jones Lang LaSalle Incorporated. For further information, visit www.jll.com JLL is focused on winning in the marketplace and being the industry leader, executing better than anyone else and innovating to create great products and services. We operate in an atmosphere of excellence, integrity, respect and trust. We bring a sense of teamwork, inclusion and diversity in everything we pursue. Our clients see the results as we address their needs, solve their problems and bring new ideas. As a distinguished market leader, we offer challenging career opportunities in an exciting environment. Our future success as a firm depends on our ability to attract, develop and retain the very best people in the business.Our values define who we are, underscore our commitment to clients and provide direction for everything we do.Our unique culture has been recognized by industry experts and our peers. We are:•A “best company to work for’ in multiple locations around the globe, including Chicago, San Francisco, London, Ireland, Shanghai and Hong Kong•World’s Most Ethical Companies from Ethisphere Institute for seven consecutive years •America’s 100 Most Trustworthy Companies from Forbes Magazine•#1 Top Corporate Real Estate Firm 2013 from Watkins Research Group, Inc. for six consecutive yearsThis partial list of awards demonstrates our record of achievement and our commitment to fostering an award-winning culture. For further information, visit www.jll.com Information Security StatementEmployees are expected, at all times, to perform their responsibilities in accordance with the JLL Code of Business Ethics and the firm’s corporate policies. Employees granted access to the firm’s information technology are expected to follow the firm’s guidance designed to promote best practices for information security, data privacy and the appropriate use of technology systems. EEO Statement JLL is committed to developing and maintaining a diverse workforce, and strongly believes in equal opportunity extended to all individuals in all aspects of the employment relationship. Please visit www.JLL.com for additional information on JLL’s commitment to equal opportunity.",Building Engineer (Plano,Full Time,"Plano, TX",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/building-engineer-plano-tx-job-plano-tx-us-171137193.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6baec143064b6a9613c7bde73d35cccb
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:48:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Java (J2EE) Engineer Location: Irving, TXDuration: 10 months+Compensation: $55.00 - $70.00 per hourWork Requirements: US Citizen, GC Holders or Authorized to Work in theUS Overview: TekPartners offers the most soughtafter Information Technology positions with some of the most well-knowncompanies in the world. Our client is a global organization that is oneof today's most trusted, well known brands in the security industry. They servemore than six million customers, making them the largest company of their kindin both the U.S. and Canada.  Summary:  Develops, designs, maintains, tests, installs, and provides high-level support on system software.Duties and Responsibilities:  Under general direction, provide technical expertise in the development of design and functional specifications. Code, test, and debug new software, as well as perform maintenance and enhancements to existing software. Produce deliverables related to assigned project(s). Assist in post-implementation support and system enhancements. Resolve customer software complaints and issues, as well as respond to suggested improvements, enhancements, and resolution. Work with the technical team to identify, assess, and correct application issues. As applicable, may assist in the development/support of software user manuals and test plans. Performs high-level design and development of business systems software and web apps, (ETL, BI, EAI) components and interfaces, as well as database layer work of complex tasks and projects. Collaborates with team members to resolve complex issues to assure the successful delivery of IT solutions. Required Technical Skills:  Java (J2EE) development experience. Enterprise Java including RestEasy Java Framework Experience developing and consuming RESTful and SOAP web services Ability to develop SQL queries for SQL Server and OracleAdditional Technical Skills and Experience(Preferred but not Required):  Spring Framework Jenkins Maven JDBC Mybatis Hibernate Agile experience Atlassian Products (JIRA, Confluence, Crucible) SVN HP Quality Center Our benefits package includes:  Comprehensive Medical Benefit  Competitive Pay 401K Retirement Plan And Much More About TekPartners:TekPartners is one of the fastestgrowing private staffing firms in the United States. We are a premier providerof highly qualified IT talent, Workforce Solutions and Business IntelligenceSolutions to many enterprise organizations across the nation. As experts in theindustry, our team continues to match proven talent to the right jobopportunity every day. TekPartners is an Equal OpportunityEmployer. ",Java (JEE) Engineer Job in Irving,Full Time,"Irving, TX 75014",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/java-j2ee-engineer-job-irving-tx-us-171551659.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,f4b7ee84ea1c3144167ff93f5e4245a8
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:48:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provide valet parking and front door guest services for residents, visitors, and guests. Proactively approach, greet and acknowledge all customers in a friendly, professional manner and provide quick responsive customer service. ESSENTIAL DUTIES Ensure each customer receives outstanding service by providing a friendly environment, which includes proactively greeting and thanking each customer. Operate, park and retrieve all vehicles in a safe manner by obeying all traffic laws, facility policies, and applicable pedestrian regulations. Maintain established policies, procedures, objectives, quality assurance, and safety. Inform customer of relevant services, hours of operation, and after-hours key retrieval. Assist in maintaining the ramp congestion-free through traffic control, monitoring illegal parking, and immediately storing vehicles. Assist each guest into and out of their vehicles by opening/closing car doors, and retrieving/storing wheelchairs/strollers and belongings. Keep work area clean of debris. Follow established dress code and hygiene guidelines and proper work identification. Alert appropriate personnel of suspicious activity during the regular course of duty or of any unsafe driving conditions. Prepare and maintain accurate valet logs and other required data. Perform other duties as assigned. *Job duties may be modified at any time. Job Requirements:Must have a High School diploma or GED. Must be capable of driving both auto and manual transmissions. Ability to work in an environment that is not necessarily protected from weather and temperature changes with exposure to hot, cold, wet, humid, or windy weather conditions for long periods of time. Must be at least 18 years of age and possess a valid state issued driver’s license. Ability to walk/stand continuously. If this application leads to a conditional offer of employment, you will be subject to an employment/criminal background check in accordance with any federal and/or state and/or local specific law.",Medical city Dallas Valet (Par-time/Temp/Any Shift) Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75221",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-city-dallas-valet-par-time-temp-any-shift-job-dallas-tx-us-171597499.aspx?mescoid=3900654001001&jobPosition=19,,Food Services/Hospitality,87a2d1564757b993bf8ff12f7406fba8
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:48:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Columbus ID  41293 Posted Date  8/14/2015 Category  Hotel/Conference Centers Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks & Responsibilities:  Responsible for set-up and breakdown of all items transferred into and out of designated locations Follow chain of command Assist Catering Manager/Supervisor in all duties as directed Follow all policies and procedures according to Aramark standard operating procedures Service customers in a quick and professional manner Accurately inventory and record all product (in or out ) Essential Tasks & Responsibilities:  Responsible for set-up and breakdown of all items transferred into and out of designated locations Follow chain of command Assist Catering Manager/Supervisor in all duties as directed Follow all policies and procedures according to Aramark standard operating procedures Service customers in a quick and professional manner Accurately inventory and record all product (in or out ) Dependable and timely attendance record Ability to build relationships with guests and coworker Exhibit and practice the highest level of guest service skills Ambitious and willing to accept change, new procedures, and constructive comments Ability to coordinate multiple tasks, meet production/service time schedules, and adapt to necessary and unforeseen changes Demonstrates consistent professionalism in the execution of daily assignments Knowledge of how to set up and break down both a buffet and seated meal function Must be able to lift, but not limited to, 50 pounds Must be able to stand for long periods of time Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Cater Waiter Columbus Polaris Center Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/cater-waiter-columbus-polaris-center-job-columbus-oh-us-171818363.aspx?mescoid=3500614001001&jobPosition=18,,Food Services/Hospitality,eb88fdecd2cbf62343670bb2955bcf2b
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:49:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Columbus,Part Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-columbus-oh-us-171813435.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=16,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,83ab486cf8ffe16b98d19c94f7cd77d9
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:50:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"At AT&T, our job is to deliver the future before anyone else. We do this with people. People who want to create and deliver new technology that can transform the lives of our customers, our communities and our society. Our professionals innovate every day, whether they are working on upgrading our wireless and broadband infrastructure or delivering new possibilities for our consumer and business customers. They make the impossible, possible. The TDP-Network Operations program is a development program that provides the opportunity for participants to collaborate with project teams while gaining broad experience across the AT&T Network Operations organization. This program will allow you to gain the professional development and peer/leadership support that will help you jump start your career with AT&T. Being part of this program will help you build your technical, problem-solving, communication, and analytical skills to achieve real impact at a much earlier stage than many of your peers. It will also give you the ability to have plenty of networking opportunities that include key executive leadership sessions, business area and industry overview presentations, volunteer and social activities and Individual team member responsibilities. After the initial training, you will continue to showcase your skills on a variety of technical platforms, disciplines and strategic project areas and support key strategic initiatives across Network Operations. Specifically, as a Sr. Communications Specialist your primary responsibilities will include24X7 hour direct technical support for all product issues including technology and infrastructure delivered in a geographically dispersed environment including all 50 states. Assists customers regarding product and service problems and inquiries via social media. Performs root cause analysis for any high impact or repetitive issues via social media venues. Ensures proper handling and follow-up with customers, documents problems and corrective procedures. Delivers results on all key metrics including Customer Satisfaction, Task Accomplishment, Professionalism, Call Deflection & Self-Service adoption, and repeats. Works with Corporate Communications and Legal on a daily and weekly basis to ensure the appropriate responses and messages are being delivered via Social Media. This position is for Social Media Technical Support for AT&T Wireline products; provides hands on customer service, troubleshooting, and support via social media venues (Facebook, Twitter, etc) while delivering a best in class social media customer experience. Responsible for the day to day operations, incident management, technical support, administration, maintenance, implementation, and configuration for all Wireline technical issues with an emphasis on U-Verse. AT&T will not sponsor applicants for work visas of any kind for this positionPreferred Bachelor of Science degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Applied Science, Electrical Engineering, or Math or equivalent experience. AT&T will not sponsor applicants for work visas of any kind for this position.",Sr Communications Specialist TDP Network Operations Job in Richardson,,"Richardson, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-communications-specialist-tdp-network-operations-job-richardson-tx-us-171904202.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=2,,,e999ba235fb0996a813ae54ed926d714
United States of America,US,08/Nov/2015:23:51:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Rental AdministratorThe Rental Administrator is responsible for maintaining accurate rental and leasing customer information.Rush Enterprises is a premier provider of quality products and services to commercial equipment users. We are customer-focused, people-oriented, and financially motivated to deliver excellent outcomes for customers, shareholders, vendors and our people. We offer a rewarding career with a leader in the transportation industry. Grow with us as we continue to expand our network of locations and services. Rush Enterprises is always looking for good people to join our team.Responsibilities1. Rental unit files must be detail oriented and maintain files daily.2. Handle phones for the General Manager, and Sales Manager.3. Make reservations and do paperwork to check rental trucks in and out, including thorough physical damage inspection.4. Maintain rental customer list with up to date credit files and insurance certificates.5. Maintain lease customer mileage reports, obtain end of month mileage readings.6. Make telemarketing calls to solicit rental, lease or contact maintenance business.7. Coordinate rental truck washing and maintenance with shop.8. Prepare and print proposals for GM/Sales dept.BenefitsWe offer exceptional compensation and benefits, 401K and stock purchase, incentives for performance, training, and opportunity for advancement - all in a culture that appreciates and rewards excellence, a positive attitude and integrity.",Rental Administrator Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/rental-administrator-job-columbus-oh-us-171531771.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,7bbc80988967a9130adbbca9bde510d7
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:14:18:09,No,jobs.monster.com," IS/IT SUPPORT TECHNICIAN The North Sound Behavioral Health Organization (North Sound BHO) is pleased to announce an opportunity to join our team as an IS/IT Support Technician.  We are looking for a candidate with strong IT support skills to assist in supporting end users, maintaining network-related infrastructure (phones, printers, servers, etc.), and to help keep our network functioning with a high level of uptime.  Candidates will need current Windows desktop and server skills.  Experience with Office365 preferred.   If you are interested in playing a critical role in assuring quality behavioral healthcare in the North Sound community and believe you have the background and skills necessary, we invite you to apply!  We are located in Skagit County, one of the most beautiful regions of Washington State with easy access to Bellingham and Seattle. ABOUT NORTH SOUND BHO Our Mission: Improving the mental health and well-being of individuals and families in our communities. North Sound BHO (formerly named NSMHA) currently operates as a Regional Support Network (RSN) for publicly funded behavioral health services in a five county region in northwestern Washington. The five counties include: Island, San Juan, Skagit, Snohomish, and Whatcom.  North Sound BHO is responsible for the Medicaid funding for behavioral health, and our goal is to ensure eligible individuals and families receive appropriate, person centered and timely services.  Please visit our website www.nsmha.org for more information. PRIMARY POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES Provides technical support for end users.Maintains, analyzes, troubleshoots and repairs North Sound BHO’s network including user workstations, servers, phones and security hardware and software.Tests and installs software and updates on North Sound BHO equipment.Identifies and provides training opportunities for end users on the effective use of software used at North Sound BHO.Performs network, groupware, hardware, and software support functions.Ensures security of North Sound BHO’s computer network.Maintains current documentation of North Sound BHO’s computer network. QUALIFICATIONS, EXPERIENCE, & EDUCATION Knowledge of:Network operating systems.Implementing, monitoring, and maintaining security best practices.In depth knowledge of software used at North Sound BHO, including Microsoft Office programs. Education and Experience:Associates degree in Information Services, accounting, business, or other related field AND two or more years of experience providing computer/software technical support to end-users.Advanced PC skills including Microsoft Office and Operating Systems.An equivalent combination of training and/or experience, which provides the required knowledge and abilities. License and Certification:Valid Washington State driver’s license and proof of insurance at the time of hire and vehicle available for work-related travel. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION Starting salary is $ 60,576 DOE, plus a generous benefits package in excess of $35,000.  Position will remain open until a qualified applicant is selected. North Sound BHO is an Equal Opportunity Employer.  Visit www.nsmha.org/jobs for full job description and application. Send cover letter, resume and application to hr@northsoundbho.org   Please note that applications will not be accepted without a completed NSMHA application form.     ",IS/IT Support Technician Job in Mount Vernon,Full Time,"Mount Vernon, WA 98273",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/IS-IT-Support-Technician-Job-Mount-Vernon-WA-US-166988138.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=19,"$60,576.00+ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),5cfbfa68c4b1103975c6cb5b0c5228dc
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:13:34:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Object Systems International is looking for a proven test-driven development (TDD) coach to lead the charge in transforming the culture of a large software dev group made up of 30-35 individual Scrum teams into a passionate focus on velocity, quality, test coverage, and CI through test-driven development best-practices.  You will be embedded on one team after another, teaching them TDD theory, and showing them how to practically implement TDD.  You will also help the team responsible for build management assess CI tools, and implement them as part of the check-in and build processes.We need someone who passionately believes in TDD, and is expert at leveraging it to improve quality and velocity.  This position will be part mentor, part coach, and part software development guru.If you think you have what it takes to tackle this challenging position, we'd love to talk to you.Job Duties and Responsibilities:•Embed in one team at time to provide TDD training, coaching, and practical examples of how to do TDD using real stories•Write tests and code with the team•Mentor team members in TDD and other software dev best-practices•Develop training materials that can be used to improve training on subsequent training iterations•Work with the customer to establish working, valuable CI•Help teams reflect value of TDD through velocity and other metrics Required Skills/Experience:•3+ years of practical, hands-on TDD experience•7+ years of software development experience•3+ years developing on a Scrum team•Strong leadership, organization, and communication•Strong software development•Flexibility and adaptability•Strategic thinking•Proven ability to inspire organizational changePreferred Skills/Experience:•C#.Net software development•Java software development•C++ software development•Javascript software development•IIS•Apache•SQL Server 2008R2 or higher•TDD in large organizations•Instructor-led training•Over-the-shoulder training•Technical training course developmentRequired Education and/or Credentials:•Bachelor's degree or higherPreferred Education and/or Credentials:•Certified ScrumMaster or Scrum coachTO APPLY: Please respond to this e-mail and provide the following information.  An updated copy of your resume.Brief summary of how you meet the skills and experience needed for this position.Phone numbers you can be reached at, including your cell phone number.",Test-drive Development (TDD) Coach - () Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time,"Salt Lake City, UT 84123",,http://jobview.monster.com/Test-drive-Development-TDD-Coach-10071-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-167077942.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=12,,,2e4970cf71b7852a86184affaa73fa85
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:13:32:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Atkore International is an industry leader in the manufacture of Electrical Raceway and complimentary high value products, serving a wide range of construction, electrical, fire and security and mechanical applications.Atkore International is comprised of three Business Units: Conduit and Fittings, Cable Solutions and Mechanical Products and Solutions.  Privately held and steadily growing, we have more than 3,300 employees worldwide.We currently have an opening for a Service Desk Technician II based in our Headquarters office in Harvey, IL. Harvey is located approximately 30 miles south of Downtown Chicago.Reporting to the Manager, End User Computing in the Corporate Information Technology Department, the Service Desk Technician II has primary responsibility for providing live and remote technical support to end users and supporting and maintaining Atkore computer systems and equipment. This role is responsible for the coordination and follow-up of customer problems and assists with system administration as needed.Additional responsibilities include but are not limited to:Act as technical expert in assisting users in troubleshooting issues and resolving problems with computers, data and equipmentResearch and resolve complaints and problems in a timely Provide IT support to external users via phone and remote assistance toolsProvide live (in-person) IT support to Internal Atkore usersAssist visitors with obtaining Internet access at Atkore facilitiesEnter and update service desk tickets daily on behalf of users as necessaryResolve routine questions and problems on an everyday basisServe as first point of contact for all Information Technology issuesReset passwords and unlock accounts in Active Directory and AS400Move and install computer equipment at local facilitiesAssist with the administration of computer systems as necessaryDocument Service desk related solutions into problem solving standard work documentation for other techniciansMonitor the AS400 system and all jobs during work shiftConfigure, install and upgrade network connections, operating systems, software, and equipmentTroubleshoot problems with computer systems, including hardware and software, e-mail, network and peripheral equipment and makes repairs and corrections as requiredMaintain accurate records and prepare reports for all installed Atkore PC’sAssist systems programmers in isolating and resolving network problems.Perform repetitive motions such as bending and twistingStay current with newest technology to provide creative and efficient solutionsAssist users with troubleshooting of Atkore cell phonesDistribute software using SCCMManage Inventory of Computer Assets through Dell KaceManage the Deployment of Operating Systems using MDTOther duties as assignedBachelor’s Degree preferred (Associates Degree required)3-4 years of experience in a service desk role 1-2 years of experience as a Team LeadA+ Certification requiredStrong customer service skills and orientationExceptional written and oral communication skillsExceptional interpersonal skills, with focus on rapport-building, listening, and the ability to ask technical questions to the end user.Excellent technical computer troubleshooting skillsAbility to provide hands-on support to users throughout the building (desks, offices, conference rooms)Ability and willingness to work in a fast paced environmentKnowledge of basic computer hardware and peripheralsWorking technical knowledge of current systems, including Windows 7Knowledge of Citrix Go-to Assist.Experience with IBM Power7/AS400Experience with SCCM 2007,2012Experience with Ghost, and MDTWork requires frequent sitting, keyboarding, bending, twisting, lifting, walking and carrying equipment. Often requires crawling under desks and work stations and lifting computer equipment, frequently up to 40 pounds and occasionally up to 60 pounds.All associates must embrace and foster an environment that supports our core values of Integrity, Respect, Excellence, Teamwork and Accountability.    Atkore International offers a competitive salary package in addition to a comprehensive benefits package including Medical, Dental, Vision, 401(k) with Company Match and Flexible Spending Accounts.  Atkore International is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate because of age, color, disability, ethnicity, marital or family status, national origin, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, military veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.Atkore International is a diverse company that believes its employees are the foundation for investing in its future. Diversity and inclusion are keys to growing our business and providing a work environment that fosters contributions by all employees.Our dedicated employees are recognized around the world for their commitment to our customers’ success, combining product innovation, collaborative service and providing the broadest line of products into an offering that ensures they can operate as efficiently as possible. Join our team and align yourself with an industry leader!",Service Desk Technician II Job in Harvey,Full Time,"Harvey, IL 60426",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Desk-Technician-II-Job-Harvey-IL-US-167071781.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=1,,,b7b64649d8bf21fcc5c6dfbee692642a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:13:13:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"LEGAL SECRETARY/ PARALEGAL: Legal office looking for long term Legal Assistant. Qualified candidate must have experience in word processing Microsoft Word helpful and type 70+ wpm. Must be organized, detail oriented and able to multi-task. Some responsibilities include answering phones, transcribing, dictation and filing. If you are interested in this opportunity, please call 507-537-0591 and ask for Nancy. provided by The Marshall Independent",Legal Secretary/Paralegal Job in Marshall,Full Time,"Marshall, MN 56258",Legal Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Legal-Secretary-Paralegal-Job-Marshall-MN-US-167063523.aspx?ch=midwest&mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a477f8137e350822083ea576ff46bcc7
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:13:12:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More SATCOM Support Specialist Job #:  659911Apex Systems in Colorado Springs is looking for a Satellite Terminal Technician who is interested in taking on a new and exciting job!  If you have a desire to learn new processes, systems, and grow with this organization please send your resume to Barrett Zehner at bzehner@apexsystemsinc.com .   Required Experience:Perform technical support as required to monitor corporate infrastructure (i.e. LNS, CDS) for proper operation and also investigate and resolve anomalies in a timely manner (on and off hours) to ensure proper data detection, collection and integrity of corporate data products.Technical support, troubleshooting and system installation expertise by remote or fly-away on-site support.Perform C, Ku and X band earth terminal asset analysis to ensure assets are capable of supporting internal or external customer operational tasking.Conduct earth terminal and deployed systems troubleshooting and maintenance by either directly accessing the assets or interfacing with host teleport and contract maintainers to ensure operational requirements are met and/or required repairs are completed.Conduct C, X and Ku-Band satellite network analysis and troubleshooting as required. EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",SATCOM Support Specialist Job in Colorado Springs,Full Time Employee,"Colorado Springs, CO",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/SATCOM-Support-Specialist-Job-Colorado-Springs-CO-US-167072407.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),af8bf3e319a0c0f264642de70729dfdd
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:12:58:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More IT - Enterprise Resource Planning Consultant Job #:  649109Business Analyst - ImplementationPlease email resumes to ejohannsen@apexsystemsinc.com Description: Healthcare Software Implementation SpecialistOptum Technology’s is searching for Healthcare Implementation Specialist who will be responsible for developing and executing activities related to end-to-end implementation of our Healthcare administration systems. Responsibilities will include developing project plans, developing implementation processes, scoping and requirements, configuration processed and end-to-end technology and cutover preparation and management. Assist in growing our implementation consulting practice and establishing our end to end implementation cutover segments.The position will also be responsible for proactively supporting the implementation and configuration processes of each implementation segments. This responsibility will include managing work across different workforces as needed and completing execution deliverables through all program/project phases. The candidate will also have a basic understanding of the consulting cycle process within the healthcare industry. As a key contributor he/she will support the building of world class healthcare practice solutions through listening to client needs, proposal development and presentation of solutions.Responsibilities:• Deploy innovative healthcare industry-specific solutions that enable industry standards and processes.• Identify, assess and solve complex business integration problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors• Assess current state workflow and work with implementation team to validate proposed future state fits with overall project objectives• Work interactively with clients and client team members to configure, test and validate the software application environment• Perform account management to foster expansion of system usage and features within the organization• Responsible for coordinating training of administrators and super users• Follow installation standards, project plans, and related documentation to ensure a high level of success during the implementation process• Explain project goals to help client create an obtainable timeline• Assist client through Implementation Period for Preparation to Work with Trainers.• Responsible for problem solving/issue resolution on reported problems/incidents and questions• Queue monitoring for accuracy of logged calls and response time.• Direct and perform follow up as necessary to complete projects• Provide exceptional customer serviceQualifications:• Bachelor's Degree in a Health Information Management, Information Technology, or similar program• 3 years experience implementing software in a healthcare setting• 3 years working with health information system software products• 1 years claims processing in the Healthcare Industry• Experience with use of remote collaboration toolAssets:• Undergraduate degree in applicable area of expertise or equivalent experience• Experience translating Business Requirements into system solutions• Understanding of cloud technology• Understanding of a service-oriented architecture• Experience in complex projects with division or company-wide scope• Should be able to effectively communicate with business and other IT teams.• Experience with commercial software development and/or deployment• Self-starter, well organized, manage to a schedule, and strong communication skills (written and verbal         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",IT - Enterprise Resource Planning Consultant Job in Eden Prairie,Full Time Employee,"Eden Prairie, MN",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Enterprise-Resource-Planning-Consultant-Job-Eden-Prairie-MN-US-166964877.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),68ab195fa0ad9dade3d706efe492b42a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:12:53:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"COLE SCHOTZ P.C.APPLICATIONS/SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR- NEW JERSEY OFFICE:Major New Jersey law firm with multiple regional office locations seeks an Applications/Systems Administrator to join our New Jersey Office.  Duties include becoming intensely familiar with the firms applications and systems from both the end user standpoint as well as the systems side.  Resolve complex issues and escalated Level II / III requests from support and Help Desk staff.  This position will be responsible for keeping software up to date, maintaining databases and performing preventive system and network maintenance tasks necessary to keep systems up to date and to minimize system downtime.  Maintain a strong knowledge of legal applications such as iManage FileSite, Microsoft Office, Workshare, Payne Templates, Elite Enterprise, Fast Tax and others.   Strong knowledge of Windows 2008/2012 Administration with Active Directory (Provisioning, Group Policies, OU, scripting, etc.), Microsoft SQL Server (scripting as well as maintenance) and Systems Management tools (WSUS, SCCM, SNMP  etc.) required.  Maintain and monitor healthy SQL database environment.  Minimum 5 years of IT experience focused on both end user applications and application server operations and management.  We offer a competitive starting salary and comprehensive benefits package.  Please e-mail resume, which must include salary requirements, to: Gayle P. EnglertChief Human Resources OfficerCole Schotz P.C.Court Plaza North25 Main Street, P.O. Box 800Hackensack, NJ 07602-0800genglert@coleschotz.comPlease visit us at our website  www.coleschotz.com NEW JERSEY/NEW YORK/DELAWARE/MARYLAND/TEXAS/FLORIDA Cole Schotz is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Applications Systems Administrator Job in Hackensack,Full Time,"Hackensack, NJ 07601",,http://jobview.monster.com/Applications-Systems-Administrator-Job-Hackensack-NJ-US-166754916.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=13,,,d89d71bb748552105c99d1c804a80056
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:12:50:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Charlotte, North Carolina (NC) that is seeking an Implementation Project Manager. This role will work specifically with our Application Teams in the oversight of the Vulnerability Initiative Communicating and tracking remediation plans to solution paths within targeted dates. Escalating issues as appropriate. Responsibilities: Consults with project managers and project teams to establish appropriate implementation strategy, methods and plans for strategic initiatives that impact multiple or organization-wide systems, workflows or products with high risk Leads the development of complex business requirements Evaluates current business practices and policies and recommends most effective integration strategy May present alternative solutions to senior management Designs communication and training strategies, including identifying the appropriate learning process and timing Manages implementation resources and budgets, works with project teams and users to understand complex problems and focuses on bringing issues to resolution, escalating as necessary to meet timelines Manages multiple projects and designs solutions for delivery to the field Identifies best practices and creates new workflows and/or procedures May provide guidance and expertise to less experienced staff May also be responsible to miscellaneous business administrative initiativesREQUIREMENTS: 2+ years' experience in implementation with an additional 3+ years' experience in project management or implementation Demonstrates excellent communication skills both written and oral Ability to effectively work with/understand technical concepts around the vulnerabilities and impacted environments Working in a collaborative matrix organization Able to multi-task and prioritize",Implementation Project Manager - Vulnerability Job in Charlotte,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Charlotte, NC 28262",,http://jobview.monster.com/Implementation-Project-Manager-Vulnerability-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-167038406.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bc1b8b75f1d269d439fa6a5464651ab5
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:12:33:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a SQL Server DBA in New York, NY. This is a -hands-on position for a L3/L4 MS SQL Server DBA with very good knowledge of AWS.Responsibilities: Work independently and collaboratively Design, implementation, and migration of databases to AWS Responding to escalations Working with database engineering team on solutions / enhancements for recurring problems Manage SQL Server databases through multiple product lifecycle environments, from development to mission-critical production systems Refine and automate regular processes, track issues, and document changes Configure and maintain database servers and processes, including monitoring of system health and performance, to ensure high levels of performance, availability, and security Share domain and technical expertise, providing technical mentorship and cross-training to other peers and team membersREQUIREMENTS: 10+ years of experience in MS SQL Server database administration required Experience in design, planning and migration of databases to AWS is a must Strong knowledge of all AWS technologies and Services Experience in PowerShell and operational automation Experience with Performance Tuning and Optimization, using native monitoring and troubleshooting tools as well as 3rd party tools Experience with backups, restores and recovery models Knowledge of High Availability (HA) and Disaster Recovery (DR) options for SQL Server (Windows and SQL Server clustering, Mirroring, Log Shipping, Always On, etc) Experience is data transformation services and ETL tools Hands on working experience in SSIS and SSAS server Good interpersonal and communication skills",SQL Server Database Administrator Job in New York,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","New York, NY 10017",,http://jobview.monster.com/SQL-Server-Database-Administrator-Job-New-York-NY-US-166986778.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),567968682410fd640dfcd34e7c78661e
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:12:25:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Greenfield Advisors LLC is looking to hire an R Programmer for our Seattle, WA office. We are a boutique firm with 30+ years of experience in analytics and valuation in the real estate arena in a friendly, fairly casual office. We place a high premium on producing concrete answers to extremely complicated and abstract real-estate-related situations. Our employees are creative and come from a wide variety of backgrounds. The successful candidate will be responsible for the following:Converting designs and specifications into code.Managing project efforts. Compiling code and resolving compiler errors. Analyzing code to find causes of errors and revising programs. Data management and formatting.Creating and generating reports.Collaborating with fellow team members and product users.Adapting and improving knowledge of all related software. Learning new software as needed for the changing needs of the firm.Documenting your work for future reference.Requirements: At least 3 years using RDemonstrated ability to solve problems.Strong analytical and decision making abilities.A “can-do” attitude.Can translate ‘tech’ for non-technical people.Taking responsibility for delivering superior value and client service.Working well with people who have diverse abilities, experiences, and perspectives.Preferred:Experience in Real Estate related topicsParallel Computing 1 year using SQLCloud experience (AWS) We offer a generous compensation package, including:• A competitive salary, commensurate with experience, with a range between $27 and $36 per hour.• Health, prescription, dental, and vision insurance either fully paid by the company or supplemented, depending on which option you choose.• A 125 Cafeteria Plan with company paid HRA. (Flexible Spending and Dependent Care accounts available.)• Life/AD&D Insurance of $20,000 paid by the company.• Retirement 401(k) after one year of employment, with 100% match up to 15% of annual salary (or IRS limits).• Paid time off and ten days of vacation each year.This is an on-site, full-time, non-management position.  All employees must pass a rigorous background check.  U.S. citizens or permanent residents only at this time (VISA sponsorships are not available).  Please send your resume, and a cover letter that speaks directly to the minimum requirements listed above to:Lisa Mc SherryDirector, AdministrationPlease do not call, or fax, or mail. Every submission will be responded to within a week. Greenfield Advisors is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",R Programmer Job in Seattle,Full Time,"Seattle, WA 98121",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/R-Programmer-Job-Seattle-WA-US-166902581.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,27.00 - 36.00 $ /year,Experienced (Non-Manager),c4837aeff0739d5fa412e0e7dfad5c73
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:12:02:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Software Engineer II Blue Springs, MOIf you are interested in this position, the preferred way to apply is to email your resume to (Sam) at sberi@nwexs.com and include the job number in which you are applying for. You may also text 248.707.1071 with your questions.Responsibilities include:Plans and develops software utilizing Visual Basic, C# and other languages for products including PC based and embedded systems applications. Plans and coordinates assigned project from concept to post manufacturing. This includes aiding with the completion of the Project Identification and product requirements documents. Will be responsible for assuring project is completed in compliance with ISO-9001 requirements. This includes, but is not limited to, documenting test results, conducting design reviews and coordinating with manufacturing. Confers with Sales, Marketing, Production and Quality to clarify or resolve problems. Creates test procedures for solving problems. Performs experiments to determine necessary engineering parameters. Discusses, analyzes, summarizes and publishes with appropriate personnel, test results. Uses test data and reports to determine if design meets functional and performance specifications. Evaluates test results for possible application to development of other uses. Prepares or directs preparation of product or system layout and detailed drawings and schematics. Performs product, component and system design. Coordinates activities with appropriate approval agencies to ensure compliance of products with industry standards. Confers with other engineering personnel and prepares design modifications as required. Develops new methods and techniques for products requested by marketing. Is expected to solve difficult problems or issues during product development with assistance from other personnel. Interacts with customers to understand product application and to provide solutions to their requirements and product problems. Assists or recommends procedures for the operation of new or existing processes with product development. Studies ASME, ANSI, MIL, AISI, IFI, NACE, API, AWS and NFPA standards and applies these standards to proposed designs. Is also responsible for learning and applying any new standard listed in a product specification. Maintains professional and technical knowledge by attending educational workshop and seminars, reviewing professional publications, networking and participating in professional societies. Maintains the confidentiality of all information processed. Ideal candidates must possess the following in order to perform the functions of the job: Required:Bachelor’s degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Software Engineering or Computer Science . Five years of post-degree experience. Proficient in Microsoft Office suite. Background in writing applications that work with embedded electronic products. Preferred :Master’s degree in a related technical field. Experience with embedded electronic designs utilizing C programming. If you are interested in this position, the preferred way to apply is to email your resume to (Sam) at sberi@nwexs.com and include the job number in which you are applying for. You may also text 248.707.1071 with your questions. Feel free to also send me an invitation to connect on LinkedIn.You can also visit our website for other open positions. We try and keep them current. If it is posted, it is still active. Nationwide Technical & Executive Search, Inc.www.nwexs.com",Software Engineer II # Job in Blue Springs,Full Time,"Blue Springs, MO",,http://jobview.monster.com/Software-Engineer-II-37749-Job-Blue-Springs-MO-US-166972217.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=7,,,7f6233915b600c80e3ddfca15fb4c98a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:12:01:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More System Support Analyst Job #:  660318 Position: System Support AnalystLocation: Minneapolis, MN Requirements:Basic Qualifications5 years systems support analysis experience.Minimum Qualifications • 5 years’ experience performing network set up, device functionality and configurations.Demonstrated experience serving as the subject matter expert in software configurations and management tools. Demonstrated experience creating and maintaining configuration documentation for printing devices.Advanced knowledge of printers monitoring tools: Markvision and Webjet Admin or similar toolExperience writing queries using one or more of the following tools: Phyton, Pearl, VBScript, or Powershell.Experience in leading/ addressing patching, vulnerability reviews, security and compliance requirements on enterprise printing optimization programs or similar initiatives.Strong knowledge of printing environments and printer hardware manufacturers.Preferred SkillsExperience working within a Risk and Compliance Printing Environment.Knowledge of Ricoh DMNX monitoring tool. Flexible schedule will be necessary. Since, some weeks resource will have to work in the evenings   Please send resumes to Reegan at RLloyd@apexsystemsinc.com        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",System Support Analyst Job in Minneapolis,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More System Support Analyst Job #:  660318 Position: System Support AnalystLocation: Minneapolis, MN Requirements:Basic Qualifications5 years systems support analysis experience.Minimum Qualifications • 5 years’ experience performing network set up, device functionality and configurations.Demonstrated experience serving as the subject matter expert in software configurations and management tools. Demonstrated experience creating and maintaining configuration documentation for printing devices.Advanced knowledge of printers monitoring tools: Markvision and Webjet Admin or similar toolExperience writing queries using one or more of the following tools: Phyton, Pearl, VBScript, or Powershell.Experience in leading/ addressing patching, vulnerability reviews, security and compliance requirements on enterprise printing optimization programs or similar initiatives.Strong knowledge of printing environments and printer hardware manufacturers.Preferred SkillsExperience working within a Risk and Compliance Printing Environment.Knowledge of Ricoh DMNX monitoring tool. Flexible schedule will be necessary. Since, some weeks resource will have to work in the evenings   Please send resumes to Reegan at RLloyd@apexsystemsinc.com        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/System-Support-Analyst-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-167054566.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6de6f7c1e8fe25f888e8d66f73a63c7c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:11:34:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More IT - Senior IT Security Analyst Job #:  660030Excellent Security opportunity in the Charlotte, NC market. If you are interested in being considered for submittal, please send your resume to RMorris@ApexSystemsinc.com .Location: Charlotte, NCRate: Let’s DiscussLength: 12 monthsThe Critical Infrastructure and Operations (CIOPS) - Security Team member: Individuals will members of the team responsible for the performance of IT Security tasks associated with Energy Management Systems and associated support infrastructure including Cyber Vulnerability Assessments, Security Controls Testing and Baseline validation, security alert monitoring/response.Individuals will use security tools to perform and interpret port scan data, monitor and respond to security alerts, conduct security controls testing as well as monitor security systems for unauthorized changes.This position will require the incumbent to be well rounded in all aspects of IT security in a complex and layered environment and possess the ability to quickly assess and take ownership of security or compliance related issues or findings with a commitment to work until a proper resolution is foundDesired Skills/Certifications: Tripwire Log Center Tripwire Enterprise Tenable Security Center IP 360 Nessus NMAP Arcsight Palo Alto Threat Monitoring CISSP  EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",IT - Senior IT Security Analyst Job in Charlotte,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More IT - Senior IT Security Analyst Job #:  660030Excellent Security opportunity in the Charlotte, NC market. If you are interested in being considered for submittal, please send your resume to RMorris@ApexSystemsinc.com .Location: Charlotte, NCRate: Let’s DiscussLength: 12 monthsThe Critical Infrastructure and Operations (CIOPS) - Security Team member: Individuals will members of the team responsible for the performance of IT Security tasks associated with Energy Management Systems and associated support infrastructure including Cyber Vulnerability Assessments, Security Controls Testing and Baseline validation, security alert monitoring/response.Individuals will use security tools to perform and interpret port scan data, monitor and respond to security alerts, conduct security controls testing as well as monitor security systems for unauthorized changes.This position will require the incumbent to be well rounded in all aspects of IT security in a complex and layered environment and possess the ability to quickly assess and take ownership of security or compliance related issues or findings with a commitment to work until a proper resolution is foundDesired Skills/Certifications: Tripwire Log Center Tripwire Enterprise Tenable Security Center IP 360 Nessus NMAP Arcsight Palo Alto Threat Monitoring CISSP  EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Senior-IT-Security-Analyst-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-166990132.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),00ac88a7300f9e8761d14f1d226d7761
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:11:25:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Law firm of K&L Gates has an immediate opening for a full time litigation legal secretary. Successful applicant must have minimum 3-5 years Washington litigation experience in both state and federal courts and be a self-starter with excellent organizational and document management capabilities. The Litigation Legal Secretary transcribes, drafts, updates, and finalizes pleadings and other documents, and, at the direction of the supervising attorney, is responsible for designated decision making at every step. The Secretary also prepares trial notebooks, witness books, subpoenas, orders, exhibits, and other materials.Successful candidate must be accustomed to working as a team member; and possess the ability to handle multiple project/deadline assignments under tight deadlines or high pressure; have outstanding work planning and organizing skills; outstanding grammar, proof reading, English composition, spelling, and editing skills; knowledge of court and law office litigation rules and procedures; outstanding communications skills and the ability to preserve excellent work relations with other individuals. The ability to ask pertinent questions and work independently and demonstrated ability to meet obligations with confidentiality, integrity, and sensitivity are also required.The Firm is an equal opportunity employer. It is the policy of the Firm that employment decisions shall be based on merit, qualifications and competence. Employment practices shall not be influenced or affected by virtue of a person’s race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, disability, military status or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. This policy governs all aspects of employment including, without limitation, recruiting, hiring, compensation, benefits, promotion, assignment and dismissal. In addition, it is the Firm’s policy to provide an environment that is free of unlawful harassment of any kind including, without limitation, that which is sexual, racial, age-related, disability-related or ethnic background-related.",Legal Secretary - Litigation Job in Seattle,Full Time Employee,"Seattle, WA 98104",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Legal-Secretary-Litigation-Job-Seattle-WA-US-163801158.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=15,,Legal,7dfcde88d363f40027e3ba7230f0da69
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:11:25:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"The HR Manager is both a strategic and hands-on role that provides full cycle Human Resources support to Marlborough's Corporate and Manufacturing Facility. The role is critical in executing our people initiatives, providing great internal customer support, and driving HR functional excellence and process improvement.Must be willing to work a flexible schedule that includes nights and early mornings; shifts can change based on business needs, Fluency in Spanish preferredESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESAdvise managers on strategies to improve organization design and organizational effectiveness and efficiency through improved design of jobs and allocation of human resources.Provide ongoing coaching and counseling to managers and employees. Support, interpret and communicate company policies and procedures. Solve employee relations' issues in best interests of Company goals and objectives while maintaining a high level of employee satisfaction. Assist with the design and implementation of training programs. Develop plans to reduce worker's compensation costs and reduce accidents.Assist managers and supervisors on actions to improve job performance, performance appraisals and developmental plans to enhance career potential. Advise and counsel managers on organizational problems and needs. Advise managers on legal issues and ensures that Ken's Foods is in compliance with applicable state and federal employment laws and regulations. Participate in strategic business planning. Serve as a managerial role model for others outside of HR.Must have experience with employee relations, full investigations and employment law. Skills:Education and/or ExperienceBachelor's degree (B.A.) in business management or similar field or an equivalent combination of training and work experience. Fluency in Spanish PreferredRequires a minimum of five years of increasingly responsible Human Resource experience. Knowledge of the Human Resources role in a manufacturing, distribution, or retail environment is desirable. The position requires an understanding of the various functional areas within HR.Person must have experience in, employee relations, employment regulations, employee benefits administration, compensation and recruiting.THIS IS A DIRECT HIRE OPPORTUNITYRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER Job in Marlborough,Full Time Employee,"Marlborough, MA 01752",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/HUMAN-RESOURCES-MANAGER-Job-Marlborough-MA-US-167080741.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=9,,,d59c6093531de56c0c8b9461a10249c7
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:11:06:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client is looking for a Java Developer with background in identity and access management development in Coppell, Texas (TX).REQUIREMENTS: Need Technical Specialist with 2 - 4 years of experience in the Digital Security and IAM domain Extensive technical knowledge and work experience in Aveksa, Oracle IDM, or Sail Point Development experience with Java SE, EE and Open Source Frameworks IDM experience - VDS-HDAP and LDAP experience Experience with customer engagement including ideation, design thinking, and seeking rapid feedback Experience with developing large-scale, custom distributed software systems in Java Experience with system design with SOA/REST/Microservices Experience with AWS or similar distributed architecture Detailed technical problem solving and troubleshooting skills Desired: IDM, J2EE",IDM / Java Developer Job in Coppell,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Coppell, TX 75019",,http://jobview.monster.com/IDM-Java-Developer-Job-Coppell-TX-US-167038470.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cded0a7bab959cbba002b6a389e0788f
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:11:05:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client in Peoria, IL is seeking a Senior Level UI Developer. This is a long term contract with the opportunity to be hired directly.Summary:The successful Developer will assist one or more Senior Level Developers to identify, prioritize and deliver technology-related solutions that continually meet or exceed stakeholder expectations with the user interface development that they will be doing. With appropriate supervision from one or more Senior Developers, the Developer then works independently and/or with others to deliver solutions of varying complexity that is consistent with the Technology Division's mission, strategies, plans, standards and guidelines.Responsibilities: Adheres and contributes to development policies, procedures and standards Reviewing of current systems Working closely with analysts, designers and staff Producing detailed specifications Testing the product in controlled, real situations before going live Maintaining the systems once they are up and runningREQUIREMENTS: 5 - 8 years of application development/IT experience Must be passionate for HTML, JavaScript, CSS, UI web development and have at least 5 year of experience developing in these technologies Web Developer-specifically user interface experience; this is all front end developmentSkills: HTML, JavaScript, CSS, and UI web development Excellent and proven problem solving skills Good oral and written communication skills Ability to work independently and as part of a team Must have attention to detail",.Net Developer Job in Peoria,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Peoria, IL 61601",,http://jobview.monster.com/Net-Developer-Job-Peoria-IL-US-167087813.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3946fe6423c34df9c33ca5ec4b5cde0a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:11:05:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"VTCTechnician Overview: Team Akimekahas an opening for a VTC Technician at Ft. Detrick.  ** Minimum of an A+ certification required Essential Functions, Responsibilities & Duties may include, but are not limited to:System administration of the videoconferencing (VTC) infrastructure: bridges, gatekeepers, management suites and endpointsInstall, configure maintain and troubleshoot Telecommunications and Video hardware and softwareMaintain all conference room audio/visual equipment by performing regular preventative maintenance checks and services.Maintain inventory of all AV equipment in each conference room. Operate multi-media audio-visual conference room equipmentCoordinate and schedule conference room use as well as VTC scheduling and ensuring resources are available as required. Supply knowledge of DOD/Army Information Assurance guidance.Perform demonstrations. Record and post YouTube presentations.Sustain training log-in system. Support the IT Technical team in addition to VTC duties.Other duties as assigned. Qualifications: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education and/or Experience:College diploma or university degree in the field of computer science or 5+ years equivalent work experience2+ years demonstrated experience supporting client configuration, administration and network access in Telecommunications and Video environments.Experience in implementing enterprise-wide Video Teleconferencing (VTC), (PolyCom preferred) infrastructure and technical solutions. Completed comprehensive training in the implementation of enterprise VTC infrastructure networking, communications, and/or computing equipment and hardware, such as that offered by Polycom, Inc.  Experience includes:IA Certification Requirement (Reference DoD 8570.01-M:  IAT Level I) Clearance:  Active NAC II Physical Demands and Work Environment: The physical demands and work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of the job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Physical demands:  Employee will occasionally need to lift or move equipment weighing up to 15 pounds.  Dexterity of hands and fingers to operate a computer keyboard.  Hearing and speaking to exchange information.  Seeing to view computer monitor.  Sitting for extended periods of time. Work environment:  Professional office environment: temperature controlled office building, low noise level, standard office lighting.   Akimeka is proud to be an EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability employer.   ",VTC Technician Job in Frederick,Full Time,"Frederick, MD 21702",,http://jobview.monster.com/VTC-Technician-Job-Frederick-MD-US-167042048.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=9,,,77bfa6d41c85515b7f4aa11025b3e997
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:11:05:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job #11027 Human Resources Director Business Partner / IT Location:  Downtown Chicago, IL and local Chicago area candidates are preferred but other qualified candidates will be considered. Duration:  3 – 6 months with Possible Contract-to-Hire opportunity We cannot accept resumes from third parties, and no Visa sponsorship is available.All selected candidates must be able to attend an in person interview in Chicago at own expense.When responding, please indicate current location and contact information. Required Skills/Qualifications:·      Work with business partners to define business needs/capabilities that are needed and design that is needed.·      Manage data Transformation.·      Process Transformation using Six Sigma.·      Experience with general consulting and business consulting.   ·      Bachelor Degree with 15 years generalist experience.·      Management experience preferred in addition to leadership, team building, coaching and counseling skills.·      Hands-on experience in at least two HR disciplines.·      Working with top business partners.·      Strategic thinker.·      Relationship building.·      Strong oral/written communications.·      Project Management skills.·      Analytical skills.·      Consultation, networking, verbal, written and interpersonal communications. Desirable Skills/Qualifications:·         Master’s Degree or Senior Professional of HR (SPHR) Certification.·      Knowledge of HR disciplines with health industry background. General Information:·         Resumes must show month and year for each job/assignment.  ·         No visa sponsorship available, and we cannot accept 3rd party resumes for this position. ·         Candidates must be able to interview in-person if requested by client, NO Skype interviews. Client does not pay for this expense.  ·         Must be willing to work at client site.·         CompuPros offers the following benefit plans to our W2 employees: Medical PPO, Dental Insurance, Group Life Insurance, Disability Insurance, Direct Deposit, 401k, Transportation Flexible Spending Account, and Flexible Spending Account for Child Care. ",Human Resources Director Business Partner / IT Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL 60601",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Director-Business-Partner-IT-Job-Chicago-IL-US-167050792.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=17,Compet Mrkt Rate,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),4ce019bb1bbd95619c0e47bc60968605
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:11:05:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Boutique NYC firm looking for a permanent T&E Paralegal. The Trusts & Estates Paralegal is responsible for a full range of estate administration matters by providing assistance to the firm’s attorneys in preparing and filing probate petitions and related court papers, drafting documents, preparing estate tax returns and client case management.  Minimum QualificationsBachelor’s Degree requiredOutstanding organizational, interpersonal, and administrative skillsExcellent attention to detail with the ability to multi-taskMust be self-motivated and able to meet deadlines under pressureMust have the ability to work as part of a team, as well as independently For immediate consideration, please submit resumes to pltresumes@petersan.com ",Permanent Trusts & Estates Paralegal Job in New York,Full Time,"New York, NY",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Permanent-Trusts-Estates-Paralegal-Job-New-York-NY-US-166364075.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=6,,,e7ca9df5abfb7b4b30998f68a48a877e
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:11:05:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"CURE Auto Insurance is a leading direct writer of auto insurance in New Jersey and Pennsylvania.  We offer a great working environment, pay and comprehensive benefit package which includes health and dental coverage, life and disability insurance, 401k with company match, and much more! We are currently searching for an experienced professional to join our in-house defense firm as an office manager/front desk receptionist. The ideal candidate will have 5 or more years experience in the legal field as an office manager, paralegal, legal assistant or secretary.  Candidate must have exceptional organizational skills and be able to multi-task.  Must be able to manage multiple calendars and, preferably, have experience with Excel and the preparation and filing of legal documents.  PIP arbitration and/or auto defense experience a plus.Coordinate and monitor activities within the law office.Review completed documents for accuracy and quality. Ensure a lawyer has all necessary paperwork to take to court.Greet clients and answer incoming calls.Manage e-mail correspondence and distribute mail incoming to the office.Prepare memos and other correspondence.Create client files.Order office supplies.Schedule attorney and client meetings.APPLY NOW",Legal Office Manager Job in Princeton,Full Time,"Princeton, NJ 08540",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/Legal-Office-Manager-Job-Princeton-NJ-US-166361652.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b396b34173a9ec17533891c253f8d8ef
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:53:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aural Designer – Mountain View, CAPSPICE              DSP              MEMS            Intouch Staffing Professionals, Inc    650 -967-3400    charlie@intouchstaffing.com http://www.linkedin.com/in/techjob Auditory Architecture Help with the construction of new audio feature DSP product lines while managing growth of existing products.Aid with the guidance of product design and product expansion for audio products for tablets, smart phones and consumer electronics.Detect  product strategies for electro-acoustic interfaces and amplifier architectureHave in-depth knowledge of the following:Audio transducersUltrasound bandwidthElectro-acoustic interfacesSignal processingMATLABSlimbusWireless applicationsSingle supply implementationsFiltering techniques3D audio theoryDigital interfacesDegrees are required.  We will consider applicants with MS or PhD with a minimum of 5 years of relevant industry academic experience. You should have experience of 3 to 5 years working with voice and audio products. If you are a match, please forward your resume directly to my attention, include your telephone number I will call you directly.  Provide your availability to interview, target start date, salary expectations. Thank you. charlie@intouchstaffing.com     attn: Charlie Smith    650-967-3400    Intouch Staffing Professionals, Inc           650 Castro Street Suite 120A   Mountain View, CA 94041 ",Aural Designer Job in Mountain View,Full Time,"Mountain View, CA 94041",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Aural-Designer-Job-Mountain-View-CA-US-149599224.aspx?mescoid=2700414001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ca681c638d82c89c6503f8b4785aecad
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:52:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Description:  World IT Solutions rapidly recruits and places the best I.T. professionals for US Government Agencies and large corporate clients. We have extensive experience in the permanent placement and staff augmentation arenas. We pay particular attention to our client's job requirements and shape our recruiting efforts around their specific needs. Our goal is to deliver the most qualified candidates for every position we are asked to fill.Job Description: Pay rate:  $27/hrWe are looking to hire an IT Specialist, SR immediately. This is a great opportunity to join a rapidly expanding and successful team.  We are looking for someone with a hands-on technical background who has effective communication skills.  It’s your chance to work with the best in the industry in a solutions focused environment.    ·         Applies specialized knowledge in a single discipline such as assembly/integration, cross-discipline functions, data engineering, industry expertise, knowledge engineering or legacy evolution. ·         Applies specialization to conceptualize, design, construct, test and implement portions of business and technical information technology solutions through application of appropriate software development life cycle methodology. ·         Interacts with the customer to gain an understanding of the business environment, technical context and organizational strategic direction. ·         Defines scope, plans and deliverables for assigned projects. ·         Collects, identifies, defines and organizes detailed user and information technology requirements. ·         Coordinates and collaborates with others in analyzing collected requirements to ensure plans and identified solutions to meet customer needs and expectations. ·         Confirms and prioritizes project plans and deliverables with the customer. ·         Participates in business and technical information technology solution implementations, upgrades, enhancement and conversions. ·         Understands and uses appropriate tools to analyze, identify and resolve business and or technical problems. ·         Applies metrics to monitor performance and measure key project criteria. ·         Prepares system documentation. ·         Establishes and maintains security, integrity and business continuity controls and documents.·         Participates in special studies. ·         Stays current on emerging tools, techniques and technologies. ·         Assists information engineers on application of specialized knowledge to coding, testing, implementation and documentation projects.  Job Requirements:  10+ years experienceSecurity+MCTS, MTA, MCSAVsphere 5NetApp SAN·    At World IT Solutions, we connect you with outstanding government and corporate positions that are excellent career opportunities. We were founded by former US Navy officers and we are dedicated to providing exceptional IT and Telecommunications services back to the military and to large corporate clients. Along with excellent benefits and competitive pay, we also provide free technical training and certification reimbursement for A+, Network+, Security+, and other applicable certifications. Why join the World IT Solutions Family? At WITS, we believe our people to be our best asset. This is distinctly reflective in our culture, work environment, and most importantly how we treat our employees.WHAT WITS CAN OFFER YOU:·         Design your own benefit plans: Three options of Medical, Dental, and Vision Packages so you can Best Choose What works for You!·         Life/Accident Insurance·         401(K) Matching with Free Planning and Guidance from a Financial Advisor·         Certification Reimbursement to Help You Pursue your Educational Career Goals·         Paid Time Off·         Referral and Performance Bonuses·         Business Casual Work Environment·         And Much More!World IT Solutions, LLC is a full-service consulting firm that specializes in information technology and telecommunications. We provide professional IT and design consulting services as well as engineers and operations specialists to meet military, government, and corporate demands worldwide. We continue to fulfill urgent customer demands by providing cleared personnel across the globe.Learn more at:www.witsllc.com Expand your horizons! APPLY TODAY!Additional Information:All of your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",IT Specialist,"Full Time, Employee","Kansas City, MO 64101",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Specialist-Sr-Job-Kansas-City-MO-US-166357189.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=3,27.00 - 27.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,3dbd7ef6202c11ba399aa0bd426f6616
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:49:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Infrastructure Managed Services Governance Coord.12 month contract (possible extension)Must be US Citz/GC to applyPOSITION SUMMARY –Summary:The IT Infrastructure Managed Services (IMS) Governance Coordinator is responsible for supporting adherence to and audibility of all transactions related to the Managed Services’ Agreement(s) and ensuring proper contractual, financial, and performance controls are in-place for the term of the Agreement(s).  Additionally, the Coordinator supports monitoring of the Suppliers’ compliance with contract terms and conditions, service level requirements and reports on the status of all deliverables.  The Coordinator, in conjunction with the resources of the IT Outsourcing Provider and BTS Managed Services Tower Managers/Leads, is also responsible for supporting the optimal delivery of Data Center Operations (DCO) and End User Compute (EUC) technical services from contractual, financial, performance, and relationship perspectives.25% Duties:  DCO and EUC Governance CoordinatorProvide coordination and administrative support in the areas of oversight, quality control and auditing of information, including working directly with Suppliers and BTS Managed Services Managers and Leads the to resolve data conflicts and inappropriate usage; scope of this activity includes Service Desk, Desk Side, Network and Data Center Operations.Perform monitoring and reporting for performance and financial metrics/KPIs in collaboration with the IT Service Management (ITSM) Team. Participates in Tower Performance and project reviews to assure that defined SLRs and other performance metrics are maintained while meeting the business requirements.  Supports monthly reporting regarding all contracted services and uptime operational commitments.Supports an annual mapping exercise linking all processes to significant Infrastructure items associated with the Managed Services SOW(s).  Delivers audit report to the Office of the CIO (OCIO) for interpretation and discussion with Supplier(s).Coordinates a quarterly audit of IT Managed Services Supplier SOW(s) working directly with BTS Tower Managers/Leads to ensure compliance.  Delivers audit report to OCIO for interpretation and discussion with Supplier.Executes strategic and tactical interfaces with the OCIO in support of Supplier partnership(s) and supports communication to deliver top-down agreement in Supplier engagement(s).Provide coordination and administrative support to ensure adequate Disaster Recovery (DR) arrangements have been made and tested to deliver acceptable audit results.Collaborates with ITSM  and the IT Managed Services Managers/Leads to support the strategy on Capacity Management to ensure DCO and EUC services are delivered.40% Duties:  Key Sourcing Metrics and EscalationCoordinates and supports a monthly audit with Tower owners and IT peers to ensure SLR delivery meets the needs of Business.  Deliver audit report to OCIO for interpretation and discussion with Supplier(s).Supports the evaluation, analysis and recommendation regarding key vendor performance as to time, quality, scope, budget, capacity and responsiveness.Executes within the framework for decision making and enacts change across multiple departments, including training for Associates and Suppliers.Tracks, analyzes, and communicates appropriate key vendor performance metrics.Enables frequent communication between all key project or sub-department parties including customers, vendors, associates and other appropriate stakeholders.Supports efforts to rectify failures by following established issue and escalation processes and procedures.Interfaces with counterparts in other groups and/or locations utilizing same or similar vendor services, hardware, or software to ensure consistency of interpretation and implementation of all agreements, statements of work, licenses and software schedules.Communicates key issues clearly and effectively to the appropriate vendor and Client audience.Supports the review of Managed Services contracts to ensure a sound sourcing approach, strategy adherence, and that a competitive environment is maintained.Monitors the results of Suppliers based on Client contractual terms and technology project requirements.Monitors and supports tactical sourcing approach and operating model and recommends changes that are aligned with business priorities. 35% Duties:  Compliance and ImprovementSupports interactions with the OCIO to assess strategic Supplier goals and incorporate those goals into tactical measures.Supports audits pertaining specifically to vendor agreements, statements of work, licenses and software schedules to ensure compliance with applicable BTS IT policies, practices, standards, guidelines, architectures, processes and procedures and report results to senior management.Adheres to Sarbanes Oxley process and procedures to support all service towers under the Infrastructure Management Services Outsourcing agreement(s).Offers improvement recommendations for established policies, practices, standards, guidelines, procedures and processes related to contractual negotiations, adherence and vendor performance evaluation.Supports department compliance to establish IT policies, practices, standards, processes and procedures.Drives continuous improvement efforts (e.g., kaizen, cost reduction).Support the assessment of Service Lever Requirement (SLR) gaps and enables the use of governance to increase Supplier performance.Tracks and summarizes appropriate vendor sourcing metrics. Provides objective analysis and opinions to the Client stakeholders even if they represent a view more favorable to the vendor than Client.Supports department compliance with established policies, procedures, and process standards.Updates established policies, procedures, standard processes, or guidelines to support controls and meet / exceed internal and external compliance requirements.Supports delivery of quality methodologies and continuous improvement efforts designed to generate productivity and cost efficiencies. Requirements:Must Haves:Seven  or more years in an IT/IS organization, particularly requiring data, contract, supplier management, or financial analysis.Vendor Relationship and Infrastructure Managed Services governance experience (i.e. Service Desk, Desk Side, Network, Data Center Operations).Experience monitoring and reporting for performance and financial metrics/KPIsExcellent PC skills, including Microsoft Word, MS Office, Excel, PowerPoint, VisioExperience creating process workflow and other diagrams.Strong verbal, written, and presentation skills.Team-oriented skills and detail-oriented execution skills.Ability to work independently, with strong organizational and flexibility skills in a team-oriented environment. Preferred/ Nice-to-haves:Knowledge of/experience with ServiceNow Platform is a plus.Knowledge of/experience with Sarbanes Oxley process and procedures is a plus.Strong Internet/Web software, tools and other productivity applications are  a plusAdministrative experience with MS SharePoint a plus.One or more years of Project Management experienceExperience in supplier outsourcing, risk assessment, and compliance assessment a plusKnowledge of ITIL-based processes a plusExperience with financial services operations, particularly automotive lending, leasing, and dealer financing is a plusThe ability to understand business issues and processes and to articulate the business context of projects and processes.BS in Computer Science or Engineering (preferred but not required)",Infrastructure Managed Services Governance Coord. Job in Torrance,"Full Time, Employee","Torrance, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Infrastructure-Managed-Services-Governance-Coord-Job-Torrance-CA-US-166988476.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,IT/Software Development,c3d998d69c45adef6d8d2da61422152c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:35:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"I have a Project Manager opportunity in Princeton NJ that needs a candidate with strong PM skills but also QA experience in terms of System Integrated Testing and UAT as well. This is a large scale program that will go for at least 12-24 months. Please feel free to reach out with any questions 973-732-5454 x27.This will involve interactions with development staff, internal business users and external customers and partners, infrastructure staff, as well as external organizations (Customers, suppliers, etc.).Responsibilities:Work with IT Staff to create project estimates and project plansOversee System Integration Testing and UAT testingDrive projects to completion on time and within budgetReport project statuses to management and stakeholdersManage changes within and across projects to meet dynamic business needsCoordinate interactions between IT, the business users, and customersInteract with IT management regarding work assignments and statusRequired experience:Demonstrated success in a project team settingProject experience in a leadership capacityExperience managing software development projects (SDLC)Strong analytical and problem solving skillsBuilding project plans using project management softwareWillingness to adapt and learn new technologies and methodologiesExperience with issue tracking solutions as well as project and portfolio management solutions Lori SklarskiSenior Technical Recruiter lori.sklarski@pritechnology.comPRI TechnologyP: 973.732.5454 x27 C: 973.432.9968F: 973.732.5456",Project Manager (QA/Automation) Job in Princeton Township,Full Time,"Princeton Township, NJ 08540",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-QA-Automation-Job-Princeton-Township-NJ-US-167090340.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3c3c86ee589b692a593075862476ea04
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:32:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryDo you want to gain experience using C++ in a production environment?  We have need of a motivated individual to continue the internationalization of our code base.  This code is a fundamental piece of the MATLAB Compiler SDK which allows users to access their MATLAB code from a whole bunch of different environments. ResponsibilitiesYou will refactor some of our C++ code to move the internationalization of our code base forward.  You will create sandboxes, modifiy the code, test it locally and submit it to our code repository.Minimum Qualifications Candidates must be pursuing a bachelor's level degree in a technical discipline. Experience with C++Additional QualificationsCandidates must be pursuing a bachelor's or master's level degree in a technical discipline.Experience with C++ Why MathWorks?It’s the chance to collaborate with bright, passionate people. It’s contributing to software products that make a difference in the world. And it’s being part of a company with an incredible commitment to doing the right thing – for each individual, our customers, and the local community. MathWorks develops MATLAB and Simulink, the leading technical computing software used by engineers and scientists. The company employs 3000 people in 15 countries, with headquarters in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S.A. MathWorks is privately held and has been profitable every year since its founding in 1984. MathWorks, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",Platform deployment runtime refactorization - Summer Intern Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Platform-deployment-runtime-refactorization-Summer-Intern-Job-Natick-MA-US-166972335.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3c4956eb3b683952ec8c5d10cdf04eaf
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:30:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Intellectual Property In-House Legal SpecialistCompany: Helic, Inc.Location: San Jose, CAPosition Type: Full TimeExperience: 1 YearEducation: Master's DegreeIntellectual Property In-House Legal Specialist needed for Helic Inc. in San Jose, CA Research & analyze IP legal issues and report to CEO. Maintain IP portfolio. Review legal agreements & participate in contract negotiations. Req.: Master's in Law or equiv. 1 year exp in job offered or as Lawyer. Exp. in IP law. Send resume to: ja@helic.com",Intellectual Property In-House Legal Specialist Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,95134,Legal Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Intellectual-Property-In-House-Legal-Specialist-Job-US-166412242.aspx?ch=sanfranchron&mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=20,,,74e4414b99e8b246087edc2e4de25628
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:27:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Upscale client in the Newark area is looking for a sharp Payroll Processing professional to handle biweekly corporate payroll in their in-house processing environment. Job Description: - Process payroll for exempt and non-exempt employees and ensure that computing, withholding and deductions of net pay are accurate and payroll balances- Issue W-2 statements- Perform data entry related to new hires, pay statement interface, premium adjustments and W-4 changes, etc.- Comply with requirements of liens, garnishments, child support orders, etc.- Respond to employee inquiries and troubleshoot problems Qualifications: - 3+ years experience in an in-house payroll processing environment- Experience with garnishment and payroll taxes- Excellent communication skill, problem solving skills, ability to deal with individuals at all levels throughout the company-  Some college education is preferred but not required  If you meet these requirements and are interested in this opportunity please go to www.AccountingPrincipals.com and apply today!  ",Payroll Administrator Job in Parsippany,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Parsippany, NJ 07054",,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Administrator-Job-Parsippany-NJ-US-165862705.aspx?mescoid=4300702001001&jobPosition=16,,Human Resources,bbf55bb83d0c4483e3586ef243816bdd
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:24:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an Identity & Access Management Engineer in Dallas, Texas (TX). This is a 6-12 months' project at least - the work will continue beyond the project and depending on how candidate fits in could lead to extended engagement.REQUIREMENTS: Java skills who has experience with IAM tools Company uses Aveksa Via by RSA but would look at anyone that has Oracle IDM or Sail Point Autonomous team player",Identity & Access Management Engineer Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Dallas, TX 75019",,http://jobview.monster.com/Identity-Access-Management-Engineer-Job-Dallas-TX-US-166973101.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),40ef401bae58fc749399148008b206bd
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:24:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More ServiceNow Administrator Job #:  659598The Service-Now technical team is responsible for the implementation, support, maintenance, operations and upgrades of the Service-Now ITSM solutions.  Currently, we are migrating from Remedy to ServiceNow.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",ServiceNow Administrator Job in St. Louis,Full Time Employee,"St. Louis, MO",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ServiceNow-Administrator-Job-St.-Louis-MO-US-167054611.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),98cee09708f0b21316d3a1ced7bf270c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:24:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an Enterprise Architect Manager in Miami, Florida (FL).Position Summary: The Enterprise Architect Manager is responsible for the overall direction, standards and performance of enterprise architecture domains, including Application, Information, Data and Security. They also participate in support of solution development, Enterprise Architecture governance, and Enterprise Architecture planning processes.Primary Duties: Partner with the CIO to set overall IT Enterprise Architecture vision and strategy Develop and implement an IT Enterprise Architecture roadmap Translate business priorities into IT architecture requirements for respective Enterprise Architecture domains Understand as-is architectures and implications of the architecture requirements to current and future architectures Define, document and maintain to-be domain architecture applying architecture guiding principles Augment architecture guiding principles Develop architecture roadmaps for respective application, infrastructure, network and data domains Identify architecture gaps and inefficiencies and provide recommendations for improvements and alignment Assist in identification and development of new Enterprise Architecture assets, standards and frameworks Research industry-wide architecture and technology trends for the respective domain and present relevant point-of-views Review project architecture for compliance with enterprise standards as part of the Architecture Review Committee and make domain-specific recommendations Manage and direct the activities of six direct reportsREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field / Advanced degree strongly preferred Understanding of business and IT priorities Deep understanding of respective domain architectures Ability to set strategic architectural direction Capability to depict enterprise information conceptually, logically, and physically Ability to determine architectural implications of business requirements for the respective domains Deep understanding of industry architecture trends Understanding of EA governance & planning processes Experience with business process architectures and management Strong leadership and mentoring skillsPhysical Requirements:Requires the ability to work in excess of eight hours per day in the confined quarters of an office. Also requires the ability to operate a motor vehicle, climb stairs, bend, stoop, reach, lift, move and/or carry items that are less than 50 pounds. Finger dexterity required in operating a computer keyboard and a calculator. Office work requires sitting at a computer monitor for extended periods of time. Additional Requirements: Follow directions from a supervisor Interact well with co-workers, supervisors and management Understand and follow posted work rules and procedures Accept constructive criticism Maintain Professional appearance and demeanor at all timesKnowledge and Experience Requirements: 6+ years' experience architecting and delivering solutions across multiple architectural disciplines",Enterprise Architect Manager Job in Miami,"Full Time, Employee","Miami, FL 33172",,http://jobview.monster.com/Enterprise-Architect-Manager-Job-Miami-FL-US-167090587.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=18,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),2543a2c6c4aef1de4c21682d83451d9c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:24:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"In need of an experienced Human Resources Professional to fill a Senior HR Manager position.  You should have 3-5 years’ experience in HR and at least 2 of those in a leadership position.  If you’re looking for a team environment with ample growth opportunity, this is the place for you!   • Lead, train and develop HR staff focusing on efficiency, cost, and moral. • Responsible for development of staff through performance management, training, feedback, and coaching. • Ensure company policies and procedures are administered and contribute to fair and consistent treatment of team members. • Broad working knowledge of HRIS functions, benefit programs, and compensation. • Variety of routine administrative HR functions.  Qualifications:• Bachelors’ Degree in Human Resources or an equivalent combination of education and experience. • Manufacturing experience Preferred • Oracle and Kronos experience a PLUS. 3-5 years experience in HR   To apply for this position or other opportunities in the area, please visit www.ajilon.com.  ;",HR Manager Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",,http://jobview.monster.com/HR-Manager-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-166367029.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=7,,Human Resources,781eeb36bd35141fd70624867f0fe507
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:23:29,No,jobs.monster.com," Director of Corporate Development & Training - Biotech / PharmaceuticalResumes to Careers@directhr.comMy client provides a broad array of healthcare marketing solutions, including comprehensive direct-mail, fulfillment, sampling, database, and sales force management for the Pharmaceutical and Healthcare vertical. The Director of Corporate Development and Training is responsible for the effective development, coordination and presentation of training and development programs for all employees.  Assess organization-wide developmental needs to drive training initiatives, and identify and arrange suitable training solutions for global staff members. Responsibilities: Maintain and administer the LMS system, including security, data entry, upload, or auditing and reporting.Conduct system monitoring to ensure employee and training data are accurate and adhere to system administration procedures.Work with Human Resources as appropriate to coordinate organization-wide global staff development and training effortsIdentify training requirements of individual staff members and departmentsDevelop training plans and budgets, with an emphasis on working with individualdepartments on training/professional development budgets and maintenance.Assist in the evaluation and implementation of reports and procedures, to increase efficiency and to meet department goals.Determine best strategies for meeting training needsDesign, implement and deliver or coordinate direct training for staffEvaluate external and internal training resourcesSecure volume discounts for external training classes and for any related travelProvide regular support for staff as ad hoc questions and mini training opportunities arise in the normal process of daily work. Enhance formal training efforts with ad hoc interventionsDevelop and manage training curriculumManage on-site training on subject matter, systems, products and processesDevelop training schedules and coordinate with department headsAssess training needs, adjust as necessary and deliver appropriate training to maximize effectiveness·         Develop strategies to improve workforce supporting growth and direction of business. Lead organizational development efforts including organization design and planning, team building and development, and leadership development. Manage application/implementation of new training technologiesEnsure training compliance company-wideRequirements: B.A./B.S. degree required3-5 years of training & development experience including delivery, developing designing training materials and LMS administrationDemonstrated ability to prioritize tasks, manage projects, and meet deadlinesAbility to provide training material samples, on-line, delivered and take-awayAbility to work with all levels within the organization and with a diverse andnationally/internationally dispersed employee populationStrong understanding of cultural sensitivityDemonstrated ability to work with users to identify training needs and with training providers to identify external resourcesService-oriented with strong interpersonal skills, outgoing, flexible, able to motivate and encourage and inspireTravel Required: 25% (within NJ offices)Offering:·         Base Salary $100,000 - $120,000 (based on experience)·         Bonus potential·         Full Benefit PackageResumes toCareers@directhr.comDirect Sales Recruiting, LLC, (DSR) and DirectHR are National Recruitment organizations partnering with National, Regional and Local Clients to bring qualified candidates a career and a future. DSR offers over 50 years combined Recruitment, Sales and Management experience. We are, along with our clients, an Equal Opportunity Employer and are committed to hiring and supporting a diverse workforce. A M/F/D/V ",Director of Corporate Development & Training - Biotech / Pharmaceutical Job in Bridgewater,Full Time Employee,"Bridgewater, NJ",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsBusiness Services - OtherMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Corporate-Development-Training-Biotech-Pharmaceutical-Job-Bridgewater-NJ-US-167085668.aspx?mescoid=1900254001001&jobPosition=6,"100,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",Human Resources,b146b890a1bb525eed2efdd6636c2cb5
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:22:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking multiple IT Project Coordinators to provides the Project Managers support and assistance in: * scheduling, documentation, budgeting and communication. Updates the project plan.  These IT Project Coordinators will assist in information collection and validations.Also: * Facilitates collaborative documents and data stores. * Helps prepare status reports and presentations.  Role: These Project Coordinators will support Projects within the Enterprise initiative at our client. In addition to core qualifications of in depth experience in program coordinator roles and strong ability to support project coordination, documentation, preparation and scheduling needs, the Coordinator will operate in a highly matrixed program. Should posses the proven ability to coordinate across programs and structure upward reporting in addition to project specific coordination is essential.  Requires: * Excellent oral and written communication skills are required. * Must have strong knowledge of MS Project, Excel, Word, Visio, Powerpoint. * Strong acumen of financial accounting desired.* Experience with waterfall and iterative delivery frameworks and corresponding document and artifact practices. * Proven ability to operate in a matrixed program environment, supporting the delivery within the immediate team as well as the higher level program reporting needs. EOE",IT Project Coordinator Job in Minneapolis,Full Time,"Minneapolis, MN 55401",,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Project-Coordinator-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-166965791.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f298dd8879fe973d2e908a11fd009d79
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:22:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Your IT skills are needed just about anywhere. But is it where you want to go? Imagine working for one of the nation's most respected companies. Making a strategic contribution. Receiving the rewards and recognition you deserve. Whether you are pursuing a contract or permanent placement, Experis knows how and where to get you where you want to go.Are you interested? The ideal Technical Writer candidate will possess the following experience:Understand programming languages (Java, Javascript, Objective C or Swift)Understand Application Programming InterfacesTechnical writing documenting RESTful API and URL schemes Develop SDK documentation for the client's Secure Mobile Access platform. This is a new SDK and requires a writer who has experience creating SDK technical collateral. You can see it. More challenging work. A more interesting work environment. The opportunity to use your finely honed skills to make a real difference. And to collect pay that reflects your talent and expertise. If this is what you see for yourself, you need to talk to Experis.Through our reach and resources, Experis brings you career options you couldn't find on your own. We're experts at placing each of our candidates into his/her ""dream job"" - one perfectly matched to skills, ambition and lifestyle.We've got the right opportunity. Tell us why you're the right person. Apply today!Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Technical Writer (Junior) Job in North Bend,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Technical Writer (Junior),"North Bend, WA 98160",http://jobview.monster.com/Technical-Writer-Junior-Job-North-Bend-WA-US-167077359.aspx?mescoid=2700440001001&jobPosition=20,1.00 - 1.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,0946098c4557f09a437803b14d8ae88a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:22:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Information Technology Sr. Mobil Application Developer San Francisco Job Requisition Number 7763BR Locations where job may be based El Dorado Hills, San Francisco Work Schedule Full Time Employment Type Regular Term Employee There's never been a better time to join Blue Shield! Looking for a chance to do meaningful work that touches millions? Come join the hardest working, nonprofit health plan in California and help us shape the future of health care. Blue Shield of California is focused on transforming health care by making it more accessible, affordable and customer-centric. Being a mission-driven organization means we do much more than serve our 3.5 million members: we were the first health plan in the nation to limit our annual net income to 2 percent of revenue and return the difference to our customers and the community, and since 2005 we have contributed more than $325 million to the Blue Shield of California Foundation to improve community health and end domestic violence. We also believe that a healthier California begins with our employees, so we provide them with resources to develop and maintain a healthy lifestyle through our award-winning wellness program, Wellvolution. We're hiring smart thinkers and doers who want to work for a leader and innovator in the challenging, ever-changing healthcare space. Come and help us make health care better for everyone. Job Details We are looking for a Sr. Mobile Developer to support Blue Shield of California’s iOS apps that integrate with our services platform. This person will report to the Senior Manager of Web and Mobile Application Support. The Mobile support team is responsible for application solution development to support consumer mobile apps for BSC Online Mobil business. The ideal candidate will have extensive experience in iOS design and development, with one or more apps in the Apple iTunes AppStore.    A Sr. Mobile Developer will have hands experience also overseeing the daily work of the Managed service Mobil  team. This includes providing the ongoing direction application and who can take diverse and changing requirements and turn them into actionable plans. The ideal candidate will have had experience in the high paced energy of startups as well as experience in the structured world of a large company. The successful applicant will work closely with Mobil Application Development team and Business teams, and Quality Assurance Engineers in a collaborative environment to provide quality software and solutions to solve Mobil support issues.   Job Required Education/Experience Leads the analysis and application of engineering patterns  and methodologies (REST, Soap, etc.) used P rovide technical guidance to less experienced staff and managed service team Monitors software configuration changes to anticipate and address the impact of data reliability and customer satisfaction issues Experienced in managing SLA performance in a 24x7 support cycle Expert level understanding and experience with Software Debugging and integration techniques.(API, Services, SOA) Performs code review Development and unit testing complex code for new enhancements and to fix defects  based on detailed specifications and conducts unit testing. Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Engineering or equivalent work experience. 3+ years as a technical lead with deep understanding of iOS UX and UI design paradigms, and ability to implement and design iOS apps 5+ years of broad knowledge of Objective-C, XCode, UIKit, and Interface Builder Experience working with and tuning high volume mobile application Experience integrating with RESTful API backends Desire to work in a fast paced, agile, collaborative environment Understanding of other technologies such as Oracle, Java, .NET etc Extensive technical leadership skills including management of sustaining support for complex, enterprise level software portfolios of applications. Experience developing and delivering communications to key stakeholders Experience in managing on and offshore teams Job Additional Education/Experience Familiar with Health Industry ITIL v3 certification (advanced certification preferred) PMP certification is a plus . Blue Shield of California is committed to remaining a drug-free work place. All positions require a pre-employment background investigation and drug screen. Blue Shield of California is an Equal Opportunity Employer - EEO/MF/disabled/veteran. Sourcer #LI-PS1",Sr. Mobil Application Developer Job in El Dorado Hills,Full Time Employee,"Information Technology Sr. Mobil Application Developer San Francisco Job Requisition Number 7763BR Locations where job may be based El Dorado Hills, San Francisco Work Schedule Full Time Employment Type Regular Term Employee There's never been a better time to join Blue Shield! Looking for a chance to do meaningful work that touches millions? Come join the hardest working, nonprofit health plan in California and help us shape the future of health care. Blue Shield of California is focused on transforming health care by making it more accessible, affordable and customer-centric. Being a mission-driven organization means we do much more than serve our 3.5 million members: we were the first health plan in the nation to limit our annual net income to 2 percent of revenue and return the difference to our customers and the community, and since 2005 we have contributed more than $325 million to the Blue Shield of California Foundation to improve community health and end domestic violence. We also believe that a healthier California begins with our employees, so we provide them with resources to develop and maintain a healthy lifestyle through our award-winning wellness program, Wellvolution. We're hiring smart thinkers and doers who want to work for a leader and innovator in the challenging, ever-changing healthcare space. Come and help us make health care better for everyone. Job Details We are looking for a Sr. Mobile Developer to support Blue Shield of California’s iOS apps that integrate with our services platform. This person will report to the Senior Manager of Web and Mobile Application Support. The Mobile support team is responsible for application solution development to support consumer mobile apps for BSC Online Mobil business. The ideal candidate will have extensive experience in iOS design and development, with one or more apps in the Apple iTunes AppStore.    A Sr. Mobile Developer will have hands experience also overseeing the daily work of the Managed service Mobil  team. This includes providing the ongoing direction application and who can take diverse and changing requirements and turn them into actionable plans. The ideal candidate will have had experience in the high paced energy of startups as well as experience in the structured world of a large company. The successful applicant will work closely with Mobil Application Development team and Business teams, and Quality Assurance Engineers in a collaborative environment to provide quality software and solutions to solve Mobil support issues.   Job Required Education/Experience Leads the analysis and application of engineering patterns  and methodologies (REST, Soap, etc.) used P rovide technical guidance to less experienced staff and managed service team Monitors software configuration changes to anticipate and address the impact of data reliability and customer satisfaction issues Experienced in managing SLA performance in a 24x7 support cycle Expert level understanding and experience with Software Debugging and integration techniques.(API, Services, SOA) Performs code review Development and unit testing complex code for new enhancements and to fix defects  based on detailed specifications and conducts unit testing. Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/Engineering or equivalent work experience. 3+ years as a technical lead with deep understanding of iOS UX and UI design paradigms, and ability to implement and design iOS apps 5+ years of broad knowledge of Objective-C, XCode, UIKit, and Interface Builder Experience working with and tuning high volume mobile application Experience integrating with RESTful API backends Desire to work in a fast paced, agile, collaborative environment Understanding of other technologies such as Oracle, Java, .NET etc Extensive technical leadership skills including management of sustaining support for complex, enterprise level software portfolios of applications. Experience developing and delivering communications to key stakeholders Experience in managing on and offshore teams Job Additional Education/Experience Familiar with Health Industry ITIL v3 certification (advanced certification preferred) PMP certification is a plus . Blue Shield of California is committed to remaining a drug-free work place. All positions require a pre-employment background investigation and drug screen. Blue Shield of California is an Equal Opportunity Employer - EEO/MF/disabled/veteran. Sourcer #LI-PS1",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Mobil-Application-Developer-Job-El-Dorado-Hills-CA-US-167000286.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,ebd373d5c49d1d178118d0f9a1764c3a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:21:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"New York City office of Special Counsel looking for labor & employment attorneys open to working on upcoming potential assignments. Temporary Labor & Employment Attorney Job Duties: Help employees and clients understand the revised FLSA laws Review budgets to determine how additional overtime pay will impact the bottom lineAssist in notifying employees of impending changes under revised laws and explain how those changes may impact their employment and compensationDetermine whether to increase salaries for any newly reclassified employees under revised lawsHandle any employment related matters as needed Requirements:Must have at least 5 years of experience as a labor & employment attorney Must have an understanding of Fair Labor Standards Act and the impending changes Must be admitted to the bar and in good standing Must be committed to working the duration of an assignment If you are qualified, available and interested in potential, upcoming temporary labor & employment attorney positions, please send an MS Word version of your resume to newyork@specialcounsel.com ",Temporary Labor & Employment Attorneys Needed for Potential Upcoming Assignments Job in New York City,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"New York City, NY 10175",,http://jobview.monster.com/Temporary-Labor-Employment-Attorneys-Needed-for-Potential-Upcoming-Assignments-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-167024066.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=11,,Legal,db10e15dce4748cbfb92c581478c1321
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:21:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"  <!-- /* Font Definitions */ @font-face {font-family:""Courier New""; panose-1:2 7 3 9 2 2 5 2 4 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536859905 -1073711037 9 0 511 0;} @font-face {font-family:Wingdings; panose-1:5 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0; mso-font-charset:2; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:0 268435456 0 0 -2147483648 0;} @font-face {font-family:""Cambria Math""; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536870145 1107305727 0 0 415 0;} @font-face {font-family:Calibri; panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536870145 1073786111 1 0 415 0;} /* Style Definitions */ p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal {mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-parent:""""; margin:0in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph {mso-style-priority:34; mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-margin-top-alt:auto; margin-right:0in; mso-margin-bottom-alt:auto; margin-left:0in; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin;} .MsoChpDefault {mso-style-type:export-only; mso-default-props:yes; font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} @page WordSection1 {size:8.5in 11.0in; margin:1.0in 1.0in 1.0in 1.0in; mso-header-margin:.5in; mso-footer-margin:.5in; mso-paper-source:0;} div.WordSection1 {page:WordSection1;} /* List Definitions */ @list l0 {mso-list-id:939681731; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:-728828780 67698691 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l0:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l0:level2 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l0:level3 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l0:level4 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l0:level5 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l0:level6 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l0:level7 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l0:level8 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l0:level9 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:4.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l1 {mso-list-id:1177623421; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:-1616585584 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l1:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l1:level2 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l1:level3 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l1:level4 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l1:level5 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l1:level6 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l1:level7 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l1:level8 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l1:level9 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:4.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l2 {mso-list-id:1286621684; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:-230228144 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l2:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l2:level2 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l2:level3 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l2:level4 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l2:level5 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l2:level6 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l2:level7 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l2:level8 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l2:level9 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:4.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l3 {mso-list-id:1747729573; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:172541966 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l3:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l3:level2 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l3:level3 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l3:level4 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l3:level5 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l3:level6 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l3:level7 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l3:level8 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l3:level9 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:4.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l4 {mso-list-id:1760980547; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:-1196763326 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l4:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l4:level2 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l4:level3 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l4:level4 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l4:level5 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l4:level6 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l4:level7 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l4:level8 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l4:level9 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:4.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l5 {mso-list-id:1945845617; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:1118105618 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l5:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l5:level2 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l5:level3 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l5:level4 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l5:level5 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l5:level6 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l5:level7 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l5:level8 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l5:level9 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l6 {mso-list-id:1974408361; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:-889013758 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l6:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l6:level2 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l6:level3 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l6:level4 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:1.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l6:level5 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l6:level6 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:2.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l6:level7 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l6:level8 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:3.75in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New"";} @list l6:level9 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; margin-left:4.25in; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} ol {margin-bottom:0in;} ul {margin-bottom:0in;} --> SBS is a rapidly-growing IT services company that is seeking a versatile Human Resources Assistant to support our team. This individual will also serve as a point of contact for off-site managers and key staff.  Job Summary: ·       Responsible for managing key functions within the Human Resources Department·       Liaison between corporate management, employees, and corporate services team (finance, IT, recruiting, training, HR) Key Objectives and Major Responsibilities: ·       Perform key functions within the Human Resources team:o   Responsible for the on-boarding process (offer letters, background screening, orientation, paperwork)  o   Separation processing for all employees (exit interviews, unemployment claims)o   Serve as a liaison to geographically dispersed employees for a variety of day-to-day HR needso   Review and provide updates to policies as neededo   Maintenance of personnel folders (updates- hard and soft copies)o   Employment verification process (communication, documentation)o   Interact with Professional Services Managers to address and resolve employment issues or concernso   Manage the Employee Welfare and Morale program (gift cards, bonuses, tracking)o   Compliance (OSHA, 5500, EEOC, VETS-100, AAP Reporting and Compliance) ·       Responsible for payroll administrationo   Process payroll semi-monthly for all SBS employeeso   Enter and maintain all employee information within payroll systemo   Prepare all reporting information related to payroll ·       Responsible for benefits administrationo   Assist employees in the resolution of benefit claim issueso   Educate employee population on the benefit programs offered o   Organization and communication of benefit programs during annual open enrollment period o   Review and analyze benefit programs annually o   Responsible for compliance items as they relate to benefits administration (ex: ACA, COBRA)o   Review and reconcile monthly bill statements for paymento   Process disability and worker’s compensation claims·       Provide recommendations to leadership team regarding new initiatives, policies, processes and procedures to ensure success ·       Provide assistance to the Human Resources Manager with special projects as needed Performance Metrics: ·       Accurate and timely reporting as it related to Human Resources functions·       Satisfaction of service level provided to employees, management and customers  ·       Accuracy of payroll records, employee files and benefits information Capabilities and competencies for Success:·       Bachelor's degree and at least two (2+) years of Human Resources experience·       Exceptional customer facing skills·       Excellent organizational and time management skills·       Exemplary written and oral communication skills·       Ability to work well independently and in team environment·       Handle employee information and privacy with utmost confidentiality and professionalism·       Knowledge of HR practices and principles, and familiarity with applicable employment, compensation, benefits, and safety laws and regulations·       Understanding of core business functions and how they relate to Human Resources and delivering IT services to customers Strategic Business Systems, Inc. (SBS) is a National Information Technology Services company headquartered in the Washington D.C. Metro area. SBS provides IT infrastructure design, integration, and operation services. Our expertise encompasses the full spectrum of infrastructure technologies, including the latest network, server, data storage, disaster recovery, security and Internet technologies. SBS is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Please feel free to visit our website at www.sbsplanet.com",Human Resources Assistant Job in Chantilly,Full Time,"Chantilly, VA 20151",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Assistant-Job-Chantilly-VA-US-167024595.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=1,Based on Applicable Experience,Entry Level,87a774f2d191242d7f1282b9c7fb15c9
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:21:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More UX Designer Job #:  659432The Senior UX Designer will be responsible for designing a user experience that helps learn about and purchase our client's products from their website. In this role, you will work with a team of product managers and marketing specialists to develop and refine a strategy for increasing conversion rates for new and existing customers using our website to find, evaluate, and purchase products to improve their process. We’re looking for great designers who are passionate about understanding users and addressing their needs, understand marketing strategy and buying behaviors, and will draw upon their creativity and problem-solving to find the best approach to improve the user experience.The ideal candidate for this position will have experience designing well-researched and thought-out wire frames and prototypes; iterate on designs based on A/B testing and other forms of user research; and have strong visual design skills with the ability to creating an engaging site experience.REQUIREMENTS:5-10 years experience as UX Designer, Interaction Designer, UX Architect, or Information Architect.Experience working with marketing teams to develop strategic direction, messaging, and value proposition.Experience designing and improving the purchasing experience.Strong visual design skills with an extensive portfolio to show your range and abilities.Produce wireframes using programs such as Axure.Create visual mock ups using programs such as Photoshop or IllustratorPREFERRED:Previous B2B experience, especially working in the HR, HRMS, or recruiting space.Develop clickable prototypes using programs such as Axure, Invision, or Sketch.Experience conducting user research such as usability sessions, user interviews, or card sorting.Experience working with HTML, CSS, jQuery is a plus. This position does not require front-end coding but by understanding front-end web technologies it will assist you in creating designs that can be implemented correctly.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",UX Designer Job in Chicago,Full Time Employee,"Chicago, IL",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/UX-Designer-Job-Chicago-IL-US-166990120.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),13abefcb3c3a98acddf71a7877c16763
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:21:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T's Technology Development Digital Experience group is looking for a highly skilled Principal User Experience Designer to join their growing team. If you want to be part of a dynamic team with an awesome company take a look below. We look forward to hearing from you. The Principal User Experience Designer works to design website elements (iconography, visual compositions, redlines, static banners, promotional elements, etc.). Other additional responsibilities may include: creating/updating style guides, wireframes, prototypes, animated files, CSS, HTML. This person will work closely with other internal partners, including: the Brand team on visual element adoption, the Standards team on element and pattern creation/adoption, UX teams on functional design creation, business partners, and Usability and User Research teams. Key Roles and Responsibilities for a Principal User Experience Designer: Analyzes, develops, and drives strategy Act as a senior member contributing to the design groups efforts to enhance the look and feel of the organizations site designs and user interface features. Designs the website and website elements to support the organization’s vision, strategies, and goals. Education: Preferred Bachelor of Science degree in Human Computer Interaction, Interactive Media, or Graphic Design or equivalent experience. Experience: Typically requires 5-7 years’ experience. Supervisory: No. Awesome Points: Requires advanced knowledge in web-based technologies and thorough knowledge of PhotoShop, Illustrator, Adobe CS and InDesign, and Visio Able to work in design-related software and MS Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint). Strong knowledge of design, visual hierarchy, layout, grids, color theory, typography and imagery. CSS, HTML, and JavaScript experience. Things that make you stand out: iRise, Axure is a plus. Excited and able to work in a fast-paced environment. Demonstrated background working in agile and other SDLC methodologies.",Senior User Experience Designer UX Design Job in Bothell,,"Bothell, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-User-Experience-Designer-UX-Design-Job-Bothell-WA-US-167075466.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=16,,,c39cfd8454c89e6a515d60f61bea7a01
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:21:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Digital Engagement PracticeContent Management and Portals (CMP) Practice provide consulting and systems integration services in the areas of Portals, Content Management, Collaboration, Social Media and Enterprise Search. It holds partnership with the market leading products in each of the areas and offers customer’s services to consult, implement and maintain product based solutions. Key technology sub-practices include SharePoint, PCC (Portal Content & Collaboration), and ECM (Enterprise Content Management). The group is around 3000 associates worldwide and is one of the fastest growing businesses within Cognizant.Focus areas are in Digital platforms market expansion where we leverage Internet and Intranet Platform Products and Services portfolio in the digital platforms landscape. Also a market leader in the areas of Commerce and WCM, domain specific Web Portals and Cloud and Mobile Web, Social, Mobility, Core SP Business Applications, Migrations and upgrades Job Title: Documentum Architect with D2  Must Have Skills:   Documentum Expertise D2 3.x/4.0, xCP 2.0, Documentum 5.3/6.5/7.0 WebTop, Web Publisher, Documentum Administrator, Workflow Manager, Retention Policy Manager DFC, DFS, BOF, Site Cache Services, Documentum 5.3 Web Services, API, DQL, Documentum Application Builder requirements and build functional specifications, including but not limited to interface changes and process flows.  Functional Expertise Documentum applications design and solution architecture development Configuration and customization of Documentum product suite WDK components customization/migration and workflows development   Organization Marketing Statement Cognizant(NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centres worldwide and approximately 221,700 employees as of December 31, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at http://www.cognizant.com/ or follow us on https://twitter.com/USJobsCognizant/ Additional Information:",Documentum D Architect Job in Greenville,Full Time Employee,"Greenville, NC 27834",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Documentum-D2-Architect-Job-Greenville-NC-US-167036862.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,c22233cb1bf1f2f1abe23575973290fb
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:21:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Database Administrator works in the Engineering Services and Technical Support Services. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Essential duties and responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. Responsible for the integration of CNI Core Competencies into daily functions, including: commitment to integrity, knowledge/quality of work, supporting financial goals of the company, initiative/motivation, cooperation/relationships, problem analysis/discretion, accomplishing goals through organization, positive oral/written communication skills, leadership abilities, commitment to Affirmative Action, reliability/dependability, flexibility and ownership/accountability of actions taken. Knowledge of software programming, development, review, audit, testing, configuration management, requirements, and changes is required. Highly developed programming skills using Oracle, Solaris Operating System, Power Builder, CCC Harvest, and other software as identified is also required. Responsible for aiding in own self-development by being available and receptive to any training made available by the company. Plans daily activities within the guidelines of company policy, job description and supervisor's instruction in such away as to maximize output. Responsible for keeping own immediate work area in a neat and orderly condition to ensure safety of self and coworkers. Will relay any unsafe conditions and/or practices to the appropriate supervisor and Human Resources. Will immediately correct any unsafe conditions to the best of own ability. EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE Bachelor of Science degree in Computer Science is required. A degree in another technical discipline may be substituted depending on other qualifications, and length and type of specialized experience Minimum of 15 years experience in developing, revising, testing, and applying code to data base applications is required. Assistance in development of training materials and training of data base users may be required.MATHEMATICAL SKILLSAbility to work with mathematical concepts such as probability and statistical inference, and fundamentals of plane and solid geometry and trigonometry. Ability to apply concepts such as fractions, percentages, ratios, and proportions to practical situations. REASONING ABILITYAbility to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists. Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATION LANGUAGE SKILLSAbility to read, analyzes, and interprets general business periodicals, professiona1journals, technical procedures, or governmental regulations. Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals. Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public.PI93763267Apply Here",Database Administrator Job in Oklahoma City,"Full Time , Employee","Oklahoma City, OK 73069",Chickasaw Nation Industries Aviation,http://jobview.monster.com/Database-Administrator-Job-Oklahoma-City-OK-US-167045546.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=4,,IT/Software Development,68b17c74d32e21ef4c5c824216323ce0
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:15:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More PS Functional Analyst Job #:  660246Our client is looking for a PeopleSoft HR Functional Analyst. Candidates will focus on both enhancements and project work (multiple projects in queue). Key area of expertise will be focused on Core HR & Reporting; Position Management is a very nice to have, but not a hard requirement.Please send resumes to Chris Rosbaugh at crosbaugh@apexsystemsinc.com  Duties are as follows:Gathering RequirementsRoot Cause AnalysisCreating Functional SpecificationsAnalyzing Process Flows / Designing Configuration DocsConfiguration of Core HR (Candidates will be expected to do hands on config work, but they are looking for stronger analysis skills and can coach on the config aspect)Creation of test scripts/execution of manual testing/tracking defects etc.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",PS Functional Analyst Job in St. Louis,Full Time Employee,"St. Louis, MO",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/PS-Functional-Analyst-Job-St.-Louis-MO-US-167054623.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b40886022860e1750f53547b5ce7ad50
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:14:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Work Location    :  Bellevue, WADuration                : Full TimeStart Date             :  ASAP Visa Status: USC/GC/H1-BSend resume at tom@snsglobalstaffing.com  Should be strong in AWS, Linux, Cloud formation, should be workingin architect role currentlyTom (Tabrez Nazir)Talent Acquisition SpecialistSnS Global Corporationdba SnS StaffingPh: 512-298-3748Fax: 512-377-9840tom@snsglobalstaffing.com",Cloud Devops Developer Job in Bellevue,Full Time,"Bellevue, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Cloud-Devops-Developer-Job-Bellevue-WA-US-166980122.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6007ad6b379ed121b2725f49811c9283
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:03:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More IT - Security Consultant Job #:  660011Apex Systems Inc. is seeking a Project Resource Coordinator for a role in Golden Valley, MN! The ideal candidate will have good follow-up skills, is detail oriented, and possesses some knowledge of Project Management skills.Position: Project Resource CoordinatorLocation: Golden Valley, MN 55427Contract: 6 Month ContractPay: Competitive Hourly RateHours: M-F 8AM to 4PM CSTWorking with the IRM Vendor Risk Assessment team to successfully manage resources and schedulesWork with management to schedule onsite resources based on region (arrange travel details)Various forecasting, staffing, scheduling of Onsite Risk AssessmentsCommunicate, escalate, and track resources’ progress on assessmentsReport periodic operational and risk metrics to leadershipJob RequirementsNeed advanced level experience in MS Word, MS Excel, and MS PowerPoint.Good follow-up skills and detail orientedStrong Communication and Presentation SkillsOrganization skillsExperience working with senior levels of managementPossess project management skills             EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",IT - Security Consultant Job in Eagan,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More IT - Security Consultant Job #:  660011Apex Systems Inc. is seeking a Project Resource Coordinator for a role in Golden Valley, MN! The ideal candidate will have good follow-up skills, is detail oriented, and possesses some knowledge of Project Management skills.Position: Project Resource CoordinatorLocation: Golden Valley, MN 55427Contract: 6 Month ContractPay: Competitive Hourly RateHours: M-F 8AM to 4PM CSTWorking with the IRM Vendor Risk Assessment team to successfully manage resources and schedulesWork with management to schedule onsite resources based on region (arrange travel details)Various forecasting, staffing, scheduling of Onsite Risk AssessmentsCommunicate, escalate, and track resources’ progress on assessmentsReport periodic operational and risk metrics to leadershipJob RequirementsNeed advanced level experience in MS Word, MS Excel, and MS PowerPoint.Good follow-up skills and detail orientedStrong Communication and Presentation SkillsOrganization skillsExperience working with senior levels of managementPossess project management skills             EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Security-Consultant-Job-Eagan-MN-US-167072332.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bfef581a1e76fa8f17c84de119027deb
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:03:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"IT Technician (Part Time), Visual Basic, MySQL, Hardware/Software - Akron, OH - JOB 16-02715 Salary Range: $13.75 per hour, Part Time Contract (20 hours weekly)Only U.S. Citizens or persons with a Green Card work permit may apply. A custom programming, software developer & business management firm servicing the outdoor power equipment, agricultural, power sports and marine industry is seeking a part time IT Technician to provide technical support clientele.  Part Time Hours = approximately 20 hours a week.  This position requires strong communication skills. REQUIREMENTSAssociates degree or Technical College or Self-Taught2 years or more experience with Visual Basic, Hardware & Software Knowledge (Networking, Routers, Switches, Drivers, etc...)MySQL, .NET, C#, C++ is a plusSeeking a junior level IT Technician with good communication skills and proficiency with Visual Basic.  Other desired experience is MySQL, .NET, C#, C++Only U.S. Citizens or persons with a Green Card work permit may apply.Candidates are required to pass a Criminal Background Check and a 10 Panel Drug Screen. Salary Range: $13.75 per hour Part Time Contract (20 hours weekly) Due to the large amount of resumes we expect to receive only the most qualified candidates will be contacted. We will retain all other resumes for any future job considerations. Integrity Technical Services, Inc.14 Whitehall Drive Suite 102Akron, Ohio 44278Toll Free: 1-888-262-3226Akron: 330-633-6500 Cleveland: 440-257-3232Website: www.integrityjobs.com (To view all of our open positions please visit our website) Integrity Technical Services, Inc. does not charge a fee for finding anyone a job. Integrity Technical Services is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",IT Technician Job in Akron,Full Time,"Akron, OH 44311",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Technician-Job-Akron-OH-US-166236107.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=4,13.75 - 13.75 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),a4305a008240691f611f766a48540d9d
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:03:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Real Estate department of a mid-size law firm with offices throughout the tri-state area is seeking two Land Use Attorneys -- one mid-level (3-6 years of experience) and one senior level (7-10 years of experience) -- to join the firm’s Princeton, NJ office as an Associate. The right Land Use Attorneys will have environmental, regulatory, zoning, and municipal experience.  Experience with the preparation of municipal and county land use applications, notices of decision, and other legal notices is key. Land Use Attorney candidates must be admitted in good standing to the New Jersey Bar.  Admission to the New York Bar as well is preferred.  Top academic credentials and large firm experience are strongly preferred. This is a great opportunity to join a prestigious Real Estate department in a partner-track position at a firm on the rise, working out of one of its smaller, more congenial offices.  If you are interested in hearing more, please submit a recently updated resume highlighting your relevant experience.  We look forward to hearing from you!",Real Estate/Land Use Attorney Job in Princeton,Full Time Employee,"Princeton, NJ",,http://jobview.monster.com/Real-Estate-Land-Use-Attorney-Job-Princeton-NJ-US-166663442.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=9,,Legal,424ce0834c8d51bf05cf51835340fa60
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:10:02:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Duties and responsibilities include providing support to ensure efficient operation of REMS (Real Estate Management System). Position will support managers and employees through a variety of tasks related to organization and the smooth and efficient running Tririga, a single system to manage lifecycle of facilities. - Accurately and efficiently input leasing information from a variety of sources into a computer database. - Ensure all required documents (leases, amendments, clarifications, ACH, etc.) are uploaded in the Notes & Documents tab. Scanning documents. - Review information in database and cross reference with a variety of sources for accuracy. Modify any incorrect information. - Assist in gathering of information in database and cross reference with a variety of sources for accuracy. Modify any incorrect information. - Create flow charts - Attend training sessions. - Uses Microsoft PowerPoint and other software to create internal and external presentations. - Assist with training documents. - Answer and direct calls & emails from the Admin HotlineIT background is required. Accounting background is desired. Integrated Workplace Management Systems knowledge is desirable. This position inputs data into the system and validates lease information found in the system. Candidate must understand leasing data such as square ft./cost per square ftMicrosoft Office Skills; Interest in learning new systems; strong communication skills; customer service skills; ability to prioritize tasks; ability to work with minimal supervision; willing to be part of a Team and to continually strive to improve the overall process; have a good eye for attention to details; real estate background a mustGraduation from an accredited college or university with an Associate's degree in Computer Science or Computer/Information Technology is preferred, but not required",Help Desk Support Job in Trenton,Full Time,"Trenton, NJ 08601",,http://jobview.monster.com/Help-Desk-Support-Job-Trenton-NJ-US-167021535.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=5,,,63c57e023a668460a5686c30964d0fb9
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:58:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Content Writer, Partner Marketing, California (CA).Essential Functions: Manage day-to-day messaging, monitoring, and moderation across 20 different client-branded topic pages Work with marketing lead to increase reach and relevancy Work with external partners to coordinate and support content partnerships on the topic pages Develop best practice one-sheets and case studies highlighting interesting trends and great public figure content Source and collect content from public figures and media companies of client and curate into best practice resource libraries Become the go-to expert in content created by public figures and media companiesREQUIREMENTS: 1-2 years of online professional writing and/or blogging experience Deep understanding of platform and pages, navigating the page features and insights to evaluate performance Must be an avid user with a passion for Public Content including pop culture, sports, and politics Rapid learner who can ramp up quickly and thrive in a fast-paced environment Exceptional written and verbal communication skills Strong editorial and copywriting skills Extremely reliable, consistent, and hard-working Ability to work effectively and cross-functionally with all levels of management, both internally and externally",Content Writer,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Menlo Park, CA 94025",,http://jobview.monster.com/Content-Writer-Partner-Marketing-Job-Menlo-Park-CA-US-166970223.aspx?mescoid=2700442001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),13d14837ac78a4d994f903b4e174bd1f
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:57:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Facilities Service Center Coordinator Job #:  652181Apex Systems, the nation’s 2nd largest IT Staffing organization, has an immediate opportunity for a Facilities Coordinator to work for our client who is one of the world’s largest and most admired companies.  If you’re looking for an organization that focuses on innovation, social responsibility, and quality, then this is the place for you.  Pay is competitive and the work is to be completed in Silicon Valley.If interested, send a resume to Ann-Michelle Faulkner, Technical Recruiter, at afaulkner@apexsystemsinc.com Overview:Candidate is responsible for receiving, dispatching and following up on maintenance work orders, communicating with business partners and vendors, soliciting quotes for services, invoice verification and updating work order status..Responsibilities:Receive, triage and dispatch maintenance work orders for a designated group of buildings.Manage coordination of multiple vendors and staff technicians. Assigns technicians or vendors to perform repairs and coordinate work until complete. Review, validate and approve proposals. Reviews, validates and approves invoices. Maintains records of maintenance and other facility activity. Provide direction to vendors as needed and ensures vendors comply with company policies and procedures. Coordinates and manages schedule and calendar for Facilities Department. Identifies opportunities for increased efficiencies and cost savings. Assists in coordinating and organizing special events. Provide administrative support for the Facilities Department..Skills/Qualifications:Demonstrated ability to plan and prioritize tasks in a self-directed work environment and maintain high levels of productivity.Extremely detail oriented.Strong customer service and problem solving aptitude.The ability to communicate effectively and provide direction to contractors and vendors performing services for the company.Manages time efficiently with demonstrated ability to multi-task.Familiarity with Mac platform and Microsoft Office programs.Strong analytical and problem solving abilities.Must work well under pressure in a demanding environment .Strong verbal and written communication skills .ShiftGraveyardCompany & Group DetailsThe organization offers several perks, including great benefits, an onsite café, outdoor patios and other rewards programs.*Please note that as a contract employee of Apex Systems, you’d be eligible for Health, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance; Short Term Disability; Hospitalization Coverage; Direct Deposit; Weekly Pay Periods; Training and Development Programs; Corporate Discounts/Perks and our Referral Program.* Learn More",Facilities Service Center Coordinator Job in Santa Clara,Full Time Employee,"Santa Clara, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Facilities-Service-Center-Coordinator-Job-Santa-Clara-CA-US-167023299.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d45f3d665e0d17bdfe52c7691730a1b0
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:55:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are Plaintiff oriented personal injury law firm located in Southfield, Michigan. We are looking to add aparalegal, full time, to assist attorneys handling auto and PIP claims.Qualifications:2+ years as a paralegal in Auto/PIP personal injuryMicrosoft Office (Word, Outlook, Excell)Salary negotiable and dependent upon experience.General job description is:GENERAL1. Telephone calls to attorneys/adjuster regarding: case status, outstanding discovery, missing documents;2. Meet with injured party to gather documents, respond to discovery and discover facts3. Track down and interview witnesses;4. Prepare/Assist in preparation of Motions, Stipulations & Orders;5. Calling medical providers to gather medical bills for PIP claims.7. Gathering ongoing disability slips to support claims.6. Preparing monthly attendant care and replacement service submissions.DISCOVERY6 . Prepare routine Interrogatories and Requests for Production of Documents;7. Prepare Interrogatory answers;8. Interview Insured to answer discovery;9. Prepare Response to Request for Production of Documents;10. Prepare Motions to Compel Responses to Discovery;11. Summarize Answers to Interrogatories;12. Prepare Witness/Exhibit Lists.EXPERT13. Find experts, including experts for IME records review and accident reconstruction;14. Prepare letters and documents to be sent to experts.RECORDS15. Prepare Record Subpoenas;16. Prepare HIPPA Authorizations;17. Follow­up with medical providers to update medical records.FILING/Secretarial18. Maintain and organize all client files;19. Maintain and organize tickler file to send documents to clients/insurance carriers20. Photocopy documents at the request of attorney21. Assist in greeting clients22. Maintain cleanliness of officeTRIAL21. Prepare Trial Notebooks;22. Prepare Trial Exhibits;23. Prepare Exhibits;24. Assist in preparation of jury instructions;25. Attend Trial when necessary and pre­approved by client.",Paralegal/Legal Assistant Job in Farmington Hills,Full Time,"Farmington Hills, MI 48334",,http://jobview.monster.com/Paralegal-Legal-Assistant-Job-FARMINGTON-HILLS-MI-US-163949222.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=1,,,13495e6f278f7f98f1ffde750aaab5b6
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:54:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"ProHEALTH is one of the largest private multi-specialty medical practices in the Northeast and we have been serving the health needs of Long Island and the Greater New York Metropolitan area since 1997. Along with outstanding physician leadership, state-of-the art technology and advanced clinical laboratories, ProHEALTH patients enjoy comprehensive and superior medical services. Growing company in Nassau County is seeking experienced Payroll staff to join our expanding team. The ideal candidates should have the following skills:Working knowledge of ADP Workforce Now and Essentials TimeExperience processing multi-state payrollThoroughly understand all facets of payroll processing including pay rates, deductions and maintenance of benefit accrualsPossess excellent interpersonal skills and be comfortable communicating with all levels of employees and managementAbility to work in a fast-paced environment Attention to detail and accuracyMust be a team playerProficient in Word and Excel and generating ad hoc reports in ADP Workforce Now are criticalAll interested, qualified candidates please submit resume with salary requirements to careers@prohealthcare.com .ProHEALTH is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",Payroll Specialist Job in Lake Success,Full Time,"Lake Success, NY",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Specialist-Job-Lake-Success-NY-US-167080471.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=11,,,e5eb40061af6a7ac2311afa6fc591511
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:54:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad Professionals is currently recruiting licensed attorneys for upcoming document review projects at large law firms located in downtown Minneapolis. Various projects will start throughout the month of May (and throughout the rest of the year). Both long-term and short-term options are available and flexible hours will be offered for projects.Candidates must hold an active attorney license (in any state) and be available for full-time work (8 hours per day, Monday through Friday) at short notice.Interested and qualified candidates, please submit resumes to Christine Burgess at christine.burgess@randstadusa.com",Document Review Attorneys Needed - Downtown Minneapolis Job in Minneapolis,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Minneapolis, MN 55402",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Document-Review-Attorneys-Needed-Downtown-Minneapolis-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-166664273.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=7,,Legal,556b25ae56522afb5080466d333d43ea
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:44:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a leading Pharmaceutical company, is currently seeking a Business Analyst to join their team. **Candidates must be available to work directly on our w2 without sponsorship**This successful candidate will have the following background:Strong Property & Casualty Insurance backgroundMust be able to evaluate and reconcile policy related data for system conversation projectsExperience with analyzing insurance business operations, trends, costs and revenues to project future business operations.**Candidates must be available to work directly on our w2 without sponsorship** The Judge Group is a privately-owned, leading professional services firm, providing technology, talent and learning solutions to businesses around the globe. Judge’s expertise is positioned at the crossroads of people and technology - two of the most important aspects of successful business today.  Our solutions are successfully delivered through a workforce of 4,500+ professionals and an international network of more than 30 practice offices.  The Judge Group prides itself on delivering services of exceptional quality and value while upholding our commitment to customer service.  Find out more information at www.judge.com.",Insurance Business Analyst Job in Conshohocken,"Full Time, Employee","Conshohocken, PA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Insurance-Business-Analyst-Job-Conshohocken-PA-US-167039408.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,be1ccdfd067de42d98d4731d48e2419e
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:44:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More IT - Voice / Data Network Consultant Job #:  658369Cisco EngineerOptum - United Health Groupplease email resumes to ejohannsen@apexsystemsinc.com  Description: The candidates primary role will be to provide the delivery of network projects that could include; new deployments, hardware refresh, network growth, and assisting complex operational tasks.• This candidates role will include designing and implementing data networks.• Candidate must be comfortable engineering Cisco environments• Candidate must have thorough understanding of Ethernet technologies• Candidate must have experiencing with routing protocols; OSPF, BGP, and EIGRP.• Ability to troubleshoot F5 load balancing environment desired.• Experience working in an Agile environment is desired.• This position will involve various technical documentation writing.The majority of the work is to be performed in the Optum 6150 Trenton Ln, MN facility but some work may be required in other metro office locations, Elk River and Chaska Tech Centers.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",IT - Voice / Data Network Consultant Job in Plymouth,Full Time Employee,"Plymouth, MN",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Voice-Data-Network-Consultant-Job-Plymouth-MN-US-166964932.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3a80e46835bc3605bdb6151c925151fc
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:43:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"BI Developer-Redmond, WA-Contract OpportunityTake your career to the next level with CompuCom. We offer jobs with Fortune 1000 companies nationwide, AND invest in your career development through our generous, annual training contribution.In this role, the candidate will be tasked with building a PowerBI dashboard that will gather information from multiple systems. The main task will be to retrieve and present performance, reliability and timeliness metrics out of multiple systems. These systems range from ETL warehouse services to file movement batch jobs. The goal is to provide a real-time dashboard that represents the health of the department.Data will be pulled from SQL, Windows event log, API event logging, third party databases and services. There will be a need to link with COSMOS. Understanding how to interact with all of these data sources is critical to the position. Most important will be SQL and flat files. They will be working with at least 35 data sources.Overview: * Sync with sponsor to plan the dashboard * Get access to the data sources and iterating on the dashboard * Make needed refinements * Engage with the owners of various tools * Build the dashboard and report on it on a daily basisQualifications: * 1 or more years of experience with SQL, including understanding the concepts of telemetry * Ability to be self-sufficient - experience owning projects end-to-end * Demonstrated experience adding value by building dashboards used both by executives and individual contributors * Data Integration experience - thru web services or SSIS nice to have * Presentation skills requiredW2 only, no Corp to Corp. We are unable to sponsor H1B visas at this time.**CompuCom supports Employment Equity and Diversity**CompuCom Systems, Inc., a global company headquartered in Dallas, Texas, provides IT managed services, infrastructure solutions, consulting and products to Fortune 1000 companies committed to enhancing their end users' experience. Founded in 1987, privately held CompuCom employs approximately 11,500 associates. For more information, visit www.compucom.com",BI Developer Job in Redmond,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project","Redmond, WA 98052",Computer Hardware Computer Software Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/BI-Developer-Job-Redmond-WA-US-167046443.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f3072877835ef09a18b4904b9948a6a2
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:43:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recruiter to contact: Sherry JordanJob Title: Cloud & Rest ArchitectJob Number: 152583Location: Greer, SCCompensation: $57-89/hrAssignment Length: Contract-Long term with full time hours Description: The cloud computing and REST architect plays a key role in maintaining, migrating, and building back-end systems to support the Digital, Mobility, and Connected Services team.  The team currently maintains an in-house J2EE environment that will continue to need care and attention while designing and building a new mobile back-end platform to support the next generation of digital and mobile services.  The architect will work with mobile engineers, J2EE engineers, analytics engineers, web engineers, and project managers to build a service portfolio for use in supporting mobile application development.    Qualifications:High School Diploma or GED requiredMust have experience migrating legacy J2EE software and services to a modern micro-service architecture hosted on cloud computing services while maintaining security, scalability, and personal data protection.Must understand and guide the development and implementation of database systems, complex networking, software development, authentication, and more within an agile environment. ",Cloud & REST Architect Job in Greer,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Greer, SC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Cloud-REST-Architect-Job-Greer-SC-US-166978479.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=3,57.00 - 89.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,f0995f944d2b19b56842cc8262797793
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:43:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ajilon has teamed with a growing start up company in the downtown Chicago area to fill a HR Coordinator job. If you have 3+ years of experience in HR including benefits administration, new hire onboarding, open enrollment and have experience with ADP, this could be the job for you. This person will be responsible for all aspects of HR for a department within the company including payroll, benefits, recruiting, onboarding of new hires, trainings, COBRA, etc. Our client provides a positive & fun working atmosphere, collaborative environment and the opportunity to work on a growing team.  HR Coordinator Job Requirements: Bachelor degree 3+ years of progressive experience as a HR Coordinator3+ years of experience with benefits administration, open enrollment, 401KADP, Microsoft Office, Excel requiredAbility to work in a team atmosphere  If you meet the requirements and would like to be considered for the HR Coordinator job in downtown Chicago, please email your resume in WORD attachment to Heather.sherman@ajilon.com ***Emailed resumes will take priority over online submissions.   ",HR Coordinator job in downtown Chicago!!! Job in Chicago,Full Time Employee,"Chicago, IL 60602",,http://jobview.monster.com/HR-Coordinator-job-in-downtown-Chicago!!!-Job-Chicago-IL-US-166908298.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=17,,Human Resources,d3b62e9cd7a8067a0c663bd7190e568f
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:22:41,No,jobs.monster.com,An AV-rated insurance defense firm in Madison Heights is currently seeking paralegals with a minimum of 3 to 5 years  of no-fault experience.  Also seeking attorneys with 2 or less years experience.  Salary will commensurate with experience.  Qualified candidates should apply with a copy of your most recent resume.    ,Legal Secretary and Attorney Job in Madison Heights,Full Time,"Madison Heights, MI 48071",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Legal-Secretary-Attorney-Job-Madison-Heights-MI-US-161188583.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=13,,,8553d817d9e6d1d981789b3bbab885be
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:20:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary: Rockwell FTPS Deployment project at site  Job Description: Manage successful implementation of MES system/ solution at the site for a pharmaceutical client • Responsible for managing all aspects of the site implementation project • Assures detailed project plan in place, monitors plan and keeps to schedule and budget • Assures standard business processes  are implemented and adopted • Coordinates project communication including comprehensive weekly and monthly status reports • Align and deliver as per global PMO and standards Mandatory Skills: • Core : Project Management experience in any Manufacturing Application (preferably MES) Development or Testing  and Validation or Deployment or  Documentation • Strong verbal and written communication skills and experience in customer relationship management • Positive and learning attitude with ability to manage by examples or walking the talk Preferred Skills: FTPS Knowledge and MES Deployment experience • Domain: Manufacturing knowledge and experience   Organization Marketing Statement Cognizant(NASDAQ: CTSH) is a leading provider of information technology, consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the world's leading companies build stronger businesses. Headquartered in Teaneck, New Jersey (U.S.), Cognizant combines a passion for client satisfaction, technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work. With over 100 development and delivery centres worldwide and approximately 221,700 employees as of December 31, 2015, Cognizant is a member of the NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world. Visit us online at http://www.cognizant.com/ or follow us on https://twitter.com/USJobsCognizant/ Additional Information:",MES Project Manager Job in Raleigh,Full Time Employee,"Raleigh, NC 27601",All,http://jobview.monster.com/MES-Project-Manager-Job-Raleigh-NC-US-166985934.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,e277e27d229a03fa2d6d1f6f11e7c5ff
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:09:00:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Entry Level - Part Time Weekend IT Data Center Support Job #:  660031Our great client in Germantown, WI has an immediate opening for a Part-Time (25 hours) Weekend IT Data Center Monitoring. We are looking for 2 resources. 1 to work the days and 1 to work the nights. If you are interested please apply with resume to aboettcher@apexsystemsinc.com .First 30 days would be spent training M-F 1st shift. After that the schedule would be as follows given the respective shifts. Opening 1(Day)Saturday 7:30am- Saturday 8pmSunday 7:30am- Sunday 8pmOpening 2 (Night)Saturday 7:30pm- Sunday 8amSunday 7:30pm-Monday 8amIn this role you would be doing monitoring and maintenance of a Data Center Facility. There is not a lot of active work in this role as it is primarily monitoring and responding to incidents as they come in. So someone that is reliable, organized, and being self-sufficient is ideal in this role. There may be some small projects where you would provide installation of datacenter computer and networking equipment, cable management, visual inspection of systems, and various preventative maintenance and operation tasks for computer, HVAC (CRAC), and emergency power systems. We are looking for someone that is eager to learn and accountable with good customer service and people skills.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Entry Level - Part Time Weekend IT Data Center Support Job in Menomonee Falls,Full Time Employee,"Menomonee Falls, WI",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Part-Time-Weekend-IT-Data-Center-Support-Job-Menomonee-Falls-WI-US-166990203.aspx?mescoid=1500136001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a69e2aa9ff12ca279044c000625eb04a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:08:57:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Human Resources Manager  Resource Management Concepts, Inc. (RMC) provides high-quality, professional services to government and commercial sectors. Our mission is to deliver exceptional management and technology solutions supporting the protection and preservation of the people and environment of the United States of America.   We have an opportunity in our Lexington Park, MD office for a Human Resources Manager. Responsibilities include:   ·         Directing daily operation of HR staff/functions·         Conducting new employee orientations and out-processing of exiting employees·         Establishing and implementing systems and procedures to ensure execution of programs and policies·         Maintaining and updating corporate policies·         Custodian of employee personnel records·         Maintaining and administering the employee performance appraisal system·         Implementing and administering the RMC Awards Program.·         Participating in the review of the employee benefits program; providing recommendations to senior management ·         Administering employee benefits program  ·         Responding to required government reporting, (ex. EEO / Affirmative Action, VETS100) ·         Administering employee training and tuition reimbursement programs·         Support managers with employee counseling, performance improvement plans and other employee relations.·         Implementing plans of actions that ensure success of the goals and objectives outlined in the RMC Strategic Plan Qualified candidates should have a bachelor's degree in Human Resources or Business and 8+ years of experience in the human resources field. Other necessary competencies include: strong leadership skills, ability to think strategically and make decisions; excellent written and verbal communication skills; and knowledge of employment law/regulations.  Please email your resume to our recruiter at HR@rmcweb.com. RMC offers an attractive benefits package that includes comprehensive health and dental plans, tuition reimbursement, paid holidays and vacation, and a competitive 401(k) plan. RMC is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified women, minorities, disabled, and veterans are encouraged to apply for RMC job vacancies. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Visit our website at www.rmcweb.com. ",Human Resources Manager Job in Lexington Park,Full Time,"Lexington Park, MD 20653",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Manager-Job-Lexington-Park-MD-US-167045346.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=18,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),66462997d2fca346cfc6504d1846a90d
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:08:57:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Group Policy Objects (GPO) Administrator position in San Antonio, Texas (TX). This position is responsible for providing tools administration for a medium enterprise-wide, multi-site server environments and requires excellent communication skills and work flexible schedules to support mission requirements. The GPO Administrator will work with the client and Air Force System Administrators, Operations team, and Engineering team to assist in the planning, analysis, and implementation and sustaining of Linux-based tools/applications and their associated host servers and storage. The GPO Administrator will support the delivery of new capabilities and projects; effectively troubleshoot issues towards a resolution; assist with providing the health monitoring of the tools/application processes/services; assists with creating and maintaining system documentation and reporting. Duties and Responsibilities Include: Successfully coordinates with other Client and Air Force teams on IT projects and operations support Communicates, assist in the day to day tasks of the other team members and collaborates with the other client and Air Force leads and Managers Ensures tools and applications assigned are compliant with DoD security policies, STIGs, IAVAs, etc. Provides on-call support on a rotational basis with other team members Provides troubleshooting and incident resolution for Tier 2 problems Assist in troubleshooting and resolution of Windows DC problems Assist in troubleshooting AD authentication, Microsoft DHCP, and Microsoft DNS problems Create, manage and deploy GPOs Deploy Microsoft DHCP servers Support LANs, WANs, network segments, Internet, and intranet systems Maintain system efficiency Ensure design of system allows all components to work properly together Troubleshoot problems reported by users Make recommendations for future upgrades Maintain network and system securityREQUIREMENTS: The implementation and maintenance/troubleshooting of large scale enterprise implementations of MS AD based on Windows Server and the migration of Windows Domain Controllers Implementation and troubleshooting of AD services in support of program goals and baselines with a heavy emphasize on GPOs Current DoD 8570.1 IAT Level 2 Certification (Security+ CE or higher) Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information",GPO Administrator Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Antonio, TX 78216",,http://jobview.monster.com/GPO-Administrator-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166982555.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=10,30.00 - 36.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),d57a54772fb301f826ec4d66f9791d95
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:08:27:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Tandem Tester. Below is the job description.Summary: Tandem tester who can work independently and be responsible for all testing activities. Should possess excellent verbal and written communication skills. Ability to quickly grasp complex application ecosystem and take ownership. Responsibilities/Deliverables: •6 to 8 years of tandem development/QA experience  •Test case authoring, TC execution, reporting •Experience in financial markets projects  •Ability to quickly grasp complex application ecosystem and take ownership  •Ability to work independently with little or no supervision  • Excellent verbal and written communication skills  •Batch Processing, Tandem S-series Servers  Qualifications: Graduate or post graduate  Essential: 5-6 years of experience",Tandem Tester Job in Portland,"Full Time, Employee","Portland, ME",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Tandem-Tester-Job-Portland-ME-US-167083624.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=1,,IT/Software Development,649d1b428877cfa1cacee73b62738aa4
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:08:17:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Audible-Relation Algorithm Developer – Palo Alto, CAMachine Learning                   Acoustic Echo Cancellation                Speech EnhancementIntouch Staffing Professionals, Inc    650 -967-3400    charlie@intouchstaffing.com http://www.linkedin.com/in/techjob  Be a part of a dynamic team in the designing of forward-thinking audio and speech processing algorithms for the formation of top-quality acoustic consumer electronics.The right candidate with Real World Audio-Related Experience who projects the ambition of creating superior acoustic prototypes.Auditory Processing Algorithm Development for the enhancement of loudspeaker management and transducer performance.Have in-depth knowledge of the following:Real world experience with Audio-related technologySpeech EnhancementC/C++Acoustic Echo CancellationMATLABSpeaker IdentityPythonMachine LearningSpeech signal processingAudio VerificationMicrophone and LoudspeakerTransducer TheoryAdaptive FilterDegrees are required.  We will consider applicants with a PhD with a minimum of 5 years of relevant industry academic experience. You should have experience of 3 to 5 years working with real-world audio systems. If you are a match, please forward your resume directly to my attention, include your telephone number I will call you directly.  Provide your availability to interview, target start date, salary expectations. Thank you. charlie@intouchstaffing.com     attn: Charlie Smith    650-967-3400    Intouch Staffing Professionals, Inc           650 Castro Street Suite 120A   Mountain View, CA 94041 ",Algorithm Developer Job in Palo Alto,Full Time,"Palo Alto, CA 94301",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Algorithm-Developer-Job-Palo-Alto-CA-US-152006003.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9a8e025e1d26c6d2843ee06869dc828b
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:08:17:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Payroll Processor needed for a long-term contract opportunity with Yoh's client located in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess: - Payroll processing experience (multi-state) - Ability to work with tight deadlines - Good oral and written communication skills - High degree of proficiency in Word, Excel and PowerPoint What You'll Be Doing: - Will perform tasks related to analysis, execution, and support of payroll time processing including assisting with site time administration activities. - Must ensure that deliverables adhere to payroll goals, and align with service center strategies - Review and process all time cards including interpretation of work rules, work schedules, day divide, week divide, etc. and then enters the time into ADP payroll - Reviews and analyzes all time / pay issues as directed by Manager Payroll - Identifies root cause of errors of payroll time issues - Identifies and recommends changes to ensure improved accuracy of time processing - ""Tickets"" are generated by the Front Office and this position will be responsible for researching and reviewing the tickets and comparing them to actual payroll. Will generate a response that could include adjustments to payroll What You Need to Bring to the Table: - A.A. Degree in Accounting or an undergraduate degree in business, or related field (preferred) - Minimum of five years of experience processing multi-state payroll - Certified Payroll Professional (CPP) or Fundamental Payroll Certification (FPC) is preferred - Proven ability to troubleshoot time capture systems and to manually process payroll - Experience with ADP payroll preferred - Advanced knowledge of Automated Timekeeping System - Proven problem solving ability - Strong understanding of and ability to interpret various work rules, work schedules, payroll complexities required. - Skill in oral and written communications, including the ability to deal effectively with all levels of employees, retirees and management - High degree of proficiency in Word, Excel and PowerPoint - Knowledge of HRIS data bases - Ability to handle multiple tasks and non-standard situations with minimal supervision. - Ability to handle heavy workload with tight deadline pressures. - Experience in a shared service center environment preferred - Strong interpersonal and customer service skills required. What's In It For You? We welcome you to be a part of the largest and legendary global staffing companies to meet your career aspirations. Yoh's network of client companies has been employing professionals like you for over 65 years in the U.S., UK and Canada. Join Yoh's extensive talent community that will provide you with access to Yoh's vast network of opportunities and gain access to this exclusive opportunity available to you. - Medical, Dental & Vision Benefits - 401K Retirement Saving Plan - Life & Disability Insurance - Direct Deposit & weekly ePayroll - Employee Discount Programs - Referral Bonus Program Opportunity is Calling, Apply Now! Recruiter: Vera Evan Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: PROF; MONJOB TAX TERM: CON_W2 J2WNWCORP Ref: 1073467 SFSF: PROF Nearest Major Market: Pittsburgh Job Segment: Payroll, Medical, HR, Information Systems, HRIS, Finance, Healthcare, Human Resources, Technology #TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Payroll Processor Job Job in Pittsburgh,Full Time Employee,"Pittsburgh, PA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Processor-Job-Job-Pittsburgh-PA-US-167058011.aspx?mescoid=4300702001001&jobPosition=9,,Human Resources,62822c737ab30a2b1ea1fa5431771c31
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:08:14:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description: Consults, advises and represents the corporation on a variety of legal matters. Plans and determines course of action regarding handling of response to claims and lawsuits, negotiations and mediations. Formulates and implements corporate legal policy concerning broad range of legal issues and business practices. Prepares form agreements for use by non-lawyers in the corporation and reviews and approves variations from approval forms. Attorneys also supervise the work of outside counsel in the handling of litigation.Skills:· Must have experience with Data Privacy, especially in education, health care and employment · Excellent, clear writing skills · Experience with Analyzing laws, prepare policies, consents, advise on privacy issues, prepared to assist in incident management · Preferred candidates with experienced paralegal/data privacy skills",General Counsel Job in Minneapolis,Full Time,"Minneapolis, MN 55420",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Counsel-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-167084726.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=14,,,dc6d57b165b6ba048d1bb5a5e399ffe7
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:08:07:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"CTG has an immediate opening for a IDX Legacy Support Analyst: (Remote) GE- IDX Financials (Scheduling, Registration, And Claims) Support/management required. CTG is the most reliable IT services provider, built on 50 years of meeting our commitments to make technology work for clients and deliver real business value. CTG provides industry-specific IT strategy, services, and solutions throughout North America and Western Europe that address the business needs and staffing challenges of clients in high-growth markets, such as technology, healthcare and life sciences, financial services, industrials, and telecommunications. CTG's clients include large technology and energy companies, major health systems, and government entities.   CTG's greatest asset is our people, and as such we are committed to providing employees programs and processes to support their performance, hone their skills, and advance in their careers. This commitment is reflected by CTG being named a Best Places to Work Company by Modern Healthcare (since 2013) in North America, and a Best Places to Work Company in the United Kingdom (2013), Belgium (since 2007), and Luxembourg (since 2011).   CTG is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and strong advocate of workforce diversity. Minority/Female/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Disability/Veteran. Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 50%",IDX LEGACY SUPPORT ANALYST Job in Camden,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Camden, NJ 08101",All,http://jobview.monster.com/IDX-LEGACY-SUPPORT-ANALYST-Job-Camden-NJ-US-167042761.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,53106db263c122ec08273e9f09e19129
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:08:06:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Senior Software Systems EngineerJob Location: Folsom - CAJob Duration: 8+ Months ContractJob ID: VZTJP00036872Client: Verizon Summary: We are looking with overall minimum of 7-8 years of Techno-Functional Peoplesoft experience with Financials experience on functional side in modules such as GL, AP, PO, PC and AM. Job Description:� The Sr. PeopleSoft Systems Developer is responsible for the design and development of modifications to packaged software and/or custom solutions developed to support specific business needs. Works closely with business analysts and/or key users, assessing business needs and determining/implementing information technology solutions. � Performs analysis, conceptual design, development (coding) and implementation of modifications to purchased applications or custom programs to enhance value to business. Provides expert support of the development after implementation. Applies business and systems knowledge throughout process. � Participates in the technical design and coding of interfaces, data conversions, reports, and customizations providing the required functionality not supplied by the package. � Collaborates with internal users, staff members, and information technology colleagues to define detailed customer requirements and system interfaces while assessing value in modification to delivered software versus building new functionality. Translate requirements into technical design solutions. � Gain sufficient understanding of various IT applications to translate functional designs into technical approaches � Deliver technical information, support and training to internal customers to assist them in performing and improving their daily work processes. � Provide technical expertise to team members � Participate in trainings for offshore Development team.  Experience: 8 years minimum work experience in application analysis, design, software development, systems implementation and package integration with demonstrated strong performance. Education: Bachelor's degree preferred or commensurate work experience  Additional required competencies/skills:  � Excellent problem solving skills � able to focus both on the big picture and finite details. � Attention to detail. � Experience with PeopleSoft Financials 9.1 � Ability to deliver results in a high-energy, fast-paced environment. � Outstanding written and verbal communication skills required. The ability to express oneself effectively within groups and in one-to-one conversations. Conveys information clearly and effectively through both formal and informal documents. � Excellent ability to organize information, manage tasks and use available tools to effectively contribute to an organization. � Demonstrates advanced knowledge of software development industry concepts, tools, and techniques. � Working knowledge of project management concepts, tools, and techniques. � Comfortable working within the parameters of a project methodology. � Comfortable working with geographically diverse teams. � Experience with PeopleTools, PeopleCode, Application Engine, Component Interfaces, Equations, SQR, Integration Broker. � Experience with Oracle databases.   ",Sr. Peoplesoft Systems Developer Job in Folsom,Full Time,"Folsom, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Peoplesoft-Systems-Developer-Job-Folsom-CA-US-167027593.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=8,,,0dd1d467114809e1240ab3e7500d2f6e
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:08:06:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Join an exciting, team oriented technical firm and work with over 300 other engaged associates in our main Columbus office.  The successful candidate will monitor the work of contractors to ensure quality control and contract compliance primarily for public capital improvement projects of routine to moderately complexity.  Oversee, inspect and monitor contractual field work which includes excavations, drainage facilities, road surfaces, water line installation and sanitary sewer piping and structures; schedules work and inspection phases with contactor and agency personnel.  Advise contractors of violations/deviations and recommend adjustments to operations.  Serve as a liaison between the Client and EMH&T.  Maintain project records which include daily logs, materials notebooks, photos, as-built plans and/or pay quantity records.The ideal candidate will have at least ten (10) years of experience in construction related activities, including 3 - 5 years of experience in the inspection of state, county and public construction projects.  Past experience must involve CIP projects.   Other combinations of experience and education may be substituted.  Registration with the ACIA preferred.  Various combinations of education and experience which are acceptable or registration may be substituted.  Knowledge of construction practices and techniques, engineering terminology, principles and techniques of civil engineering including materials testing, surveying and plans review and knowledge of materials used in construction projects.Other key competencies and capabilities necessary for success in this position include:•           Observation & measurement techniques; graphic expression of ideas and concepts•           Attention to detail, organizational and follow up capabilities•           Mathematical skills, e.g. averages, percentages, ratios, proportions, logarithms, geometry•           Demonstrated oral and written communications•           Excellent interpersonal and relationship management skills•           Cooperation and adaptability•           Appreciation for safe work procedures  To learn more about worklife at EMH&T go to http://www.emht.com/careers .    To apply, send your resume and cover letter to careers@emht.com or fax to 614-775-4800.EMH&T is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Celebrating 90 years of excellence!  ",CONSTRUCTION RESIDENT PROJECT REPRESENTATIVE Job in New Albany,Full Time,"New Albany, OH 43054",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/CONSTRUCTION-RESIDENT-PROJECT-REPRESENTATIVE-Job-New-Albany-OH-US-165912705.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),59d90b2b082812264dd358e8a4accdc9
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:07:04:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you seeking a position with a Fortune 500 company? Do you have experience as a Front End Developer? Are you looking to gain more professional experience?If your answer is yes, Experis has an opportunity for you!Experis supports a large client in Miami, Florida seeking a Front End Developer for a 12 month contract position.RESPONSIBILITIES: Produce HTML5/Node.JS/AngularJS code from design documentation for integration into desktop and mobile websites and web applicationsUnderstand cross-browser and cross-platform concepts and concernsEnsure code and design quality through the execution of test plansDevelop coding standards, methodology and repeatable processesWork with design teams to identify optimal technical solutions to UI conceptsRapid prototyping of design wireframes into functional user interfacesDevelopment of responsive web UIs and interactive data visualizationsWork as part of an agile software engineering team and with back-end integration and middleware engineersIf this sounds like the position for you, let's talk today!Jzazell Chamblissjzazell.chambliss@experis.comExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Front End Developer Job in Sweetwater,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Front End Developer,"Sweetwater, FL 33172",http://jobview.monster.com/Front-End-Developer-Job-Sweetwater-FL-US-166969460.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=13,,IT/Software Development,ac44eb6b08c83b4833dffde67b1353b6
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:07:03:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Payroll Specialist in San Leandro, CA We are currently looking to fill a temp-to-hire Payroll Specialist job opportunity for an exciting East Bay company located in San Leandro, California. You should have 3 or more years of payroll experience preferably with Canadian payroll and or UltiPro software. You will be part of a team responsible for handling the Canadian payroll of 1,600 hourly employees and backing up the US payroll. The salary for this position is between $25.00 to $28.00 per hour based on experience. The Qualifications for the job include:- 3 plus years of experience in Payroll - Experience working with Canadian Payroll- Software experience with UltiPro would be preferred- Strong communications both verbal and written- Comfortable with Microsoft Office (Excel, Word and Outlook) If you are interested in this or other job opportunities available through Accounting Principals, please submit your resume today at www.AccountingPrincipals.com!  ;",Payroll Specialist Job in San Leandro,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Leandro, CA 94577",,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Specialist-Job-San-Leandro-CA-US-166764674.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=6,25.00 - 28.00 $ /hour,Human Resources,2707e0695ae40cd4b3db0d25177c2fc7
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:06:29:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recruiter to contact: Samantha AngermeierJob Title: Digital Content SpecialistJob Number: 152585Location: Atlanta, GACompensation: DOEAssignment Length: Contract- Description: The Digital Content Specialist will help manage the company’s employee-facing digital channels. The role supports the Manager, Creative Design and the Manager of Global News, allowing your talents to be leveraged in a fast-paced, thriving, creative environment.Provide day-to-day management of company’s communications channels, with a focus on managing the employee intranet (on SP2010 platform) and external website (as needed). Support team in the management of multiple global sites by executing upgrade of existing intranet, to include wireframes, high-fidelity mockups and page build-out within Sharepoint CMS. Regularly updates regional and country-specific content for intranet home pages and landing pages. Produce creative layout for Employee News section of intranet on a regular basis, using both written and visual assets to stylize magazine quality stories. Sources, selects and/or creates visuals to complement content. Proofread content. Provide insights from analytics to improve user experience and increase traffic to the intranet Manage communications channels for Atlanta Headquarters.Assists with management and maintenance of all digital assets within NWL internal visual asset system to ensure assets are maintained appropriately and easily discoverable. Provides input on the on-going usage of and improvements to the NWL internal visual asset system. Creates edits and posts digital signage. Assists with email layout and distribution, as well as e-newsletter layout, content and delivery.Qualifications:High School Diploma or GED required2 to 3yrs experience Digital Content experienceBachelor’s degree, Degree in digital communications/or relevant experience preferredExtensive knowledge in SharePoint 2010 (2013 a plus). Strong understanding of HTML and CSS for web pages and HTML emails. Strong writing and editing skills (particularly for Web). Knowledge of Mac platform Adobe Creative Suite preferred, with emphasis on Photoshop.",Digital Content Specialist Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Digital-Content-Specialist-Job-Atlanta-GA-US-166979257.aspx?mescoid=1500139001001&jobPosition=20,,IT/Software Development,11cd42450bae785d08454d1922b3ba8d
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:06:26:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Enterprise Service Desk Program provides Mission Readiness support to over 40,000 global Customers. Our ESD Team includes more than 100 dedicated staff working 24x7 delivering phone, web, remote management, and server support to our Customers. We rely on each other, process documents, technical solutions, Instant Messaging, training, and professional growth to resolve Customer issues as quickly as possible.The organization is a very fast-paced, dynamic environment. Superior customer service skills are required. This position requires ability to work independently as well as within groups. Sensitivity to accuracy, timeliness, and professionalism in all areas of support activity is imperative. Functional Role:The Service Desk Support Technician is responsible for providing Tier I and basic Tier II support to customers with hardware, software, and application problems. The candidate serves as the Information Technology customer service specialist that performs a range of activities that contribute to overall customer satisfaction to the user base. Attention to detail and good organization skills are critical. Accurate incident documentation and tracking are important parts of the position.Service Desk Technician - Functional Description minimum requirements:• Complies with documented procedures for IT service restoration by adhering to ESD policies and procedures relative to problem analysis and resolution• Demonstrates excellent Customer Relationship skills through communications, tone, knowledge, and respect while engaging via phones, web tickets, and other communications media• Demonstrates good writing skills relative to etiquette, clarity, concise information gathering, feedback, and written documentation during troubleshooting activities and resolution• Demonstrates ability to independently understand, troubleshoot, and resolve many types of Service Requests• Demonstrates the ability to learn all facets of the ESD's process oriented environment• Possesses an IAT Level 1 certification at start or within 30 days of starto A+, Network +, or Security + (CompTIA CE)• Demonstrates basic knowledge of the Microsoft Windows desktop operating systems and administrative tools• Demonstrates basic knowledge of Enterprise support hardware, software, network connectivity and applications• Provides accurate and detailed documentation of the IT problem, analysis and resolution actions performed during the IT restoration process • Accurately and completely capture Customer and Incident data within the service request tracking system • Follows direction from Shift Leads and Senior Agents• Offers continuous improvement suggestions to enhance performance of entire teamAA degree or equivalent combination of training, education and experience required. 1-3 years of related help desk or service desk experience Requires a Security +ce Certification",Service Desk Technician with TS/SCI Job in Colorado Springs,Full Time,"Colorado Springs, CO",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Desk-Technician-with-TS-SCI-Job-Colorado-Springs-CO-US-124604124.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1ffb7134fcda40a52a77001708980c02
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:06:25:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chubb is the world’s largest publicly traded property and casualty insurer. With operations in 54 countries, Chubb provides commercial and personal property and casualty insurance, personal accident and supplemental health insurance, reinsurance and life insurance to a diverse group of clients. The company is distinguished by its extensive product and service offerings, broad distribution capabilities, exceptional financial strength, underwriting excellence, superior claims handling expertise and local operations globally. Administrative Assistant – Office of General Counsel (OGC)Key Objective:Must possess the desire to thrive in a fast-paced environment and think independently. This position provides administrative support to the Deputy General Counsel of the Global Transactions and Operations team of 20+ professionals.Duties and Responsibilities:  Under minimal supervision, performs the following administrative duties with an eye on confidentiality and at times a considerable degree of independent decision making.Support to the Deputy General Counsel and Operations/Transactions Team of professionals: Schedule meetings and arrange for conference rooms, including any equipment needed and food servicesCoordinate travel reservations and related arrangements effectivelyPrepare and track electronic expense reports for manager and team and assist with any follow-up activities neededMaintain extensive calendars (via Outlook) for assigned professionalsResponsible for generating and maintaining senior level correspondence that includes proofing and finalizingAssist with CLE meeting processesPay monthly invoices as assignedCreate producer licensing and customer services agreements/amendments and publish using SharePoint Support to the Records Manager and Producer Licensing Team:Assist when needed with the ACE Records Mailbox- Monitor transactional activities and complete all necessary tasks.Assist with the Resolve Exceptions reports with IM inventory that includes compiling/configuring comprehensive Excel spreadsheetsProvide support as needed to the Producer Licensing team and assist with the distribution and maintenance of Producer Contracts.Minimum Requirements:  3 - 5 years+ of demonstrated competence in administrative assistant functions or related experienceDesired Qualifications/Skills·              High degree of professionalism and a demonstrated ability to handle highly confidential information·              Able to work in a fast paced environment with accuracy·              Excellent working knowledge of PC·              Proficient with various Microsoft software programs including Outlook, SharePoint, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint; ability to create PowerPoint presentations with minimal direction·              Must be able to multi-task, be flexible in meeting changing work demands/priorities·              Experience with electronic and paper records management practices·              Thorough knowledge of the organization, personnel and policies·              Thorough understanding of the role and objectives of the department·              Excellent customer service skills·              Strong verbal and written communication skills·              Self-starter with willingness to take initiative·              Demonstrated ability to think and work independently with limited supervision·              Proven ability in planning, prioritizing, and organizing diverse workload·              Effective interpersonal skills to be capable of working with all levels of office personnel Chubb offers a competitive compensation package and comprehensive benefits package including life, health and dental, vision, a generous retirement savings plan, disability coverage, stock purchase plan, flexible spending accounts, tuition reimbursement, and business casual dress. At Chubb, we are committed to equal employment opportunity and compliance with all laws and regulations pertaining to it. Our policy is to provide employment, training, compensation, promotion, and other conditions or opportunities of employment, without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, transgender, national origin, disability, genetic information, veteran or marital status, or any other characteristic protected by law.                                              Additional Information:",Admin Assistant Job in Philadelphia,,"Philadelphia, PA 19019",,http://jobview.monster.com/Admin-Assistant-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165948816.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d3cfc2f3add7561e3a89291f7ddf8a13
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:06:05:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"- LITIGATION PARALEGAL –Thompson Coburn LLP currently has a non-exempt position available in our Belleville, Illinois office for a full-time Litigation Paralegal with at least three years of litigation experience.  Qualified applicants will possess a b",Litigation Paralegal Job in Belleville,Full Time,"Belleville, IL 62220",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Litigation-Paralegal-Job-Belleville-IL-US-167048055.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5ee2145354813ed22c9119a69717b58c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:31:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Cyber Security PM in Jersey City, NJ. Responsibilities: Drive the execution of the resiliency strategy for Cyber Security threat scenarios Provide regular, metrics-driven updates to executive management on program status, threats and progress Communicate regular project status updates to the business stakeholders and senior sponsors Drive project steering committees and influence decision making Address project issues with the business and influence timely and successful resolution Ensure project lifecycle and project roles and responsibilities are understood by the business, proactively managed and enforced Proactively identify and resolve issues that would present a risk to on-time implementation of projects within the portfolio Evaluate project and resourcing costs, develop and present business cases and budget, and influence business and technology sponsorship Ensure full transparency on deliverables, provide weekly status updates including issues and risk items for management attention Assess risks, costs, benefits, and dependencies of alternative decisions and approaches Manage to a financial plan, including ensuring completion of projects on-time and on-budget, forecasting, business case development Partner with cyber testing and simulation teams to develop new testing scenarios and develop action plans based upon results Ensure that recovery playbooks are clearly defined, documented, communicated, adhered to, and audit compliant Define and implement postREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, or a related field 10 + years of experience in Technology with emphasis in Cyber Security and or Risk, including roles of influence and direct span of control coupled with consistent interactions with Senior Business leadership Strong Program/ Project Management Skills Proven leader with successful track record driving large scale technology projects from inception to implementation Experience in managing project and resourcing financials, and managing to tight budgets Ability to think strategically about how to create business led solutions and ability to communicate effectively to both business and technical audiences Ability to orchestrate and drive complex strategies and solutions Experience with implementation of project management methodologies in a large organization Experience managing and working with geographically distributed and functionally diverse work-groups Proven ability to build strong, cohesive partnerships with the business, operations, technology & other key stakeholders, including external vendor partners, and work effectively in a matrix organization Strong sense of prioritization and ability to execute against deliverables. Able to take personal accountability for key projects and issue resolution Superior analytical and problem solving skills Ability to formulate a strategy, approach and delivery plan Strong leadership and communication skills Proven experience in developing and presenting status reporting and metrics to senior level management Prior experience working with external auditors and regulators as Firm representative for cyber security standards Prior experience in managing large Cyber Security and regulatory projects is essential Prior experience in disaster / cyber recovery planning and testing would be advantages Knowledge of process engineering, project management, ITIL, CoBIT etc. PMP, CISSP, CISM, CISA a bonus",Cyber Security Project / Program Manager Job in Jersey City,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Jersey City, NJ 07310",,http://jobview.monster.com/Cyber-Security-Project-Program-Manager-Job-Jersey-City-NJ-US-167073426.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),aabbe6d9932cc359f390d1fd663d6518
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:28:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Downtown Dallas law firm is currently looking for a Paralegal with 4+ years of experience and knowledge working on commercial litigation.  Paralegal responsibilities to include:  knowledge of all aspects of discovery, case organizing, analyzing, communicating, researching and writing, coordinating schedules and drafting legal documents.  Paralegal must be able to work in a team environment and work well with all attorney levels.   Bachelor's degree and paralegal certificate preferred but not required.   Firm offers excellent benefit package, competitive salary, bonus and paid parking.   All submissions will remain ""confidential"".  Apply now for immediate consideration.  Please visit us on the web at: http://www.ceramisearchgroup.comCerami Search Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.Cerami Search Group is a successful Texas based search firm specializing in the temporary, temp-to-hire and direct hire placement of Legal, Accounting, Information Technology, Medical and Administrative professionals. Our clients range from small companies to large corporations throughout Dallas Fort Worth and North America.",Paralegal - Commercial Litigation Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Paralegal-Commercial-Litigation-Job-Dallas-TX-US-167086980.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=13,,,7e4cb445f88c24cd27f187f9a9b454f7
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:26:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Research Associate / Recruiter Still in school? Recently graduated? You are moving towards beginning your career but where do you start? You love money and want to start making a lot of it now, right? Here’s a true fast track sales career and the best part; NO experience needed. Just bring your hunger to succeed, your desire to make things happen and your refuse to lose attitude, we’ll supply the rest.  Dimensions Professional Search is a boutique national recruiting firm in business since 1997 and business has never been better!  Based on our continued growth we’re looking for a Researcher/Recruiter to join our team. The Research Associate/ Recruiter is responsible for supporting the Research Department and the office as a whole with a focus on talent acquisition for our diverse client base. You will be involved with all aspects of recruiting including: research candidate sourcing, maintaining the applicant tracking system, developing call plans, writing job descriptions, coordinating interview process, conducting phone screens, performing candidate background screening, and other functions related to the recruiting process. The goal for you is to use your training and experience as a Research Associate to advance into the role of a Recruiter. Responsibilities will include:•        Training with Sr. Recruiters to locate and contact candidates in regards to job orders•        Conduct research using several tools such as Social Media, Networking, and Cold Calling•       Screen/source candidates from internal and external databases•        Manage job postings and screen candidates from company website and external sites•        Ensure all data is entered into Applicant Tracking System•        Assist Recruiters and hiring managers with their talent acquisition needs Skills and Experience:  Outgoing personality   Success oriented• Proficient with PCs• Strong written and oral communication skills• Strong attention to detail• Ability to work on work on multiple projects at once• Ability to work with confidential and sensitive information Required experience:•        4 Year Education or obtaining Required education:•        Bachelor's or Seeking Bachelors degree Job Type: Part-time leading into Full-time Local Candidates Only ",Research Associate / Recruiter Job in Greenville,Part Time,"Greenville, NC 27858",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Research-Associate-Recruiter-Job-Greenville-NC-US-167047392.aspx?mescoid=1900305001001&jobPosition=4,,Entry Level,bfec355707bdb6a9ac1f62fd0ecfae3e
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:19:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Senior Instructional Designer Job #:  660071My client is seeking a Senior Instructional Designer in the Raleigh/Durham area!Must have strong curriculum development and management skills. This role requires strong consulting skills and an ability to understand complex business problems and develop solutions to prepare employees to execute business objectives. Strong written and verbal communication skills a priority.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Senior Instructional Designer Job in Durham,Full Time Employee,"Durham, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Instructional-Designer-Job-Durham-NC-US-167054530.aspx?mescoid=2500399001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cfb8d3f1f1fb87377822938392396e3a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:08:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"GENERAL SUMMARY:    Leverage your passion for learning  and development as the Training and Development Manager. This position will be responsible for increasing organizational capabilities by deploying learning solutions. Focusing on blended solutions that reach every employee including our clinical roles across the country. This position will be charged with design, delivery and management of professional and compliance learning solutions including the management of training technology, as well as, professional level and leadership development programs.           ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS and KNOWLEDGE:                                                                                                                   1.      Learning Technologies·        Identify, select and apply a variety of learn technologies ·        Adapt learning  technologies, matching  the appropriate technology to the specific learning opportunity 2.      Instructional Design·        Design and develop informal and formal learning  solutions to meet organizational needs·        Analyze and select the most appropriate strategy, methodologies, and technologies to maximize the learning experience and impact3.      Training Delivery·        Deliver informal and formal learning solutions in a manner that both engages the learner and produces the desired outcomes ·        Manage and respond  to ongoing  learner needs ·        Ensure solutions are made available in appropriate platforms and delivered in a timely and effective manner4.      Performance Improvement·        Partner with the customer to identify the opportunity and the solution·        Apply a systematic process of discover and analyze  human performance gaps·        Design and develop solutions to close performance gaps·        Implement the solution, monitor the change, evaluate  the results5.      Evaluate  Learning  Impact·        Gather, organize and analyze  information regarding  the impact of learning solutions against key business drivers·        Present  the information in a way that is meaningful to the organization·        Use  learning metrics and analytics to inform learning decisions 6.      Manage  Learning  Programs·        Plan, monitor and adjust learning and development projects or activities Role specific knowledge, skills and abilities:·        Ability to work in a fast paced environment while remaining  flexible, proactive, resourceful and efficient with a high level of professionalism, confidentiality and good time management with critical thinking skills. ·        Capture  distribute  and archive  intellectual capital in a way that encourages knowledge sharing  and collaboration in the organization·        Apply structured approaches to shift individuals, teams, and organizations from a current state to a desired state. Key Competencies:·        Embrace change·        Leverage data for decision making ·        Take initiative·        Achieve Results·        Commit to individual and team success·        Be passionate about our mission and your work EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE:Bachelors of Arts (or related degree) or 5-10 years of experience in a learning role  ",Training and Development Manager Job in Canton,Full Time,"Canton, OH 44718",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Training-Development-Manager-Job-Canton-OH-US-167046890.aspx?mescoid=1100029001001&jobPosition=8,,,f4318162b7a493c890163b81ed43dd9c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:08:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"The SharePoint Administrator position will report to the Manager of Application Services. Application Services is responsible for the Administration, Architecture, planning, development, and support of both the SharePoint and SQL Server platforms. The primary responsibility of the SharePoint Administrator is the overall System Administration of the Authority's SharePoint 2013 platform. The SharePoint Administrator conducts activities to support existing applications and software infrastructure as well as implement new applications and new software infrastructure. To support existing applications effectively manages the resolution of production issues, adheres to all IT change management and incident reporting requirements, and verifies that applications are functioning properly after any change. Additional support activities include installing upgrades and patches and, when required, analyze, design, code, and implement changes to enhance functionality or to accommodate business process changes. When an application, underlying software infrastructure, or hardware has reached the end of its lifecycle identifies and implements replacement solutions to meet business objectives. As technology and the utility business changes so must the solutions implemented to ensure NYPA business needs. The SharePoint Administrator will be responsible for the following: Managing and checking the overall server health and functionalityMonitoring SharePoint disk space usage through the built-in SharePoint reports for each site collectionManaging SharePoint permissionsAnalyzing and reporting upon SharePoint usage and activityMoving/copying sitesSupporting F5 load balancing needs and ensuring its correct operationRegular review of the events and messages reported in Event Viewer and Performance MonitorRegular review, clean-up, management and configuration of SharePoint accounts and sites. This portion of the role will work closely with an Active Directory administrator if they are separated.Regularly analyzing SharePoint content and storageMonitoring SharePoint trends (e.g. site usage and growth, disk space usage and growth)Setting up alerts and enforcing policiesRegularly auditing SharePoint environmentIdentifying and reporting governance violationsChecking for, applying, and testing operating system, SQL Server and SharePoint patches and cumulative updates.Manage services and scheduled jobs within the SharePoint environmentCreate new sites and lists, install web partsPerform backups and restores at all levelConfigure, Manage, and troubleshoot the Shared Service Applications including User Profile, Managed Meta Data, and Search ServicesEducating users on how to use features, managing governance policies and permissions.From a knowledge perspective, the SharePoint Administrator must have an above-basic level of understanding of:Windows operating system and hardware - Basic administration of a server including service packs and hot fixes.General knowledge of networking - IP, DNS, Load Balancing as well as the concepts of Availability, Scalability, and Maintainability. This person should also understand firewalls, encryption and security zones.Internet Information Server (IIS) and the basic operation of websites, Application Pools, IIS Administration, the IIS Metabase, Ports, SSL Certifications (security certificates and wildcard certificates)Microsoft SQL Server - Basic operation, tuning, transaction log selection, backup and recovery, and maintenance planning. Since SharePoint is completely supported by a Microsoft SQL Server database, the SharePoint Administrator is expected to be knowledgeable at the database level.SharePoint working knowledge of Central Administration, PowerShell, CSOM. SharePoint Event Log troubleshooting, search administration and troubleshooting, concepts of a farm and the planning and implementation of Service Packs and Cumulative Updates.Debugging skills and techniques for each of these areas identified above - troubleshooting issues can occur within or across one-to-many of these areas.Required Experience:The successful candidate has a Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or equivalent minimum of at least 5 years' IT experience serving in strong technical roles.5+ years of experience showing advanced knowledge of the Planning, Implementation and Support of SharePoint 2013 and previous versions.Working knowledge of VMWare Systems and concepts, Microsoft Windows server system administration and concepts, and backup systems preferably Commvault.The candidate must have demonstrated excellent decision-making, analytical, organizational, communication and problem solving abilities.The candidate must be willing and able to work after hours and weekends as required.",Sharepoint Administrator () Job in White Plains,Full Time,"White Plains, NY 10601",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Sharepoint-Administrator-75-Job-White-Plains-NY-US-167074396.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2872ba3359b97cbc852420a221e39216
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:08:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Silver Spring, Maryland (MD) that is seeking Citrix / AD System Engineer. Responsibilities: Deployment of a Citrix XenApp / XenDesktop environment with nodes in multiple geographic locations, including: Provisioning and deployment of the required Windows 2012R2 virtual servers on VMware ESXi hosts, including Microsoft SQL Server 2012 Installation and configuration of XenApp and XenDesktop Installation and configuration of virtual Netscaler appliances for load balancing Configuration of non-persistent virtual Windows 7 desktops Configuration of published applications to be made available through Citrix XenApp. Typical applications include Microsoft Office applications, Mozilla Firefox, Google Chrome, Mozilla Thunderbird, and similar productivity software Deploy and troubleshoot the Citrix Receiver on client platforms to include Windows 7, Linux, and Apple OS X workstations* Coordination with the vendor to install and initially configure NexentaStor Creation of NFS shares suitable for mounting as VMware NFS datastores Installation of VMware ESXi Connecting the ESXi servers to the Nexenta datastores Creation of new domain controllers to extend the existing Active Directory Creation of Windows 2012R2 virtual machines to host vCenter, vSphere Update Manager and supporting Microsoft SQL Server databases Integration of vCenter with Active Directory Establishing a VMware cluster with the physical hosts, including fully automated DRS and HA Configuring virtual networking using distributed virtual switches in cooperation with the network engineering / support staffREQUIREMENTS: 5+ years experience with Citrix XenApp / XenDesktop, v7.x preferred 5+ years experience with VMware vSphere including vCenter Server and virtual networking 5+ years experience with Microsoft Active Directory, Windows Server Experience with configuration management and automation (Puppet or Puppet Enterprise), monitoring (Nagios, SNMP) Experience with remote system management tools (IPMI, RDP, SSH) Experience configuring network storage systems based on NFS and ZFS Experience with environments spanning multiple physical sites Excellent oral and written communication skills Ability to travel; destinations include Colorado, North Carolina, Mississippi",Citrix / AD System Engineer Job in Silver Spring,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Silver Spring, MD 20901",,http://jobview.monster.com/Citrix-AD-System-Engineer-Job-Silver-Spring-MD-US-166982521.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e1b0aa3d8b5f1a5aef3c81feaea5c82b
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:07:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Human Resources Assistant Job in Madison, NJ Ajilon Staffing is searching for an HR Assistant for our client in the Madison area. This is a temporary opportunity that has the potential to go permanent. Our client is a very professional and well known organization in the area. Candidates must have immediate availability. Job Duties: Heavy database work inputting transfer information, promotions, address changes etc.HIGH email correspondence with field workersCommunicate with other departmentsAdditional projects as needed Job Requirements: Bachelor's Degree requires- preferably in HR or BusinessSTRONG written and verbal communication1-3 years of experience in the HR fieldAbility handle multiple projects at onceHIGHLY professional Interested Human Resources Assistants should apply to this job at www.ajilon.com. ;",Human Resources Assistant Job in Madison,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Parsippany, NJ 07054",,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Assistant-Job-in-Madison-NJ-Job-Parsippany-NJ-US-165823833.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=16,,Human Resources,89caf8ad61f9a310cc9e1786499126e4
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:03:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionPositionSummary:Performoptimization and customer analysis for internal and external customerprojects.  Information communicated tothe requestors through presentations and reports. EssentialDuties and Responsibilities:Demonstratescreative problem solving skills Engage multiplestakeholders and use data to evaluate issues and initiatives in order to facilitateand provide insight on supply chain goals and projectsAnalyze largeamounts of data and provides in-depth analysis needed to support businessoperations to meet operational and strategic goalsDevelopsanalytical tools, processes, and performance metrics to use in supply chain andvalue analysisFacilitate meetings, answer questions, and provide insight withinternal/external customers when covering the results of analysis work Interface with business teams and Information Technology teams seamlesslyGather all necessary corporate or external customer data for analysisUse technology to perform analytics Qualifications:Education,License or Certification: Working towards aBachelor’s Degree (Supply Chain, Business Management, Logistics, etc.,preferred)Experience: Education may besubstituted with adequate work experienceSkills andCompetencies: FunctionalExpertise: Usesjudgment and draws upon past experience to solve problems and recommendedapproaches; demonstrates accountability for completing work assignments andmeeting deadlines.Interpersonal: Contributesacross workgroups to achieve common goals. Possesses the ability to deal with conflicts.Leadership/Change:DemonstratesUniGroup’s vision, values, and principles and displays integrity and ethics inall interactions.Business: Identifies avariety of customer needs and adapts to varied customer situations to solveproblems and deliver timely solutions.Communications: Demonstrates strong verbal and written communication and listeningskills; possesses the ability to effectively communicate to all levels of theorganization. Language:Ability to read, write and speak English fluently.Technology:Proficient in using multiple software programs and web-basedapplications such as e-mail, Microsoft Office Suite products, internet browsers,etc.",Supply Chain Analyst Intern Job in Fenton,Full Time,"Fenton, MO 63026",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Supply-Chain-Analyst-Intern-Job-FENTON-MO-US-167088100.aspx?mescoid=1300086001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fb3324b536975655ad5810707a995bad
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:03:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose: The position is the Director, Compliance for Sports Medicine US. The role provides direction and leadership on Compliance matters to the Sports Medicine Business. The Director will be located in Andover, Mass. The role reports into the U.S. Compliance Officer. [The Director, Compliance will be part of the business leadership team.] Essential job tasks: • Oversight: Leads the implementation of the Global Compliance Program in the US Sports Medicine Business under the direction of the US Compliance Officer, and with the Sales and Marketing leaders as primary Business partners. The activities include review of compliance risks in market and the status tracking of risk – control actions. The Director, Compliance also partners with the business teams to create the required Compliance Culture. • Risk Assessment: Partners with the business leadership to conduct compliance risk assessments in the business determining areas of focus and developing mitigation plans. Drives implementation of risk mitigation plans. • Written Standards:  Creates and/or implements policies and procedures for all risk areas including review and approval processes.  Ensures that all standards are communicated regularly to employees. • Training and Education: Identifies and implements annual training and education plans including a method of tracking completion and effectiveness with the support of the Global Compliance Training Team. • Monitoring and Auditing:  Supports the Global Compliance Monitoring and Internal Audit teams in conducting monitoring and auditing as required.  Implements spot checks, ride-alongs or other monitoring activities as directed. Will have primary responsibility for the monitoring program for Bio-therapeutic products, including monitoring speaker programs, Medical Scientific Liaison programs, and other promotional activities. • Third Party Management: Drives Third Party Seller and non-seller third party compliance management and initiatives. Conducts Third Party Risk Assessments and site visits. Partners with business team to understand third party strategy and ensures compliance risks are considered and mitigated. • Investigations: Conducts and/or assists in investigations to the extent requested. Ensures consistent and appropriate investigative processes are utilized. • Corrective Actions: Ensures that appropriate and consistent corrective actions are implemented for compliance issues. Tracks issues and corrective actions to establish targeted training as needed. Conducts assessments to determine effectiveness of corrective actions. • M&A: Conducts compliance due diligence for potential business development opportunities and drives integration of acquired businesses into the Company’s Compliance Program. • Guidance and Management:  Provides day to day advice and guidance to applicable US Business Teams on Compliance matters. • Key Performance Indicators (KPI’s):  Monitors and reports status on Compliance KPI’s.  Creates and implements action plans to address performance gaps as needed. Job Requirements: • Seven years of experience related to implementing a compliance programme within a business • Device knowledge and experience required • Knowledge of applicable laws, industry codes and best practices, and Director must remain up-to-date on the evolving external compliance landscape in the US Device market segment, • Bachelor Degree or equivalent required (Legal degree is beneficial) • Fluent in English (written and spoken) • The role will involve US travel approximately 25-50% of the time, with occasional international travel as needed. Other requirements: • Excellent communication and interpersonal skills. Strong ability to communicate complex topics in concise terms • Ability to communicate concisely and persuasively in writing as well as the ability to draft clear and effective reports, policies etc. • Self- motivated and result- driven • Strong analytical skills. Ability to persuade through positive communication. • Ability to work across cultures with all levels of the organization as well as with different functions. • Ability to detect risk areas and red flags • Solution-minded; desire to solve problems • Project management skills. Ability to follow through and complete tasks on time. Additional Information:",Compliance Director-Sports Medicine (Medical Device) Job in Andover,Full Time Employee,"Andover, MA 01810",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsLegal ServicesMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Compliance-Director-Sports-Medicine-Medical-Device-Job-Andover-MA-US-167092595.aspx?mescoid=1100057001001&jobPosition=1,,Legal,4c7392873350233a1465e24741b08e00
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:05:01:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"FINANCIAL INFO SVCS AGENCY Job Posting Notice Job ID: 239927 # of Positions: 1 Business Title: DATA CENTER-SHIFT SUPERVISOR Civil Service Title: COMPUTER ASSOC (OPERATIONS) Title Code No: 13621Level: 03 Proposed Salary Range: $ 66,300.00 - $101,324.00 (Annual) Work Location: 450 West 33 St, New York NY Division/Work Unit: Shared System-Data Center Ops Job DescriptionThe Financial Information Services Agency (FISA) has a vacancy for a Data Center Shift Supervisor reporting directly to the Night Shift Manager. The Data Center Shift Supervisor is responsible for supervising and directing all aspects of FISA Data Center operations. Personnel managerial duties .include ensuring all scheduled processing is completed, all printing of reports and legal documents are separated and distributed, overseeing training of staff, and handling personnel and administrative problems. In addition will organize and manage staffing levels to provide efficient operations. Management duties include handling data processing operation problems, assists with establishing operational standards and procedures. Working with outside vendors pertaining to all equipment, also work closely with agency personnel in problem determination and distribution requirements.Minimum Qual Requirements1. A certificate from an accredited technical school (approximately 675 hours) with a specialization in computer operations, and two years of satisfactory full-time experience, acquired within the last eight years, working on large-scale mainframe computer operations or mainframe data communication networks; or 2. A baccalaureate degree from an accredited college and three years of satisfactory full-time experience, acquired within the last eight years, as described in ""1"" above; or 3. A four-year high school diploma or its educational equivalent and four years of satisfactory full-time experience, acquired within the last eight years, as described in ""1"" above; or 4. A satisfactory combination of education and/or experience equivalent to ""1"", ""2"", or ""3"" above. However, all candidates must have at least two years of full-time experience, acquired within the last eight years, as described in ""1"" above.Preferred Skills• Knowledge of IBM Z series mainframe• Knowledge of TSO• Familiarity with IBM Tape Library• Familiarity with OCE and IBM laser printers, RSI equipment• Experience with UNIX Systems a plus• Excellent communication (oral and written), interpersonal, and organizational skillsAdditional Information P98TITLE SALARY RANGE:HIRING RATE: $66,300INCUMBENT RATE: $76,245MAXIMUM: $101,324To Apply External applicants please visit https://a127-jobs.nyc.gov/ to apply to Job ID # 239927. Current NYC employees may apply via Employee Self Service (ESS). While all complete applications will be given consideration, only candidates selected for an interview will be contacted by FISA. FISA IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER.Hours/Shift This position is a 3-day work week, 19:30 until 8:00 a.m. and includes weekends and holidays. The days worked will rotate on predetermined schedule.Residency Requirement New York City Residency is not required for this position.POSTING DATE: 05/02/2016POST UNTIL:  Until Filled The City of New York is an Equal Opportunity Employer",DATA CENTER-SHIFT SUPERVISOR Job in Manhattan,Full Time,"Manhattan, NY 10001",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/DATA-CENTER-SHIFT-SUPERVISOR-Job-Manhattan-NY-US-166969769.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=7,,,6054d6bf1c603a3cd5fb41409e67645f
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:04:45:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T provides world class digital content delivery and is continuing to expand its role as the largest digital video service provider in the world. As part of our challenge to produce innovative solutions Next Gen Platform System Architect team will lead the way in developing solutions to complex business and technical problems that directly impact our end-to-end architecture and overall systems performance. Day to day Responsibilities include authoring requirements and Systems specifications (end-to end design/Call flows/System architecture/Interface definition) System Engineering for a next generation software platform Play a lead role in architecture meetings and discussions to define overall architecture Design and prototype innovative new solutions and architectures applicable to the future connected home Execute prototype efforts/lab tests/performance and system tests Perform system engineering tasks related to Next Gen platform including Router/Gateway Take part in technical reviews and provide leadership to facilitate design and technical strategies Qualifications: Bachelors or Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related technical field desired. 5-8 years related technical architect experience, including design and end-to-end architecture of Service provider managed Consumer devices(STB and Routers) Experience with IP based networking technologies apart from design/integration Knowledge/Experience with Linux, IPv4/v6 stacks, IP protocols. Experience with Linux based platforms or Routers and of hardware platforms and SoC’s. Good understanding and/or experience with cloud based technologies required including SDN & NFV. Candidates should have the ability to understand the big picture for system design",Next Gen Platform System Architect System Engineer (NGP) Job in Los Angeles,,"Los Angeles, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Next-Gen-Platform-System-Architect-System-Engineer-NGP-Job-Los-Angeles-CA-US-166969774.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=8,,,79fdb386d2bd8d624b805ff55c53191b
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:04:25:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Overland Park, Kansas (KS) that is seeking an Android Software Developer.Responsibilities: Writing and maintaining DSI's Android application utilizing the native Android SDK Work directly with the Manager of Software Development to design and implement applications for DSI's Android products; specifically, writing and maintaining DSI's mobile applications, unit testing each application, and documenting how the application works Develop, document, test and maintain Android applications Assist in creating functional/technical specifications for new mobile applications Assist in UI design, focusing on usability specific to the Android application Take ownership of project through the entire development lifecycleREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science or relevant discipline and experience 3+ years of experience developing Android applications; B2B or B2C specifically Experience in objective-oriented design and development of applications and systems Professional experience with Java development and the Android SDK Experience with the development of user interfaces for mobile devices Experience with Interactive application development, memory management, concurrency and multi-threading Strong understanding of the Android SDK and application performance analysis",Android Developer Job in Overland Park,"Full Time, Employee","Overland Park, KS 66210",,http://jobview.monster.com/Android-Developer-Job-Overland-Park-KS-US-167024889.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cd27abc2dfb608556ae17002248dd4f7
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:04:25:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Desktop Support Specialist in Stamford, Connecticut (CT).Summary:This hardware and software support position is in a dedicated building in Stamford, Connecticut (CT). As a whole, the person will need to complete the identified tasks as required. They must also be able to execute all assigned projects quickly and efficiently with a sense of urgency.Principal Duties and Responsibilities: Support from 8:00am ET to 5:00pm ET weekdays Incident support of customer designated standard and non-standard coreload software Operating System support of Windows 7 Configure and deploy desktops and laptops Support of customer designated standard and non-standard coreload software Service Request support for installs, moves, adds and changes (IMACs) Support of laptops, desktops, tablets, smartphones telephony devices, printers, conference room equipment, infrastructure computing, and Cisco Telepresence Daily multifunction printer check and conference room checks Manage pool of loaner Laptops, iPhone, iPad and other devices Remote site support Hardware Maintenance Support of on and offsite meetings Quarterly DR testing required in Norwalk siteAdditional Responsibilities: Facilitate tickets to engage other teams as needed Internet Explorer/Chrome/Firefox Printer support and maintenance Windows 7 Core Image support Documentation creation and updating Associate Training Escalation point for Help Desk Other duties as assigned Walkup support rotationREQUIREMENTS: Dell certified or comparable experience A+ certified or comparable experience Must have at least 3+ years of experience supporting PC hardware and software Must have a strong working knowledge of Windows 7 Working knowledge of Active Directory Must be able to work with minimal supervision Must have good communication and organizational skills and be able to work professionally with internal and external clients Must have the drive to dig into issues and suggest resolutions for repeat issues for implementationHardware/Software Support: Deskside Support experience Desktop Break/Fix experience Field Technician Dispatch experience Laptop Break/Fix experience Networking experience Printer Break/Fix experience Server Break/Fix experienceNice to Have: CCNA CompTIA A+ CompTIA Network + CompTIA PDI + CompTIA Security + CompTIA Server + HP Laptop/Desktop Warranty Certified HP Printer Warranty Certified HP Server Warranty Certified IBM/Lenovo Laptop/Desktop Warranty Certified IBM Server Warranty Certified Xerox Certified with TCN Number",Desktop Support Specialist - Special Delivery Job in Stamford,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Stamford, CT 06905",,http://jobview.monster.com/Desktop-Support-Specialist-Special-Delivery-Job-Stamford-CT-US-167036407.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),13be643cb312a8d228b4c0923e4703ce
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:04:21:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"CITATION AND CRIMINAL TRAFFIC CLERK JACKSON COUNTY Jackson County is seeking applications for a Citation/Criminal Traffic Clerk. This position would be responsible for entering all traffic, criminal traffic, forfeitures and juvenile ordinance actions into the computer. This position requires preparing case files, docketing all papers, ensuring cases move efficiently through the court system, clerking in cases, taking minutes, receipting money, bail bonds, charge slips and bond cards. Requirements: High School diploma or equivalent and one year experience in a law office or legal services environment required. Post-secondary coursework in legal secretary, paralegal or related field preferred. Proficiency in Microsoft Office required. This position also requires competent knowledge of legal documents and terminology as well as excellent written, oral and interpersonal skills. Wage Range: $12.18-$15.23 per hour plus full County benefits package. Resume and completed application materials are required and must be received by April 19, 2016. No e-mailed, faxed or incomplete application materials will be accepted. To apply, request application materials from: Jackson County Personnel Department 307 Main Street  2nd Floor Black River Falls, WI 54615 715-284-0216 susie.meinerz@co.jackson.wi.us www.co.jackson.wi.us Jackson County is an EEO/AA/ADA Employer",Citation and Criminal Traffic Clerk Job in Black River Falls,Full Time,"Black River Falls, WI 54615",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Citation-Criminal-Traffic-Clerk-Job-Black-River-Falls-WI-US-165796960.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=19,,,c82a5c76755374bbeb851f7d48942707
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:04:13:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Lease & LaBau, Inc. is your one source for legal recruiting.  For the past twenty-five years, we have specialized in the placement of professionals in the legal workplace. Please visit our website at www.leaselabau.com. As of May 5th, a leading international law firm seeks a vibrant Legal Secretary to provide administrative support to a team of attorneys. Working within the Tax Department, this individual will draft, revise, and distribute practice-specific documents and correspondence. The person in this role will also be responsible for: ·         Tracking attorneys’ time in order to assist with client billing efforts·         Creating and updating client and matter lists·         Managing the attorneys’ calendars and organizing logistics for appointments, meetings, and conference calls·         Coordinating travel arrangements and distributing unique itineraries·         Maintaining and alphabetizing documents and files. Required Skills: ·         3+ years of experience in a law firm or similar professional environment·         Demonstrated proficient in Microsoft Office Suite with the ability to quickly learn new databases·         Professional, team player, and flexible to work overtime as requested  Resumes may be submitted in confidence to christina@leaselabau.com",Legal Secretary Job in New York City,Full Time,"New York City, NY 10177",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Legal-Secretary-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-167091990.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=4,"60,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),67582d4116e4b57cc6b72a8fe6086037
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:04:12:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Regional law firm seeking associate attorney for our Fort Wayne/Warsaw offices.  Bankruptcy experience preferred but not necessary.Candidate should be willing to work in a high paced environment, have excellent communication skills, and be a team player.  Must be licensed to practice law in the State of Indiana.   Competitive salary.Mail or fax resume to:                Glaser & Ebbs                                                132 E. Berry Street                                                Fort Wayne, IN 46802                                                Attn:  Hiring Manager                                                Fax:  (260) 424-6529                        orEmail resume to:  resume@glaserebbsfw.com",Associate Attorney Job in Fort Wayne,Full Time,"Fort Wayne, IN 46802",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Associate-Attorney-Job-Fort-Wayne-IN-US-141027311.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=3,,Entry Level,a3489fd8f3cf4e12403d19d9ca1ea1a5
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:03:35:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"OverviewDuration: 8+ month contract (possible extensions)Location: Greenville, SCPay rate: W2/HourlyJob ID: 2465Our client, an innovative automotive manufacturing company, is looking for talented individuals for an opportunity in the Greenville, South Carolina area. This position is a long term contract position with the possibility of multi-year extensions and conversion to a full-time/permanent position.The mobility architect plays a key role in maintaining, migrating, and building back-end systems to support the digital, mobility, and connected services team.  The team currently maintains an in-house J2EE environment that will continue to need care and attention while designing and building a new mobile back-end platform to support the next generation of digital and mobile services. The ideal candidate will have experience migrating legacy J2EE software and services to a modern micro-service architecture hosted on cloud computing services while maintaining security, scalability, and personal data protection. The candidate will need to understand and guide the development and implementation of database systems, complex networking, software development, authentication, and more within an agile environment. The incumbent will work with mobile engineers, J2EE engineers, analytics engineers, web engineers, and project managers to build a service portfolio for use in supporting mobile application development.   QualificationsEducation: BA/BS Degree in Business, Computer Science or Electrical Engineering preferred or the equivalent of 4 years professional IT related experience.MS degree (preferred).Experience:5+ years of overall technical experience in Information Technology2+ years of experience in voice technologies such (SIP, voice trunking, etc.)2+ years experience network technologies (switching, routing, etc.)2+ years experience with RESTful web services and cloud computing2+ years demonstrated strengths in development, integration and testing2+ years experience with troubleshooting / analysis2+ years working with external vendors/suppliers and managing and steering their deliverables as internal technical project lead1+ year experience in project managementIT technical documentation skills preferredLicenses/Certifications: Process/project management experience or training/certifications (preferred).About our CompanyDataSoft Technologies is a highly recognized provider of professional IT Consulting services in the US. Founded in 1994, DataSoft Technologies, Inc. provides staff augmentation services for Information Technology and Automotive Services. Our team member benefits include:Paid Holidays/Paid Time Off (PTO)Medical/Dental InsuranceGroup Accident/Critical Illness InsuranceLife Insurance401 (K)",Mobility Architect Job in Greenville,Full Time,"Greenville, SC 29601",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Mobility-III-Architect-Job-Greenville-SC-US-166973631.aspx?mescoid=1700157001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9a9a92f8ce6effd6dc8a77aaddbdf7cf
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:03:33:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"About CapgeminiWith more than 180,000 people in over 40 countries, Capgemini is one of the world's foremost providers of consulting, technology and outsourcing services. The Group reported 2015 global revenues of EUR 11.9 billion. Together with its clients, Capgemini creates and delivers business and technology solutions that fit their needs, enabling them to achieve innovation and competitiveness. A deeply multicultural organization, Capgemini has developed its own way of working, the Collaborative Business ExperienceTM, and draws on Rightshore�, its worldwide delivery model. Learn more about us at www.capgemini.com                                                                                              Rightshore® is a trademark belonging to Capgemini  Capgemini is an Equal Opportunity Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law. This is a general description of the Duties, Responsibilities and Qualifications required for this position. Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed. Whenever necessary to provide individuals with disabilities an equal employment opportunity, Capgemini will consider reasonable accommodations that might involve varying job requirements and/or changing the way this job is performed, provided that such accommodations do not pose an undue hardship.   Capgemini's robust Outsourcing offerings include: Applications Management, Infrastructure Management and Business Process Management. We combine these services with our deep industry knowledge and experience to provide the change agent to accelerate business growth. We generate quality and speed through our proven tools, methods and global centers. These capabilities, coupled with our program management expertise are tailored to fit the most challenging business needs.   Solution Architects assess a project’s technical feasibility, as well as implementation risks. They are responsible for designing and implementing a project’s technical architecture. They define the structure of a system, its interfaces, and the principles that guide its organization, software design and implementation. The scope of the Solution Architect’s role is bounded by the business issue at hand. A Solution Architect needs to have knowledge of all the different aspects of the technical solution as well as robust business knowledge. This includes the Software Architect. You are responsible for the end-to-end architecture of a solution, including its assembly and integration into the IT architecture principles defined with the client. You define the structure of the system, its interfaces, and the principles that guide its organization, software design and implementation. You are responsible for the management and mitigation of technical risks, ensuring that the solution services can be realistically delivered by the underlying technology components. Certification: Technical certification e.g. Cisco, VMWare; or achieved professional certification TOGAF 9 level 1; or has / seeking IAF level 1.   Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law • 2-3 years of Coudera Experience and overall 8-10 year of IT Experience.  •Design and implement Cloudera Hadoop based big data solutions, including leadership role in design to develop shared/reusable components. • Hands on experience on Core Java in Linux environment. • Work with functional team/ Frameworks team to understand requirements and translate them to technical specifications. •Cloudera certified will be added advantage. Solution Architects assess a project’s technical feasibility, as well as implementation risks.  They are responsible for designing and implementing a project’s technical architecture. They define the structure of a system, its interfaces, and the principles that guide its organization, software design and implementation. The scope of the Solution Architect’s role is bounded by the business issue at hand. A Solution Architect needs to have knowledge of all the different aspects of the technical solution as well as robust business knowledge. This includes the Software Architect. Required Skills and Experience: You are responsible for the end-to-end architecture of a solution, including its assembly and integration into the IT architecture principles defined with the client. You define the structure of the system, its interfaces, and the principles that guide its organization, software design and implementation. You are responsible for the management and mitigation of technical risks, ensuring that the solution services can be realistically delivered by the underlying technology components. • Qualification: Minimum 5 years experience, Bachelor’s Degree. • Certification: Technical certification e.g. Cisco, VMWare; or achieved professional certification TOGAF 9 level 1; or has / seeking IAF level 1.  • Should have experience in Functional Architecture Design and Architecture Knowledge, Negotiating, Financial Analysis and Continuous (Service) Improvement. • Should be proficient in Business Knowledge, Software Engineering Leadership, Technical Solution Design and Change Management. • Should have progressing knowledge in Business Analysis. Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 100%",Sr. Solution Architect - Cloudera Architect Job in Jersey City,Full Time,"Jersey City, NJ 07097",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Solution-Architect-Cloudera-Architect-Job-Jersey-City-NJ-US-166961917.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5bfda0073a2ad9967485dd68659880d9
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:42:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:$45-55k Foot in the door opportunity for a Career in Recruiting!Are you looking for a foot in the door to a great career? A prestigious recruiting firm is seeking a Staffing Associate. You will have the opportunity to learn about our industry, recruiting quality applicants, and business development. After 6 successful months in this position, you will have the opportunity to apply for a promotion into the Staffing Consultant career path. Successful candidates will have a positive, ?whatever it takes? attitude, work well under pressure, possess basic business acumen, i.e. email etiquette, business grammar and spelling. Benefits include Vacation, Sick Leave, Medical, Dental, Vision and 401k. Apply today for immediate consideration. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1034523 Job Experience:,",Staffing Associate - Earn $K in this exciting career! Job in San Marcos,Full Time,"San Marcos, CA 92069",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Staffing-Associate-Earn-55K-in-this-exciting-career!-Job-San-Marcos-CA-US-167044094.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=3,Up to $55000.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),7a82fce6d0de612f224ad9fa8f3015c8
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:34:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Automation Engineer/QA Job #:  660007Apex Systems is looking for sharp, motivated QA engineers for several exciting opportunities with one of our major financial clients in New Jersey!!!Bachelor's Degree required!If you have automation experience, CI/CD HIGHLY Preferred - and financial industry experience please reach out to Matt Ryan at mryan@apexsystemsinc.com         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Automation Engineer/QA Job in Jersey City,Full Time Employee,"Jersey City, NJ",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Automation-Engineer-QA-Job-Jersey-City-NJ-US-166990147.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),85c8b984836cda338fa052228215d106
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:33:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"LAKE SUPERIOR STATE University seeks an HR Generalist. Under the direction of the Associate VP for Human Resources, is responsible for providing HR, Payroll, and Administrative support for services provided by the office for Human Resources.   For complete job posting & application go to:  https://jobs.lssu.edu APPLICATION DEADLINEOpen Until FilledAn Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action EmployerWe encourage a diverse work force",HR Generalist Job in Sault Sainte Marie,Full Time,"Sault Sainte Marie, MI 49783",All,http://jobview.monster.com/HR-Generalist-Job-Sault-Sainte-Marie-MI-US-167086395.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=5,,,ca5c7ebd6c80531d74215aaecd294e60
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:26:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Data Center TechnicianContract OpportunityLocation: San Antonio, TX 78251 (local candidates only) The Data Center Technician is responsible for daily operations of Data Center facility located in San Antonio, TX. The person in this role is expected to rigorously follow accepted Standard Operating Procedures (SOP), and Job Safety Analysis (JSA).  Key Responsibilities:Completion of service requestsIncident documentation to resolution of all work performed within the facilityCreation of Change Request (CRQ) including planning, scripting and implementation of changes in the data center environmentMaintaining, implementing and testing data center Business Continuity PlansSupport of DC Facilities evergreen compliance calendarAssisting IRM coordinator in creation of REMEDY CRQ and TASKCollection/storage of compliance data from all ITC Global Data CenterDeploy and maintain strong Operational Excellence (OE) processes to ensure consistent, reliable operations and promote sharing of best practices throughout the division and across the IT Function Key Qualifications:Solid IT TroubleshootingFamiliarity with servers - Virtual, blade and physicalFamiliarity with network principlesAble to perform network troubleshooting taskFamiliarity with enterprise storage arraysFiber channel troubleshooting techniquesKnowledge of IT power management principlesDesired Skills:ITIL FundamentalsCustomer relationship managementCommunication skillsHardware/software troubleshootingWired/Wireless networking infrastructureTelecommunicationsLAN/WAN networking",Data Center Technician Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX 78251",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Data-Center-Technician-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-167074153.aspx?mescoid=1500143001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2f884275736bedd4cdb0298f1db376f2
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:25:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dorsey & Whitney LLP is seeking a lawyer with two to five years of experience to join the Corporate practice in its Salt Lake City office.  The associate will have the opportunity to work on a wide variety of corporate transactions, including mergers and acquisitions, capital markets and venture capital transactions, financings and fund formation.  Dorsey offers opportunities for advancement within a collegial and dynamic environment, competitive salary, and excellent benefits. Qualified candidates will have:·        Two to five years of experience in one or more of the following: venture capital offerings, public company matters (including offerings, reporting and compliance), mergers and acquisitions, corporate governance and partnerships/LLCs;·        Experience working in the business/corporate group of a large law firm;·        Strong communication and writing skills; and·        Top academic credentials. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, affectional preference, disability, age, marital status, familial status, status with regard to public assistance, military or veteran status, or any other legally-protected status. Dorsey & Whitney LLP accepts online applications at www.dorsey.com/attorneyjobs.  We do not accept application materials by mail or email except as a reasonable accommodation for qualified disabled applicants.  Individuals who are unable to use our online process due to a disability should call 612-492-5186.",Corporate Associate Attorney Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time,"Salt Lake City, UT 84101",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Corporate-Associate-Attorney-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-166555208.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7f347eb51b5f6059ed1a1c586874f89a
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:22:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Representing plaintiffs in cases dealing with primarily motor vehicle accidents. Trial work is a MUSTDuties:*MUST HAVE trial experience, knowledge of case law, NJ court rules, motion practice and Admitted to New Jersey Bar.* Provides legal advice on personal injury issues; keeping clients abreast of case developments; analyzing plaintiff's positions; providing explanations of personal injury law concepts and actions. * Resolves personal injury cases by trial, settling, mediating, and/or arbitrating; planning, organizing, and presenting arguments and counter-arguments; engaging expert witnesses; preparing and presenting evidence; preparing and interrogating witnesses.Skills/Qualifications:Trial Experience, Litigation, Negotiating, Verbal Communication, Presentation Skills, Proactive, Results Driven, Adjudication.",Personal Injury Attorney Job in Asbury Park,Full Time,"Asbury Park, NJ 07712",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Personal-Injury-Attorney-Job-Asbury-Park-NJ-US-166970040.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=17,,,a928838454f528ff4ce74e86e083a741
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:21:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"APPLICATION DEVELOPER Purpose of the Position: The successful candidate will be responsible for all aspects of the product life cycle including requirements gathering and analysis, design, coding, unit testing, implementation, and maintenance of the code Essential Functions & Responsibilities: •Design, develop, code and unit test complex programs •Collaborate with the Project Management, Business and Systems Analysts and Business Partners to develop specifications for system enhancements for continuous functional improvement •Participate in and/or drives the design and development of technology solutions which meet security, network, infrastructure/operations, and customer support requirements •Responsible for root cause analysis and providing solutions for production and development issues •Interface with functional teams to ensure the proper integration of business processes and identify customer solutions •Assist in defining complex technical requirements for on-going systems maintenance Must haves: Technical: •Bachelor’s degree in Software Engineering or relevant alternatives •Experience and good understanding of object oriented programming (design and develop)(preferably .Net framework) •Experience and good understanding of relational databases (design and develop)(preferably SQL server) •Experience with both windows and web applications; back end and front end; •Experience with JavaScript, JQuery, Html5, CSS3 •Programming skills in C#, Entity framework, MVC Soft Skills: •Strong problem solving and analytical skills •Smart and enthusiastic about their job •Enjoys finding solutions to any request or issue and be creative about it •Strong debugging and trouble shooting skills •Excellent communication skills and strong interpersonal skills •Creative and Curious Very nice to haves: •Programming skills in Java •Understanding of SAP (programming and/or modules) •Understanding of HANA XS •SharePoint skills 2010 and/or 2013 •Administration and/or development •InfoPath and Workflows •PowerShell scripts Nice to haves: •Web UX research and design •Knowledge of SAP ABAP programming •Floorplan Manager for WebDynPro ABAP •Workflow, Cross Application Technologies like BAPI & ALE experience •Knowledge of SAP ABAP programming tools including Transaction and Report creations, enhancements, SmartForms, User Exits, ALV Reports, Screen Painter BDC, Data Dictionary, ABAP Query, BAPI, ALE, IDOCS •Experience in Test-driven development •Familiar with Agile software development",Application Developer Job in Toronto body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,"Full Time, Employee",Toronto,Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Application-Developer-Job-Toronto-US-167041066.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,9636fd091e187e2c5ceca624500ebf49
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:19:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Digital Marketing Consultant Job #:  657045Industry leader in supporting homeowners and consumers. We put customers at the center of all that we do. We make every decision - and design every product and service - with our customers in mind.It starts with you. We must attract, develop, retain and motivate the most talented people - those who care and who work together as partners across business units and functions.  We value and promote diversity and inclusion in every aspect of our business and at every level of our organization.The team includes Home Lending, Consumer Credit Card, Personal Loans and Lines, Direct Auto, Dealer Services, Commercial Auto, Retail Services and Education Financial Services including the professional services teams that partner with these businesses - Human Resources, Finance, Credit Risk, and Compliance & Operational Risk.Our Consumer Credit Solutions (CCS) Marketing and Channel Partnerships team supports Consumer Financial Services (credit card, personal lines and loans, direct auto loans, fee-based services and rewards programs) and Education Financial Services (EFS-student loans) with compelling cross-channel marketing and sales strategies and program execution to drive profitable growth.Summary: The Marketing Program Manager 2 is integral to the success of the digital payments marketing team. Working closely with the Head of Digital Payments Marketing, this role will support strategy and program development and manage the execution and implementation of marketing launches and ongoing projects.Marketing projects may involve traditional, digital, new, and emerging mediums, including paid, owned, and earned. Key objectives are to strengthen awareness and drive adoption and usage of digital payments options with cards.The ideal candidate will have a background in financial services, consumer impacting technology and/or fintech roles. He/she has experience in and/or can demonstrate strong interest in digital payments. Other key attributes include experience in new product launches, multi-channel marketing, partner management and cross-functional leadership.This role will be a key partner with the product team to bring the strategy and plan for new products to life through marketing support.Key activities: Job responsibilities for the position include (but not limited to) the following.• Manage execution of new marketing launches and programs to support key objectives of awareness, adoption and usage• Collaborate on marketing strategy development across channels and products• Manage complex projects across the organization with multiple business areas• Cultivate strong relationships to coordinate/negotiate projects across internal and external business partners• Manage project timelines; ensuring that all milestones stay on track and projects are completed consistently, on time and without error• Key partner with product team to support product strategy• Serve as an influencer to promote Digital Payments Marketing in the organization        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Digital Marketing Consultant Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Digital-Marketing-Consultant-Job-San-Francisco-CA-US-167024212.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7877f9ee3306d9e458543b68c1adc41c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:19:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Special Counsel is immediately hiring a Project Manager in Penns Park, PA.  Qualified candidates must have at least 2 years of project management experience and a background in paralegal work.   Job Duties:·         Coordinate and supervise paralegals, including prioritizing work, allocating resources to projects, ensuring completion of tasks in a timely matter, adhere to policy·         Manage active and pending projects·         Act as intermediary between the Biomechanical Engineer and the client ·         Manage all activities that occur from the time a case comes in to the time it closes which could include taking sign-up calls, completing conflict checks, creating estimates for jobs, managing file material, setting deadlines, performing quality assurance checks, and ensuring a job is satisfactorily completed·         Conduct regular team meetings to discuss ongoing work, team issues, firm news, and ensure that all team members are provided with pertinent information as neededJob Requirement:·         Bachelor’s Degree required·         Paralegal Certification/Legal Services experience·         2+ years’ experience in a Project Management Role·         3+ years’ experience as a Paralegal·         Excellent organizational and time management ability·         Proficient in all Microsoft Office Applications·         Excellent interpersonal communication skills (written and verbal)·         CRM experience preferredIf interested in this Project Manager position, or other job opportunities through Special Counsel, please e-mail your resume as a WORD document to Philadelphia@SpecialCounsel.com. EOE Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",Project Manager Job in Penn's Park,Full Time Employee,"Penns Park, PA 18943",,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Job-in-Penn's-Park-PA-Job-Penns-Park-PA-US-167080382.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,,Legal,abc2555fb836588364a06caa8d8df361
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:19:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Harper Associates has been retained by the prestigious Detroit Athletic Club to search for an exceptional Director of Human Resources with experience in a luxury hospitality or service industry employer.   The DAC (www.thedac.com), celebrating its 100th year on Madison Avenue in the heart of Detroit’s sports, entertainment and theatre district, is long recognized as one of the finest private Clubs in the country.  Known for impeccable service, The DAC offers its members a wide variety of services, many very unique, including a small number of boutique hotel rooms.  The DAC has ~ 4500+ members, 300 employees, multiple restaurants, catering and conference facilities, spa, etc. Our client provides a very high level of staff training and empowers its employees to offer the very best guest experience.  The HR Director, therefore, plays a vital role in maintaining the club’s outstanding reputation for stellar customer service.  The DAC’s performance excellence process and consistent performance process are significant factors in differentiating the DAC from other clubs and hospitality venues in Michigan.  This quality program is the foundation on which the club operates on a daily basis and is managed by the HR department.  The Director’s willingness to embrace this program is essential for the club to maintain its award winning status.  The ideal candidate has a warm, friendly and helpful approach.  In addition, they would have great initiative and drive which creates a natural flair for motivating others.  A strong sense of urgency and the ability to make decisions, at times under pressure, are also desired traits for this key leader. The HR Director is a very hands-on role, with two assistants in the department. The Director will oversee all HR functions including: training, benefit administration (not payroll), employee relations, compliance issues, recruiting / onboarding, union interactions and strategic planning.  Process development, implementation, and improvement along with project management are also incorporated into the HR Director role.  Future plans will involve an employee wellness program.  Expertise using an Applicant Tracking System (ATS) is highly desirable in order to have the ability and enthusiasm to research and implement one for the club. Bachelor’s Degree required; SPHR a plus; require HR background in a luxury Hotel / Resort or upscale service industry. Candidates must have advanced computer skills. Competitive salary plus comprehensive  benefits and 401K will be offered.  All inquiries will remain confidential.   Please send your resume directly to Harper Associates in a Word format attachment to ben@harperjobs.com  Ben Schwartz PresidentHarper Associates 31000 Northwestern Highway, Suite 240 Farmington Hills, MI 48334Phone 248 932-1170Direct Line: 248 737-0431 Fax 888 737-8525ben@harperjobs.com www.harperjobs.com",Human Resources Director - Detroit Athletic Club Job in Detroit,Full Time Employee,"Detroit, MI 48201",Hotels and LodgingRestaurant/Food ServicesFood and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Director-Detroit-Athletic-Club-Job-Detroit-MI-US-167086350.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=1,,Human Resources,11f9fa621602159bcf144149f3c0d1d5
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:02:19:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Live IT Up at Ciber   At Ciber, we believe the most inspired, innovative and industrious companies should win, regardless of size or legacy. We’re the small company that cares and the big company that can. We deliver breakthrough performances and powerful solutions that are anything but cookie cutter in order to give our clients the competitive advantage they deserve.  Work.Ciber Inc. is currently seeking a Java Developer in Roseville, CA.   More than 4 years experience writing code using languages such as (and not limited to) PL/1, Java, J2EE, Struts. Knowledge, skill and mental development equivalent to successful completion of four years of college with course work in computer science or directly related fields.Five plus years of professional experience in Java development for large, web-based applications systems. Experience in developing ERP based solutions is preferable. Working knowledge of Information Technology concepts and principles, the theories and functions of computer systems, and the principles and techniques of Information Technology documentation. Working knowledge of the methods, procedures and techniques of conducting studies for system conversions and enhancements, including the use of structure, behavior, and interaction diagrams in the analysis and design of web-based systems. Ability to effectively participate in and profit from continuing education, both in a formal and in-service training setting.  Ability to analyze data logically and exercise sound judgment in defining, evaluating, and solving moderately difficult technical and operational problems. Ability to gain and maintain effective working relationships with agency officials, associates, vendors, clients and others. Developed oral and written communication skills to present technical information to others with clarity and precision. Requires education/experience as outlined above for the following: Java EE framework technologies, Struts Framework, Spring Framework, Spring Batch, Java EE systems development; WebSphere; web based application development, especially creating Java server pages and data access objects (SQL); testing with JUnit. Experience with DB2 databases.Experience with interface development and troubleshooting.Experience with any ERP application development / maintenance. Experience with PDI data integration tool or other ETL tools is a plus. This position requires the successful completion of a background investigation and/or drug screen.  Ciber, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.  Learn. Ciber Transformation Services help our clients accelerate the pace of change. Through effective talent identification, thoughtful implementation and reskilling, we help IT organizations modernize their workforce, meet emerging industry requirements and ultimately shift their labor pyramid.Grow.  For more than 40 years, Ciber has delivered the technical savvy and IT solutions that help businesses achieve strategic goals. A global IT consulting company with some 6,500 people, Ciber has offices on four continents and in 15 countries. Founded in 1974, Ciber remains client focused and results driven. The company trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE: CBR). For more information, visit http://www.ciber.com/. Additional Information:",Java Developer Job in Roseville,"Full Time, Employee","Roseville, CA 95661",,http://jobview.monster.com/Java-Developer-Job-Roseville-CA-US-167022228.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,f26eeed789f9153e07927dbcf786dd6c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:00:28:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"FOSTER CARE RECRUITER-TRAINER FOR FAYETTEVILLE OFFICE Boys and Girls Homes of North Carolina, Inc is accepting applications for theposition of Foster Care Recruiter-Trainer for our Fayetteville office in Cumberland County. This position requires a BSW. Must be certified to teach MAPP. Experience working with DSS. Three (3) years experience working with emotionally and behaviorally disturbed youths and their families. Experience in working with foster parents. Must be able to demonstrate all the technical and program skills required of a foster parent. Advanced technical writing skills, treatment planning and behavior analysis skills required. Will be teaching MAPP-GPS throughout the year. Extended work hours are necessary on occasion. Must provide 24 hours accessibility, including weekends and holidays during assigned times (pager provided). On-call responsibilities may include being on-call to assigned foster parents, other program consultants and/or colleagues during their time off. Exempt salaried position. We offer an excellent benefit package. You can apply online at www.boysandgirlshomes.org , by email at tesa.bush@bghnc.org , or fax to 910-646-3609 and/or mail applications to Boys and Girls Homes of NC, Inc - P. O. Box 127, Lake Waccamaw, NC 28450 - Attn: Tesa Bush, HR Manager. For questions, please call Tesa Bush at 910-646-3083 ext 205. EOE",FOSTER CARE RECRUITER-TRAINER Job in Fayetteville,Full Time,"Fayetteville, NC 28304",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/FOSTER-CARE-RECRUITER-TRAINER-Job-Fayetteville-NC-US-167056979.aspx?mescoid=2100315001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3522e84433bd311387163503dc41089c
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:00:14:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Position available for DE licensed litigation attorney to work out of Philadelphia, PA or Wilmington, DE office of regional defense firm. Additional PA or NJ licenses are a plus. The firm specializes in defense litigation, toxic tort product liability, general insurance defense and workers' compensation. Our firm is a great place to work because of its fast paced yet casual environment. We are high achievers seeking to add another self-starter to our team. This position is best suited to attorneys with 3-5 years of experience. Salary commensurate with skill level.  Excellent Benefits",Attorney Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19103",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Attorney-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-166229530.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=3,,,05068ed979109b78875b9a8b6f770bab
United States of America,US,06/Nov/2015:00:13:53,No,jobs.monster.com,Prestigious law firm located in Center City Philadelphia is seeking an employment litigation associate with 3 to 5 years of state and federal experience representing employers on the management side.    Candidate should have excellent research and writing skills and be admitted in the state of PA.     Competitive salary and great benefits,Labor and Employment Associate Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Labor-Employment-Associate-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-166895706.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),58376ec027bd338033efbe3560595774
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:00:22:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Physician’s Assistant – Wayzata Cosmetic Surgery and SpaWomen’s Health, Medical Weight Loss Center and Medical Spa Wayzata Cosmetic Surgery and Spa is currently seeking an enthusiastic and knowledgeable Physician’s Assistant.  Located in Wayzata, our full service clinic is dedicated to providing comprehensive, innovative and caring cosmetic surgery, hormone replacement therapy, medical weight loss and unique aesthetic services including cosmetic injectables, advanced facial treatments, chemical peels, a variety of laser treatments, body contouring and skin tightening.  Dr. Lisa Ohman Erhard is committed to providing a balanced approach to health, beauty and intimacy.  The ideal candidate will be passionate about health promotion and be eager to help our clients achieve their optimal goals through a holistic approach.  We are ultimately seeking individuals that are interested in a long term career and the opportunity to grow. Requirements:Certified Physician’s AssistantCurrent Minnesota State LicenseCurrent DEA certificationKnowledge of local, state and federal regulations including HIPAA, OSHA and infection controlProficiency in basic computer skillsA passion for health and wellness is a mustExperience with Bio-identical Hormone Replacement Therapy and pellet insertion preferredExperience managing a nursing team is a plusStrong communication and organizational skills requiredMust have exceptional professional and customer service standards Responsibilities:Assist in surgical and non-surgical procedures including vaginal rejuvenation and labiplastyCounsel patients on hormone replacement therapy, weight management, nutritional supplementation and aesthetic service optionsPerform BHRT pellet insertions, non-surgical vaginal rejuvenation with MonaLisa Touch, non-surgical labia tightening, non-surgical body contouring and skin tighteningOversee nursing staff and labB12 injections and other weight management injections Office Environment:Part-time at first, leading to full-time with benefits (additional benefits will apply after becoming full time with 3 months of work experienceNo on-call dutiesFantastic and supportive work environmentBeautiful high end office, backed by one of the leading Gynecologists and Cosmetic Surgeons in the region ",Physician Assistant Job in Minneapolis,Employee,"Minneapolis, MN 55401",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Physician-Assistant-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-164730707.aspx?mescoid=2900483001001&jobPosition=6,,,9d24c149d914356d0ad629eae088a537
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:00:23:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"A-Line Staffing is looking for Reimbursement Counselors for work in Fort Mill, SC to interview ASAP. These Reimbursement Counselors will work any 8 hour shift between 7am-7pm Monday-Friday. These Reimbursement Counselors will be compensated between $14-$14.50 per hour. I have listed a detailed Job Description for these Reimbursement Counselor positions below for you to review. If you have any questions or are interested in the position, please contact Brandon Wood at 877-782-3334 or by email at bwood@alinestaffing.com Thanks!Job Description:Responsible for various reimbursement functions, including but not limited to accurate and timely claim submission, claim status, collection activity, appeals, payment posting, and/or refunds, until accounts receivable issues are properly resolved. Collects and reviews all patient insurance benefit information, to the degree authorized by the SOP of the program. Provides assistance to physician office staff and patients to complete and submit all necessary insurance forms and program applications. Completes and submits all necessary insurance forms and electronic claims to process the claims in a timely manner as required by all third party payors. Researches and resolves any electronic claim denials. Researches and resolves any claim denials or underpayment of claims. Effectively utilizes various means for collections, including but not limited to phone, fax, mail, and online methods. Provides exceptional customer service to internal and external customers; resolves any customer requests in a timely and accurate manner; escalates complaints accordingly. Maintains frequent phone contact with provider representatives, third party customer service representatives, pharmacy staff, and case managers. Reports any reimbursement trends/delays to supervisor (e.g. billing denials, claim denials, pricing errors, payments, etc.). Processes any necessary insurance/patient correspondence. Provides all necessary documentation required to expedite payments. This includes demographic, authorization/referrals, National Provider Identification (NPI) number, and referring physicians. Coordinates with inter-departmental associates to obtain appropriate medical records as they relate to the reimbursement process. Maintains confidentiality in regards to patient account status and the financial affairs of clinic/corporation. Communicates effectively to payors and/or claims clearinghouse to ensure accurate and timely electronically filed claims. Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined standard operating procedures to determine appropriate action. Typically receives little instruction on day-to-day work, general instructions on new assignments. Performs related duties as assigned. Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing. Ability to build productive internal/external working relationships. Strong interpersonal skills. Strong negotiating skills. Strong mathematical skills. Strong organizational skills; attention to detail. General knowledge of accounting principles, pharmacy operations, and medical claims. General knowledge of HCPCS, CPT, ICD-9 and ICD-10 coding preferred. Global understanding of commercial and government payers preferred. Ability to proficiently use Microsoft Excel, Outlook and Word. Is developing professional expertise; applies company policies and procedures to resolve a variety of issues.Insurance Verification ; Medical Billing ; Prior Authorization ; Insurance Verification ; Medical Billing ; Prior Authorization ; Insurance Verification ; Medical Billing ; Prior Authorization ; Insurance Verification ; Medical Billing ; Prior Authorization",Reimbursement Counselor Job in Fort Mill,Full Time Employee,"Fort Mill, SC 29715",,http://jobview.monster.com/Reimbursement-Counselor-Job-Fort-Mill-SC-US-164688678.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=18,14.00 - 14.50 $ /hour,Medical/Health,53434d55aa65be7c473263522e570eb5
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:00:55:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-Time Night shift needed from 10pm to 6amBrookdale West Seattle 4611 35th Ave SW Seattle, WA 98126 Job #: 049597aBrookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities: * Provide residents with medication administration and treatment assistance and services according to the health care provider's orders * Supervise residents who self-administer medication while following company and regulatory guidelines * Report any changes in residents' physical condition and/or behaviors * Maintain resident records regarding medication distribution, leisure activities, incidents and observations Required skills and qualifications: * High school diploma or GED * Successful completion of state certified medication aide/tech course * One year of related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience * Previous experience working directly with older adults preferred * Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed * Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Certified Medication Aide (CMA) or Certified Medication Technician (CMT) Job in Seattle,Full Time Employee,"Seattle, WA 98126",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Certified-Medication-Aide-CMA-or-Certified-Medication-Technician-CMT-Job-Seattle-WA-US-165270983.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,a1de2e9fedf2f34758c28107fa528a32
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:00:55:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"The RN and LPN provides nursing interventions and management of acute and residential patients (ages 4-17) as prescribed by the physician.  The RN serves as Licensed Independent Practitioner during restraint, seclusion, and behavioral crisis intervention. Both provide supervision and guidance of direct care workers as charge nurse, assures milieu management and quality delivery of treatment to assigned patients.  Provides patient specific treatment, adheres to patient safety standards, assures patient rights, prevents and identifies abuse, and oversees quality of behavioral interventions. Administers medication and medical treatment in accordance with policies and physician’s orders. Provides psychiatric nursing interventions and treatment education, provides intervention appropriate to the specific treatment needs of the patient. Coordinates admissions, transfers, and discharges, and assures that relevant nursing documentation is completed in a timely manner. Provides timely, accurate, and thorough documentation of patient behavior, medication administration, medical interventions, treatment planning, and treatment interventions. Documentation reflects professional standards. Performs other duties as assigned. Job Requirements:Skills, Knowledge, & Abilities: • Knowledge of psychiatric nursing skills, ability to assess patient physical and emotional status. Knowledge of seclusion and restraint protocols,  national patient safety standards, age specific competencies, pain management, and standards established by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing. • Accurately conveys patient behavior and status verbally and in writing. Professional verbal and written skills for communicating patient status, and   treatment needs to clients, families, professionals, and employees of the facility. Able to verbally adapt spoken communication to meet needs of   patient.• Proficiency in facilitating medication education groups, and training ADL skills. Able to safely de-escalate and manage aggressive patients, to   oversee seclusion and physical restraint of patients per policy. Able to handle multiple projects under deadlines with short notice. • Maintains professional therapeutic relationships with staff, patients, families and visitors. Able to maintain patient confidentiality. • Able to provide leadership and supervision of direct care staff, to delegate responsibilities, make shift assignments, and monitor performance. Education/Training: Graduate of an accredited school for Registered Nurse program. Licensure/Certification: • Current Oklahoma Registered Nurse licensure. • Current Oklahoma Driver’s License (requirement for staff on Driver’s List) Experience: Prefer two years work experience in a psychiatric treatment setting with children and/or adolescents. Physical/General: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions: • Must be at least 21 years of age. • Physical strength necessary to implement patient behavioral crisis intervention. • Sitting, standing, walking, reaching, bending, stooping as required to assist in patient care. Able to sustain physical activity eight hours a day and remain on feet eight hours per day. • Hearing, vision, sensory, and emotional stability sufficient to perform essential job functions. • Able to deal with stressful situations and changing priorities. • Able to lift, carry, and lower up to 35 pounds using appropriate body mechanics. • Able to push patients in wheel chairs up and down hills and pursue running patients. • Access to reliable transportation; maintains reliable attendance record and arrives in a timely manner. Conditions of Employment: Satisfactory reference and background investigation checks. Criminal charges or convictions that occur while employed with SMBHS must be reported within 24 hours to Human Resources. Completion of a pre-employment drug screening and completion of post-employment drug or alcohol tests upon reasonable suspicion of use. Completion of ALL required paperwork prior to reporting for work. Completion of pre-employment physical, proof of Rubella inoculation, TB screening upon hire and annually thereafter, complete or waive HBV series. Successful completion of initial orientation and competency assessment. Maintains current CPR/First Aid certification; and behavioral crisis management certification every year. Attendance at all mandatory nursing meetings; completes annual CEUs, and training on time. Work Environment: Exposes employee to contagious or infectious diseases and to potentially hostile patients and situations. Job stress ranges from low to intense. Category I - Tasks. Non-smoking work environment. Drug free workplace. Customers Served: Patients (children ages 4-12, teenagers ages 13-17); families; direct-care service providers; external funding sources; service, accreditation, and licensing agencies; external case managers; school districts; other staff; and the community. Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=134228&site_id=35",RN/LPN (PRN) - Eagle Creek (Kansas,"Per Diem, Employee","Kansas, OK 74347",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-LPN-PRN-Eagle-Creek-Kansas-OK-Job-KANSAS-OK-US-165204364.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,43b2573b9919b72b8fa028faf35cc51b
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:01:15:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full Time3619 S Mebane St, Burlington, NC 27215Job # RNHHdurNC044865d$2500 SIGN ON BONUS!This position will provide Home Health services in the Burlington, NC area to the residents in our retirement communities as well as general community.A career with Brookdale has never been more rewarding!   Brookdale is the only national full-spectrum senior living solutions company and committed to providing the best options for our over 110,000 residents we serve. The services that we offer ensure residents continue to live the lives that they want while also meeting all of their needs along the way. Every day our associates collaborate to guarantee this promise is fulfilled in more than 1,150 communities in 47 states. Our Senior Living Solutions include: Independent Living, Assisted Living, Memory Care, Skilled Nursing, Continuing Care Retirement, Therapy, Hospice, Home Health, and Personalized Living.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a Home Health Registered Nurse to provide services in the Burlington area. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on health, wellness and prevention for all our patients.Your responsibilities:* Evaluates the patient and home health environment to determine required services* Serves as the patient's advocate by providing information* Responsible for timely completion and synchronization of OASIS visits as required and developing the POC based on findings from evaluation visit* Involves patient and patient's family in developing the plan of careRequired skills and qualifications:* Graduate of an accredited school of professional nursing* 2 years experience in Medicare home health* Licensed as a RN in the state of practice* Travel is required; must have a reliable car with current insurance coverage and a current driver's licenseIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Registered Nurse RN - Home Health Job in Burlington,Full Time Employee,"Burlington, NC 27215",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Home-Health-Job-Burlington-NC-US-165221059.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,b8fb733f015881d51f50704d798fd7fc
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:01:42:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary The purpose of this position is to join and contribute to a service conscious Pharmacy team who will consistently build relationships with patients by exceeding their needs and providing safe, accurate and efficient care to achieve optimal patient, Team Member and Company outcomes. Job Responsibilities Immediately acknowledge and welcome patients with compassion and a smile at all pharmacy entry points. Model excellent patient care by respecting, engaging and enthusiatically meeting or exceeding all patient needs including processing orders in person and by phone, directing patients to products and merchandise and referring appropriate questions concerning prescriptions and over the counter medicine to the pharmacist. Adhere to all company, state and federal policies, laws and regulations including HIPAA and Pseudoephedrine sales. Finalize sales using cash register according to established procedures including the Point of Sale Policies. Maintain a neat and clean work environment to ensure company and government requirements are met. Assist with maintaining proper inventory levels by ordering, receiving, stocking and rotating drugs and other supplies per company policy and procedures. Answer telephone in a polite and timely manner and ensure accurate information is exchanged and customer is satisfied. Resolve customer questions and concerns by communicating effectively with the customer and the management team/support staff in an efficient manner. File written prescriptions daily. Assist team members with tasks to ensure department runs efficiently. Use the pharmacy computer to complete all actions necessary to maximize efficiency and provide optimal patient care at drop-off, will call, drive thru, phone, filling and order receiving, including but not limited to: search for patients and profiles, determine dates of fill and pick-up, determine prescriptions sent to Central Fill, quote cash prices of prescriptions, check on-hand counts of medications,enter invoices. Have knowledge of all appropriate service and business metrics and assist team on action plans to improve outcomes. Assist in the execution of all company initiatives and programs. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift Any Hours Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Normal office environment Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Pulling Sorting Standing Filing Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Telephone Usage Typing Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Data Entry Pushing Twisting Weighing Equipment Used Intercom System Cash Register Deposit Safe Drive Thru Fill Station Ordering Machine Safety Cutter Scale WalkieTalkie",Pharmacy Tech ( Part time ) Heath Giant Eagle Job in Newark,Full Time Employee,"Newark, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Pharmacy-Tech-Part-time-Heath-Giant-Eagle-Job-Newark-OH-US-165178577.aspx?mescoid=2900524001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,0ede8a97e7b81016b78de9b59a33b5e6
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:01:52:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"MUST HAVE A MASTER'S DEGREE PER STATE REQUIREMENTS. ***$500 Sign-on Bonus after 90-day probationary period***Seeking a master's level professional with Medicaid Waiver experience and experience working with adults and children with developmental/learning disabilities to join our growing practice in the Indianapolis/Greenwood area. The job is currently part-time (25-29) hours per week, hourly, and either in the home or clinic setting in the Southern Indianapolis area. Potential to become a full-time, salaried, position after the first 90 days. Benefits to those who qualify.Qualifications:Must have a master's degree in Clinical Psychology, Counseling Psychology, School Psychology, Social Work, Counseling, Special Education, or Marriage and Family Therapy with the right amount of experience.A BCBA, RBT, LCSW, and/or LMHC highly preferred.Experience working with the Medicaid Waiver.Experience in behavior analysis.Must be willing to drive to and throughout the county on a daily basis if necessary.Must be willing to participate in agency and other events to promote our behavior department's services and supports (showcases, provider fairs, resource fairs, the county fairs, etc).Must be well organized and have good time management skills.Must be willing and able to work independently.Must have good written and oral communication skills.Must be able to type up professional reports that are a part of a consumer's permanent file.Must be able to work with children and/or adults.Must get 10 CEUs per year.Must adhere to all our other hiring policies; back ground checks, CPI, CPR, etc.Must be willing to work evenings and weekends.Job Description:• Executing a functional behavior assessment on a consumer's maladaptive behaviors and conduct observation.• Analyzing the data and creating an intervention plan based off of your assessments.• Meeting with consumers (some are once a week, some are twice a week, some are daily, and some are bi-weekly) to implement your interventions.• Services are held in a variety of environments; homes, schools, day programs, community, our office, clinic, etc.• Support staff and caregivers in implementing your interventions.• Analyze data and adjust plan as necessary.• Write quarterly status reports for the team.• Attend quarterly team meetings.• Provide hands-on support.• Provide crisis intervention as needed.Benefits:1.Life Insurance2. Short Term Disability Insurance3. Indemnity Health Plan4. Mileage Reimbursement5. Yearly stipend for CEUs6. Yearly stipend for supplies7. Paid holidays8. Vacation time9. Employee paid dental, vision, and more life insurance coverage available as well.Apply Today!",Therapist- Behavior Clinician-Master's Level Job in Indianapolis,Part Time,"Indianapolis, IN 46204",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Therapist-Behavior-Clinician-Master's-Level-Job-Indianapolis-IN-US-165211331.aspx?mescoid=2900496001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ee98ba65383c994d2124dc3ea7c08710
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:02:02:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking to advance your nursing career at a Skilled Nursing Facility?  If so, your job search stops here at North Auburn Rehabilitation & Health center.  We provide a center that makes a difference in the lives of our residents, embraces the skills of our staff and allows for growth in their careers.  Outside of providing the support and resources needed to do a job well, we additionally offer ongoing training and continuing education assistance to our nurses. Through doing all of this we have seen staff longevity and success in meeting our center goals. So if you thrive on providing leadership and guidance and want to grow your skill set, APPLY TODAY AT NORTH AUBURN http://northauburnskillednursing.com/ In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:·         -Career Advancement opportunities·       -  Employee Recognition and Center Based Incentives·         -Educational Assistance up to $2,500/yr·         -Competitive Wages·         -Comprehensive Benefit Package, including:o   FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for any FT Nurse hiredo   Medical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/montho   401(k) Retirement Programo   Paid Time Off Program At our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.  ·         With an environment focused on quality care, your input is important. Helping to achieve excellence, individuals with high standards and accountability for individual and team performance are embraced.At our center, you will be able to grow your career·         We regularly promote from within. Our employees are made aware of opportunities within our health centers to help further their development and experience.At our center, we provide support and resources ·         We have many resources available to those working throughout our center, offering you the right tools to do your job well.At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills·         We invest in you! Training and continuing education are encouraged to promote skill development.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans·         We offer a competitive compensation and industry leading benefits package.  POSITION SUMMARY: Under the supervision of the Unit Manager / DON, a RN assumes responsibility and accountability for a group of residents/patients for a shift of duty.  Nursing care is provided through assessment, implementations, and evaluation of the plan of care.  The RN adheres to the standards of care for the area, manages the environment to maintain resident/patient safety, and supervises the resident/patient care activity performance by nursing assistants and helpers.  Follows all Center’s policies and procedures.  Performs duties as defined by the State Nurse Practice Act.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: Oversees assigned nursing staff   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.    Makes frequent rounds to note resident/patient conditions and to ensure nursing personnel are performing their work assignments in accordance with acceptable nursing standards.2.    Gives/receives the nursing report upon reporting in and ending shift duty hours.3.    *Ensures assigned work area (i.e. nurse station, med. Cart, medication room, etc.), resident/patient care rooms and treatment areas are maintained in a clean and sanitary manner.  Monitors supplies and orders as needed.4.    *Attends regularly conducted staff meetings as scheduled by the Director of Nursing/Unit Manager and participates regularly in continuing education in-service programs.5.    *Handles on-call responsibilities as required.6.    Provides the following nursing functions:·         *Responsible for resident/patient care during his/her respective shift.·         *Provides required patient assessments and interventions.·         Reviews care plans, at least daily, to ensure appropriate care.·         Appraises the DON / Unit Manager of resident /patient status changes in condition.·         *Takes and records blood pressure and vital signs.·         *Administers catheter care as required (may include catheter insertion).·         *Provides respiratory care, e.g. oxygen, nebulizer treatments.·         *Assists the physician in therapeutic measures, as needed.·         Participates in care plan development and attends resident/patient care conferences.·         Helps determine policies for improvement of care.·         Receives and transcribes physician’s orders to resident’s/patient’s charts, Kardex/Care Plan A, Medication Administration Record (“MAR”), treatment/care plans, as required.·         *Prepares and administers medications and performs treatments as ordered by the physician.·         Charts nurses notes in an informative and descriptive manner that reflects the care provided as well as the resident’s/patient’s response to the care.·         Documents all pertinent data as required by Medicare, Medicaid, Center standards and policies.·         Completes the required forms upon admission, transfer, and/or discharge.·         Informs physician of resident/patient change of condition.7.    *Counts all controlled drugs with other nurse at shift change and notifies the DON / Unit Manager of all drug and narcotic discrepancies noted on your shift.8.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart locked according to regulations.  Responsible for security of keys. 9.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart clean and orderly.10.  Conducts weekly shift meetings with nursing assistants.11.  Participates in the Interdisciplinary Plan of Care (“IPOC”) process as assigned.12.  *Complies with laws and regulations applicable to position and acts in accordance with Center’s Corporate Compliance Program.13.  Treats all residents, visitors, and staff with courtesy.14.  *Attends and participates in in-service classes, performance improvement (“PI”) committees, and other meetings as assigned.15.  Follow facility dress and hygiene policies.16.  Safety·         Knows and follows facility rules.·         Demonstrates proper use of equipment.  Reports equipment needs or repairs.·         Follows facility smoking policies.·         Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents, staff or visitors to the appropriate facility personnel.·         Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment to Supervisor.·         *Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents, as assigned in Facility Disaster Plan.·         Uses required protective equipment.·         Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.17.  Resident Rights·         Knows Resident Rights.  Help the residents/patients exercise and/or protect their rights.·         Reports resident/patient complaints to management.·         Maintains confidentiality of resident/patient information.18.  HIPAA·         Follows and adheres to Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.·         Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks (applies only if position requires access to PHI under Role Based Access Grid).·         Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Facility Privacy Designee. Other Duties: •             Participates in all-hands dining.•             *Performs other duties as directed by facility management.•             Participates in marketing events.•             Works overtime, holiday and weekend hours as scheduled. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Possesses a current license to practice in the State as an RN. Experience: One year of experience preferred. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Ability to manage and supervise nursing staff. Ability to make independent decisions. Ability to read, write, speak and understand English. Meets all health requirements, as required by law. Ability to relate positively, effectively, and appropriately with residents, families, community members, volunteers and other facility staff.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word, MS Access, MS Excel, E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer.  ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, pushing, pulling and twisting.  The tasks on this position description marked with an asterisk (*) are those that regularly require these physical activities.  All employees of nursing homes may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents.  Lifting and/or transferring some residents will require use of a lifting device and /or assistance of other staff.",RN North Auburn Rehab Job in Auburn,Full Time,"Auburn, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-North-Auburn-Rehab-Job-Auburn-WA-US-165296797.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=4,,,66c33d631db88af1b8c943065dad9b24
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:02:03:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years. Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care. Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures. Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department. * Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. * Current Texas State RN license. * CPR (American Heart Association) * ACLS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. * PALS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. * One-year experience in surgical services nursing preferredEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse - Recovery Room Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX 78414",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Recovery-Room-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-165278088.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,a9df1cd8aa00b3f3a6a4d8cb1a863470
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:02:05:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that the care we give can make every moment count.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s how our Hospice improves quality of life in the final stages of life. By delivering palliative care by hospice professionals, our patients can spend their remaining days in comfort and peace.   Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. We believe that every moment matters. We believe in compassionate care. Most of all, we believe in dignity and respect for each patient we serve. I believe my work is my calling.As a Hospice LPN, you will:Provide skilled professional nursing care to patient/family/caregiver as directed by the supervising Case Manager or the Patient Care Manager and in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations and with Company’s policies and procedures.Provide timely documentation of patient services based on plan of care.Identify other physical, psychological, social and spiritual needs for assigned patients. Work closely with other members of the interdisciplinary team to ensure all patient and family care needs are being met. Implement nursing plan of care as directed by the interdisciplinary team and Patient Care Manager.Provide professional nursing care by utilizing all elements of nursing process as directed by the plan of care.Responsible for checking and ordering medications.Assess and provide patient/family/caregiver education and information pertinent to diagnosis and self-plan of care.Participate in coordination of Hospice services, appropriately communicating and reporting the need for Hospice interdisciplinary team members (e.g., HCA, OT, PT, MSW, ST, Dietitian) to the Case Manager or Patient Care Manager.Order and use equipment and supplies effectively and efficiently.Provide appropriate pain/symptom management.  Evaluate patient’s response to treatments/medications. Required SkillsQualifications:LPN or LVN licensed in the state where program is located  Graduate of accredited practical nurse or vocational nursing programMinimum of one-year general nursing experienceCommunity health/Hospice or medical/surgical experienceUnderstanding of Hospice philosophy and needs of terminally illSelf-directed with ability to work with little supervisionDemonstrate excellent observation, good nursing judgment and communication skillsAbility to provide good written documentation in a timely mannerRequired ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, cardio nurse, cardio LPN, cardio LVN, cardiac nurse, cardiac LPN, cardiac LVN, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, home health nurse, homecare nurse, home care nurse, home health LPN, home health LVN, homecare LPN, homecare LVN, home care LPN, home care LVN, hospice nurse, hospice LPN, hospice LVN, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, LPN, LVN, L.P.N., L.V.N., license practical nurse, licensed practical nurse, license vocational nurse, licensed vocational nurse, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology LPN, oncology LVN, oncology nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho LPN, ortho LVN, palliative care LPN, palliative care LVN, LPN Job, LVN Job, LPN jobs, LVN jobs, Nursing, nursing job, nursing jobs, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab LPN, rehab LVN, rehab nurse, skilled visit, staff LPN, staff LVN, staff nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit LPN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry LPN, telemetry LVN, travel nurse, travel LPN, travel LVN, visit nurse, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. Job LocationSan Jose, California, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Hospice LPN Job in San Jose,,"San Jose, CA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Hospice-LPN-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-165304252.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=11,,,29a680bad0e06f2dc76eff1238eb7e29
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:03:08:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"What makes us different? Our People, Our Pride, Our Passion.  If you are wanting to make a difference in the lives of residents and grow your nursing career, LaCrosse Health & Rehabilitation center in Coeur d'Alene is for YOU!  Look no further and apply today at our 99 bed center.  Our nurse leadership team instills a fun, welcoming environment which has allowed for longevity and success amongst our nursing team. Visit our website to learn more about these great opportunities and have the potential to be working at our Award winning center soon http://lacrosseskillednursing.com/ In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:·         -Career Advancement opportunities·       -  Employee Recognition and Center Based Incentives·         -Educational Assistance up to $2,500/yr·         -Competitive Wages·         -Comprehensive Benefit Package, including:o   FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for any FT Nurse hiredo   Medical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/montho   401(k) Retirement Programo   Paid Time Off Program At our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.  ·         With an environment focused on quality care, your input is important. Helping to achieve excellence, individuals with high standards and accountability for individual and team performance are embraced.At our center, you will be able to grow your career·         We regularly promote from within. Our employees are made aware of opportunities within our health centers to help further their development and experience.At our center, we provide support and resources ·         We have many resources available to those working throughout our center, offering you the right tools to do your job well.At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills·         We invest in you! Training and continuing education are encouraged to promote skill development.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans·         We offer a competitive compensation and industry leading benefits package.  POSITION SUMMARY: Under the supervision of the Unit Manager / DON, a RN assumes responsibility and accountability for a group of residents/patients for a shift of duty.  Nursing care is provided through assessment, implementations, and evaluation of the plan of care.  The RN adheres to the standards of care for the area, manages the environment to maintain resident/patient safety, and supervises the resident/patient care activity performance by nursing assistants and helpers.  Follows all Center’s policies and procedures.  Performs duties as defined by the State Nurse Practice Act.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: Oversees assigned nursing staff   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.    Makes frequent rounds to note resident/patient conditions and to ensure nursing personnel are performing their work assignments in accordance with acceptable nursing standards.2.    Gives/receives the nursing report upon reporting in and ending shift duty hours.3.    *Ensures assigned work area (i.e. nurse station, med. Cart, medication room, etc.), resident/patient care rooms and treatment areas are maintained in a clean and sanitary manner.  Monitors supplies and orders as needed.4.    *Attends regularly conducted staff meetings as scheduled by the Director of Nursing/Unit Manager and participates regularly in continuing education in-service programs.5.    *Handles on-call responsibilities as required.6.    Provides the following nursing functions:·         *Responsible for resident/patient care during his/her respective shift.·         *Provides required patient assessments and interventions.·         Reviews care plans, at least daily, to ensure appropriate care.·         Appraises the DON / Unit Manager of resident /patient status changes in condition.·         *Takes and records blood pressure and vital signs.·         *Administers catheter care as required (may include catheter insertion).·         *Provides respiratory care, e.g. oxygen, nebulizer treatments.·         *Assists the physician in therapeutic measures, as needed.·         Participates in care plan development and attends resident/patient care conferences.·         Helps determine policies for improvement of care.·         Receives and transcribes physician’s orders to resident’s/patient’s charts, Kardex/Care Plan A, Medication Administration Record (“MAR”), treatment/care plans, as required.·         *Prepares and administers medications and performs treatments as ordered by the physician.·         Charts nurses notes in an informative and descriptive manner that reflects the care provided as well as the resident’s/patient’s response to the care.·         Documents all pertinent data as required by Medicare, Medicaid, Center standards and policies.·         Completes the required forms upon admission, transfer, and/or discharge.·         Informs physician of resident/patient change of condition.7.    *Counts all controlled drugs with other nurse at shift change and notifies the DON / Unit Manager of all drug and narcotic discrepancies noted on your shift.8.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart locked according to regulations.  Responsible for security of keys. 9.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart clean and orderly.10.  Conducts weekly shift meetings with nursing assistants.11.  Participates in the Interdisciplinary Plan of Care (“IPOC”) process as assigned.12.  *Complies with laws and regulations applicable to position and acts in accordance with Center’s Corporate Compliance Program.13.  Treats all residents, visitors, and staff with courtesy.14.  *Attends and participates in in-service classes, performance improvement (“PI”) committees, and other meetings as assigned.15.  Follow facility dress and hygiene policies.16.  Safety·         Knows and follows facility rules.·         Demonstrates proper use of equipment.  Reports equipment needs or repairs.·         Follows facility smoking policies.·         Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents, staff or visitors to the appropriate facility personnel.·         Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment to Supervisor.·         *Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents, as assigned in Facility Disaster Plan.·         Uses required protective equipment.·         Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.17.  Resident Rights·         Knows Resident Rights.  Help the residents/patients exercise and/or protect their rights.·         Reports resident/patient complaints to management.·         Maintains confidentiality of resident/patient information.18.  HIPAA·         Follows and adheres to Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.·         Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks (applies only if position requires access to PHI under Role Based Access Grid).·         Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Facility Privacy Designee. Other Duties: •             Participates in all-hands dining.•             *Performs other duties as directed by facility management.•             Participates in marketing events.•             Works overtime, holiday and weekend hours as scheduled. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Possesses a current license to practice in the State as an RN. Experience: One year of experience preferred. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Ability to manage and supervise nursing staff. Ability to make independent decisions. Ability to read, write, speak and understand English. Meets all health requirements, as required by law. Ability to relate positively, effectively, and appropriately with residents, families, community members, volunteers and other facility staff.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word, MS Access, MS Excel, E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer.  ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, pushing, pulling and twisting.  The tasks on this position description marked with an asterisk (*) are those that regularly require these physical activities.  All employees of nursing homes may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents.  Lifting and/or transferring some residents will require use of a lifting device and /or assistance of other staff.",RN $,Full Time,"Coeur D'alene, ID",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-10-000-SIGN-ON-Lacrosse-Health-Rehab-Job-Coeur-d'Alene-ID-US-165295368.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,,f05b5a792ad72701c8b6e4c8b600294f
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:03:08:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Old Vineyard Behavioral Health Services is the Piedmont Triad's only private psychiatric hospital meeting the behavioral healthcare needs of our community.  Our 102-bed inpatient services for adults and adolescents offers comprehensive and indivdual assessments, psychiatric evaluation and medication stabilization, daily group therapy and personalized aftercare planning.  Old Vineyard is accredited by The Joint Commission and certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. Old Vineyard offers a competitive salary as well as a generous company benefit program including medical, dental, vision, life, supplemental life, short-term and long-term disability, healthcare and dependent care flexible spending programs, 401(k) with company match and stock purchase program. We are currently seeking a Registered Nurse to join our talented and caring staff.  The Registered Nurse must possess a current/active NC nursing license.  The ideal candidate will also have had previous experience rendering patient care in a behavioral health setting. Renders professional nursing care to patients within the treatment programs. The RN practices ongoing patient assessment, evaluation, and update of patient care through observation of physical and behavioral symptoms. Communicates pertinent data to other service areas as needed. Administers medications appropriately and documents all data accurately according to facility policy. Participates in formulation of individual care plans for all patients and implements plan according to facility policy. Specific job related tasks include:- Manages medication of patients by ensuring physician orders are implemented, evaluated and documented and by assuring proper administration of medication to each patient.- Monitors patients for any adverse reaction and efficiency of medication regimen through contact with patient, observation or patient and staff reports. - Observes and reports the patient's signs, symptoms and behaviors and any subsequent treatment and/or interventions and records same in the medical record according to facility policy. - Participates in patient treatment team meetings and contributes pertinent observations and knowledge of updating and changes of the treatment plan. - Provides individual instruction to patients and their families concerning medications, health, and medical needs. - Participates in and/or supervises and documents special treatment procedures, progressive interventions and de-escalation of patients to facility policy. - Demonstrates basic knowledge and practice of cultural sensitivity, age specific competencies as well as emotional/mental health and disease concepts.- Consistently meets facility and regulatory training requirements by attending all mandatory staff meetings and training sessions as required. - Assures cleanliness and orderliness of the assigned area and proactively assists in all security, maintenance, and safety functions as required for the overall facility to help maintain the physical environment to assure the safety of patients and staff. - Ensures compliance with all company policies, procedures, and other regulatory requirements by reporting any known or suspected violations to the supervisor or through other means identified in company policy. Maintains confidentiality of all patient records per program guidelines. - Provides timely, accurate, and professional documentation according to facility policy. - Documents weekly patient contact report including any changes in health or mental status and effectiveness of treatment interventions.  Job Requirements:Education: Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. Training and Experience: At least 1 year experience in the nursing field. Experience in behavioral health field preferred, but not required. New graduates considered with approval from the Director of Nursing. Certifications, Licenses, Registrations: Must demonstrate current licensure with the North Carolina Board of Nursing (or compact state).Knowledge Required: Demonstrate accurate physical, mental, emotional and spiritual assessment skills and ability to clearly communicate findings both verbally and in writing. Demonstrate theoretical and practical knowledge of Standards of Nursing Practice and Care in all aspects of care provided. Demonstrate knowledge and support of the psychotherapeutic based treatment model and ability to utilize knowledge in patient care and therapeutic milieu. Physical Demands:  Work is physically and mentally demanding.  Must be able to lift, push and pull 50+ pounds.  Must be able to participate in physical restraints.  Must be able to remain calm and professional in crisis situations.Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=185934&site_id=35",Registered Nurse,"Full Time, Employee","Winston-Salem, NC 27104",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-FT-3rd-Shift-Job-WINSTON-SALEM-NC-US-165232565.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,5b511a1d7b4c2ee8d7caa582ac251016
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:03:09:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Medical Technician / Driver - Tomah, WI Total Home Health is currently seeking a Medical Equipment Technician for our Tomah, WI location. Candidates must be comfortable working in a fast paced customer focused environment. The Medical Equipment Technician provides for the selection, delivery, set-up, demonstration, and continued maintenance of designated items such as respiratory care, home medical equip. and related supplies. Duties also include providing patient-customer training in the safe proper use of all delivered equipment and supplies. Responsibilities include: Deliver, set up, demonstrate and train patients and their family members on how to use the medical equipment Troubleshoot equipment problems and repair or replace equipment Monitor truck inventory levels and request replacement stock Process equip. returns for rental Cover on-call and after hour business needs Requirements: Thorough knowledge of homecare equipment Clean driving record Ability to lift/move heavy equip. up to 175 lbs. with accommodations Ability to pass DOT physical exam Able to pass a Drug screen and Alcohol test Able to meet the requirements of a criminal background check Excellent organizational skills, documentation skills and attention to detail Strong people/interpersonal skills Enthusiastic, high motivated, team player and growth orientated personality Bilingual is a big plus (English & Spanish) We offer our associates an excellent benefits package including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, 401K, paid time off and paid holidays. Send resume and salary requirements to: lvruwink@totalhomehealth.com for confidential consideration. No phone calls or agencies, please. EOE.",Medical Technician / Driver Job in Tomah,Full Time,"Tomah, WI 54660",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Medical-Technician-Driver-Job-Tomah-WI-US-165287454.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=15,,,2ccc4b3b7f58fa37c1f7b59a23dc9174
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:03:09:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB FAIRWho: RNs, LPNs, CNAs & Dining ServicesWhen: Tuesday, April 19, 2016Time: 7:00am - 11:30amPlace: 1445 Sycamore Road Montoursville, PA 17754PT LPN Day/Evening/Night ShiftPT Dining Service Aides Day/Evening Shift $2,250Sign on Bonus for FT RNs 3-11/11-7 Combination Shift$1,125Sign on Bonus for PT RNs Evening/Night Shift$750Sign on Bonus for PT CNA Day/Evening/Night Shift.A chance to win a $50 VISA gift card, gift bags for all,refreshments and breakfast items will be availableOn the spot interviews If unable to attend please forward resumes to CSmith@platinumhrm.comSubject: Loyalsock/Job FairClick Image to View Adprovided by The Williamsport Sun-Gazette",RN's,Full Time,"Montoursville, PA 17754",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/RN's-LPNs-CNA's-Job-Montoursville-PA-US-165326259.aspx?ch=centralpa&mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),103db1f7e253374c27a5886c6d90a524
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:03:09:36,No,jobs.monster.com," Primary functions are to coordinate patient care with the interdisciplinary team including physician, patient/family and referring agency; and administer skilled nursing care for clients of all ages in their place of residence.  Qualifications:Graduate of an accredited diploma, Associate or Baccalaureate School of Nursing.Current state license as a Registered Nurse, Current state Driver’s License.One year experience as a registered nurse, two preferred.Proof of current CPR and Hepatitis consent/declination.Reliable transportation with valid and current auto liability insurance. Functions:Case manages and provides clinical directions to the interdisciplinary team, physician, and family.Implement/develop/document the plan of care.Provide care utilizing infection control measures that protect both the staff and the patient (OSHA).Assess home health patients to identify the physical, psycho social and environmental needs as evidenced by documentation, clinical record, case conference, team report and evaluations.Assure continuity of quality patience care delivered with appropriate documentation.Monitor assigned cases to ensure compliance with requirements of third party payer.Promote Agency philosophy and administrative policies.Perform on-call responsibilities and provide on-call service to patients/families as assigned.Supervise and provide direction to the home health aide and LVN/LPN.Demonstrate commitment, professional growth, and competency. We Offer:Low Nurse/Patient ratio!Excellent pay structure!Full benefits including Health and Dental, Life Insurance and 401K!Extensive training and paid time off! ",Registered Nurse (RN) Job in Lawton,Full Time,"Lawton, OK 73505",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Job-Lawton-OK-US-165177588.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),81f5fedd56d704c4979d16f144b48eba
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:03:10:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Respiratory Therapist needed for a local, independent company offering solutions in home medical equipment, respiratory services, and home accessibility lifestyle products.  Applicants must be flexible, organized, and self-motivated.  Background in home medical equipment preferred but not necessary.  Position offers benefits and salary commensurate with experience.  HLS is an Equal Opportunity Employer.  Please send resume by mail to 1355 Bloomfield Road, Suite C, Bloomington, IN 47403-2052 or email to kgray@hlshealth.com.  Duties include the following:-CPAP and Bi-Level -Non-Invasive Ventilation and Full Ventilation-Oxygen Home TitrationsAbout The Company:HLS Health + Wellness is your total health resource for individuals living in Southern Indiana, Southeastern Illinois, and Northwestern Kentucky.  We are proud to offer quality home medical equipment, respiratory services, home accessibility solutions, and wellness products delivered by a team of caring, knowledgeable individuals who are dedicated to providing solutions to keep you ""living well.""  Our product lines include respiratory services ranging from oxygen therapy and nebulizers to sleep apnea products and even home ventilation.  We also have a full line of home medical products including bathroom safety equipment, mobility solutions such as walkers, wheelchairs, and power scooters, hospital bed and comfort items, post-mastectomy women's wear, as well as hundreds of aids to daily living.Home accessibility also comprises a large part of our business, as individuals choose to make minor modifications to their home to enjoy ""living well"" by aging in place.  Some of our most popular products include ramp systems, stair lifts, as well as barrier free showers and bathtubs.Visit us on our website at www.hlshealth.com.",Respiratory Therapist Job in Bloomington,Full Time,"Bloomington, IN 47403",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Respiratory-Therapist-Job-Bloomington-IN-US-164213558.aspx?mescoid=2900493001001&jobPosition=8,,,42973fcb7afdfacdd1ce11c8af1eea44
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:03:17:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Environmental Safety Manager We are currently looking to fill a position within our University Risk Management Department. This position will be responsible for performing and documenting environmental safety studies, inspections and will also be responsible for maintaining compliance records. We are seeking an individual familiar with EPA, S.C. DHEC, OSHA and TJC regulations and requirements. Successful candidates will have a high school diploma and two years experience in environmental health programs or radiologic health. A bachelor’s degree in the natural or physical sciences, mathematics, public health, engineering or a related technical field may be substituted for the required work experience. To submit an application, please visit our website www.jobs.musc.edu, requisition number 051693. MUSC is an equal opportunity employer supporting workplace diversity m/f/vet/disability",Environmental Safety Manager Job in Charleston,Full Time,"Charleston, SC 29425",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Environmental-Safety-Manager-Job-Charleston-SC-US-164766268.aspx?ch=newschar&mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=9,,,ca9417d62e6cfff11598f032b2ade7e7
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:03:43:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients. Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care. Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development. 1. Incorporates the following values into the work environment: a. Dignity: demonstrates respect for the worth of every person, recognition and commitment to the value of diverse individuals and perspectives, and special concern for the poor and underserved. b. Integrity: demonstrates honesty, justice and consistency in all relationships. c. Excellence: demonstrates high standards of service and performance. d. Compassion: demonstrates service in a spirit of empathy, love and concern. e. Stewardship: demonstrates wise and just use of talents and resources in a collaborative manner.As part of the application process for a role at CHRISTUS Santa Rosa - Westover Hills you have been invited to complete an assessment. We believe that you will find this to be a challenging and enjoyable experience. You are expected to complete this assessment on your own without the assistance of anyone else. This assessment should take approximately 15-20 minutes to complete and you are not required to have any special computer skills to do so. Please click on the link below to get started. https://christushealth.selectrakonline.com/recruitment/recruit.aspx As part of the application process for a role at CHRISTUS Santa Rosa - Westover Hills you have been invited to complete an assessment. We believe that you will find this to be a challenging and enjoyable experience. You are expected to complete this assessment on your own without the assistance of anyone else. This assessment should take approximately 15-20 minutes to complete and you are not required to have any special computer skills to do so. Please click on the link below to get started. https://christushealth.selectrakonline.com/recruitment/recruit.aspx 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license. 2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients. 4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal. 1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods. 2. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly. 3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies. 4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications. 5. Required to lift and move patients. 6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists. 7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area. There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.). 8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone. 1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department. 2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served. 3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliancewith all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities. 4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties. 5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate. 6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa. 7. Performs other duties as assigned.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",RN Labor & Delivery Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78251",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Labor-Delivery-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-164165542.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,6de4a1caaff9c71f8af2425ddb0a178f
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:03:59:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Coordinator of Infection Prevention & Control As Infection Preventionist, we aim to protect hospital patients, visitors, clinicians, contractors, and staff from acquiring and spreading infection; we also work to reduce the risk of infectious disease transmission into the community. General Description:Under limited direction, plans and coordinates the hospital-wide infection prevention and control program. Essential Function/Duties:Conduct and design surveillance and epidemiological investigations.Identify infectious disease processes and investigate, communicate and report as appropriate.Assist with the education of staff and patients/families on the prevention and control of transmission of infections.Participate in the formulation and revision of policies and procedures addressing infection control.Collaborate with Employee Health Department to prevent the transmission of infections and to manage exposures.Identify and implement infection prevention and control strategies.Compile and communicate information on the infection prevention and control program.Submit required data to NHSN and/or other regulatory agencies.Ensure compliance with state and local reporting of communicable diseases.Graduate from an approved Board of Nursing as a Registered NurseThree (3) years of experience in infection control prevention or surveillance or performance improvement to decrease hospital acquired infections.Certification in Infection and Control by the Certification Board of Infection Control and EpidemiologyBlueridge Vista Health and Wellness is a behavioral health hospital, serving the adult and senior populations in a contemporary healing environment. Inpatient and outpatient treatment programs have been developed by the highest level clinicians to have a profoundly positive impact on the broad range of unique behavioral needs of our guests. Our focus is on restoring peace of mind and control of behaviors, ultimately leading to more fulfilling, connected lives.PI92996242Apply Here",Coordinator of Infection Prevention & Control (RN) Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH 45213",,http://jobview.monster.com/Coordinator-of-Infection-Prevention-Control-RN-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-164152387.aspx?mescoid=1900253001001&jobPosition=4,,,92292de6f3c1d2b132313526c579f26d
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:04:11:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"A well-established medical practice in Warwick is seeking an individual for a Medical Billing and Coding opportunity. This is a full time position for someone looking for their next Medical Billing and Coding opportunity. You will be responsible for the medical billing and coding process from start to finish.Responsibilities include but are not limited to:Verifying patient's insurance and submitting the claims to insurance companies.Assisting with patient inquiries and following up with insurance companiesMonitoring accounts for discrepancies and reconciling them.Must have knowledge of the overall medical billing and coding process. Must understand remittances, denials, ICD-10 & CPT-4 codesThorough knowledge of write-offs, payer contracts & EOB's. Must have Microsoft Office experience.Requirements:3 to 5 years of Medical Billing and Coding experienceSoftware package knowledge: Eclinicalworks, Intergy or CaretrackerMedical Billing and Coding Certificate is preferredMinimum 3 years medical billing/coding experience in a physician office or third party billing company.Please send resume to apply.",Medical Billing & Coding Job in Warwick,Full Time,"Warwick, RI 02886",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Billing-Coding-Job-Warwick-RI-US-165270235.aspx?mescoid=2900531001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1f48115bc56716a9ccbac3cbff45a9fd
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:04:13:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients. Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care. Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.Job Responsibilities Nursing Process 1. Uses critical thinking skills to assess the basic physical, psychological, social, cultural, spiritual, and developmental needs of patients and families. Communicates findings to appropriate healthcare team members. a. Collects data from all applicable resources; organizes assessment data so that it is complete and accessible; and then documents findings (legibly) in the medical record or other appropriate documents. b. Recognizes alterations in health status, anticipates onset of patient care crisis situation and communicates findings appropriately. c. Assesses, reassesses, and manages pain. 2. Develops and uses a specific plan of care and modifies it to meet individual patient needs using evidence-based practices. Implements patient care and therapeutic procedures. Monitors and documents progression of treatment and teaching goals. a. Identifies and prioritizes the patient's present/potential problems. b. Plans appropriate nursing interventions specific to the patient's problems, incorporating the patient's cultural, age-specific, and developmental needs. c. Competently performs nursing interventions and procedures for the patient population (s) served consistent with scientific principles of nursing and policy and procedure. d. Provides education to patients and family concerning diagnosis, treatment, and hospitalization. e. Reviews and updates plan of care according to patient's needs and/or regulatory agency requirements. f. Documents and involves patient, family, and other healthcare workers in plan of care decisions in accordance with HIPAA requirements. 3. Evaluates the care and treatments provided to the patient and the patient response to the care and treatments. Performs timely re-assessment and documentation: a. Evaluates patient's response to treatment/care and modifies plan of care as needed. b. Evaluates patient and/or significant others ability to perform self care and procedures prior to discharge. c. Records patient's response to prescribed treatment and other significant data.Patient Throughput/ Patient Flow Process 1. Anticipates admission/discharge/transfer needs to facilitate patient flow. a. Identifies potential/actual discharge/transfer needs of patients upon admission and as patients' conditions change. b. Identifies need for and/or follows-up on referrals to ensure identified problems are addressed. c. Incorporates other disciplines into plan of care according to patient's needs. d. Evaluates patients and/or significant other's understanding of discharge instructions based on ability to verbalize and/or give return demonstration. e. Expedites admission/discharges/transfers. f. Participates in a process of communication with the multi-disciplinary team to facilitate the progress of the patient through the continuum of care. Unit Operations 1. Demonstrates good stewardship in proper use and maintenance of equipment and supplies. a. Coordinates the selection of supplies and equipment in a cost effective manner. b. Charges for supplies/procedures appropriately. c. Ensures availability and organization of supplies and equipment for patient care. d. Performs and documents emergency equipment checks as assigned. e. Removes and returns discontinued supplies and equipment. f. Removes broken equipment from area immediately and initiates a work order. g. Ensures and documents that all alarms (patient and equipment) are functional. Safe Practice/ Quality Care/ Regulations 1. Incorporates patient safety practices/guidelines to promote a safe environment resulting in positive patient outcomes. a. Demonstrates accountability for nursing research and quality improvement Activities. b. Demonstrates knowledge and skill in administering medications. 2. Completes medication reconciliation upon admission, transfer, and discharge.3. Reviews physician's orders for clarity and accuracy, legibility & appropriate authenticity (name, title, date, time, etc.).4. Follows the restrictions on abbreviations and does not use abbreviations on the ""Do Not List"". Uses only approved abbreviations.5. Transcribes telephone orders per policy.6. Administers, documents, and evaluates medications according to policy and procedure.7. Instructs patient on medication including: expected effects, side effects, and possible food or medication interactions and documents instructions.8. Recognizes, reports, and documents medication errors and adverse drug reactions. a. Uses patient identifiers as defined by policy. b. Communicate patient information effectively across the continuum of care. 9. Uses an approved hand-off communication format consistently.10. Follows the universal protocol, e.g. time out.11. Uses SBAR to communicate changes in patient condition.12. Follows the Chain of Command.13. Critical values are reported in a timely manner in accordance with policy.14. Sets clinical alarms according to equipment parameters and responds rapidly to the alarms. a. Initiates the Rapid Response team in response to deterioration in patient condition. b. Demonstrates safe patient handling practices. c. Promotes a safe patient care environment including compliance with restraint policy and rounding. d. Implements processes to prevent falls, pressure ulcers, and other hospital-acquired complications. e. Assures compliance with core measure implementation and documentation, e.g. SCIP, CHF, AMI, CAP. f. Identifies, corrects and/or reports patient safety and/or environmental safety hazards at the time of discovery. g. Demonstrates proper infection control and isolation techniques including providing appropriate information concerning isolation precautions and patient status to patient, family, and/or significant others and/or other disciplines. h. Adheres to CHRISTUS policies and procedures and the standards of the Joint Commission, OSHA, DHHS, HIPAA, etc. Leadership 1. Serves as a leader of patient care. a. Guides and supervises other nursing staff in the operational activities in assigned area. b. Promptly recognizes and attempts to reinforce appropriate behavior and attempts to correct inappropriate behavior in self and co-workers. c. Delegates nursing and non-nursing functions according to standards. d. Participates in leadership activities including community activities, e.g. charge/team leader, council participation, preceptor/coach, unit education, staff/council meetings. e. Assumes responsibility for currency of knowledge and skills including participating in unit-level meetings and all mandatory education activities sponsored by the facility. f. Identifies and corrects inconsistencies in nursing procedures/techniques. g. Participates in implementing performance improvement and change activities. h. Assists in teaching and evaluating other personnel as assigned. i. Contributes to the learning experience of students and new employees. j. Acts as a resource person. k. Communicates the intensity of work load and collaborates with nursing leadership to meet patient care needs and unit activity.Qualifications 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.""Working Conditions and Physical Requirements"" 1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods.2. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly.3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies.4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications.5. Required to lift and move patients.6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists.7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area. There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.).8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone. Other 1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department.2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served.3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities.4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties.5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate.6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa.7. Performs other duties as assigned.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78207",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-NICU-Level-III-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-164665683.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,bbc0478742285a3a5debdde57e165e22
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:04:58:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARYResponsible for the evaluation, diagnosis, treatment planning and treatment of persons seeking professional help for emotional disorders. This includes initial assessments, diagnosing, triage/crisis counseling, and individual/family therapy. This clinician will focus on the provision of outpatient mental health and co-occurring services to military personnel and/or their family members. HRMC is an EOE. HRMC conducts Background Checks, Drivers LicenseRecord, Degree Verification, and Drug Screens at hire. Employment is contingentupon clean drug screen, background check and driving record. Additionally,certain programs are subject to TB Screening and/or Testing.  Bilingualapplicants are encouraged to apply.JOBREQUIREMENTSEducation/Knowledge: Graduation from an accredited college of university with a Master'sDegree in Counseling, Marriage and Family Therapy, Psychology, Social Work, orother related field of study. Eligible for certification and licensure by theState of Tennessee if such exists or his/her degree/profession. Licensedpreferred. Experience:Must have course work and or experience in the areas of psychopathology,counseling, theory, cultural diversity, human development, etiology andtreatment of alcohol and drug abuse and mental illness. One year experiencepreferred. Veterans and those with military experience preferred. Physical:Exposure to biological hazards. Hearing of normal and soft tones. Close eyework. Valid driver's license- ""F"" endorsement. Lifting up to 50 lbs.Pushing/pulling up to 250 lbs. Frequent sitting, standing, walking, bending,stooping, and reaching. Must be capable of assisting in utilizing non-violentmethods of crisis intervention including therapeutic holding. Must have mentalability to exercise sound judgment under pressure. The necessary skills forthis position include the ability to demonstrate appropriate boundaries,ability to be an empathic listener, and flexibility, willingness andadaptability to work with diverse populations. Must also have the ability tocommunicate effectively and possess good time management and organizationalskills. Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1138&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Military Services Masters Clinical Counselor Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Military-Services-Masters-Clinical-Counselor-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-164185593.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,72d372409e122300b6f2f0d659a8ffe1
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:05:26:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently looking for an organized and team-oriented, full-time Registered Nurse Case Managers to join our team in West Covina. This individual must share our Core Values and possess the ability to bring our Mission to life.The Registered Nurse Case Manager’s role is to assess new and current patients’ conditions to develop and implement an individualized patient care plan.  They will educate and instruct patients’ of their care plan and evaluate and or update the patient care plan as needed.  This position will work with healthcare providers and become a liaison between them and patients’ in coordinating care plans for patients. MAJOR POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES AND FUNCTIONS: ·         Responsible for providing leadership for the clinical support team.  ·         Assists providers in communications with their patients and other healthcare providers.  ·         Implements protocols and systems for Quality Improvement activities.  ·         Works collaboratively with clinic operations. ·         Reviews provider’s incoming communication/tasks.·         Reconciles tasks with RN Scope of Practice and/or delegates as appropriate.·         Makes nursing decisions based on interpretation of data and assessments.·         Assists in effective systems for triaging walk-in patients.·         Serves as a leader of the healthcare team.·         Discusses patient findings and progress toward outcomes with providers and other members of the healthcare team.·         Participates in problem identification and resolution.·         Prioritizes, delegates assignments appropriately and complies with the standard of practice.·         Confronts difficult or conflict situations constructively and seeks appropriate assistance.·         Leads and directs others through change processes.·         Champions new ideas.·         Shares responsibility and authority with subordinates and holds them accountable for performance.·         Acts as a resource and mentor to new employees.·         Demonstrates professional and supportive behavior.·         Practices customer service standards.·         Assures that policies, protocols, safety guidelines and facility requirements are met.·         Supports audit activities.·         Assists in managing performance improvement projects.·         Provide dispensary care according to clinical medical protocols. ·         Dispense medications as prescribed by EVCHC providers.·         Provide required information and education regarding medications and drug interactions.·         Accurately complete all required documentation.·         Ensure that updated educational materials and patient instruction sheets are available and included with every prescription.·         As necessary, consult with Medical Director and/or Consulting Pharmacist regarding drug interactions.·         Take part in medical updates and training as appropriate; comply with continuing medical requirements.·         Participate in team meetings as required.·         Assistance with quality improvement activities as required.·         Other assigned duties as directed. POSITION REQUIREMENTS AND QUALIFICATIONS: Completion of accredited Registered Nurse training program, and current license as an RN in the State of California.Must relate well to all cultural and ethnic groups in the community.Able to work with minimal supervision and get along with co-workers.Community Health experience preferred. Bilingual in English and Spanish. Working Conditions/Physical/Mental Abilities and Processes:Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential job functions. Duties are performed primarily in a site/office setting. Work requires periods of standing, sitting, lifting, turning, twisting, walking, pushing, pulling, reaching, speaking, hearing, seeing and ability to articulate clearly, use of hands to finger, reaching with hands and arms. Ability to stand, sit, stoop, kneel, and bend in order to speak to patients. Ability to write notes, treatment plan comments, track records and reports. Frequent significant decisions to ensure the operations of the agency.Ability to communicate, in a positive manner, with all levels of staff.  ",Registered Nurse Case Manager Job in West Covina,Full Time,"West Covina, CA 91790",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Case-Manager-Job-West-Covina-CA-US-164598917.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,,0d503cd06f7ec7f3aab24900200e6257
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:05:28:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"About The Company""The Joint. . . the chiropractic place"" brings affordable and convenient chiropractic careto patients through locally owned and operated clinics nationwide. Staffed by dedicated,experienced, and friendly chiropractors, each of our locations offers exceptionalchiropractic maintenance care making quality healthcare easily accessible for all thoseseeking to live healthier lives.Job DescriptionFront Desk Wellness Coordinator at The Joint. . . the chiropractic place are friendly,enthusiastic individuals who are expected to:• Greet patients with friendly enthusiasm and courtesy• Assist patients in completing required paperwork• Educate patients on clinic memberships and other wellness offerings and packages• Complete transactions using point of sale software• Manage clinic phone calls• Ensure all member accounts are current and accurate• Maintain the cleanliness of the clinic and organization of workspaceSuccessful coordinators develop solid working relationships with their clinic's doctors,management, and patients. They also continually seek better ways of improving theclinic's environment to ensure an enjoyable experience for all of our patients and theirfamilies.Minimum Requirements• High school diploma or equivalent (associates degree or higher preferred)• Cheerful demeanor and positive can-do attitude• Dedication to high quality service• Able to work weekends/evenings (as required)• Able to use basic office equipment; computer, scanner, and phone system• Proficient with Microsoft Office• Maintain a professional appearance and appropriate attire• Sales experience preferred, but not mandatoryPay$10.00 per hour, with merit increases.Bonuses (determined by sales)Floater for North Dallas area must be available to travel around Dallas Guaranteed 40 Hrs. per week if available. Gas and toll ReimbursmentPlease only serious inquires only. Must have transportation and available to work full shifts. We are opened Mon-Frid 10AM-7PM, Sat 10AM-5 and some locations are opened Sunday 10AM-4PMPlease specify which location you are interested in.",Front Desk Wellness Coordinator Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Front-Desk-Wellness-Coordinator-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165245938.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2b3cab76888426ee559cc2f2015d72e9
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:05:43:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Health Imperatives is seeking an experienced Nurse Practitioner to work in amid-level security Department of Youth Services (DYS) juvenile detention center, located in Westfield, Massachusetts. Be a key member of our health care team. Our medical program stresses comprehensive assessment, community standard of treatment, health education, prevention, and continuity of care.   Qualifications: Must be licensed to practice in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts by the Massachusetts Department of Public Health. Experience working with Pediatric-Adolescents preferred. Excellent fringe benefit package: including but not limited to; generous paid earned time off, 403b retirement plan, group health/dental/vision/life, disability insurances and pet insurance.  Hours:35 hours a week Salary: $48-$49/hour Send resume & cover letter by March 9th 2016.",Nurse Practitioner Job in Westfield,Full Time,"Westfield, MA 01086",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Practitioner-Job-Westfield-MA-US-164030533.aspx?mescoid=2900505001001&jobPosition=7,48.00 - 49.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),3e65e37c5fd11022731dfb65dd78f299
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:05:43:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is currently seeking a Billing/Collections Rep in Rancho Cordova, CA!!You MUST have:a minimum of 3 years healthcare collections, billing and follow-up experience!!Qualifications & Requirements:3 to 5 RECENT years Patient Financial Services, Revenue Cycle Management experience High School diploma or equivalent Special Knowledge, Skills, AbilitiesDemonstrate an excellent understanding of benefits requirements, on-line claims status, submission, and reconciliation procedures Proficient in understanding of state insurance laws and the various appeals processes including but not limited to Insurance Commission filings Understanding of Coding requirements PFS System applications and MS Office Applications Medicare, Medicaid, Managed Care and Commercial Insurance/Self-Pay and Third Party regulations and outcomes. Strong working knowledge of current patient accounting and claims editing applications in a hospital environment. If you or anyone you know is interested in this opportunity, contact me directly at 484-434-2924 and send your most UP TO DATE resume to kkajunski@judge.comI look forward to hearing from you,Kelly",FN - Billing/Collections Rep - Senior Job in Rancho Cordova,"Full Time, Employee","Rancho Cordova, CA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/FN-Billing-Collections-Rep-Senior-Job-Rancho-Cordova-CA-US-165224420.aspx?mescoid=4300696001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,99aa49bab636a09ed5b85fc623d9cd23
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:06:01:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRN psych home health RN in Birmingham area400 University Park Dr. Birmingham, AL 35209Job# prnPSYCHRNbhmAL045299cProviding Medicare Home Health Psychiatric Visits in Birmingham!A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division.Brookdale. Bringing new life to seniors. Your responsibilities:* Evaluates the patient & home health environment to determine required services* Serves as the patient's advocate by providing information* Responsible for timely completion & synchronization of OASIS visits as required & developing the POC based on findings from evaluation visit* Involves patient & patient's family in developing the plan of careRequired skills and qualifications:* Graduate of an accredited school of professional nursing* Must have recent Medicare Home Health Psych visit experience* Licensed as an RN in the state of practice* Travel is required; must have a reliable car with current insurance coverage & a current driver's licensePlease contact Kelly Dymock for more info / kdymock@brookdale.com / 704 541 7471 / 414 299 5076 (fax)If you are a Brookdale Associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug free work place.",Psych Nurse - Home Health Job in Birmingham,Part Time Employee,"Birmingham, AL 35209",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Psych-Nurse-Home-Health-Job-Birmingham-AL-US-165223927.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,b9631b10b5d8dfa2a76c92c8ff99d2ad
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:06:02:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"<!-- /* Font Definitions */ @font-face {font-family:Times; panose-1:2 0 5 0 0 0 0 0 0 0; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} @font-face {font-family:Cambria; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:3 0 0 0 1 0;} /* Style Definitions */ p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal {mso-style-parent:""""; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:10.0pt; margin-left:0in; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-ascii-font-family:Cambria; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-fareast-font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Cambria; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} @page Section1 {size:8.5in 11.0in; margin:1.0in 1.25in 1.0in 1.25in; mso-header-margin:.5in; mso-footer-margin:.5in; mso-paper-source:0;} div.Section1 {page:Section1;} --> Physical Therapist - Home Health Care A non-profit healthcare system has an open Physical Therapy home care position right in Bucks County. The position could be either full-time or part-time. The coverage area is rather small and would keep you close to home. You would only be covering a small portion of Bucks County and the area would be dependent on where you live.  The position is salaried with guaranteed visits. * Full-Time or Part-Time * Reasonable Caseloads * CompetitiveRates and Salaries * Provides a Laptop, Cell Phone Stipend, and Mileage Reimbursement * Local Territory keeping you within a Close Radius from your Home * Strong Referral Basis, Extremely Stable Company * Treated as a Professional * Quality Patient Care * Thorough, Paid Training Program * One-On-One Patient Care * Opportunities for Advancement * Great Flexibility and Independence * Very Supportive of their Field Staff * Excellent Benefits - Inexpensive Healthcare Coverage, Over Six Weeks of Paid Time Off, Pension Plan with a Match, and Much More If you are interested in working for stable company where you truly get to provide one-on-one quality care, please consider applying. ",Physical Therapist Job in Levittown,Full Time,"Levittown, PA 19054",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Physical-Therapist-Job-Levittown-PA-US-164662170.aspx?mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=17,"75,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",,ef7151573036ca234d3d9c40f0f4b944
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:06:56:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description: AlixaRx is a national long-term care pharmacy organization that has both Full and Part-Time Closed Door Pharmacy opportunities immediately available. Our mission is to deliver pharmacy services for post-acute care medical settings that Restore Health, Improve Patient Outcomes and Provide Cost-Effective, Accessible Healthcare Solutions. AlixaRx has a new approach to pharmacy services that incorporates remote automated dispensing technology.To find out more about AlixaRx and to view a video showing our in-house designed ADU, please visit our website at http://alixarx.com Our team members must be dynamic, dedicated, patient-oriented, and have a passion for long-term care. If you are interested in joining a fast-paced, cutting edge pharmacy team, please read on!General Purpose:Provide dispensing work under the supervision of a licensed pharmacist to deliver superior patient care and customer service. Assistthe pharmacist with the day-to-day activities in a closed-door long-term care pharmacy. Support an environment that promotes optimalefficiencies, staff retention and superior quality of business office employees.Essential Job Duties:* Fill daily prescription orders: punch cards, bulk items, OTCs, compounding, cassettes, prepacks, etc.* Stock and restock medication inventory* Print daily orders for the pharmacy, and print labels and delivery sheets.* Process daily shorts and punch card buckets.* Reorder the bulks and shorts.* Create and maintain the punch-card calendar and maintain the calendar board.* Receive any incoming shipment of medication and handle all related paperwork. Position Requirements:                 Qualifications: ·           ·          High school diploma or general education degree (GED)·          Licensed and/or registered with the State Board of Pharmacy and in good standing·          National CPhT certification through the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board, preferred·          At least one year of related experience, preferred·          Must be capable of maintaining regular attendance·          Must be dependable and able to work with minimal supervision·          Must meet all local health regulations, pass post-offer drug test, and pass post-employment physical exam if required.  Knowledge, Skills, Abilities & Behaviors: ·          Basic computer skills, including fundamental knowledge of Windows based software programs, including but not limited to word·          processing and spreadsheet applications·          Ability to communicate, perform and comprehend variables within the pharmacy operation·          Capable of providing excellent customer service to all external and internal customers·          Ability to adhere to regulatory and company compliance, Code of Conduct and Business Ethics (OSHA,DEA, State Board of Pharmacy, etc.)·          Keeps abreast of current state, federal and company policies, procedures and regulations·          Ability to accept ownership and accountability for the successful completion all pharmacy production duties and tasks and achievement of pharmacy branch goals·          Understand, promote and comply with rules and regulations governing residents' rights·          Organization skills including the ability to prioritize and manage multiple tasks in a dynamic environment·          Ability to effectively and harmoniously interact with facility, group, division and company management and other employees at all·          levels; promotes teamwork and demonstrates strong professionalism·          Ability to work and produce results under pressure.  Physical and Sensory Requirements:  Mobility, reaching, bending, lifting (minimum of 10 pounds), fine hand coordination, ability to read and write, the ability to understand and follow written and oral instructions and directions, ability to travel, and ability to remain calm under pressure. Delivering the best possible care for our patients means having the best team. That's why we're committed to helping talented professionals like you achieve your professional goals on every level with: ·          Management and clinical career ladders·          Leadership training opportunities·          Company-paid trainings and certifications·          Mentoring programs and more. We are always seeking skilled professionals who are ready to take pride in their work and grow their expertise. We'll reward your dedication with a comprehensive benefits package, which includes medical insurance, retirement savings plans, paid time off and more. Join us and contribute your energy, experience and knowledge to redefining the future of care. Apply today! AlixaRx is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, age, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.",Pharmacy Technician,Full Time,"Eden Prairie, MN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pharmacy-Technician-Dispensing-1-Job-Eden-Prairie-MN-US-165115478.aspx?mescoid=2900524001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),814e2b85df6a12b92a7c3b08af1292b3
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:07:01:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"HOME HEALTH RN12 VISITS PER WEEK GUARANTEED!Allegheny Lutheran Social Ministries Home Health Program has openings for occasional RNs with current home health (nursing) experience for Cambria County. Our program is rapidly growing and provides the opportunity to contribute to our supportive and compassionate continuum of care with our in-home care program and skilled home health. Current PA RN license and prior home health experience required. OASIS assessment knowledge a plus.Come Join Our Team! Interested candidates should apply online www.alsm.org EOEHuman Resources 998 Logan Blvd. Altoona, PA 16602 EOEThis job listing brought to you by The Johnstown Tribune Democrat",Nursing Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,15905,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Nursing-Job-US-165317130.aspx?ch=newsjtpa&mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d1420169886dc643439b83c58b9a16d5
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:07:03:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you want to be part of the#1 retailer in Americaand whose Optical Departments focus on cutting edge optics, eye health care, and great value? If so, Sam’s Club is looking forLicensed Opticiansfor our Clubs inRochester, NY to provide the best in eye care to our patients. You will be an integral part of our eye healthcare team.  We are looking for patient-centered eye care professionals who are committed to exceeding patient expectations and growing your optical business through trusted eye care. In a Sam’s Club Optical Department, you can practice your optical skills while assisting our dedicated community of patients. Our vision care professionals deliver glasses, contact lenses and eye care essentials to fit every style and eye care need at an affordable cost.  Whether it is fitting or adjusting eyewear or educating your patients on progressive bifocals, you will find everything you need to service your patients in a well-supported, team-oriented atmosphere.    We can also offer you many benefits including:·Competitive compensation based on experience·Non-commission, consultative sales approach to concentrate on your patients’ eye health·A professional team-oriented atmosphere·Job security throughout the year, even during slow seasons·Career advancement opportunities·Licensure reimbursements·Great Benefits including Health, Vision, Dental and PTO etc.      Sam’s Club #8178700 ELMRIDGE CENTER DR Rochester, NY 14626 Or online at samsclub.com/apply and during the application reference Store #8178 Sam’s Club is an Equal Opportunity Employer.  ",Optician Job in Rochester,Full Time,"Rochester, NY",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Optician-Job-Rochester-NY-US-165314721.aspx?mescoid=2900532001001&jobPosition=6,,,acd801d70609b7afa15aebba27a91b83
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:07:25:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Unyts has  significantly improved our compensation package and schedule requirements for Clinical Donation Coordinators.  Are you a Critical Care Nurse looking to take your career to the next level? If so, we are looking for you! We are in search of the best and brightest RNs to join our team of dedicated professionals.Responsibilities:At Unyts, our team of Clinical Donation Coordinators assist in the management of acutely ill patients who have experienced severe neurologic injury resulting in the diagnosis of brain death. This occurs in settings such as intensive care units and cardiac care units and requires continuous vigilance, complex assessment, and high-intensity therapies and interventions. Working with the patients and their families, Unyts Clinical Donation Coordinators also focus on empathy and patient advocacy throughout the donation process.Schedule:24 hour on-call shifts. Expect 10-12 shifts per month, plus 4 in office days for trainings and meetings.Requirements:RN with 1 year or more years of critical care experience; or RN with 3 years or more of step down unit or medical/surgical unit experience.Must be able to communicate effectively and have strong interpersonal skills.Must have proficient computer skills and be detail oriented.  Must have professional appearance and demeanor. Must be detail oriented and have the flexibility necessary to fulfill on-call requirements. Valid driver’s license and reliable transportation required.To apply for this position, please visit www.unyts.org/about/careers/",Registered Nurse Clinical Donation Coordinator Job in Buffalo,Full Time,"Buffalo, NY 14203",,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Clinical-Donation-Coordinator-Job-Buffalo-NY-US-165262705.aspx?mescoid=2900502001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3e2b2e287982da9672f56ee880123bf0
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:07:35:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Build A Career That Matters Fort Wayne Orthopedics offers a meaningful career that makes a real difference in people’s lives, as well as your own. Here, we’re all about care, and that caring nature extends to our employees as well. We provide a professional environment based on respect and dedication to being the best.  Our specialty-trained experts are dedicated to providing exceptional, compassionate care in the treatment of orthopedic conditions Pre-CertificationSpecialist We have an opportunity for a detail-oriented individual to assist in obtaining prior authorizations and verifying benefits from insurance payers for services and procedures.  Prior clinical or medical facility/office experience desired.  Knowledge of insurance claims processes, coding and medical terminology beneficial.  Full-time, 8am-5pm, M-F.  Benefits include medical & dental coverage, life insurance, long/short-term disability, paid time off and a Profit Sharing/401k plan. Please visit our website at fwortho.com or our Facebook page for an overview of providers, services and locations.   ",Pre-Certification Specialist Job in Fort Wayne,Full Time,"Fort Wayne, IN 46804",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pre-Certification-Specialist-Job-Fort-Wayne-IN-US-165174817.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=13,,,0b4df7dbce6cdf33075210f9188f2a67
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:07:35:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65or geriatric patient's ages over 65. May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years. Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care. Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures. Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department. * Graduate of an accredited school of nursing. * Current Texas State RN license. * CPR (American Heart Association. * Oncology Clinical Nurse Certification (ONC™) (Chemo) or Oncology Nursing Society (ONS) preferred. * Excellent interpersonal and communication skills. * Review of patient records to ensure accurate ant complete nursing notes and required charting elements. * Ability to assess patient and threat accordingly in emergency rooms situations. * Ability to calculate BSA and ANC in patients receiving chemotherapy. * Understand patient charge process for services rendered. * Education of patients and caregivers about therapeutic effects and management of chemotherapy side effects.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse - Med/Surg Oncology Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX 78404",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Med-Surg-Oncology-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-165195642.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,e0ce49cff4ba1251fae6af68601d11c6
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:07:39:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Government & Capital Property Specialist 3 The Boeing Company - Kent, WA 98030 Posted: 2/2/2016 - Expires: 4/2/2016 Job ID: 163150931",Government & Capital Property Specialist  Job in Kent,,"Kent, WA 98030",,http://jobview.monster.com/Government-Capital-Property-Specialist-3-Job-Kent-WA-US-163150931.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=19,,,171f390e0f7269ee10af4ac6fbff00ef
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:08:01:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Reporting to the Director, Policy and Quality (Director), the Policy/Advocacy Fellow will maintain a comprehensive understanding of the oncology policy landscape, contribute to the overall development, management, and advancement of NCCN’s policy initiatives and agenda, and manage the efforts of the NCCN Policy Advisory Group. This position requires occasional overnight travel. MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES: ·        Research and analysiso   Track legislation and cancer-policy issues relevant to NCCN Mission and Visiono   In consultation with the Director, respond to requests for information or updates regarding cancer-policy issueso   Manage the NCCN Policy Advisory Group by performing policy research and analysis and organizing and participating in meetings and conference callso   Attend Policy and Advocacy meetings, briefings and other cancer-policy events of interest to the oncology communityo   Plan and implement the NCCN Policy Summit Series and other policy-related programs and initiatives under the guidance of the Director and NCCN Leadership    o   Monitor and engage in global oncology policy issues, including examination of issues and opportunities relevant to the NCCN Mission and Vision in developing countries and emerging markets·        Advocacyo   Work with the Director to prepare and coordinate responses to policy issues including Federal Register notices and requests for comments and support from NCCN Member Institutions and outside organizationso   Act as a point of contact and represent NCCN in regular meetings and conference calls with cancer-policy and advocacy coalitions·        Communicationso   Update and provide counsel to NCCN leadership on relevant happenings in the oncology space and the development and execution of policy prioritieso   Author white paperso   Write regular articles and a weekly policy updateo   Contribute to JNCCN — Journal of the National Comprehensive Cancer Network and NCCN e-newsletterso   Assist in maintaining Policy and Advocacy content on NCCN.orgo   Contribute to the monitoring and awareness of use of NCCN Content by public and private payerso   Work with Global Business Development team and NCCN Leadership to communicate global oncology policy issues to all relevant stakeholders EDUCATION/RELATED EXPERIENCE: ·        Successful completion of a bachelor’s or master’s program in health policy, public policy, public health, business, economics, or other non-profit or health care related field·        Knowledge of national oncology policy, quality of care discussion and movement, as well as key challenges facing stakeholders SKILLS AND ABILITIES: Excellent interpersonal and communication skillsStrong attention to detail and excellent project management skillsStrategic thinkerOrganizational ability to manage multiple tasks simultaneously and independentlyStrong proofreading skills and absolute attention to detailProficient in MS Office products This position represents a unique opportunity to build a career with a premier organization. We offer competitive salary and excellent benefits. Send resume with salary history to jobs@nccn.org. EOE. No calls please.The National Comprehensive Cancer Network® (NCCN®), a not-for-profit alliance of 26 of the world’s leading cancer centers devoted to patient care, research, and education, is dedicated to improving the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of cancer care so that patients can live better lives. Through the leadership and expertise of clinical professionals at NCCN Member Institutions, NCCN develops resources that present valuable information to the numerous stakeholders in the health care delivery system. As the arbiter of high-quality cancer care, NCCN promotes the importance of continuous quality improvement and recognizes the significance of creating clinical practice guidelines appropriate for use by patients, clinicians, and other health care decision-makers. The primary goal of all NCCN initiatives is to improve the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of cancer care so patients can live better lives.",Policy/Advocacy Fellow Job in Fort Washington,Full Time,"Fort Washington, PA 19034",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Policy-Advocacy-Fellow-Job-Fort-Washington-PA-US-165259583.aspx?mescoid=2500373001001&jobPosition=17,,,8fd4d521e79abc4382999e0afea586a9
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:08:02:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Integrated Medical Systems International, Inc. (IMS), a wholly owned subsidiary of STERIS Corporation, provides surgical instrument and device management, as well as clinical consulting, for more than 2,500 healthcare facilities. IMS offers fast turn-around time, competitive pricing and a commitment to helping customers avoid expensive replacement instruments through effective maintenance and proper handling.  IMS is rapidly growing our business and offers a dynamic environment, challenging work, and opportunity.   Sterile Processing Technician     Summary Provides on-site support for the reprocessing of surgical instruments and trays to contracted facilities in compliance with the Department of Health, TJC, OSHA, CDC, AAMI and AORN standards and facilities goals and policies.   Essential Job Functions    Supports daily operations of all activities that relate to the reprocessing of reusable medical supplies and instrumentation including decontamination, cleaning, assembly, wrapping, sterilization, and storage processes within all set professional standards and regulations. Awareness of concepts of the Lean work environment. Communicates in a professional manner to all hospital staff and company employees. Refers all decisions beyond personal scope of responsibilities to IMS leadership. Reports broken instrumentation. Adheres to IMS dress requirements, is neat and well-groomed at all times. Arrives at facility at scheduled time and is consistently ready for work assignments. Exhibits professional behavior in all telephone and electronic communications. Represents IMS, self and profession positively in all public arenas. Supports and adheres to IMS policies and procedures. Participates in in-services and educational offerings provided by IMS in the facility. Supervisory Responsibilities                                                    This job has no supervisory responsibilities. Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Job Requirements:  Education and/or Experience                                                   High School graduate or equivalent required. Previous CS/SPD experience preferred Computer Skills                                               Basic computer skills and aptitude.  Certificates, Licenses, Registrations Ability to obtain certification within 12 months of hire strongly preferred. Other Skills and Abilities                          None. Other Qualifications                                                     Ability to work daily in a fast-paced, high pressure Healthcare Service environment. Physical Demands The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to stand; walk; use hands and reach with hands and arms. The employee is frequently required to sit, stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl and talk, see and hear.  The employee must frequently lift and/or move up to 50 pounds, push and/or pull up to 300 pounds on a cart or carriage. Work Environment The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is frequently exposed to biohazardous material, fumes or airborne particles, and toxic or caustic chemicals. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderately loud. IMS, a wholly owned subsidiary of STERIS Corporation. STERIS is a $1.9B+, publicly traded (NYSE) organization of over 8000 employees and is dedicated to providing innovative infection prevention, decontamination, and health science technologies, products and services.  IMS Corporation complies with all obligations with respect to online application systems under guidelines provided by the US Department of Labor's Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. If you are a disabled person who requires reasonable accommodation to complete an online application, please contact the STERIS Human Resources Department.   IMS is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants.  Applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status.    ",Sterile Processing Technician - nd Shift Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL 60290",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Sterile-Processing-Technician-2nd-Shift-Job-Chicago-IL-US-164629843.aspx?mescoid=3100557001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,dc01f9150d4c20f4014fb5949c47c144
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:08:29:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sojourn  - Substance Abuse SolutionsFull Time COUNSELORAddiction Treatment Center.  Minimum Bachelor's Degree in Behavioral Healthcare and CADCpreferred; Competitive salary & benefitsMail resume & references by March 28, 2016 to: Brenda Albertson, Clinical SupervisorSojourn House565 N Turner Ave. Freeport, IL 61032Or email: brenda@sojournhouse.comEOE",Counselor - Addiction Treatment Center Job in Freeport,Full Time,"Freeport, IL 61032",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Counselor-Addiction-Treatment-Center-Job-Freeport-IL-US-164751728.aspx?mescoid=2100309001001&jobPosition=1,,,f436e1de19a98a89f533d30a3a2d08a1
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:08:40:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that the care we give can make every moment count.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s how our Hospice improves quality of life in the final stages of life. By delivering palliative care by hospice professionals, our patients can spend their remaining days in comfort and peace.   Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. We believe that every moment matters. We believe in compassionate care. Most of all, we believe in dignity and respect for each patient we serve. I believe my work is my calling.As a Hospice LPN, you will:Provide skilled professional nursing care to patient/family/caregiver as directed by the supervising Case Manager or the Patient Care Manager and in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations and with Company’s policies and procedures.Provide timely documentation of patient services based on plan of care.Identify other physical, psychological, social and spiritual needs for assigned patients. Work closely with other members of the interdisciplinary team to ensure all patient and family care needs are being met. Implement nursing plan of care as directed by the interdisciplinary team and Patient Care Manager.Provide professional nursing care by utilizing all elements of nursing process as directed by the plan of care.Responsible for checking and ordering medications.Assess and provide patient/family/caregiver education and information pertinent to diagnosis and self-plan of care.Participate in coordination of Hospice services, appropriately communicating and reporting the need for Hospice interdisciplinary team members (e.g., HCA, OT, PT, MSW, ST, Dietitian) to the Case Manager or Patient Care Manager.Order and use equipment and supplies effectively and efficiently.Provide appropriate pain/symptom management.  Evaluate patient’s response to treatments/medications.Required SkillsQualifications:LPN or LVN licensed in the state where program is located  Graduate of accredited practical nurse or vocational nursing programMinimum of one-year general nursing experienceCommunity health/Hospice or medical/surgical experienceUnderstanding of Hospice philosophy and needs of terminally illSelf-directed with ability to work with little supervisionDemonstrate excellent observation, good nursing judgment and communication skillsAbility to provide good written documentation in a timely mannerRequired ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, cardio nurse, cardio LPN, cardio LVN, cardiac nurse, cardiac LPN, cardiac LVN, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, home health nurse, homecare nurse, home care nurse, home health LPN, home health LVN, homecare LPN, homecare LVN, home care LPN, home care LVN, hospice nurse, hospice LPN, hospice LVN, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, LPN, LVN, L.P.N., L.V.N., license practical nurse, licensed practical nurse, license vocational nurse, licensed vocational nurse, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology LPN, oncology LVN, oncology nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho LPN, ortho LVN, palliative care LPN, palliative care LVN, LPN Job, LVN Job, LPN jobs, LVN jobs, Nursing, nursing job, nursing jobs, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab LPN, rehab LVN, rehab nurse, skilled visit, staff LPN, staff LVN, staff nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit LPN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry LPN, telemetry LVN, travel nurse, travel LPN, travel LVN, visit nurse, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. Job LocationHutchinson, Kansas, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Per Diem Hospice LPN Job in Hutchinson,,"Hutchinson, KS",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Per-Diem-Hospice-LPN-Job-Hutchinson-KS-US-165225324.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=8,,,d1132fc745c657f6b9ddea14f5595f7f
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:05:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-Time; Available to work evenings and weekends, shift differential available.Brookdale Richmond Heights #3 Homewood Way Richmond Heights, OH 44143 Job #:055023Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management* Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus* Two years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Richmond Heights,Full Time Employee,"Richmond Heights, OH 44143",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-LPN-Job-Richmond-Heights-OH-US-165221564.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=18,,Medical/Health,cd2dd8e3e9d260177f80986b628d45c1
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:09:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"HOSPITAL, INFUSION, LTC & RETAIL PHARMACISTS Philadelphia and surrounding areas Become a preferred candidate with UNITED Pharmacy Staffing.UNITED Pharmacy Staffing, a Joint Commission certified agency, has been placing Pharmacists and Pharmacy Technicians in permanent, contract and temporary positions in Hospitals, Retail, Infusion and LTC since 1997 from coast to coast.Whether you are ACTIVELY or PASSIVELY seeking a new opportunity, submit your resume so one of our local recruiting specialists can contact you to discuss available options.Submitting your confidential resume allows us to quickly contact you and share opportunities that match your experience and goals.Positions come and go fast.At UNITED Pharmacy, we look first to our in-house database to contact the pharmacy professionals we already know.We won’t waste your time and use complete confidentiality regarding your resume/profile. Your resume is never sent to anyone without your permission.Send us your resume today and let our experienced recruiters include you on all active searches.",Pharmacists Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19102",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Pharmacists-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165187406.aspx?mescoid=2900462001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bb5ae04e7dde75164558d5d55b5649ef
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:15:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Come work for a company that has been voted one of New York State's 'Best Places to Work' 8 years in a row!Horizon Health Services is a not-for-profit corporation that provides an array of comprehensive services to assist individuals with mental health and/or substance abuse issues to make choices that improve their quality of life and achieve their personal recovery goals.We provide fully integrated behavioral health, medical and vocational rehabilitation services in community-based settings.We are committed to progressive, innovative and evidence-based practices.We provide a broad range of comprehensive and specialized services with a focus on the individual and family.Job SummaryUnder the supervision of the Program Director, the Chemical Dependency Senior Counselor is responsible for assessing client needs in areas of service planning, group process, and direct services to consumers. This position is located in Orchard Park, NY. Duties and ResponsibilitiesMaintain a caseload consistent with regulationsConducts comprehensive assessment of consumer needsBased on assessment, develops a treatment plan reflective of these needs and identified strengthsInitiates consultation with multi-disciplinary team regarding consumer assessment and treatment planOngoing assessment of service needs and modification of treatment plan to reflect these changing needsProvides consumer with linkages to other supportive services as identified in the assessmentMaintains consumer records and ensures documentation consistent with regulatory agencies, UR/QA, and payersProvides crisis intervention and management to consumersMaintains working relationships with referral agencies and supportive services to enable comprehensive service provision to consumersPerforms other duties as defined by the Program DirectorThis job description should not be construed to imply that these requirements are the exclusive standards of the position.  Incumbents may be required to follow any other instructions, and to perform any other related duties, that may be required by their supervisor.QualificationsTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.  The requirements listed below are representative of the minimum levels of knowledge, skill, and/or ability necessary.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.Basic Knowledge/Skills/AbilitiesDemonstrates a knowledge base upon which they provide direct service and clinical advisementExperienceAt least 2 years of chemical dependency as well experience with adolescent and adult treatment. 2 evening shifts and a Saturday morning shift required.Education/Licensure/CertificatesMinimum Masters degree requiredLMSW, LMHC, LCSW, or CASAC requiredApplicants without minimum education will not be considered for this position.",Chemical Dependency Senior Counselor- Orchard Park Job in Orchard Park,Full Time Employee,"Orchard Park, NY 14127",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Chemical-Dependency-Senior-Counselor-Orchard-Park-Job-Orchard-Park-NY-US-165172855.aspx?ch=buffalonews&mescoid=2100309001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,b0ad414f154844ccf30f13092f3657ea
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:17:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is currently seeking a Director Medical Management/ Care Management! This job will have the following responsibilities:Creates clinical programs to meet the needs of members in Care Management. Works closely with Medical Informatics team to identify trends that need to be addressed with program management. Monitors the program work plan to assure attainment of Medical Management annual goals. Responsible for Care Management clinical inter-rater reliability and monitoring important aspects of care. Directs the work of subordinates in dissimilar functions.Effectively manages the activities of staff providing leadership and guidance. Interviews, recommends for hire, and evaluates staff, and counsels and confronts unsatisfactory performance promptly and fairly and administers corrective action.Identifies department goals and objectives, develops and communicates action plans through regular staff meetings and other communications, uses team approach to problem solve and sets clear expectations. Identifies training needs and develops and participates in staff training. Provides a challenging and supportive environment and delegates appropriately.Seeks additional training opportunities through outside sources.Analyzes work plans developed by subordinate managers and monitors the status of their work in relation to the overall schedule requirements. Develops monitoring systems and measurements and exhibits a customer service philosophy. Manages statistical and qualitative information concerning patient outcomes and physician/hospital practice patterns in accordance with health plans utilization standards. Intervenes with hospital or physician contractors to examine cases to ensure methods for meeting these utilization standards while maintaining precedent for quality of case standards. Determines and enforces - through functional groups - medical management requirements in accordance with real company needs, based on current regulations and state-of-the art product development.Qualifications & Requirements:Education Bachelors degree in health services, Nursing or other health-related field; desire Masters Degree in health services administration or equivalent.  Certification/Licensure Required Must have and maintain current valid and unrestricted Registered Nursing (RN) license Valid state driver's license Five years clinical experience in an acute care settingFour years experience in quality management/improvement in a health care settingTwo years work experience in a managed care environmentFive years management experience in a health care settingThree years medical management experience in an HMO setting desired",Director of Medical Management Job in Rancho Cordova,"Full Time, Employee","Rancho Cordova, CA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Medical-Management-Job-Rancho-Cordova-CA-US-165314615.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,4c9330136b60e59f51f26bccf1faf1f6
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:18:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pharmcare USA has an opening for a senior accountant in our corporate office in Hydro, Oklahoma. Duties include managing several accounts - both AP and AR, general ledger work, assisting with preparation of the financials and reconciling of bank statements. May also provide lead direction to other accounting team members.Minimum of 2 years experience in Accounting function, with Quick Books experience as a plus.This position may be located in Oklahoma City, but will be required to travel to corporate office in Hydro frequently.",Senior Accountant Job in Hydro,Full Time,"Hydro, OK 73048",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Accountant-Job-Hydro-OK-US-165228128.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1f2498f100e24c3a28846e8cbe5e99fc
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:18:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Nurse Practitioners Fulltime Openings:   Livingston and Huntsville ClinicsPRN positions:  Willis Clinic and Huntsville Clinics  Willis Express and Specialty Clinic Family Practice and Specialty Location:  Interstate 45 and FM 1097 Huntsville Memorial Hospital has clinics in these areas:  Coldspring, Huntsville, Livingston, Madisonville, Riverside and WillisTo apply or for a complete list of our current openings Visit our website at:  www.huntsvillememorial.com",Nurse Practitioner Job in Huntsville,Full Time,"Huntsville, TX 77340",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Practitioner-Job-Huntsville-TX-US-162602263.aspx?mescoid=2900505001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),20493ffcee7f8bc84e6b1e47c61859fb
United States of America,US,09/Nov/2015:09:19:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Family & Children’s Center is excited to announce that we are hiring staff for our brand new Level 5 Treatment Foster Home!Our treatment foster home is a newly constructed building set to house three youth from the La Crosse area with the option for a respite bed (for youth needing short-term, occasional stays). The youth in this home may be mentally ill or developmentally delayed and may also experience behavior dysregulation; knowledge/experience with Restrictive Measures Plans, Positive Behavior Support Plans, autism spectrum, and challenging behaviors is a plus. This position has two main components: community integration (hiking, biking, going for walks, swimming, going to the library, and other recreational activities) and direct care (medication administration, meal preparation, hygiene, etc.)  This is a very active and engaging job that is as much rewarding as it is fun!Seeking Part-Time staff for all shifts including: mornings, afternoon/evenings, overnights and weekends. Must be 21 years or older, have a good driving record and pass a drug test and criminal background check to be eligible for hire.  Part-time employment benefits include Vacation Pay, Life Insurance, and 401(K) Savings Plan. If you would like to be considered for an employment opportunity, please apply online at www.fcconline.org/careers.aspx Direct any questions and/or submit application materials to Melissa Duin, HR Associate Email:fccemployment@fccnetwork.orgPhone: (608) 785-0001 ext. 281Fax: (608) 785-0002Address: 1707 Main Street, La Crosse, WI 54601Family & Children's Center is an equal opportunity employer.",Level  Treatment Foster Home Staff Job in La Crosse,Part Time Employee,"La Crosse, WI 54601",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Level-5-Treatment-Foster-Home-Staff-Job-La-Crosse-WI-US-165306839.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,d97241e393464c9b49b6a4a9e934acff
